<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7002</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (11):
State sell-offs prove inviting - John Murray Brown explains the foreign
interest in cement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CEMENT, like so many of the industries attracting foreign interest in
Turkey, is booming for one simple reason - the country's vast underdeveloped
home market.
The point is often missed by those preoccupied with Turkey's role as a
regional trade hub; but, like cars and the food and beverage industry, the
most exciting sectors are those narrowly focused on the increasingly
prosperous Turkish consumer.
Cement is one of the most promising. Foreign interest is rising, in
anticipation of the sale of 11 state-owned companies, the results of which
are expected to be announced before the end of the year. Faced with the new
competition, the large domestic producers are pushing through their own
modernisation plans to stay in touch.
'We come here to acquire market share,' said Mr Pierre Conso, the former
head of Societe Ciments Francais (SCF), during a visit to Ankara last year.
European cement concerns, stifled by a downturn in activity in their home
markets, are looking to Turkey to boost their balance sheets. The strategy,
as in the car sectors and the food and beverage industry where there has
also been a surge of foreign interest, is to tap into Turkey's large and
still relatively undeveloped local market.
'Turkey is one of the last European countries where we see real growth
prospects,' says Mr Claude Grinfeder, head of SCF's East European Division.'
We didn't know the market, but we knew our product.'
Production, at around 26m tonnes a year, is equivalent to the amount of
cement sold in Spain or France. But more important, sales are growing at
around 4-5 per cent, according to Adnan Ignebekcili, president of SCF's
local Turkish company, Set Group Holding. Analysts, looking at the level of
average annual consumption, believe the country still has a way to go.
'This growth will continue,' says Hac Sabanc, head of the cement division of
the local Sabanc Holding Group, Turkey's largest privately owned industrial
conglomerate.
Demand in the housing sector is rising, as home-owners try to hedge against
rampant inflation. What is perhaps more surprising, the market for cement
seems to have been little affected by the government's decision to cut back
on public infrastructure spending.
The Turkish cement market tends to be highly regional. For example, it is
not easy for producers in Izmir to break into the Istanbul market, as they
discovered last year, during a brief price war. The cost of transport and
the lack of a good road and rail system has proved a disincentive to
competition, and helps to explain why small producers, with plants with less
than optimum capacities, are able to survive. In Turkey, 80 per cent of
sales are still made in sacks; the rest is bulk sales. In Europe the reverse
is true.
Undoubtedly, part of the catalyst for all this activity was provided by the
arrival of the big foreign players. Many of the local concerns were clearly
taken by surprise. In some quarters, the issue provoked a chauvinistic
reaction with industrialists openly voicing opposition to the policy of
selling state assets to foreign groups.
Indeed, in 1989 SCF, the French group, found itself caught in a legal
dispute, after deputies took action in the courts to have the sale declared
illegal, on the grounds that the companies had not first been offered to
domestic buyers. Ironically the deputies were from the party of the current
prime minister, Mr Suleyman Demirel, when he was still in opposition.
Earlier this year, Mr Demirel was invited to preside over the opening of
SCF's latest investment, a Dollars 70m expansion of its clinker plant near
Ankara - an irony not lost on local commentators.
Sabanc, Turkey's largest producer with around 15 per cent of the market,
welcomes the foreign competition. Mr Hac Sabanc says this has forced the
local companies to diversify their product range and make investments which
they might otherwise have postponed. Cement is now Sabanc's second most
important business. Mr Sabanc is one of five brothers who run the holding
company, believes the company will remain a force to be reckoned.
'Italy was at the bottom of the world league table, and now they're the
largest cement producer. The only thing in our minds is to how to achieve
that sort of growth,' he says.
The company is now examining some of the 11 companies slated for
privatisation. 'It's impossible to build a new plant, because of the cost of
land.'
Ten years ago, Citosan, the state company, controlled more than 50 per cent
of the market. Today, privatisation provides the opening for a number of
foreign groups to enter the Turkish cement market. In 1989, in the first
round of sales, Ciments Francais invested Dollars 105m in the Turkish cement
sector, buying five plants. In 1990, the company purchased a sixth and
embarked on a major expansion into ready-mixed concrete, pre-fabricated
products and aggregates. All the factories are located inland, another
reminder of the fact that this is not an export business. The company says
it has also spent Dollars 42m on modernising the plants and installing
environmental controls.
Following in its wake, Lafarge Coppee, the French group now the world's
largest producer of building materials, acquired the Aslan Cimento company
through a private share placement by the state-owned Isbank. The plant, one
of Turkey's largest, with capacity of 1.5m tonnes, accounts for about 20 per
cent of the key Istanbul cement market.
Lafarge has also bought a clinker plant near Ankara, and plans to use the
site to build a full cement works in an area where the company estimates
that there is still under-capacity. The company is now developing its
presence in the ready-mix market, which industry officials say is growing by
25-30 per cent a year. The company bought into the Istanbul market, through
its purchase of the local Ekmel Beton.
With the latest round of sales by the privatisation agency, an estimated 18
per cent share of the Turkish cement market is available. The French groups,
SCF and Lafarge, have both made offers. Local municipalities have set up
companies in order to be able to bid for the local cement factories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7003</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (7): More
will own shares / Assessing the stock market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MCDERMOTT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ISTANBUL Stock Exchange (ISE), Turkey's only one, plans to move next
year from the building which used to house the company Eros, producing
underwear, to modern premises with fully computerised facilities.
The move is necessary because, although it is a comparatively small entity,
with the shares in 143 companies being traded in October, the ISE is facing
challenges that reflect the severe demands of the government's privatisation
programme and a desire on the part of brokers to spread share ownership.
The genealogy of the ISE stretches back to the Dersaadet Stock Exchange in
the 19th century, when it was the country's most organised exchange. The
Capital Market Board was established in 1982. Regulations governing the
establishment of the ISE were approved by the government in October 1984. It
opened late in 1985, and began operations the following year.
The Interbank Market was initiated in February 1986, the Foreign Exchange
Market in August 1988, the Gold Market in March 1989.
The ISE's opening to international investors permitted free repatriation of
dividends, and initial investment and capital gains were allowed. Taxes on
capital gains were suspended. But foreign investment has still to take off.
The Securities Market was established in June 1991. In May, amendments were
introduced to the Capital Markets law, which aimed at providing greater
investor protection against insider trading. These changes were intended to
encourage local institutional investment and to boost liquidity on the ISE.
In July, the government introduced tax reforms to revive (from January 1993)
market activity, by giving encouragement to investors through tax
exemptions, and to companies considering equity flotations.
The daily average volume of trade in shares has increased considerably in
the past five years - from Dollars 417,000 in 1988 to Dollars 3.2m in 1989,
and over Dollars 34m by the end of 1991 (Dollars 37.8m January-September
1992). The total trading value rose from Dollars 16m in 1986 to Dollars
8.5bn in 1991 (Dollars 7bn in the first eight months of this year). The
number of shares traded rose over the same periods from 3m to 4.5m (8.9m
during January-September 1992). The major surge in activity was between 1989
and 1990, when annual trading volume rose from Dollars 818m to Dollars 5.9bn
and the number of companies traded from 76 to 110.
The ISE index - 100 in January 1986 - hit a peak of 5,384.48 in July 1990,
and stood at 3,894.63 in the middle of last month.
The growth in the capital markets is reflected by the fact that, while the
ratio of stock market rights issues to annual gross domestic savings in the
economy was 1.5 per cent in 1989, it had reached an estimated 8.1 per cent
in 1991.
However, Turkey's domestic capital markets have been dominated by government
debt, with the result that private companies rely almost entirely on bank
debt for financing. But while the ISE may have grown in real terms six-fold
since 1990, this has largely been accounted for by the introduction in April
of a second board for bonds, which effectively meant government paper.
But there have been major fluctuations - notably in October last year,
coinciding with the general election - to the extent that the Capital
Markets Board felt the need to issue a new decree to discourage
short-selling as a result of heavy daily speculative trading.
The market recovered after the election, but broader price indices over the
past two years indicate the extent that the ISE - hit by inflation and the
depreciation of the Turkish lira against the dollar - is one of the more
under-performing markets among developing countries, and one which, in spite
of legislation, is still not attractive to foreign investors.
Another factor affecting the market negatively is the trading volume of
public-sector securities, which make up about 80 per cent of the total
trading volume of the capital markets.
The Turkish authorities - as recently as the spring of this year - were
hoping that a growing number of institutional players on the ISE would
reduce the market's volatility. Euromoney wrote that:
'Material produced by securities house Global Securities shows the wild
fluctuations in price/earnings (p/e) ratios for the 140 stocks on the
exchange. In September 1989 . . . the index p/e was 9.6. In 1990, the index
went through an extraordinary roller-coaster ride, with p/es reaching 30.9
at its peak in September. Indeed, for a period between the end of 1989 and
the third quarter of 1990, Istanbul was the world's best performing index.
The Gulf war brought the index back to 1989 levels of 13 or 14, and today
(May 1992) it stands at 10.5.'
On October 16, it stood at 10.93. Dividend yield that day was 5.95 per cent.
In terms of profitability, according to a study based on the performance of
companies quoted on the ISE, the energy sector was in the lead, with
Cukurova Elektrik and Kepez Eelektrik the outstanding companies. This
sector, which recorded TL44.81 profit for every TL100 of electricity sold,
was followed by the tourism sector (37.56 per cent), insurance/leasing
(27.29), electronics (26.30), construction (23.44) and cement (20.37).
More recently, the ISE saw a fall in July of 3.3 per cent in the composite
index; but the index fluctuated between 3,900 and 4,200 points, and a
further decrease of 2.5 per cent was recorded in lire terms in August
(reflecting an eight-month decrease of 4.9 per cent in lire terms and 31.5
per cent in dollar terms).
Trading volume in August fell strikingly by 47 per cent, compared with the
previous month. Overall, during the first seven months of 1992, according to
Global Securities, the Istanbul-based brokerage house, the ISE's composite
index fell to 3,141.98 points, to rise as high as 5,128.91.
Mr Haydar Serezli, general manager of Cars Securities, the largest brokerage
company, with 5.2 per cent of total transactions in 1991, pleads for wider
education in equity investment, to coax money out from under bedspreads and
into the ISE.
He regrets the lack of interest among foreign investors, and wants more
involvement by institutional investors. He does not see a need for exchanges
elsewhere in the country, for his company is able to provide information to
3,000 people a day in six different cities on any one working day. But he
points out: 'It is not yet a mature market. There is a huge unfulfilled
demand in the local market.'
Once the ISE has moved and is fully automated, Mr Serezli expects to see
much interest among the 60 per cent of the national population of potential
shareholders who live in the main 15 cities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7004</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (6):
Innovative showman - Profile of Erol Aksoy, of Iktisat Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MCDERMOTT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Erol Aksoy has acquired, in Turkish banking terms, a formidable list of
titles.
Born in Istanbul in 1946 (thus the age of fifty still beckons), he is
vice-chairman (but leading light) of Iktisat Bank, with a net worth of
Dollars 50m and representative offices in New York, London and Moscow.
The bank handles between 8 and 9 per cent of Turkey's two-way trade finance.
Already in 1991, in its investment role, it accounted for 17 per cent of
commercial paper issued and 11 per cent of corporate bonds in Turkey.
Mr Aksoy is also chairman of: Iktisat Leasing, the first company of this
kind to be set up in Turkey; Hayat and Emek Sigorta, life and non-life
insurance companies; Banque Internationale de Commerce (BIC), with more than
Dollars 1bn on loan tombstones in Paris (75 per cent owned by Iktisat); BIC
International Credit, in London; and the Park Avenue Bank, in New York, a
small bank with equity of Dollars 15m.
Turkey, he protests, had become, in banking terms 'very introverted'. He has
tried to change this.
His ambitions, interests and career achievements have not necessarily
endeared him to his closest associates. But he is persuasive in
conversation, as one who has gone out to be first in whatever fields he
attacks. He occupies an office that is dimly-lit and hung with many
paintings in heavy gilt frames. The intended impression is of old money  -
though it is not. Books include 'Leadership Secrets of Attila the Hun'. Mr
Aksoy also has the largest collection of Iznik tiles in Paris (half his
personal collection) - a harmony of aquamarine and turquoise.
At the same time, his rise to banking influence and authority reflects other
aspects of his life. His education includes a BS degree in electrical
engineering from MIT, 18 months in the Turkish army, an MBA from Harvard
Business School and a baccalaureate from the Lycee Michelet in Paris.
More intriguing than the facts and figures of the organisations that he
controls is the way in which he was involved with the largest family-owned
conglomerates - Koc and Sabanc.
In 1976, Mr Aksoy became vice-president in charge of finance at the Koc
group, and then general manager of Garanti Bank, owned by both Koc and
Sabanc. This bank's operations were not a success, not least because Sabanc
was reluctant to have it succeed in a way which would have provided
competition with Akbank (wholly-owned by Sabanc).
In 1980, he became managing-director of Interbank, owned by Mehmet Emin
Karamehmet, head of the troubled Cukurova family group, developing the bank
into the country's first wholesale trade finance bank - thanks, in part, to
being able to draw on his US background by introducing into the office
marble, roses and clean-limbed executives.
In 1984 came a turning-point, when he managed to acquire, for next to
nothing, a small regional bank - Iktisat Bank. He expanded its activities to
the growing capital markets in Turkey through its subsidiaries.
There were financial links between Interbank and Iktisat, which helped the
latter out of its troubles, thereby enabling it to provide a basis from
which to move overseas.
For, through 75 per cent ownership, he is chairman of the bank in Paris and
has also acquired control of ownership of the small New York bank - the Park
Avenue Bank. It was another first for Mr Aksoy, in that it made him the
first Turkish banker to venture to issue Turkish paper overseas and to
syndicate loans for Turkish companies there.
Meanwhile, he has displayed his showmanship by having one of the largest
ocean-going yachts in Turkey, and by defying, legally, TRT, the government
broadcasting agency, through the direct beaming of private television
programmes from Paris to his homeland. It has not made him loved, but he has
shown that the Turkish banking system has room for ingenuity and innovation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7005</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (8): A
wider market is sought - Gold may be given its freedom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE growing mutterings that the government is considering lifting the
remaining restrictions on Turkey's fledgling gold market.
Three years after gold trading was approved, officials are studying the
possibility of freeing the import of gold, which is still a central bank
monopoly, opening a refinery, and making a paper-based market to trade in
the precious commodity.
With the republics of the former Soviet Union searching for outlets for
their gold production, Turkey has revived the search for a gold trading
market.
Mr Yarun Toruner, the head of the Istanbul stock exchange, is said to be
considering establishing a paper-based market in the covered bazaar, where
much of the gold trading currently takes place. Traders say such a market
would provide a useful hedge for gold manufacturers. Turkey today has a
flourishing jewellery business, fuelled in large part by the tourist trade.
Turkey is also a hub of a large regional trade. The country is the largest
gold consumer in the Middle East. According to Gold Fields Mineral Services,
of London, the Middle East accounts for about 30 per cent of the world's
supply of scrap gold. The World Gold Council recently opened an office in
Istanbul. Gold News, a magazine for the trade, now has some 3,000 local
subscribers.
The country is still considered a cheap place to buy gold. In 1991, the
central bank sold 113 tones. The Bank sells on a consignment basis, using
two designated banks and 26 approved exchange dealers, at the official
international price plus freight and insurance charges. Traditionally, about
half the imports are re-exported as fabricated gold. Perhaps as much as 10
per cent of Turkey's imported gold is produced as the Republic coins.
In many Turkish families, gold is still held as a hedge against rapid
inflation and a depreciating currency. Historically, many of the Ottoman
government officials returning home after the collapse of the empire found
gold a convenient commodity to bring with them. Traders also hope some of
the 5,000 tonnes, which is estimated to be hoarded away, may come to the
market.
The problem, as ever, is one of control. Before the mid-1980s, gold trading
was an illicit activity. The establishment of an official market for the
commodity is widely acknowledged as one of the best examples of Turkey's
drive to liberalise its financial markets under the former Ozal
administration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7006</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (4):
Policies criticised as incompatible / Banking - a successful sector. But are
there too many players?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MCDERMOTT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIBERALISATION has brought with it two big questions. Is Turkey overbanked?
And is it over-regulated?
Concern also remains as to whether it is over-dominated by the big four:
Ziraat (the largest commercial institution, with branches in London, New
York and Frankfurt, and which controls about 40 per cent of total deposits
and supplies credit to the agricultural sector), Akbank, Isbank and Yap ve
Kredi.
Banking is one of the country's most successful economic sectors - not least
when performance is identified on the Istanbul Stock Exchange - though
profits are currently leaner than last year.
But arguments have persisted, which Mr Rusdu Saracoglu, the central bank
governor, tactfully tides over, about the extent to which the government is
committed to curb inflation and is resorting to short-term advances from the
central bank in order to finance economic growth.
Mr Saracoglu regrets that the central bank is seen as 'an arm of the
government', rather than an independent entity.
The World Bank also wonders whether the government has a coherent banking
policy for the next three years. Inflation of about 70 per cent in itself
causes less concern than a feeling that the government should try to find a
balance between the inflation rate, the growth rate, the balance of payments
and the financing of the budget deficit.
But the governor has urged that Turkey should follow the German example and
make the central bank more independent of the government, and even impose a
legal limit on the value of bank notes in circulation.
The central bank believes there are too many small banks, and that new
licences handed out by the Treasury were a mistake. Of more than 80 local
players, including commercial and investment banks, only 12 had more than
100 branches, and 25 have less than 10. Some bankers argue that Turkey is
not overbanked, but over-branched.
Mr Erol Sabanc, managing director of Akbank, one of the most profitable
institutions, has said: 'I don't believe we need so many banks. Mergers
among government banks can and should be done, and also in the private
sector.' But since the sector seems to be profitable and successful, there
is resistance to change.
In theory, the 1980s were a decade of reform and restructuring, to enable
Turkish banks to integrate and compete in the international arena. Interest
rates on loans and deposits were freed, as was the foreign exchange market.
However, much of the state-regulated system has remained - hampered by the
political in-fighting of the various offices which control and run the
economy.
Liberalising legislation came into force at the beginning of 1980, when
there were 5,975 bank branches and total bank deposits amounted to TL813.7bn
(Pounds 64.7m). Interest rates were floated, and soon rose exorbitantly,
leaving the already under-capitalised banks with a large quantity of
non-performing loans, and encouraging more informal finance houses to start
business.
At the end of 1990, there were 40 deposit-taking banks, eight of which were
in the public sector. There were also 26 foreign banks. As with the rest of
the economy, the banking system faces some confusion in the sometimes
contradictory views it receives from the offices of Mr Suleyman Demirel, the
prime minister; Mrs Tansu Ciller, the minister of state with responsibility
for the economy; and Mr Rusdu Saracoglu. The last has held his position
since July 30 1987.
Also at issue has been the question of whether certain govenment policies
are compatible. For instance, given the aims of sustaining economic growth
and making the economy more competitive internationally, is it also
realistic to expect to keep inflation low?
There has been some streamlining of domestic commercial banking, through
improvements in trade finance, cash management, personnel training and
technology. Standardised reporting and external auditing have become common
practice.
Meanwhile, the past year or so has not been without difficulties.
'The year 1991,' the governor of the central bank said last April, 'proved
to be a rather difficult one in conducting monetary policy. . . We entered
with the advent of the Gulf war. The environment of uncertainty hit the
banking sector hard, and in just 10 days, nearly 12 per cent of total
Turkish lira deposits and 11.5 per cent of foreign exchange deposits were
withdrawn from the banks.'
The governor claims, with some justification, that the central bank's
intervention prevented a damaging flight of capital - even at the cost of
running down reserves.
Political uncertainties resulted in a general election, but, as the governor
pointed out: 'For the first time in its history, Turkey managed to hold a
general election without resorting to any foreign exchange restrictions.'
Yet he remains staunchly at odds with having to fund the government's
soaring public deficit, as are the authorities involved with the
privatisation of state economic enterprises - particularly where the public
sector is involved.
Turkey's banking ambitions extend outside the country. Its Eximbank has
extended credits of Dollars 50m to Hungary, for the import of Turkish
intermediate, consumer and investment goods, and Dollars 50m to Uzbekistan.
Last May, Mr Demirel announced a Dollars 1.2bn package of export credits and
soft loans for six of the Moslem central Asian states.
In 1991, Turkey's Eximbank had nominal capital of TL2,000bn, and aimed to
increase the competitiveness of exports. But perhaps the government in
Ankara should look more closely at banking problems at home before becoming
over-ambitious abroad.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                TURKEY'S TOP BANKS: 1991 (DOLLARS M)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          Tier One    Capital/assets   Pre-tax
                          capital        ratio (%)     profits   Assets
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
1  TC Ziraat Bankas         700             6.74         385    10,383
2  Akbank                   543            14.90         294     3,646
3  Turkiye Is Bankas        262             4.81          94     5,449
4  Yap ve Kredi             260             6.93         101     3,746
5  Turkiye Garanti Bankas   213             9.11          96     2,334
6  Turkiye Emlak Bankas*    153             2.77          51     5,510
7  Vakflar Bank             130             4.28          25     3,032
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
*1990                                Source: The Banker, September 1992
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7007</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (5):
Adaptable but independent - Profile of Rusdu Saracoglu, governor of the
central bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HE HAS been described as Turkey's Felipe Gonzalez. The combination of an
astute economic brain, a good political pedigree and those eternally boyish
good-looks has made Mr Rusdu Saracoglu, the governor of Turkey's central
bank, one of the most enduring figures on the political scene.
At 38, he was the world's youngest central banker when he was appointed in
1987. Today, this grandson son of a former Turkish prime minister has made
the job of Turkey's top banker his very own.
Talking to him in his dark wood-panelled office, in the Bank's Ankara
headquarters, he remains urbane, soft-spoken and totally self-assured.
'Actually, I normally work in the other office. It's brighter, and suits my
mood,' he explains.
But it has not been an easy task. The only incumbent of the office to be
re-elected, he is nonetheless one of the few high-ranking bureaucrats
appointed during the former Motherland party government to survive the
change of administration.
Mr Saracoglu has had his differences with the new government, particularly
with Mrs Tansu Ciller, the economics minister. During the recent IMF-World
Bank meetings, in Washington, she publicly blamed the governor for Turkey's
current economic ills.
But today the Bank's balance sheet has rarely looked more robust. Reserves
are near record levels. And for the moment, at least, the tussle with the
Treasury over the use of cheap credits to finance its expenditures seems to
have been resolved, in the governor's favour.
He even shows little concern about what some economists believe is the
worrying growth of foreign borrowing by the private commercial banks. As he
likes to point out: as a percentage of Turkey's external receipts, foreign
borrowing has in fact fallen steadily during his governorship.
In many ways, Mr Saracoglu sees himself as a classic central banker - there
to preserve the domestic and external value of the currency, contain
inflation, and influence the price of money by containing the liquidity of
the financial system. But he is the first to acknowledge the limits of the
Turkish system: 'Given the monetary constraints, and given our culture, it
is not easy. The central bank has never really been looked at as an
independent institution, and still is viewed as an arm of government.'
Nonetheless, he is quick to recognise what he feels is the new maturity of
the Turkish financial system, which six years ago had no interbank money
market, and only four years ago started foreign exchange trading.
Through the Gulf crisis, the turbulence of the last days of the old
Motherland party government and the political and economic uncertainty
surrounding the new coalition, confidence in the lira has never really
looked under threat, says the governor.
Structural problems remain. The central bank is still required to fund the
agricultural purchases of TMO, the state-owned cereals board. More damaging,
the Treasury can still turn to the Bank for up to 15 per cent of budget
appropriations.
Many countries set such a limit; however, it is normally considered more
prudent to set the figure as a percentage of revenues, not spending as in
Turkey's case.
The governor's personal opposition to such a provision is well known. 'A
government must voluntarily choose not to resort to it. Even if it is
legally feasible, it is not economically sound,' he argues.
For, as Mr Saracoglu maintains, the size of Turkey's budget deficit is not
itself the problem, so much as the way it is financed. 'The problem is the
size of the fiscal deficit, relative to the financial system,' he says.
The Treasury's ability to draw on cheap central-bank money threatens fiscal
stability. In 1989, the Treasury and the Bank agreed a protocol, under which
they put a monetary ceiling on the volume of these cheap credits, over which
the Treasury must pay market rates. 'And lo and behold, the Treasury never
borrowed more than the limit,' the governor says.
Today it is a different matter altogether. Mrs Ciller spent the first half
of the year fine-tuning the level of credit in the system, in pursuit of her
goal of lower interest rates. The strategy has meant increasing lira
liquidity, by turning to the central bank, rather than the bond market, to
meet the Treasury's growing demand for funds.
The strategy failed, in part because Mr Saracoglu entered the market to
absorb the lira expansion he had just been forced to create. But by adopting
a tight money policy, inflation was held in check, and the confidence in the
lira was maintained. The Bank's intervention prevented a run on the lira. It
also served to contain the lira value of servicing Turkey's foreign debt.
But, just to absorb the increased liquidity, the Bank estimated that it ran
down its reserves by Dollars 2.5bn selling foreign exchange to the market.
With central bank gross reserves now recovered to Dollars 7bn, compared with
Dollars 4.8bn in June, some analysts wonder whether Mr Saracoglu may just be
preparing for another tussle with Mrs Ciller.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7008</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (2):
Government appetite proves inhibiting - A dynamic economy striving to shed
the inheritance of a large state sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FEW SUBJECTS arouse such contrasting views as the state of health of the
Turkish economy. Some of the indicators - the inflation rate, the public
sector borrowing requirement (PSBR), the steady erosion of the Turkish lira
 -remain consistently gloomy. Yet official reserves, often seen as a measure
of an economy's well-being, are at near-record levels.
The balance of payments looks robust, with capital inflow comfortably
matching the deficit on the current account. Another positive indication is
the increasing facility with which Turkish institutions seem able to tap the
international capital markets.
Turkey today is a dynamic economy striving to throw off the inheritance of a
large state sector, in a free-exchange regime increasingly sensitive to
policy errors. The foreign debt, at around Dollars 51bn, is manageable. The
private sector has proved resilient in a difficult business environment.
Exports are now a major part of the Turkish balance of payments - where a
few years ago all that Turkey exported was its Gastarbeiter, or guest
workers. Equally encouraging, the recent growth in imports included a 34 per
cent increase in shipments of capital goods, suggesting that Turkey may be
nearing the end of the recent investment slump.
The problem, as ever, is the government's huge appetite for funds, which
crowds out the equity markets and has pushed interest rates to a point where
they provide an active disincentive to investment. Already at around 70 per
cent for deposits, bankers say rates are likely to rise further.
Mrs Tansu Ciller, the Istanbul professor entrusted by the prime minister, Mr
Suleyman Demirel, to handle the economy, has at times struggled to present a
coherent strategy, to address the need for fiscal and monetary discipline
while creating jobs for a growing labour force.
When she unveiled her programme in January, many economists expressed their
doubts. The programme envisaged 5-6 per cent growth, while inflation was
projected to fall to 42 per cent. The growth target still seems within
range. Inflation, however, shows little sign of slowing down.
The figures, of course, mask one important factor - the distorting effect of
the Gulf crisis, a point Mr Demirel's government has sometimes chosen to
overlook when comparing his performance with the previous 12 months under
the Motherland party administration.
For example, this year's growth rate is somewhat less impressive if you
consider that, in 1991, the economy was at a virtual standstill. The tourism
industry is a case in point. Badly hit by the crisis, the industry has
bounced back. For the first half of 1992, revenues rose 60 per cent to
Dollars 1.4bn, the largest single item on the current account. On the other
hand, Turkey is unable to look to the grant assistance which it enjoyed in
1991. These amounts were vital in helping to close the budget deficit, and
produced a small surplus on the current account.
The latest balance of payments figures nonetheless reassert the fundamental
strengths of the economy. In the six months to June, the current account
recorded a small Dollars 760m deficit. On the capital account, portfolio
investment was up, together with direct foreign investment, although this
remains a surprisingly small item on Turkey's balance of payments. In
addition, there was a marked increase in foreign borrowings, with the
Treasury for the first time tapping international bond markets in Japan and
the US, after receiving a BBB rating from Standard &amp; Poor's, the US rating
agency. The one cause for concern, however, was a large increase in the
errors and omissions, suggesting that residents are still choosing to hold
their foreign exchange savings in hand.
The year started with the government announcing a wave of price increases
for state enterprises, which the previous administration had held back in a
bid to win voters in the run-up to the October election. The 11 per cent
jump in inflation which resulted was then blamed firmly on the old regime.
Inflation dropped steadily from January onwards, falling to 0.5 per cent in
June, the lowest monthly inflation rate since mid-1990. Indeed, almost any
rate would have seemed better than the January figure. However, it was only
a matter of time before the chickens came home to roost.
Economists were already pointing to seasonal factors, like the agricultural
surpluses resulting, in part, from the inability of exporters to ship
produce because of the Yugoslav crisis. Economists believe there has been an
underlying upward trend in inflation, given the money supply growth over the
same period as the Treasury resorted increasingly to the central bank to
finance its spendings.
In September, there was thus little real surprise when inflation jumped by
7.4 per cent, compared with 3.3 per cent in August. In October, the rate was
even higher, at 7.6 per cent or 69.2 per cent on an annualised basis.
Unless the government now comes to terms with the problems of the budget and
the PSBR, it is hard to see how Mrs Ciller can hope to bring down inflation.
In turn, without a reduction in the PSBR, upward pressure on interest rates
will continue, holding back badly needed private sector investment.
Some measures have been taken. Changes were introduced to the taxes relating
to government securities, to make it more attractive to hold longer-term
paper, to extend the government's debt maturities.
The strategy on capital market reform of the capital markets too has been
shaped by the need to create longer-term funds for business, hitherto
reliant on costly bank borrowing. Mrs Ciller has introduced new products,
like securitisation of consumer credits and other bank assets. Regulatory
change has tightened up disclosure rules. In addition, the government is now
encouraging equity investment on the part of mutual funds, in a bid to
increase market liquidity.
However, on tax and privatisation, two areas vital to the short-term budget
picture, the government has vacillated. Officials rule out any major changes
in the tax regime, although government receipts were enhanced by the law on
tax amnesty for tax offenders passed in March.
On privatisation, the government is counting on raising TL5,500bn (Pounds
438m) in 1992 from the sale of minority participation in what are, by and
large, privately managed companies. The revenue effect is all too welcome,
but, like the tax amnesty, this is little more than a one-off exercise,
unless measures are taken to divest the state of the main loss-making state
enterprises.
More controversial was Mrs Ciller attempt to talk down interest rates in the
first half of the year. By resorting to cheap central bank funds, she
fuelled monetary growth as a way to exert downward pressure on rates. But in
so doing, she come close to open conflict with a central bank governor,
strenuously defending the lira's position.
Up to June, the central bank was forced to intervene heavily to sterilise
this money creation by selling dollars to the market. Inflation strategy has
since changed, but damage control has become the major preoccupation,
leaving the fundamental causes of inflation untouched.
Without major reform, there is little room for manoeuvre on the expenditure
side. Debt servicing still accounts for 20 per cent of total spending. To
the government's credit, infrastructure investment spending has already been
sharply cut back, much to the chagrin of the powerful contractors lobby, who
rely on the government for project work. But economists expect the central
government budget deficit to be closer to TL55,000bn, compared with the
TL32,000bn forecast under the programme.
When the deficits on the public sector enterprises and the special
non-budgetary funds are added, it is hard to see how the government can
contain PSBR to the target of 8.8 per cent of GNP. Officials privately say
the government will be lucky to see anything less than 10 per cent.
Few but the most pessimistic will see a crisis looming. There is nonetheless
some disappointment that the government has not pressed ahead with its
promise of structural reform.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7009</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (3): A
thrower-up of ideas - Profile of Emre Gonensay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A TASTE for Jermyn Street shirts is not the only thing he has in common with
the prime minister. As 'ambassador and chief adviser' to Mr Demirel,
Professor Emre Gonensay has emerged as a key figure in the Turkish
government.
In the revolving doors of Turkish policy-making, the exact contribution of
this 55-year-old former lecturer at the London School of Economics is hard
to pin down. His Ankara office is in a small government building on the road
out of town. Colleagues say his task is simply to throw up ideas for Mr
Demirel.
If his curriculum vitae is anything to go by, he is not the grey academic
type - director of Koc Holding, of Egebank, founder and director of Chemical
Mitsui Bank Turkey, and chairman of Turkinvest.
Prof Gonensay makes few public statements. He claims he was misquoted by the
official Anatolian Agency, when expressing enthusiasm for the prospect of a
No vote in the French referendum on Maastricht, which he said would enhance
Turkey's long-term chance of finding a home in Europe.
But Turkey, he says, wants a Europe as wide and as open as possible. 'There
needs to be a multilateral globalisation of the northern hemisphere. Look at
the Black Sea Co-operation Agreement we signed in June: that's our
contribution. It's not watertight and it's not a trade bloc.'
He maintains that there are important lessons for Turkey in the confusion
over Maastricht and the currency crisis in the exchange rate mechanism.
His enthusiasm for a treaty which some believe is already a dead letter
might seem curious, particularly given Turkey's own economic realities - 67
per cent inflation, and a budget deficit running at 11 per cent of GNP. In
diplomatic and business circles, there are already real questions as to
whether Turkey will make its 1996 deadline of full Customs Union with the
EC, given the need to keep tariffs high for revenue-raising purposes.
Prof Gonensay's view is that Turkey should adopt the financial targets on
inflation and budget deficits, as agreed by the Twelve. 'Maastricht,
together with a fixed exchange rate, could provide a convenient external
anchor for Turkey,' he says. 'It's an an irony, but in Europe there is so
little inclination left to wring inflation out of the system, that it's not
worth the suffering. In Turkey I think we are still prepared to suffer.'
He sees little room for manoeuvre on tax reform, contrary to the analysis of
the OECD and other economists. Turkey's economy is already taxed at around
26 per cent of GNP, he says. 'In a country like ours, you cannot hope for a
rate much better than that.'
The alternative is to cover the deficit by more foreign borrowing or foreign
investment. 'Personally, I would like to have seen an increase in our
foreign borrowing this year. Our credit rating was fairly good. But now
we've lost time.' Of course, the only 'miracle' cure he can see is
privatisation.
The professor has just two proposals: adopt the practice of balanced
budgets, and strengthen the central bank. 'We need a mandate for the central
bank to enable it to stabilise prices. No bank governor in Turkey can stand
up and do something different from the government.'
His idea is to peg the exchange rate to some low-inflation currency, which
he says would take the 'discretion out of the central bank's policy-making.'
If only for the economic benefits, Prof Gonensay wants 'to see Turkey fulfil
the conditions for full membership' of the European Community.
'Customs Union without full membership? Well, that's a matter for the
politicians.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7010</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (1): In
search of a new identity - The country is still on track for a customs union
with Brussels, but political vacillation has served to undermine the case
for economic convergence with the EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RARELY CAN Turkey have had such an opportunity to shape the future of its
region. In a wide arc, stretching from the Balkans through the new republics
of central Asia even to its Arab neighbours to the south, Turkey is quietly
asserting a growing influence.
These, of course, are turbulent times. A country which suffered a bout of
painful soul-searching when the president suggested sending troops to the
Gulf war, is today offering conscripts to sort out the horrors of Bosnia
Hercegovina; is despatching military experts to advise its allies in the
Caucasus; and has deployed up to 20,000 commandos to fight Kurdish
separatists in North Iraq, in what most Turks are describing as the largest
operation since the invasion of Cyprus in 1974.
If Turkey appears ready to assume new responsibilities towards the emerging
states of central Asia and the Black Sea, it is a policy shaped more by
necessity than choice. Few of the Soviet Union's neighbours can have
welcomed its collapse with quite such mixed feelings. The strategic
imperatives which once underpinned its role in Western defence, are now
changing with alarming speed. In its place the country faces uncertainty and
confusion wherever it turns.
When he arrives in London for a working visit next week, the prime minister,
Mr Suleyman Demirel, will again make the case for Turkey's special
relationship with Europe - an idea promoted by Mr Douglas Hurd, the UK
foreign secretary but rudely overtaken by European issues of more urgent
concern.
Early this month, Turkey won the EC's endorsement for the idea of enhanced
ties, following a meeting of the EC-Turkish Association council. However, on
security issues, Turkey has reluctantly had to accept an offer of associate
membership of the nine-nation Western European Union defence organisation.
Turkey's contention is that its value to the west has become more vital. But
in the wake of the confusion over the Maastricht Treaty, even government
officials concede that any chance of early Turkish membership of the
European Community now looks increasingly remote.
Today, Turkey finds itself conducting the search for a new identity against
a backdrop of political and economic uncertainty at home. Turkey's political
establishment is still trying to rid itself of the constraints imposed in
the wake of the last military coup in 1980. Moves are under way to
liberalise the broadcasting sector from state control. Patent legislation is
ready to go to parliament. There is even talk of seeking the necessary
two-thirds support in parliament to throw out the 1982 military
constitution, which many Turkish politicians feel is at the root of the
country's problems.
In many respects, Mr Demirel's conservative-led government has proven more
resilient than many can have imagined. The prime minister has shown himself
a skilful ringmaster in the often awkward squabblings of cabinet ministers
and senior bureaucrats. An apparently weakened coalition has shown little
sign of being permanently disabled by the recent defections of a number of
deputies from the junior partner Social Democratic Populist party.
Nonetheless, for many Turks the great expectation with which the
government's programme was initially greeted has been replaced by doubts and
disappointment at the lack of progress. In an international environment of
such dizzying change, the domestic agenda has come to play second fiddle.
On too many occasions, the painstaking search for political consensus has
hindered effective action. On a range of domestic issues, from tax reform
and privatisation to human rights, Mr Demirel has instinctively chosen a
policy course of least resistance.
Almost a year to the day since taking office, he has bowed to hardline
pressures within his True Path party, and abandoned any hope for a political
solution to Turkey's Kurdish problem. With the economy forecast to grow by
around 5-6 per cent this year, much of the urgency has gone out of the
anti-inflation policy.
The economy is still on track for a customs union with Brussels in 1996, but
an increasing number of companies question whether this is still in Turkey's
best interest. Political vacillation has served to undermine the case for
economic convergence with the EC.
Foreign investors intending to come to Turkey are still uncertain whether to
expect more reform on the trade side, or whether they can plan for continued
protection and labour costs currently enjoyed in the domestic market.
Turkey's problems are those of a robust economy trying to unburden itself of
the shackles of a vast public sector, something that Mr Demirel inherited
rather than created.
Today many of Turkey's industrial families would not look out of place in
more developed countries. Trade liberalisation has increased the efficiency
of Turkish producers. Domestic manufacturing can no longer rely on an
overvalued currency to protect it from import competition. Existing lines
have been reoriented for exports, which today account for a growing
proportion of company turnover.
This growing strength of the Turkish product market was underlined this
year, when Unilever, the UK-Dutch industrial group, bought out the local
Komili group, in what is believed to be the first instance of a foreign
buyer putting a value on a Turkish brand name.
For all that, even in the most successful boardroom, the burden of the
government's budget on the economy has become an increasingly dominant
motif. The public sector borrowing requirement was 12.5 per cent of GNP in
1991, and shows little sign of improvement this year. Inflation, after
slowing through the summer, rose to 69 per cent in October.
Some bankers talk gloomily of impending business failures. In such an
environment, companies have little inclination to put resources into
greenfield site developments, although recent increases in capital goods
imports are seen as a more positive sign that the investment cycle may be on
the turn.
Stock market reform has been slow, while the index has fared worse than that
of almost any other developing country, according to the International
Finance Corporation, the World Bank's private sector lending arm. The
Istanbul Exchange is still driven by the prevailing trend of interest rates,
and until equities offer investors comparable returns, corporations are
unlikely to be able to tap the market for a source of investment capital.
The tax system is also inadequate. An amnesty offered to tax offenders will
provide a blip to the tax receipts in the current year, but it does not
address the real problems of poor collection and widespread payment
avoidance. Moreover the system itself is distorted. Ironically, the one area
where collection is possible is that of waged labour, now taxed at rates
higher than any country in the OECD - an anomaly which is at the heart of
Turkey's poor labour relations record.
The farm sector continues to enjoy implicit subsidies through the
government's support-price programme. Any attempt to cut back on the
programme could add to the social and political problems of urban migration,
which has put services under such strain in Istanbul and other cities.
In many areas of social policy, there is an urgent need for more spending,
not less. In health care, social security insurance, and primary education,
Turkey falls far behind its OECD competitors. There is still no effective
safety net which might ease the impact of the widescale closure of state
companies.
As the World Bank makes clear in a study on the public sector enterprises,
the cost of reform, through labour restructuring and other measures, is only
Dollars 7bn over two years. The financing cost of continuing to support the
state industries is conservatively estimated at Dollars 18bn. There would
seem little choice but to push forward.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7011</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Steady close after an erratic session
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRESH reminders of the recessionary pressures on the UK economy combined
with tremors in the Hong Kong stock market to keep equities depressed in
London yesterday. Losses in share prices were minimal, however, and any
stock on offer was readily taken up.
The London market was unsettled by the fall of around 3 per cent in Hong
Kong equities following disturbing comments by a visiting Chinese
vice-premier, and by equity market setbacks both in Tokyo and New York.
However, UK equities rallied from an early fall of 12 points on the FT-SE
scale, helped by steadiness in the pound and government bonds and by a more
favourable trend at the EC talks ahead of the next round of GATT
negotiations.
Equities moved upwards at mid-session to show a gain of 7.1, putting the
Footsie just above 2,686 for its best reading of the day, before turning to
face a batch of statistics on the domestic economy. A brief improvement in
stock index futures helped push the blue chips ahead.
However, support faded later. By the close, the FT-SE Index had slipped back
to 2,679, for a net loss of 0.4 on the day; support for the second line
stocks was disclosed by a 2.3 gain in the FT-SE Mid 250 Index. Traders saw
London's performance as 'highly creditable' against the nervous background
of other global markets.
Seaq volume improved to 480.4m shares from the 434.2m of the previous day
but remained short of the average daily totals of the past nine weeks.
Monday's retail business was worth only Pounds 717, barely two thirds of the
daily business levels recorded since mid-September.
The latest survey of distributive trades by the Confederation of British
Industry (CBI), published in yesterday morning's UK press, indicated that
high street sales had failed to sustain the momentum seen in September,
immediately following the pound's exit from the European exchange rate
network. But stores shares edged higher, focusing on the implications of
last week's further cut in base rates and the hope of a further reduction in
the new year. The CBI report provides a curtain raiser for the official
retail sales figures for October, due today.
Neither the unemployment numbers for the October quarter nor the Pounds
1.78bn Public Sector Borrowing Requirement (PSBR) for last month gave much
support for the equity market, although both were regarded as little more
than confirmation of known trends. Nervousness over the outlook for the PSBR
next year continued to hover in the background.
The mixed trend in price movements in leading stocks indicated that the
institutions had been shuffling their portfolios, trimming some holdings and
increasing others, rather than making significant changes in long term
investment commitments. Successful fund managers have seen portfolios
perform strongly during October.
Some strategists believe that this will prove to be the theme of the stock
market until after Christmas, when equity investors will begin to look for
the next cut in UK base rates. However, James Capel and Nomura Research are
two leading houses known to be still taking a bullish view of the near term
outlook.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 44
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7012</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Forecasts for BA slashed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
British Airways (BA) fell sharply yesterday after the company announced
disappointing second-quarter profits and analysts slashed their forecasts
for the full year. The shares were the most heavily traded in London
yesterday and tumbled 23 to 248p with 19m traded.
The airline announced a profit of Pounds 227m in the half-year to September
30, up from Pounds 185m the previous year but below the analysts' forecast
range. The lacklustre deadline figure was compounded by a veiled profits
warning as BA said prospects for the second half of the financial year
remain uncertain, even though it is carrying more passengers and cargo than
a year ago, because stiff competition has maintained pressure on margins.
The market's consensus estimate for the full year came down to Pounds 260m
from above Pounds 300m with broker SG Warburg reining back to around the new
level. BZW reduced by Pounds 65m to Pounds 285m arguing that it 'sees
sentiment remaining against the company until February or March'. The
investment bank also cut by Pounds 100m to Pounds 350m for the following
year. However Lehman Brothers' European airlines analysts Mr Christopher
Will argues that the real story is in earnings per share rather than
profits. He says eps will benefit as the tax rate will come down and the
share price had already factored in the low profits. He has turned strong
buyer of the stock.
Property placing
A large placing took the shine off trading figures reported in line with
expectations from Great Portland, as building group Costain sold its 3 per
cent stake at a considerable loss. Gt Portland shares retreated 7 to 123p
with huge turnover of 17m, shares, boosted by the Costain trade. The placing
was carried out by Cazenove who bought the stock at 120p from Costain, which
had paid 185p a share a year ago, and placed it with institutions at 121 1/2
p.
Prior to this development, Gt Portland's figures had caused no great
surprises, the maintained dividend helping the shares to hold steady, before
tumbling as the Costain placing went through the market at around 10am. In
common with most property groups, Gt Portland warned that its final dividend
might be in doubt if the market deteriorates further, or if trading suffers
further.
Mr Graham Stanley at County NatWest commented: 'The dividend yield is
offering the shares short-term support, but questions have to be asked if it
is prudent to use all the group's cash flow to fund the final dividend when
so many of its properties are in need of redevelopment.' Meanwhile, Costain
shares edged 1 1/2 to 29 1/2p.
C &amp; W pressured
The steep decline in the Hong Kong market and a bout of nervousness ahead of
tomorrow's interim figures produced a flurry of selling pressure in Cable &amp;
Wireless shares (C &amp; W) The group derives well over 50 per cent of its
profits from Hong Kong.
At their worst yesterday the shares touched 633p before stabilising to end
the session a net 9 off at 635p. Turnover was an unremarkable 2.6m shares.
Hong Kong's Hang Seng index dropped over 200 points yesterday in response to
remarks made by the Chinese deputy prime minister regarding the transfer of
power in Hong Kong to the Chinese in 1997.
Dealers said the fall in the shares was a knee-jerk reaction to the strains
between the UK Government and the Chinese but also reflected profit-taking
after the recent strong performance of C &amp; W shares. Between early-October
and mid-November C &amp; W shares rose over 20 per cent while the Footsie-100
rose some 10 per cent, mostly reflecting the steep rise in the dollar and
news of the sale of a 20 per cent stake in Mercury, C &amp; W's telecoms
division, to Bell Canada, the Canadian telecoms group for Pounds 480m.
Analysts expect only a marginal rise in C &amp; W's interim profits. The range
of estimates is from Pounds 350m to Pounds 365m. The interim is forecast to
rise by around 10 per cent to 4.7p.
Vodafone came in for some good support amid switching from Cable &amp; Wireless,
with the former's the shares moving up 9 more to 379p ahead of interim
figures pencilled in for next Tuesday.
Analysts expect Vodafone to turn in profits up around 14 per cent at Pounds
160m with a similar increase in the dividend to around 3.3p. The market has
given a good reception to last month's launch of Vodafone's new 'Lowcall'
service which pre-empted Cellnet's 'Lifetime' launch of a similar service.
BT also made progress, similarly sustained by switching activity, and closed
2 1/2 firmer at 395 1/2 p on 4.3m traded. BT partly-paid rose the same
amount to 291 1/2 p on 5m.
News reports that a sub-contractor in the Pounds 20bn Al-Yamamah defence
contract between the UK and Saudi Arabia might want to by-pass lead
contractor British Aerospace hit BAe shares. Shipbuilder Vosper Thorneycroft
had apparently said it would like to deal directly with Saudi Arabia.
However the company was unhappy with reports that it wanted to operate alone
and stressed its continued commitment to the contract.
BAe fell 4 to 133p while Vosper lifted 9 to 401p principally as a result of
announced raised interim profits and an improved dividend.
Speculation that Rolls-Royce might have been selling equipment for military
use to Iraq plus a profits warning from a US competitor and analysts'
forecast downgrades hit the shares. However, the company said that as
regards the supply of equipment; 'We have to and do accept all the
government guidelines' and added that it had a different range of engines
from United Technologies. Rolls slipped 7 1/2 to 101 1/2 p on heavy turnover
of 8.5m.
A buy recommendation issued by BZW and a well-received presentation by the
company to what was described as a sparsely-attended gathering of investment
analysts provided the impetus for a strong performance by Standard
Chartered.
The shares were the pick of a generally sluggish banking sector, racing up
21 to a new high for the year of 555p; turnover was a hefty 1.9m shares.
The stock is in the running to be included in the Footsie-100 list when the
FT-SE steering committee meets to consider changes in constituents.
Bank sector specialists said Standard had outlined its strategy and insisted
it would not float off its Hong Kong operation, a move which had been mooted
Burmah Castrol continued to drift easier as worries about the extent of the
slowdown in German economic activity triggered renewed selling pressure.
Burmah derives around 40 per cent of its earnings from continental Europe.
Brokers have been reducing estimates for Burmah for the past couple of
weeks. Burmah shares closed a further 5 off at 660p.
Dealers noted a resurgence of activity in Calor with income funds selling
the stock in special ex-dividend form around the 212p mark. At the close the
shares were marginally off at 223p with around 1m shares traded.
Paris theme park operator Euro Disney fell back for the second day running
as investors continued to bale out ahead of tomorrow's interim figures.
Steep losses are feared and Paribas yesterday reiterated its strong sell
stance. The shares tumbled 35 to 983p.
Forte continued its good run as Prudential increased its stake from 2.9 to
3.6 per cent, the shares running on 6 to 175p in turnover of 2.7m. Ladbroke
added 7 to 175p in sympathy.
Exhibitions organiser Blenheim tumbled after the company's joint broker
Credit Laing Lyonnais crossed 2.8m shares at 420p. The shares were traded
between one institution wanting to offload its entire 3 per cent stake and
institutions. happy to pick up the stock The shares picked up from the low
to close 25 off at 438p.
Courtaulds tumbled 14 to 470p on nervousness ahead of half-year results to
be announced today. Estimates range from Pounds 87m to Pounds 92m against
Pounds 96.4m a year ago.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (60).
AMERICANS (10) Abbot Labs, Amer T &amp; T, Bankers NY, California Energy, Chase
Manhattan, Chrysler, Cont'l Bank, Echlin, Morris (Ph), Quaker Oats, BANKS
(2) Dai Ichi, Standard Chartd, BREWERS (1) Taunton Cider, BUSINESS SERVICES
(1), Penna, CONTG &amp; CONSTRCN (1) Westport, ELECTRICALS (1) Ericsson,
ELECTRONICS (4) Electrocomps, Micro Focus, Misys, Telemetrix, FOOD MANUF (1)
Dalgety, FOOD RETAILING (1) Kwik Save, HEALTH &amp; HSEHOLD (3) Astra B,
Huntleigh Tech, Novo Nordisk, INSCE BROKERS (1) Berry Birch, INSCE COMPOSITE
(2) Aon, USF &amp; G, INV TRUSTS (17) Abtrust Pfd Zero Div Pf, Baring Chrysalis,
Eng &amp; Scot, GT Venture Wts, Govett Amer Sm Co's, I &amp; S Optimum Inc Zero Div,
Jakarta, Jupiter Euro Zero Div Pf, Kleinwort High Inc Zero Div Pf, New
Zealand, River Plate Zero Div Pf, Scot Nat Zero Div Pf, Selective Assets,
Spanish Sm' Co's, Thai Euro Ptg, World Tst, Do Wts, MEDIA (4) Haynes
Publishing, News Intl, TVS Ent, Do 7.4pc Pf 2008, MISC (3) LGW, Rhino, Waste
Mgmt Intl, OIL &amp; GAS (1) British Gas, OTHER FINCL (2) Perpetual, S &amp; U, PROP
(1) Helical Bar 5 1/4 pc Pf 2012, STORES (2) Burton, Storehouse, TELE
NETWORKS (1) Brit Telecom, TRANSPORT (1) GATX.
NEW LOWS (43).
CANADIANS (1) Brascan, BREWERS (2) Fuller, Matthew Clark, BUSINESS SERVS (2)
CRT, REA, CHEMS (1) Caird, CONGLOMERATES (2) Hanson Wts, Tollgate, ENG AERO
(1) Rolls-Royce, ENG GEN (5) Beauford, Bullough, Dobson Park, Mayflower,
Simon, FOOD RETAILING (1) Geest, INV TRUSTS (8) Aberforth Split Inc,
Archimedes Inc, Exmoor Dual Zero Pf, Japan OTC Wts, Japanese Wt Fd, Do Wts,
New Throgmorton Cap, Throgmorton Dual Inc, MEDIA (5) Aegis 9 3/4 pc Pf,
Chiltern Radio, HTV, Lopex, Yorkshire Tyne-Tees, MTL &amp; MTL FORMING (1) Utd
Inds, MISC (1) Ass Brit Consultants, MOTORS (1) DAF, OIL &amp; GAS (2) Fairhaven
Intl, Lasmo Ops, OTHER FINCL (1) Baltic, PACKG, PAPER &amp; PRINTG (2) Intl Comm
&amp; Data, Stat-Plus, PROP (1) Derwent Valley, STORES (2) Beattie A, Cantors,
MINES (4) Gold Fields, Hartebeest, Pasminco, Renison.
Other market statistics, Page 28
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 44
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7013</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A DEFIANTLY firm opening on the futures market petered out in a dull
afternoon session with the December contract again returning to trade at a
discount to its fair value, writes Christopher Price.
The dull opening expected by equity traders, on the back of poor overnight
performances from Wall Street and Hong Kong, plus a negative Confederation
of British Industry (CBI) derivatives trade survey, failed to materialise as
bear closing was seen squeezing the December Footsie contract firmer in a
busy morning session. December, which had hit its low of the day of 2,676
within minutes of opening, reached its high of 2,700 by lunchtime. Firmer
short sterling and government bonds helped.
However, the afternoon session saw a dearth of buyers and an indifferent
Wall Street sent December drifting away until its close. It finished at
2,684, the same close as the previous session but at a much lower volume of
6,165 contracts. The contract traded at around or slightly below fair value
for most of the session and at the close was at a discount of some five
points to its fair value level of around nine.
Traded options were subdued. Rolls-Royce was the top stock, trading 1,821
contracts which included one trade of 1,000 of the December calls at 7.5p.
British Airways found buyers after its results with 1,272 traded. Total
volume was 19,765.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 44
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7014</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: Tokyo perilously close to quicksands -
A further fall in the Nikkei could take the banks with it
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Tokyo stock market is in danger of slipping back into the financial
quicksands.
The Nikkei average is at its lowest level for three months. It has lost
about half of the gains it made in the wake of the August announcement of a
Y10,700bn (Dollars 86bn) emergency government spending package to revive the
economy.
The wave of euphoria that greeted the package drove the Nikkei up from an
year's low of 14,309 in August to a high of more than 18,908 in September.
At that time Nikko Securities was not alone in describing the rally as a
turning point. It forecast that the Nikkei would probably trade between
20,000 and 23,000 this autumn, with economic growth recovering strongly by
the early spring of next year.
Those hopes have proved ill-founded. From late September until early this
month, it was still possible to believe that the August package had done the
trick as the Nikkei hovered between 17,000 and 18,000. But in the last nine
trading days it has lost more than 1,000 points to close yesterday at
15,993.
A continued decline would have far-reaching implications for the Japanese
economy because of its impact upon Japan's troubled banks. The authorities'
ability to prevent further declines in two markets - in equities and in
property - will determine the short-term prospects for the banks, and for
the economy.
Land prices are still falling. Further falls would erode the collateral for
more of the banks' real estate loans. Bad debts for the top 21 banks rose by
more than 50 per cent in the six months to September to Y12,000bn. So
arresting the decline in property values, partly through increased
government purchases of land for public works, will be vital to curtail the
growth of the bank's bad debts.
Share prices are central to the strength of the banks' balance sheets
because about Y18,000bn of the 21 top banks' capital of about Y40,000 is
made up of unrealised gains on stock transactions.
With the Nikkei at between 18,000 and 20,000, the banks' capital base should
be strong enough to pass the Bank of International Settlement's (BIS)
capital adequacy ratios. That should allow them to increase their lending at
more than 5 per cent per annum, fast enough to fuel economic growth next
year of about 3 per cent.
However a further fall in the stock market would eat into the banks' capital
at a time when they are planning write-offs for rising bad debts; and the
pressures for the market to fall further are considerable.
The outlook for corporate earnings is dismal, with some analysts predicting
that profits next year could fall for the fourth year in a row. Investment
is still falling and consumption flat, and there is growing scepticism about
whether the government's public investment programme will deliver a kick
start to businesses outside the sectors which are direct beneficiaries, such
as construction and steel.
A more immediate worry is that companies are selling their stockholdings in
other companies to raise working capital, because they are finding it
difficult to raise it by bank borrowings.
Other sources of demand are unlikely to prove strong enough to sustain the
market. Foreign investors, who bought heavily when the market reached its
summer lows, are likely to wait to see whether it will go down further.
The government's pledge that the public sector postal savings system would
buy more stocks is running into opposition from the ministry of post and
telecommunications. It has been bombarded with complaints from savers who
are unhappy that their money is being used to prop up the ailing stock
market. Mr Peter Tasker, chief equity strategist at Kleinwort Benson,
comments: 'The influx of public funds can slow the market's decline but it
cannot chase the market back up.'
However, if the banks are to pass the BIS standards by next March the market
will have to stage a sustained recovery. With a huge rabbit pulled out of
the hat in August, it is likely that an even bigger stimulus will be
required.
A further early cut in interest rates of more than 50 basis points is
increasingly likely. But that will not be a panacea. The Nikkei has fallen
within two weeks of four of the last five interest rate cuts.
The banks could help by taking more decisive action to deal with their bad
debts. But as yet they are taking a gradualist approach.
So the main boost must come from fiscal policy. The supplementary budget to
enact the August Y10,700bn package is stalled in the Diet which is consumed
by a power struggle sparked by the Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin scandal. The ruling
Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) will face mounting pressure to deliver a
large fiscal stimulus through the 1993 budget.
The problem is that political lines of command at the top of the LDP are so
confused in the wake of the Sagawa Kyubin scandal that swift and decisive
political leadership is unlikely.
A full-scale rout taking the market back to 14,000 cannot be ruled out,
though it is still unlikely. But the longer the supplementary budget remains
stalled in parliament and the LDP leadership is gridlocked, the more likely
it is the Nikkei will continue its dismal drift downwards, threatening to
take the banks and the economy with it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7015</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (America): General Motors slips as Dow
holds ground
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
AFTER Monday's sell-off, US share prices continued to weaken across the
board yesterday, especially among secondary stocks, writes Patrick Harverson
in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 12.42 at 3,193.32.
The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 closed 1.41 lower at 419.27,
while the Amex composite eased 2.54 to 384.29. The Nasdaq composite index,
again faring worst as investors took profits gained in recent weeks, lost
another 6.94 to 627.07. Turnover on the NYSE was 187m shares.
There was little economic news of substance yesterday, and attention was
fixed on the monthly meeting of the Federal Reserve's Open Market Committee.
Recent economic reports have shown that the recovery has gathered pace since
the summer, and yesterday analysts did not expect the policy-making FOMC to
sanction another cut in interest rates.
General Motors slipped Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 30 1/2 in turnover of 1.6m
shares on a newspaper report claiming that the company knew about the
vulnerability of its pick-up trucks to fires resulting from fuel tank
ruptures in 1983, but that it did not take action to rectify the problem
until five years later. GM already faces more than 100 lawsuits related to
the fuel tank design, and the market fears that the number will rise.
Arkla jumped Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 9 5/8 in heavy trading after the
company entered into a pact to sell its exploration unit to Seagull Energy
for Dollars 402m. Arkla also planned to sell some properties to repay debt,
and was considering selling its Louisiana Intrastate Gas subsidiary.
JWP fell Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 3 1/4 after the company said it anticipated
making a third-quarter loss of Dollars 162m following restructuring and
other non-recurring charges which total Dollars 135m.
ADRs in British Airways dropped Dollars 2 7/8 to Dollars 37 3/4 after the
airline announced a 23 per cent decline in second-quarter pre- tax profit
and a 6.8 per cent drop in passenger yields in the first six months of the
year.
On the Nasdaq market, Borland International slumped Dollars 4 to Dollars 24
3/4 in turnover of 4.1m shares after the securities house, Lehman Brothers,
downgraded the technology stock from 'outperform' to 'underperform'.
Other leading technology stocks also ran into heavy selling. Apple gave up
Dollars 2 1/8 at Dollars 55 1/4 , Microsoft fell Dollars 2 3/4 to Dollars 90
and Sun Microsystems dropped Dollars 2 1/8 to Dollars 31 1/2 .
Canada
A late selloff sent Toronto share prices lower in active trading.
On preliminary data, the TSE 300 index shed 17.92 points, or 0.55 per cent,
to close at 3218.47, as declines led advances 345 to 209. Volume was
39,117,000 shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7016</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: Argentina
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BUENOS AIRES saw a 7.6 per cent rise in the all-share index to 11,544.11 as
investors returned to the stock market after a run on the peso petered out.
Turnover jumped to 70m pesos from 52m.
All 20 blue chips scored big gains with 17 rising by 9 per cent. The biggest
risers were Garovaglio and Nobleza Piccardo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7017</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Madrid and Milan buck weaker
continental trend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MADRID joined Milan as the continent's risers, while northern bourses were
generally weaker, writes Our Markets Staff.
MADRID extended the rally which took off late last week on
lower-than-expected inflation figures and the removal of restrictions on the
government holding in Tabacalera, one of Spain's privatisation candidates.
The general index rose 2.96 to 206.77. Companies featuring in the current
results season showed up, with Repsol rising Pta160 to Pta2,645. However, Mr
Stephen Hughes at Nikko Europe said its figures were no better than
expected. Iberdrola I, which did produce a pleasant surprise, put on Pta21
to Pta648 but Banesto lost Pta20 to Pta2,070 against a rising bank sector on
loan loss provisions and the restructuring of the company's board.
MILAN rose further on continued demand for privatisation stocks, taking the
Comit index through its chart resistance point at 480. The Comit index rose
8.92 to 481.30 in continued heavy turnover of around L400bn after Monday's
L394.4bn.
Dealers said that they were waiting to see what the foreigners would do,
since they had not participated greatly in the recent rally, fuelled mainly
by domestic buying.
Mediobanca rose L90 or 7.9 per cent to L14,890 before slipping back to
L14,550 after hours. Sme continued to be suspended as the market waited for
details of the government's plans to sell off part of the group.
ZURICH fell through 1,900 on the SMI index, which lost another 23.9 to
1,889.5 in thin trading. Dealers again blamed weekend polls which showed
that the Swiss electorate would reject European Economic Area membership at
the December 6 referendum.
However, Mr Jonathan Spink at Williams de Broe said that this week's fall
coincided, more importantly, with a decline in the Swiss franc against the
D-Mark towards a point (90 centimes to the D-Mark) at which the authorities
would protect the rate. Swiss interest rates have risen accordingly, and
banks showed the strain as CS Holding lost SFr45 to SFr1,915.
PARIS continued to fall in thin trading, and some sell orders from the UK
were reported. The CAC 40 index dropped 8.29 to 1,764.44 in modest turnover
of FFr1.7bn.
Schneider fell FFr37 or 6.5 per cent to FFr537 after its US subsidiary,
Square D, set a Dollars 233.5m bond convertible into Schneider shares.
Euro Disney fell another FFr2.25 or 3 per cent to FFr72.15 in a continued
reaction to a sell note from Paribas and on fears that tomorrow the theme
park will announce heavy losses for the year ended September 30.
Michelin lost another FFr4.10 to FFr182.40 but Peugeot gained FFr16 to
FFr514. Rumours that a US house was about to publish a negative report on
Elf and Total took those shares down by FFr10.40 and FFr4.30 to FFr351.30
and FFr231.70 respectively.
FRANKFURT traders tried to push equities up ahead of today's holiday, but
buying orders did not materialise and the DAX index reversed a 14-point gain
to close 1.90 lower at 1,545.05. Turnover rose from DM4.8bn to DM5.1bn.
The US dollar's rise above DM1.60 lifted some cyclicals, most carmakers,
Veba and Siemens. Volkswagen was also boosted by a short-term trading buy
recommendation from a domestic broker, closing DM4.50 higher at DM286.50.
Lufthansa's news that its nine-month loss was only slightly worse than in
1991 left the shares DM4 lower at DM100.
STOCKHOLM ran into heavy profit-taking after two days of advances, as the
market took the view that Sweden would not abandon its fixed exchange rate
policy. The Affarsvarlden general index fell 2.2 to 723.6 in turnover of
SKr708m after SKr430m.
AMSTERDAM was depressed by London and news that the government was planning
to lower its estimate for 1993 economic growth from the current 1 per cent.
The CBS Tendency index fell 0.7 to 104.5. DSM continued its downward trend
as it lost another Fl 2.60 to Fl 70.50.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
November 17                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes             Open      10.30      11.00      12.00
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100     1058.02    1058.14    1058.08    1059.32
FT-SE Eurotrack 200     1111.13    1111.75    1112.42    1111.51
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes            13.00      14.00      15.00      Close
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100     1057.02    1055.56    1055.40    1056.32
FT-SE Eurotrack 200     1111.98    1110.58    1109.21    1109.66
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        Nov 16    Nov 13    Nov 12      Nov 11   Nov 10
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100    1058.27   1059.26   1059.91   1045.16**  1054.50
FT-SE Eurotrack 200    1110.19   1114.93   1120.89   1108.98**  1117.70
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
High/day: 100 - 1059.32; 200 - 1113.20
Low/day: 100 - 1054.21 200 - 1106.93
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
**Partial
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7018</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AN improved bullion price and a weaker financial rand took mining shares off
midday lows. The gold index closed 13 down at 761, but off an earlier 754
low. The overall index fell 7 to 3,034 and industrials rose 9 to 4,078.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7019</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei below 16,000 on
earnings pessimism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Nikkei average fell below 16,000 for the first time since August 20 on
pessimism about corporate earnings and the continued delay in Diet debates,
writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The index fell 169.51 to 15,993.48 after a morning low of 15,941.93 on
arbitrage selling and an afternoon high of 16,100.90. Volume recovered to
200m shares from Monday's 124m, the second-lowest level since August 3.
Declines led advances by 670 to 228 with 165 unchanged, the Topix index of
all first section stocks lost 11.19 to 1,221.33 and, in London, the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index dropped 3.52 to 979.92.
In the morning, Mr Tsutomu Hata, the finance minister, revealed rule changes
for initial public share offerings in order to attract individual investors.
Investors ignored the announcement. Comments by Mr Kozo Watanabe, the
minister of international trade and industry, that the Nikkei average should
be at 18,000, considering the competitiveness of Japanese companies, also
failed to boost sentiment.
Investment trusts, which have been the leading buyers recently, stuck to the
sidelines. Public pension funds were also absent. Foreigners have also been
leading sellers of the market. One fund manager at a leading life assurer
said that the index was expected to fall to 15,000.
Bank shares met widespread selling on worries over bad loans. Rumours that
hedge funds were targeting bank shares for short-selling also sent jitters
through the market. Industrial Bank of Japan fell Y80 to Y2,230 and Fuji
Bank lost Y70 to Y1,690.
Electronics lost more ground on earnings worries. NEC fell Y2 to Y608 and
Matsushita Electronic Industrial retreated Y20 to Y1,040. Hitachi, however,
rose Y3 to Y703 on bargain-hunting.
The Tokyo Stock Exchange suspended trading in Gajoen Kanko, the hotel
operator involved with Itoman, the scandal-tainted textile trader, after
Gajoen's accountants refused to certify its interim earnings report. TSE
officials said the shares could be delisted if Gajoen failed to rewrite its
earnings report and obtain a final certificate.
In Osaka, the OSE average lost 92.63 to 17,467.72 in volume of 25.6m shares.
Ono Pharmaceutical gained Y80 to Y5,290, but Aoyama Trading, the men's
clothing company, fell Y70 to Y7,380 on profit-taking.
Roundup
PACIFIC Rim markets were more concerned with domestic matters than Tokyo's
drop. In Bombay and Calcutta, Indian brokers boycotted trading in protest
against registration fees imposed by the Securities and Exchange Board of
India.
HONG KONG saw waves of panic selling after a veiled threat about the future
of the colony issued in London by Chinese vice premier Zhu Rongji. The Hang
Seng index fell to 6,046.74 before bargain-hunters came in, and closed down
206.31 or 3.3 per cent at 6,088.52.
Turnover was moderate at HKDollars 3.76bn. HSBC Holdings fell HKDollars 2.50
to HKDollars 62.50.
AUSTRALIA broke a seven-day decline on bargain-hunting and the All
Ordinaries index finished 7.8 up at 1,365.1 in turnover of ADollars 210.2m.
ANZ closed unchanged at ADollars 2.53 after reporting a ADollars 579m loss
which the bank blamed partly on write-offs in its property portfolio.
NEW ZEALAND was lifted by a better than expected first half result from
Telecom Corp and the NZSE-40 capital index ended up 9.46 at 1,418.97 in
turnover of NZDollars 24.9m.
SINGAPORE ended higher on a technical rebound following Monday's losses on
news that both the country's deputy prime ministers had cancer. The Straits
Times Industrial index rose 19.38 to 1,433.65 in volume of 111.2m shares
against 130.4m.
SEOUL ended firmer in moderate trading on a technical rebound led by Kepco
shares. The composite index closed 14.78 higher at 631.42 in turnover of
Won440.96bn compared with Won370.68bn.
Kepco shares rose Won800, the daily upper limit, to Won20,500, on
expectations that the company will permit direct but limited foreign
investment at its shareholders' meeting on Friday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7020</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Continuing gloom on Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The dollar again broke through the DM1.60 level against the D-Mark yesterday
as the market continued to be swayed by Monday's report from five
independent economic forecasters suggesting that there will be zero growth
in the German economy in 1993, writes James Blitz.
If money market prices are anything to go by, there will be no easing in
official German rates before the New Year. But the report from the 'five
wise men' who advise the German government has again raised the prospect
that the Bundesbank will ease policy significantly next month to help boost
the economy.
The dollar continued to rally, peaking at DM1.6070 in European trading and
closing at DM1.5980, up nearly a pfennig on the day. In later American
trading, it was trading at 1.5982.
The dollar's rise was partly capped by the Bundesbank's decision to keep its
repurchase tender rate steady at 8.75 per cent, despite a net drain of funds
in the German money market.
One London-based dealer also said that the Bundesbank and the Bank of
England had subtly intervened in the market to cap the US currency's rise,
but this could not be confirmed.
Mr Neil MacKinnon, chief economist at Citibank in London, believes there is
every possibility that the dollar can correct lower, but views this as a
technical rather than fundamental process.
He believes that there are still signs of weakness in the US economy and
that today's September trade balance is likely to show a deficit of Dollars
8.7bn, because of a poor export performance.
'However,' he says, 'the Bundesbank will cut rates aggressively next
year,and I do not rule out a 50 basis point cut in the Lombard rate in 1992,
despite uncertainty surrounding the 1993 budget proposals.'
Mr Brendan Brown, an economist at Mitsubishi Finance International, has a
more cautious view of Bundesbank policy. His central case is that the
western German economy will not go into severe recession and that the
decline in German money market rates will be gradual. He sees the D-Mark
gaining further ground within Europe in coming months as monetary easing in
the UK and Italy outstrips that in the core countries.
Mitsubishi Finance's forecast for the dollar/D-Mark rate in the first half
of 1993 is DM1.52; by contrast, Citibank sees dollar/D-Mark at DM1.75 in May
of next year.
The D-Mark's intrinsic weakness was a boost for sterling which rose 1 1/2
pfennigs to close at DM2.4300. However, the pound was a good deal weaker
against the strong dollar, falling  3/4 of a cent to a low of Dollars
1.5125,. but later closing at Dollars 1.52. Mr Mackinnon of Citibank
believes that there is a strong correlation between the narrowing of US and
UK short term rates and the decline in sterling/D-Mark rate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7021</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Money Markets: Easing next year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN futures markets yesterday appeared to be taking the view that the
next round of central bank policy easing will come next year and not before
the end of 1992, writes James Blitz.
The longer-dated futures contracts in sterling, D-Marks and French francs
all showed good rises yesterday, implying that the cost of 3-month money
will drop next year.
By contrast, the shorter-dated futures in Europe fell back yesterday as
markets continue to take the view that the Bundesbank is keeping monetary
policy on a tight rein for the time being.
Sterling futures contracts now describe a falling interest rate yield curve
in the spring of 1993, but not before. The March 1993 contract rose 6 basis
points to a close of 93.77 yesterday, while the June contract rose 10 basis
points yesterday to 93.94.
The latter price means that 3-month money next summer would be at 6.06 per
cent, implying at least another 100 basis points off base rate within the
next 6 months.
Beyond that, the interest rate curve rises again. The March 1995 contract
was yesterday trading at 92.16, suggesting that 3-month money will be near 8
per cent again in 2 1/2 year's time.
Rates in the cash market describe roughly the same trend. Three-month money,
which is seen as a key guide to the market's view on rates, closed at 7 5/16
per cent from a previous close of 7 3/8 per cent.
That price is well above the base rate figure. But the easier close on the
day reflects the ease with which the Bank of England's shortage of Pounds
750m was removed. In the early round, Pounds 520m was removed, and there was
late assistance of Pounds 105m.
One commercial bank dealer suggested that the Bank of England might go out
of its way to help remove shortages in the next few days because of the
government's need to convince banks and building societies to pass on the
full effects of last Friday's base rate cut.
'With the short-dated periods much higher than base rate, the banks will
have a good reason for complaining of high funding costs,' he said.
Like sterling, the longer-dated Euromark contracts rose sharply yesterday.
June 1993 Euromarks rose 5 basis points to a close of 92.82, and December
1993 was up 6 basis points at a close of 93.43.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7022</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (8): Eyes on consumers -
Profile of Citicorp
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KOREANS can spend years cultivating relationships with their bank managers
in the hope of eventually being able to borrow enough to buy a home. Korean
banks prefer lending to the big industrial conglomerates dominating the
Korean economy than to the ordinary consumer.
Hence Citibank's decision to break into the consumer banking market. One of
the few foreign banks to have set its sights on the retail business in
Korea, after five years it has 12 branches in Seoul and Pusan, the second
largest city, and has won a reputation for good service by keeping a
relatively high proportion of account managers to customers.
'The business opportunities here are fabulous,' says Mr Howard Greene,
Citicorp's country head of global consumer banking in Korea.
Citicorp has been successful because it has focused on products which
domestic banks failed to develop. In the mortgage business, Korean banks
tend to advance up to Dollars 40,000 (about Won30m).
Some of the more paternalistic employers - for example Posco, the iron and
steel group - help their employees own a home by lending them money at a
lower interest rate.
But for many Koreans, the only way to scrape together enough is through a
kye, an unregulated credit association run by relations and family friends
who pool their money. Citibank said it would lend up to Dollars 200,000 for
a mortgage, provided the borrower met its creditworthiness criteria.
The US bank is now experimenting with drive-in automated teller machines,
having spent months persuading the authorities to let it set up 24-hour
touch-screen ATMs. Next year, it plans to overhaul its day-to-day banking
products and services in what is still a predominantly cash society.
Citicorp says it is targeting upper-middle class customers rather than those
described by bankers as 'high net worth individuals'. Already, it is making
a small profit on its retail operations: this year it expects to make
Dollars 4m, with a further Dollars 9m in 1993, compared with a loss of
Dollars 3m five years ago. It has set it sights on capturing between 2 and 3
per cent of the retail banking market. But even that tiny portion has
worried some of the Korean banks who resent the competition in their own
backyard.
 --------------------------------------------------------------
                MARKET SHARE OF FOREIGN BANKS (%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
                     1986   1987   1988   1989   1990   1991
 --------------------------------------------------------------
Deposits              1.6    1.5    1.0    1.1    1.6    1.9
Won                   1.4    1.3    1.0    1.0    1.6    1.7
Foreign currency      6.0    3.2    1.1    2.5    2.3    4.2
Loans                10.9   10.2    8.5    6.8    6.0    6.5
Won                   5.9    5.8    5.6    4.5    4.2    4.8
Foreign currency     63.3   44.6   34.1   28.3   22.9   21.0
Total assets         10.8   10.5    9.4    8.7    8.1    5.8
 --------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Bank of Korea
 --------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7023</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (9): 'Wild West' in view
 -New strategies will be needed after deregulation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KOREA'S banks face a tougher future. The planned deregulation of the
country's financial markets is expected to lead to fiercer competition
forcing banks to focus on improving profitability through the reduction of
overheads and better credit analysis.
'For the banks it will be like the Wild West,' says Mr Young-Wook Chin,
director of the Bank Division at the Ministry of Finance. 'They will have to
develop new strategies.'
Korean banks have led a closely-regulated existence for many years.
Privatisation may have freed the commercial banks from direct state control,
but they must still obey guidelines on credit allocation, while interest
rates on loans and deposits have been tightly regulated.
The first stage of interest rate deregulation at the end of 1991 affected
bank overdraft loans, commercial paper, overdue loans, bank certificates of
deposit, trade bills, repurchase agreements and corporate bonds with
maturities exceeding two years.
However, the most important step will be the next one, consisting of the
deregulation of interest rates on all bank lending (with the exception of
loans financed by the government), longer-term deposits with maturities of
more than two years, corporate bonds with maturities of less than two years
and bank debentures with maturities of over two years.
Mr Choi Kak-Kyu, Economic Planning Board Minister, recently said this step
would not be implemented until the first half of 1993. Once effected, 75 per
cent of lending rates and 30 per cent of deposit rates will have been
deregulated, according to the Korea Federation of Banks. By 1997, all
interest rates should have been deregulated.
The lifting of interest rate regulations is expected to result in a
narrowing of interest margins. The Office of Bank Supervision warns that
liberalisation of interest rates will lead to tougher competition between
the banks and lower profitability. So banks will have to focus on improving
profitability in a number of ways. These include:
Reducing expenditure and overheads. Many Korean banks have large branch
networks and are overstaffed, with cumbersome administration departments.
Some have stopped hiring new staff, and are supplementing expensive offices
with automated teller machines.
Introducing more competitive products which provide a higher return. Banks
are already trying to move away from interest-bearing to more fee-based
services, according to the Korea Federation of Banks, both in the corporate
and consumer area.
Improving credit analysis. Existing guidelines on credit allocation have
done little to encourage good credit analysis and, in the words of one
foreign banker, 'the result is that lending is not conducted purely on good
business sense and credit analysis'.
Bankers complain that the numerous rules force them to make loans to risky
borrowers. For example, 45 per cent of bank lending is supposed to go to
small and medium-sized companies, but bankers argue that these are the ones
currently feeling the pinch due to the combination of the slowdown in export
growth and high interest rates. Many of them cannot meet their interest
payments and bankruptcies among small and medium-sized companies have
reached worrying levels with about 5,000 smaller concerns and 18 listed
companies failing in the first nine months.
Non-performing loans have risen as a proportion of total assets from 1.8 per
cent in 1991 to 1.9 per cent at the end of June: while the figure is well
below the 1987 level of 5.4 per cent, it is still a cause for concern. The
Office of Bank Supervision is encouraging banks to introduce loan office
systems to evaluate credits and to monitor borrowers.
But some analysts are worried the proportion of non-performing loans may
rise further in view of the characteristic high gearing of Korean companies
and difficulties faced by the smaller companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7024</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (7): Sector on
tenterhooks ahead of proposals - Financiers await the most important phase
of liberalisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Korean financial sector is holding its breath. Proposals to be unveiled
next month could radically alter the shape of the system, but uncertainty
remains about how far-reaching the changes will be and when they will be
completed.
The steps to be announced in December are the last - and the most important
 -of the three-stage financial liberalisation blueprint that the Ministry of
Finance (MOF) has been preparing this year.
The MOF agreed to produce a schedule of measures after President George
Bush's visit to South Korea in January. The US, Seoul's closest ally, has
been pushing for financial liberalisation to improve investment prospects
for foreign companies in South Korea.
The first two phases, unveiled in March and June, consist of measures
designed to allow foreign financial institutions greater access to the
Korean market. However, these reforms, which will take effect between now
and 1996, will have only a limited impact on the structure of the Korean
financial system since they are concerned with relatively minor issues.
Included are measures making it easier for foreign banks - which face
restrictions on bringing capital into the country - to raise local currency
funds in the domestic market. The amount of certificates of deposits that
foreign banks can issue locally is being increased and foreign banks will be
given equal treatment in the interbank market.
A reduction in foreign exchange restrictions is also being introduced to
improve access to funds. Limits on foreign exchange positions of banks will
be eased, while the band for exchange rate fluctuations is being widened.
These measures are expected to lead to the internationalisation of the
Korean Won.
It is the third set of long-term measures, scheduled for implementation
after 1997, that deal with the fundamental principles of the current
tightly-regulated system.
The issues include:
Full-scale interest rate deregulation, which provides the foundation for
other financial liberalisation measures. The government has already started
to deregulate interest rates in four stages, a process that is expected to
be completed by the end of the century. Long-term rates will be deregulated
before short-term ones, while lending rates will be freed before deposit
rates.
All interest rates on loans will be fully liberalised by 1996, while 70 per
cent of deposit rates will also be freed. The final stage, from 1997, will
lift the regulation of short-term demand deposit rates and interest rates on
government and public bonds.
Deregulation is expected eventually to reduce interest rates, which are now
higher than those of Korea's main trade competitors. It will also end the
practice of 'policy loans' which banks must grant at below-market rates to
industries deemed strategic by the government. Policy loans account for 45
per cent of total bank credit and have contributed to the banks' bad-debt
problems.
The liberalisation of capital transfers into and out of Korea. This will
give Korean companies greater access to international capital markets and
reduce their borrowing costs, while promoting increased foreign investment.
The Ministry of Finance now regulates tightly which Korean companies can
borrow from abroad.
The abolition of credit allocation controls. Banks are now required to
provide at least 35 per cent of their total lending to small and medium
businesses, while they face restrictions on lending to big business groups.
Financial market deregulation. The stock market opened to limited direct
foreign investment at the start of this year.
Controls are also being lifted on the domestic bond market, with foreign
participation scheduled to take place after 1997. There are plans to
establish a commodity and financial futures market. Korea needs better
developed financial markets to improve its open market mechanisms governing
monetary policy.
Although the MOF is committed in principle to achieving these long-term
goals, questions still remain about the effects of the liberalisation
programme on the financial system.
Decisions will be guided by the Korean preference for a financial system
similar to that of Japan, where it is considered an instrument for guiding
industrial policy. Thus the MOF recommendations may disappoint supporters of
a more market-led Anglo-American financial system.
The Korean government might try to retain influence over the financial
system by continuing to restrict the independence of the Bank of Korea, the
central bank, and influencing the appointment of senior bank executives.
Another factor that will affect the outcome of financial liberalisation is
the future ownership structure of the domestic banks, which have been the
main tools of government control of the financial system.
The Federation of Korean Industries wants the government to allow the big
industrial conglomerates, or chaebol, to become main shareholders in the
commercial banks.
It argues that chaebol ownership would promote competition within the
banking industry and enhance management efficiency. It would also extend the
chaebol's ownership over a large share of Korea's financial institutions.
Bank ownership is now fragmented, with no individual shareholder being
allowed more than a 8 per cent stake. The dispersed ownership of the banks
allows the government to retain influence over the banking sector in spite
of its privatisation in the late 1980s.
The government consequently will resist the chaebol ownership of banks.
Instead, it hopes the banks will take control of other financial
institutions and reduce the chaebol's power.
Another unknown factor is the question of when the financial liberalisation
programme will be completed since the government has given an open-ended
deadline. 'We know the key structural changes will start in 1997, but we
fear they could take as long as a decade or two to complete,' said a US
official.
The MOF has set economic preconditions for introducing the third-stage
reforms since it fears rapid deregulation could cause economic instability.
It wants Korea to maintain a consistent current account surplus. Inflation
must fall to 5 per cent, while the differential between domestic and
international interest rates should narrow to 2 to 3 per cent.
The foreign financial community is concerned about whether economic targets
can be achieved without introducing some of the third-stage reforms. 'It's a
chicken-or-egg situation,' said one US banker.
But a recent improvement in economic performance is bringing those targets
within sudden reach. The current account deficit could shrink to Dollars
5.6bn from Dollars 8.7bn in 1991. Inflation is expected to fall to 6.6 per
cent for the year, while the interest rate gap is narrowing.
The improved economy and pressure from international financial advisors,
such as the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank, could eventually
force the government to accelerate financial liberalisation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7025</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (2): Industrial empires
still dominate - Seoul's efforts to curb the economic power of the chaebol
have come under fire
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE South Korean government's tight regulation of the financial system is
closely linked to its industrial policy. Officials argue that they must
retain control over the financial system in order to curb the economic power
of the family-owned conglomerates, or chaebol.
The government wants to make the chaebol more efficient by forcing them to
prune their sprawling industrial empires and instead concentrate on a few
important core businesses. It also seeks to reduce what it considers the
pernicious influence of the family owners on corporate management.
But critics contend that the state's use of the financial system to achieve
these goals has failed and should be abandoned.
'The economy has become too developed for the government to rely on the
financial system as an effective instrument for industrial restructuring,'
said Mr Jwa Sung-hee, a researcher at the Korea Development Institute (KDI),
the government-affiliated policy centre.
The government originally used its power over the financial system to
promote the growth of the chaebol in the 1960s and 1970s by providing them
with cheap loans. Then President Park Chung-hee believed that the emergence
of the business groups would help the country to industrialise quickly.
But by the 1980s, the government of President Chun Doo-hwan decided that the
chaebol had grown too large. They were monopolising bank loans and their
economic dominance was hindering the development of small and medium
businesses.
Moreover, the chaebol were criticised for spreading their resources too
thinly by competing in many of the same industrial sectors, from cars and
ships to construction and electronics. The intense competition reflected the
personal rivalry among the chaebol's family owners.
Credit restrictions were introduced in the mid-1980s, which limited the
percentage of bank loans that could be given to the chaebol.
However, the export boom of the late 1980s weakened the impact of the credit
controls and had little appreciable effect on the growth of the chaebol.
They still enjoy lower financing costs than smaller companies, which must
often borrow from the secondary 'kerb market' at higher interest rates.
The chaebol believe that the government's attempts to regulate them are
misguided. They argue that industrial diversification is important because
profitable subsidiaries are able to support the emergence of new industries.
The credit restrictions also hinder the chaebol's international
competitiveness since they are forced to pay higher financing costs than
their competitors in Japan and Taiwan.
A new round of reform measures was recently introduced by the government of
President Roh Tae-woo after the chaebol were criticised for using some of
their profits from the 1980s boom to invest in property, which helped
increase land prices and caused public protests.
Although the chaebol engaged in property speculation to help raise funds
that were denied them through the banking system, the government argued that
the companies should have invested more of their earnings in research and
development or improving industrial facilities.
The government last year stipulated that the 30 biggest chaebol should each
select three core businesses that would form the focus of their future
activity.
The intention was to continue to use the chaebol as vehicles for economic
development by lifting credit restrictions on the designated core companies,
while squeezing credit given to other subsidiaries in compliance with the
government's goal of reducing the size of the chaebol.
But this compromise solution has been called a failure by the KDI in a
recent report. Instead of selecting high-tech business areas as the
government hoped, the chaebol picked either financially weak or
capital-intensive subsidiaries for the unlimited bank loans.
A number of core companies were in the same business sectors, contributing
to a duplication of industrial operations. Twelve chaebol, for example,
selected petrochemicals as one of their core activities, even though Korea
is suffering from excess production capacity and unprofitability in this
sector.
Another weakness with the system is that there are few controls to determine
whether the core companies are funnelling the bank loans to non-core
concerns.
The proportion of bank loans to the top 30 chaebol has barely changed since
the policy was first introduced, and the number of chaebol subsidiaries
continues to multiply instead of shrink.
'We haven't found the optimal policy yet toward the chaebol. We are still in
a transition phase,' admits Mr Suh Sang-mok, an influential government MP.
'The chaebol are an important part of the Korean economy. We cannot apply
shock treatment to them.'
The government now wants to reduce cross payment guarantees among chaebol
subsidiaries. This could threaten some financially weak units since reduced
guarantees could discourage banks from lending to them.
Most chaebol are in a financially vulnerable position, with the average
chaebol having a debt/equity ratio of 350 per cent, a legacy from the days
of easy credit.
'The chaebol's heavy debts have made hostages of the commercial banks, which
fear that the collapse of one chaebol company would lead to downfall of the
entire business group as a result of the cross-payment guarantees,' explains
Dr Suh.
The KDI report argues, however, that the government should abandon its
attempts to regulate the size and diversification of the chaebol through
credit controls, explaining that the strength and maturity of these groups
makes such efforts 'dubious and even anachronistic'.
Instead, attention should focus on widening their ownership, which will
eventually loosen ties among the chaebol subsidiaries. It would also reduce
the influence of the family owners, who would be replaced as corporate
executives by professional managers.
A stronger inheritance and gift tax system would encourage the family owners
to sell shareholdings to their employees or the general public. Mr Kim
Young-sam, the next likely president of South Korea, has indicated that he
would make this approach the centrepiece of his chaebol reform policy.
Further steps could be taken to encourage banks and other financial
institutions to become main chaebol shareholders.
One proposal being discussed is that the banks convert some of their
outstanding chaebol loans into equity holdings. This would be combined with
tougher rules that would prevent the chaebol from taking control of the
banks.
The chaebol have already succeeded in gaining ownership of about half of the
country's non-bank institutions, including insurance companies and brokerage
firms, and used them to bypass the controls on bank loans.
About two-thirds of chaebol loans are provided by banks, while the remainder
comes from secondary financial institutions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7026</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (3): Searching for funds
 -Corporate Borrowing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KOREA'S leading corporate names are pressing for freedom to tap
international capital markets in order to reduce funding costs and improve
the competitiveness of their products.
The cheaper borrowing available in the international bond markets is
particularly attractive to Korea's high-tech companies which need to invest
heavily in research and development to compete at an international level.
Korean companies have tapped international capital markets with a growing
number of issues since the mid-1980s. Overseas securities offerings peaked
in 1991 as Korean companies raised a total of Dollars 1.06bn in convertible
bonds, bonds with warrants and depositary receipts, according to the
Securities Supervisory Board. So far this year, companies such as Pohang
Iron &amp; Steel (Posco), one of the world's largest steelmakers, and Korea
Electric Power Corporation (Kepco) have borrowed in the Yankee bond market
and others are lining up to follow suit.
However, Korean companies complain about government restrictions on overseas
borrowing: the business community has been lobbying for the removal of all
controls as the Ministry of Finance proceeds with the liberalisation of the
domestic financial markets.
At present, Korean companies may only tap the international capital markets
if the proceeds are used either for investment in their overseas operations
or to finance the import of advanced technology unavailable in Korea. The
proceeds may not be repatriated for the financing of domestic operations.
While officials at the Ministry of Finance are well aware of the benefits of
lower funding costs to Korea's leading corporate names, they remain
concerned about the possible effect of such borrowing on the Korean economy.
The restrictions reflect government concern that the money raised abroad
would be transferred back to Korea, increasing the money supply. The
government is determined to curb inflation and has set its M-2 money supply
growth target at 18.5 per cent for the year.
To tap international capital markets, companies need permission from the
Ministry of Finance and, at present, corporate demand exceeds the amount
permitted, according to investment bankers in Seoul.
Domestic sources of financing remain limited or relatively expensive for
borrowers. The weak state of the stock market has made it difficult for
companies to issue large domestic share offerings. The cost of borrowing in
the domestic bond market remains relatively high, even though three-year
corporate bond yields have fallen from over 19 per cent at the end of 1991
to below 13 per cent in October. Meanwhile bank loans are subject to
guidelines on credit allocation and so are not always easy to obtain.
For high-tech companies such as Samsung Electronics, Korea's largest
electronics group, and Hyundai Motor, the car manufacturer, which need to
invest large amounts in research and development, the high cost of funding
in the domestic markets can prove a handicap.
'The availability of funds is one of our main problems, as well as the cost
of funds,' says Mr Young-Key Hwang, executive director and group treasurer
at the Samsung Group. He reckons that the cost of funds in the international
capital markets approaches 8.5 to 9 per cent, while domestic bond yields are
still in double digits. The result could well be to force Korean companies
to curb capital expenditure and focus on the rationalisation of their
businesses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7027</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (4): Analysts sceptical -
The Stock Market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Korean stock market remained tantalisingly out of reach for overseas
investors during the high-growth years of the 1980s. Those who wanted to
profit from Korea's enviable economic performance had to be content with
investing through country funds and convertible bond issues, while
continuing to press for direct access to one of Asia's most exciting
markets.
In January 1992, their wish was granted. Restrictions on direct ownership
were relaxed, but the opening up of the market could hardly have been less
auspicious. Overseas investors were confronted by cumbersome red tape,
less-than-generous limits on ownership and a market in decline.
The Korea Stock Price Index (KOSPI) started the year at 624.23 and tumbled
to a low of 459.07 on August 21, well below the all-time high of 1007.77
seen on April 1, 1989. Worries about the slowdown in economic and corporate
earnings growth and the trade deficit lie behind the fall.
With such a lacklustre performance, foreigners were reluctant to rush in at
first. Net foreign investment reached Dollars 1.27bn in the first 10 months,
well short of the Dollars 2-4bn initially predicted.
Limits on foreign ownership were set at 10 per cent for most companies,
although some - such as the Korea Long-Term Credit Bank - are free to raise
the threshold to 25 per cent if they wish. So far, the foreign ownership
quota has been met by only 70 or so out of a total of 680 listed companies.
About 15 of those 70 companies have reached the upper limit through direct
portfolio investment, according to the Securities Supervisory Board. The
remainder reached their 10 per cent limit through joint venture or direct
investment agreements.
The limits pose serious problems for international investors, diminishing
their appetite for Korean stocks. The main problem is liquidity. Big
investors who want to buy or sell Dollars 3-4m in one stock are restricted
in their choice. In addition, global fund managers tend to be guided by
international indices when allocating assets. Korea, which is not a
completely free market, has only 20 per cent of its market capitalisation
included in the Emerging Market Free Far East Index provided by Morgan
Stanley Capital International, whereas countries such as Indonesia and
Thailand are included at 100 per cent.
'At 10 per cent the market is still effectively closed to foreigners,' says
Mr Torquil McAlpine, branch manager of Schroders in Seoul. Foreigners hope
the Ministry of Finance may soon raise the limits to 20 to 25 per cent for
most listed companies. Such a move would 'be a shot in the arm for the
market and would send a message to international investors that Korea is
adopting a more open attitude,' says Mr Peter Thorn, branch manager of W I
Carr in Seoul.
That Korea needs to send such signals to global investors is clear. A recent
Euromoney survey of investor interest in the emerging markets showed Korea
trailing behind other Far Eastern emerging markets such as Malaysia, Taiwan,
Thailand and Indonesia.
Analysts claim that many of the risk capital investors who would once have
been wooed by Korea are now turning to the next generation of Asian tigers
such as China and Vietnam.
The government has tried to encourage investors with a string of rescue
packages aimed at reversing the stock market's decline. In December 1989,
Korean investment trust companies were told to borrow funds from banks and
invest the money in the stock market. In May 1990, a 4,000bn-won stock
market stabilisation fund was set up. The proceeds - provided by listed
companies - were intended for equity investment. The measures provided only
short-lived relief in the market, which then continued its decline.
The most recent support measures, announced shortly after the market hit its
low this year, were intended to force institutions to buy stocks.
Institutional investors must remain net buyers, with bank trust accounts,
insurance companies and pension funds instructed to invest a specified
amount within a set period.
Additional measures were proposed to woo back individual investors, increase
liquidity and reduce market interest rates. The market has since shown signs
of recovery, helped by the fall in interest rates, the decision to lift
restrictions on foreign ownership of shares in Posco (the iron and steel
company) and Kepco (the power group), as well as the feeling that the stock
market was looking cheap. As a result, the index has recently risen to
levels seen at the start of the year.
Many investors are hoping the winner of December's presidential election
will propose measures to boost economic growth which would provide further
impetus for the stock market.
However, analysts remain sceptical about the extent to which the market can
recover, primarily because banks, brokers and financial institutions are
sitting on an estimated Dollars 10-15bn (out of a total market
capitalisation of about Dollars 75bn) in shares due to the assorted
market-support measures. There is no doubting their desire to offload the
stock as soon as a suitable opportunity arises, and it is this overhang of
stock which analysts believe could hold the market's rally in check.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7028</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (5): Going gets tough -
Securities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A FOREIGN fund manager visiting a Korean securities firm in the high-rise
financial district of Youido was horrified to find the staff playing table
tennis.
His tale is not unusual: the Korean securities industry expanded rapidly in
the late 1980s, but many stockbrokers now find they are overstaffed and
overbranched at a time when commission income is falling because of the weak
stock market. Added to this, competition on their home turf has increased as
several foreign securities houses have set up branches in Korea to accompany
the opening of the market to foreigners.
The securities sector is in need of rationalisation. Overheads are high,
after expansion at home and abroad, but Korean securities houses are
reluctant to cut branches and staff. Given the Korean cultural aversion to
sacking employees, securities companies admit the only way they can curb
growing wage bills is by halting annual recruitment.
Commission income for equity trading is down as the bear market has deterred
individual investors, who once dominated activity, and institutions -
although the latter are obliged to invest specified amounts in the market as
part of the government's attempts to prop up share prices.
The securities houses, too, have been forced to participate in stock market
support measures and many are sitting on enormous share portfolios on which
they have made a loss. Daewoo Securities, the largest broker, said its
holdings amounted to about Won500bn at the end of September, and it expects
to see a 15 to 20 per cent book loss on its portfolio at year-end.
One foreign analyst estimates the big securities houses are sitting on share
portfolio losses of Dollars 100-200m each. The Securities Supervisory Board
points out that most of the securities houses made losses in the first six
months of the financial year, with combined losses for the 10 largest
brokers amounting to Won76bn.
The outlook remains bleak as Korean securities houses expect to face
increased competition from the handful of foreign brokers that have opened
branches in Seoul. Branch status allows a foreign securities house to
conduct research and liaison business, and to generate revenue by placing
buy and sell orders. However, the orders have to go through a Korean broker,
who receives 30 per cent of the commission.
Jardine Fleming, one of the first to open a branch, admits that under
current market conditions it is not making a profit on the broking side:
instead it makes money by investing part of its Won10bn minimum capital
requirement in the high-yielding bond market and from proprietary trading.
Baring Securities and Jardine Fleming both made small losses in their first
year as branches, but compared with their domestic rivals, they have the
advantage of being leaner outfits, without a large branch network and huge
workforce.
The domestic houses see them as a threat for several reasons. First, Koreans
would prefer to do business directly with overseas investors, rather than
share the commission with a foreign house.
Secondly, they are worried that foreigners could steal their domestic
institutional clients. So far, foreign houses have made little headway on
that front. Business in Korea depends primarily on relationships built up
over many years. As one Korean stockbroker puts it: 'In Korea there is no
big difference between the securities houses in terms of transaction costs
or research. Fund managers often have their own research team - what is more
important is the relationship with the broker, the frequent calls, visits
and dinners.'
Yet attitudes appear to be changing. Foreign houses place far more emphasis
on the quality of their research and some Korean houses admit that with the
arrival of foreign houses, Korean institutions are showing a keener interest
in the research material put out.
Finally, if stock market activity picks up, some foreign houses may be
tempted to put up the relatively large sum required for a seat on the stock
exchange, allowing them to trade directly.
'At the moment, the volumes generated simply do not justify a seat,' says Mr
Philip Smiley, branch manager of Jardine Fleming. But if and when they do,
Korean brokers believe they will provide 'really tough competition'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7029</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (6): Battle for change -
Reforms are held in a bureaucratic tug of war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BUREAUCRATIC struggle being waged between the country's three leading
economic agencies will largely determine the future of South Korea's
financial liberalisation programme.
The Economic Planning Board (EPB), traditionally the senior economic agency
in the government, favours an accelerated push for financial liberalisation.
But the powerful Ministry of Finance (MOF) is resisting rapid change and
wants to maintain control over the financial system.
Caught in the middle of the dispute is the Bank of Korea (BOK), the central
bank, which has become a proponent of financial reform in a bid to gain
independence from the MOF, its political master.
The EPB has been the most influential state economic agency since it was
established in 1961 by President Park Chung-hee to supervise South Korea's
industrialisation programme.
It played the central role in South Korea's dirigiste economy over the next
three decades, drawing up five-year plans that determined the country's
industrial structure. EPB's strength reflected the concentration of power
within the Blue House, the executive mansion, under Presidents Park and Chun
Doo-hwan.
One indication of its senior position in the official hierarchy is that the
EPB director is also automatically the deputy prime minister, while the EPB
headquarters physically dominates the Kwachon government complex,
overlooking the other economic ministries from its hilltop location.
But the EPB's power has waned under President Roh Tae-woo who has favoured
decentralising power to the individual ministries as part of the country's
democratisation process. Mr Roh, who likes foreign policy, has also paid
less attention to economic issues than his predecessors.
'The EPB has become an institution without a role as economic planning
becomes less important,' says one western diplomat. 'It is becoming more
academic in its thinking and more liberal in its policy recommendations,
including financial liberalisation.'
The case for financial liberalisation within the EPB is supported by the
fact that many of its senior staff were educated at US universities and have
been influenced by market-based economic theories. The MOF gained influence
at the EPB's expense, consolidating its already powerful position in the
Korean bureaucracy.
Critics charge that the MOF is becoming the centre of resistance to
financial reform because its officials are reluctant to relinquish the power
they wield. Under the current regulated financial system, the MOF determines
the allocation of credit to industry, decides what companies can borrow
funds from abroad and who will lead the nation's banks.
Due to their influence, MOF officials can also find secure jobs in the
financial sector once they retire from government. 'Retired MOF officials
won't have any place to go to under financial liberalisation,' said one
Korean financial analyst.
MOF officials disagree. 'MOF is being blamed more than it ought to be,' says
Mr Oum Bong-sung, an advisor to the Finance Minister. 'Our critics are
unaware of the practical difficulties of financial liberalisation.'
But some of the most harsh comments within the MOF are reserved for the BOK.
Tensions between the two agencies have grown in the past few years as the
BOK attempts to assert its independence from the MOF.
The BOK is now one of the most tightly controlled central banks in the
world, according to a recent study by the World Bank, which ranked it as
42nd out of 56 central banks surveyed in terms of independence. 'The
government favours keeping control over both fiscal and monetary policies,
so it wants continued co-ordination between MOF and the BOK,' explains one
MOF official.
The government has often interferred in BOK operations, frequently replacing
its governors and encouraging an expansion of the money supply in an attempt
to boost economic growth.
But Mr Cho Soon, the new BOK governor appointed in March, has become
outspoken in criticising the government and demanding financial reform. Mr
Cho was head of the EPB between 1988 and 1990, but was forced to resign
because his strong views on economic deregulation angered politicians and
the business sector. His appointment as BOK governor was consequently
considered something of a surprise and he has lived up to his reputation for
independence.
Earlier this year, he successfully fought to tighten the money supply in a
bid to lower the inflation rate and restore stability to the country's
overheated economy. He is now battling with the MOF in pushing for faster
deregulation of interest rates.
Interest rate deregulation would improve the BOK's ability to control the
money supply and fight inflation, while giving it a more independent role
through its exercise of open market mechanisms. It would also deprive the
MOF of its power to allocate cheap credit to favoured industries - one of
its most cherished privileges.
MOF announced last year that it would deregulate interest rates in four
stages by the end of the century. The bank and the ministry are now arguing
about when to introduce the second stage - scheduled by the MOF for between
last July and the end of 1993 - considered crucial since it frees most
lending rates.
With interest rates recently falling sharply, the bank believes now is the
time to launch the second stage. But the MOF remains cautious, saying the
early introduction of the second phase would cause interest rates to jump.
Most analysts believe, however, that this will not happen since corporate
demand for funds is falling as many industries curb investment because of
excess production capacity. Instead, the MOF's resistance is considered
symbolic of its innate conservatism. It wants to avoid any risk of an
interest rate rise before the presidential election in December.
The MOF is still considered strong enough to resist pressure from the EPB
and the BOK on speeding up financial reform. Nevertheless, the election of
South Korea's next president could alter the outcome of the bureaucratic
struggle.
Mr Kim Young-sam of the ruling Democratic Liberal Party (DLP) is favoured to
win the election. Although Mr Kim admits to a lack of economic expertise,
some of his advisors are considered strong reformers of the financial
system.
Their ability to accelerate financial liberalisation will depend on whether
Mr Kim can reassert the power of the Blue House over the bureaucracy in
economic affairs. Some doubt that Mr Kim can succeed, since his base of
support within the ruling party is small, making it difficult to oust
leading economic officials appointed by the Roh administration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7030</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Korean Financial Markets (1): Deliberating over
change - The strict government regulation of South Korea's financial system
has outlived its usefulness. But while reforms are badly needed, officials
fear that liberalisation could release forces damaging to the economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH Korean bureaucrats are in a quandary as they prepare to unveil
important financial liberalisation proposals next month.
They realise the country's antiquated financial system needs to be
overhauled to improve industrial competitiveness. But they fear deregulation
will also unleash forces that could disrupt the economy.
How they resolve this dilemma is one of the most important issues
confronting South Korea in the 1990s, since financial liberalisation holds
the key to the country's progress.
The government successfully used the financial system to transform South
Korea into a mighty industrial power during the past three decades. The
state borrowed money from abroad and funnelled it through the
quasi-government banking system to strategic industries at low interest
rates.
But this system, appropriate for a developing country, has lost its ability
to allocate funds efficiently as South Korea's increasingly sophisticated
economy defeats efforts to manage it by bureaucratic fiat.
Government controls, including regulated interest rates, stringent limits on
capital and foreign exchange transactions, and credit allocation, have led
to distortions in the financial system.
The result is high interest rates caused by a chronic shortage of capital.
This has occurred even though South Korea has one of the world's highest
savings ratios.
Financial regulation is hampering the country's industrial development at a
critical point as South Korea tries to navigate the route taking it from
being a low-cost producer of cheap bulk goods to a manufacturer of high-tech
products.
Companies have problems funding research and improving productivity because
of the restrictions on credit and foreign corporate borrowing. High
financing costs have saddled the big conglomerates, or chaebol, with huge
debt burdens, reducing their profitability. Many small and medium businesses
face the threat of bankruptcy.
The financial system is also discouraging foreign investment since foreign
companies have problems raising capital locally or transferring funds from
abroad.
Officials acknowledge that the financial system is causing problems but they
remain cautious about change. Their hesitation in introducing fundamental
reforms reflects concerns ranging from the loss of bureaucratic control and
fear of foreign ownership to economic destabilisation and the banking
industry's weakness.
Officials argue, for example, that speedy liberalisation would damage the
economy, with a sudden influx of capital causing inflationary pressure and
sending interest rates higher. 'We don't want to experiment with the
economy,' Mr Oum Bong-sung, counsellor to the Minister of Finance, says.
'Credit demand will continue to exceed supply even in a liberalised market,'
Mr Kim Chang-lok, director of the Ministry of Finance's International
Finance Division says. 'Koreans like to speculate and much of the borrowed
funds will go into the property market because it offers better rates of
return on investment.
'Rapid financial liberalisation would not solve our need for capital and it
could reduce the savings ratio.'
The government cites its earlier attempt to deregulate interest rates in
1988, which caused rates to rise and forced the reform to be aborted, as an
example of the challenge it faces. It argues that a gradual approach is
necessary to avoid adverse side effects.
Most international economists agree that a short-term rise in interest rates
is almost certain once deregulation is introduced because of the country's
capital shortage. But they add that rates will fall in the long term as
capital inflows ease the funding shortage and the increased availability of
other financial investments attracts money from the property market.
Also impeding liberalisation is the unpreparedness of domestic financial
institutions, particularly the banks, to deal with market deregulation.
The country is overbanked, with large bank staffs, inefficient management
and inadequate services. The regulated interest rate system has guaranteed
bank profitability since the interest rate spread between lending and
deposits is two to four times higher than in the US and Japan.
Deregulation will create the need for rationalisation, while forcing the
banks to develop such management skills as credit analysis instead of
relying on government guidance in making loans. Bank supervision and
regulations must also be strengthened, including the possible introduction
of a deposit insurance system.
But perhaps the most worrying danger facing the banks is that of their large
non-performing loans and assets, the result of government policy requiring
banks to provide 'policy loans' at subsidised rates to strategic industries.
Banks have also been forced by the government to invest in securities as
part of an unsuccessful attempt to bolster the stock market, but the value
of these shares has fallen. Although the weakness of the banks is due to
government intervention, officials are now using their troubles as a reason
to delay liberalisation.
Liberalisation, however, has potential advantages for the banks. Interest
rate deregulation will allow them to recover deposits lost to other
financial institutions, such as short-term finance companies, which now
offer better interest rates.
Slowing down liberalisation is the fear that foreigners, particularly the
Japanese, will take advantage of the relaxed controls to increase their
economic influence over South Korea. Koreans still harbour strong resentment
towards Japan because of its colonial rule between 1910 and 1945.
The government also worries that the chaebol will consolidate their economic
dominance under the financial reforms. The abolition of credit allocation
will allow the chaebol to monopolise financial resources at the expense of
small and medium businesses, officials argue.
The chaebol have been winners and losers under the financial system. Their
growth was spurred by the state-mandated subsidised loans, with easy credit
encouraging them to build up huge debt/equity ratios.
But the government has cracked down on the chaebol in the past few years in
an attempt to curb their power. Limits on foreign borrowing and other credit
restrictions have driven up their financial costs, while increasing their
debt burden.
Although financial liberalisation would remove one restraint on the chaebol,
the government has other ways of keeping them under control if it introduces
new rigorous anti-trust laws.
But financial liberalisation will still represent a loss of power for the
bureaucracy, which has used financial controls to keep industry dependent on
the state. Deregulation will also mean the government will have to compete
against the chaebol in acquiring funds, raising state costs. Consequently,
there is resistance among officials to reforms.
All these concerns will almost certainly lead Seoul to reject the
Anglo-American model of a financial system governed largely by market
forces. Instead, reforms will follow the Japanese model, with the easing of
some controls and retention of others to ensure that the financial system
still plays an influential role in industry policy.
Less certain is whether South Korea will be able to stick to its preferred
course of gradually relaxing interest rates and foreign capital movements.
The country is under pressure from the US to accelerate the liberalisation
process. A 'wild card' is the possible sudden collapse of North Korea and a
German-style takeover by the South. This would cause an enormous demand for
capital and may force it to open up its financial market more rapidly to
attract foreign investment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7031</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Exports add savour to Chile's
fruit cocktail - The country leading the southern invasion of northern
markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTHERN hemisphere fruit exporters have doubled their sales to the northern
hemisphere in the past decade - but Chile's 'exceptional dynamism' has
enabled it to grab almost three- quarters of total gains.
According to a new study by Mr Jean-Marie Codron in the latest edition of
Agribusiness, significant further headway can be expected during the coming
decade, though it may be accompanied by rising protectionism, and
intensified trade conflict in certain fruits - particularly apples and kiwi
fruit in Europe and table grapes in the US.
Protection may be best organised in the unified market of the US. But this
may be disguised by the use of health and food safety laws, he warns. Best
growth will come in currently-closed markets like Japan and South Korea.
The gains made by the southern hemisphere exporters - which include Chile,
New Zealand, Argentina, South Africa and Australia - have been made possible
by new technologies and faster transport as well as substantial investment
by multinationals, which have been particularly active in Chile.
Mr Codron's study charts the startling emergence of Chile to become the
southern hemisphere's dominant fruit exporter. Between 1974 and 1990, its
exports of temperate fruit soared from 74,000 tonnes a year to 888,000
tonnes. At the same time, all southern hemisphere exporters together raised
exports from 824,000 tonnes to just over 2m tonnes.
While New Zealand exporters also boosted sales - from 74,000 tonnes in 1974
to 386,000 tonnes in 1990 (mainly due to demand for kiwi-fruit) - all other
exporters from the southern hemisphere either stagnated or fell back. Only
Chile has managed significant diversification, ranging from new varieties of
grapes to a range of stone fruits like plums, peaches and nectarines.
Mr Codron traces a number of reasons for the spectacular growth in Chile's
fruit exports:
It is close to the US, with its fruit industry built up in direct
consultation with Californian professionals.
A broad climatic range allows it to produce a wide variety of fruits, across
a long harvesting season. Grapes, for example, can be picked from November
in the northern Valley of Copiapo to April in Talca province 1,100 km (680
miles) to the south.
It offers natural protection against exotic diseases and pests, mainly
because of its extraordinary isolated position, with the Pacific to the
west, the Andes to the east, the Atacama desert to the north and Antarctica
to the south.
Availability of fruit during the normal 'low' season allows exporters to use
cheap transport and to have frequent and regular ship departures.
Multinational investors have given Chile access to 'the most modern channels
and the most modern markets', using efficient transport and distribution
systems, Mr Codron says. The country 'has forged solid commercial experience
which it should be able to draw on when Europe ceases to be a mosaic of
markets and regulations'.
It has comparatively cheap labour and recently a better record of political
stability than countries like like South Africa or Argentina.
Chile's success is not without attendant dangers, however. In opting to rely
on multinationals 'the country has taken a large risk which could one day
turn against it', Mr Codron notes. Chile's success is also attracting the
anger of Californians, who are 'ready to resort to any methods. . . by
manipulating the quality and phytosanitary (plant health) regulations' to
block grape imports in the six weeks leading up the start of their season
late in May.
In Europe, where the market for grapes is 'still a long way from saturation
levels', conflict is likely to be focused on easily stockable products like
apples, pears and kiwi fruit. While competition will be 'more threatening',
Mr Codron forecasts that southern hemisphere exporters will continue to
raise sales, reinforcing Europe as the main export market for southern
hemisphere fruits. This is not least because of the ineffectiveness of
recent protective measures put in place: 'One wonders whether the European
Community is not looking today to withdraw progressively its support from
producers', he muses.
The damp squib of the past two decades has been Australia, which has seen
its exports of temperate fruits slump from 115,000 tonnes in 1974 to a
meagre 53,000 tonnes in 1990. Argentina has also stagnated, with exports
rising over the same period from 305,000 tonnes to 382,000 tonnes. Both have
been complacent, Mr Codron argues, because a combination of a small
population and a large area of potential farm land has discouraged intensive
farming techniques.
Argentina has also been diverted by historic demand from Brazil, a strategic
mistake given that country's severe foreign exchange problems, and the rapid
growth in the output of its own fruit growers.
South Africa, so long a pariah, could become a serious competitor with Chile
in Europe now that it has turned its back on the policies of apartheid.
Few of the gains of the past 20 years would have been possible without new
technologies and speedier transport - particularly for perishable fruit like
nectarines, plums and apricots. Fast refrigerator ships now allow Chilean
exporters to deliver fruits to Rotterdam in less than 22 days - compared
with 30 days or more a decade ago. Journeys to Philadelphia take less than
15 days compared with three weeks.
Controlled atmosphere techniques have also been important in extending the
growing season for fruit - like early ripening of pears using ethylene, or
slowing down the ripening process.
The effect of these changes will be intensification of competition in
Europe, with southern hemisphere exporters like Chile and South Africa
continuing to make headway. The wild card for Chile in particular will be
Japan - a coveted but still-elusive market that offers the prospect of
making Chile not just the leading southern hemisphere fruit exporter, but
one of the most powerful suppliers in the world.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
                SOUTHERN HEMISPHERE FRUIT EXPORTS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
  ('000 tonnes - Apples, pears, grapes, kiwifruit, nectarines)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
                  1974-76*    1979-81*    1984-86*    1989-90**
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
Chile                  74         253         529         888
Argentina             305         324         292         382
South Africa          255         253         309         358
Australia             115          81          60          53
New Zealand            74         101         233         386
Total                 824       1,012       1,423       2,067
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
Sources: FAO, USDA.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
*three-year average, **two-year average.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7032</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Jute &amp; Cotton
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JUTE
November/December c and f Dundee BTC Dollars 355, BWC Dollars 370, BTD
Dollars 320, BWD Dollars 330; c and f Antwerp BTC Dollars 335, BWC Dollars
335, BTD Dollars 310, BWD Dollars 310.
COTTON
Liverpool- Spot and shipment sales for the week ended November 13 amounted
to 409 tonnes against 160 tonnes in the previous week. Improved demand
brought moderate purchases mainly in American and Russian descriptions.
South American growths made some headway.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7033</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Minor Metals Prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Prices from Metal Bulletin (last week's in brackets).
ANTIMONY: European free market 99.6 per cent, Dollars per tonne, in
warehouse, 1,685-1,745 (1,675-1,735).
BISMUTH: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per lb, tonne
lots in warehouse, 2.25-2.45 (same).
CADMIUM: European free market, min. 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 0.60-0.70 (0.65-0.75).
COBALT: European free market, 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in warehouse,
16.50-17.50 (15.75-16.75).
MERCURY: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per 76 lb flask,
in warehouse, 125-145 (130-150).
MOLYBDENUM: European free market, drummed molybdic oxide, Dollars per lb Mo,
in warehouse, 2.05-2.15 (same).
SELENIUM: European free market, min 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 4.80-5.50.
TUNGSTEN ORE: European free market, standard min. 65 per cent, Dollars per
tonne unit (10 kg) WO, cif, 45-55 (same).
VANADIUM: European free market, min. 98 per cent, Dollars a lb VO, cif,
1.75-1.95 (1.80-2.00).
URANIUM: Nuexco exchange value, Dollars per lb, UO, 8.00 (same).
 ------------------------------------
         LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
        (As at Monday's close)
 ------------------------------------
tonnes
 ------------------------------------
Aluminium   +375 to 1,439,300
Copper    +2,000 to   323,100
Lead        -750 to   194,250
Nickel      +432 to    60,222
Zinc      +3,450 to   380,200
Tin          -65 to    14,280
 ------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7034</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
London's robusta COFFEE futures eased back to end around Dollars 17 down on
a spate of profit-taking, despite setting an early nine-month high of
Dollars 990 a tonne. The profit-taking was adding to a correction which
could take the New York March arabica contract back to around 70 cents a lb,
and the London January robusta to the Dollars 950 a tonne. One dealer said
the market could need a couple of days' rest to slow the tempo of the rise
rather than an actual price retracement. On the LME LEAD closed firm against
a background of positive charts. Dealers cited good recent trade interest,
with prices touching five-month sterling lows, or, in dollar terms, the
lowest levels for some six years at Dollars 459 a tonne. COPPER was steady -
dealers said there was little fundamental justification for higher prices,
so rallies were likely to be sold into. ALUMINIUM edged ahead - late news of
a possible strike at Pechiney confirmed reports circulating earlier and
provided a supportive backdrop.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7035</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Lively export market boosts
Chicago grains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NEWS THAT the record US maize crop is being shipped overseas at a healthy
rate has taken pressure off grain prices at the Chicago Board of Trade.
Maize for December delivery surpassed Dollars 2.12 a bushel yesterday, and
having passed that mile stone, continued on to score a high of Dollars 2.15
1/4 in late trading.
Chicago wheat futures were continuing Monday's advance, also supported by
export news.
December futures contracts for maize and wheat in Chicago are close to
expiry, and as next Friday's first notices for intended deliveries approach,
commercial grain merchants and the investment funds that operate in grain
futures for profit are engaged in their usual brinkmanship. The funds were
said to be buying maize yesterday to cover previous sales.
US grain prices have been on the rise in spite of the US Department of
Agriculture's upward revisions of crop estimates last week. In its regular
monthly report the USDA said the US maize crop would be a record 9.33bn
bushels - a 4 per cent increase from its October estimate. The US soyabean
harvest has also reached record proportions, and is now estimated at 2.17bn
bushels, a 9 per cent increase over 1991.
Traders said the huge crop had already been factored into futures prices and
that as the harvest is completed quality factors would begin to come into
play. 'Historically, the corn (maize) crop doesn't get any bigger (after the
November USDA estimates),' says Mr Warren King, senior grain analyst with
Cargill Investors Services. About 1bn bushels of maize remain in the fields
and while the harvest could be completed this weekend, winter storms in Iowa
and Ohio have left fields wet and in poor condition.
The abundant harvest has forced some farmers to store their excess
out-of-doors, and that grain, as well as some of the late-harvested maize,
is expected to test poorly for starch and oil content and be subject to
mould. 'I expect we will be paying a premium for quality corn next year,' Mr
King said.
In a regular weekly report on Monday, the USDA said wheat and maize
shipments were running ahead of last year's. Last week 36.6m bushels of
maize and 32m bushels of wheat were inspected for export, well above grain
trade estimates.
December wheat futures, which closed on Monday at Dollars 3.76 per bushel,
have gained about 40 cents since the September announcement that the US
Export Enhancement Program was itself being enhanced prior to the national
elections.
Of the 29m tonnes of wheat exports targeted for the programme, about 12m
have been sold. Yesterday USDA approved EEP wheat sales to Algeria and
Morocco.
CBoT soyabean prices rose on fund buying and talk that China might be in the
market for US soyameal as well as last week's large exports, traders said,
reports Reuter. The rise was also aided by news that 22.97m bushels of
soyabeans had been inspected for export.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7036</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Argentina and EC move closer to
fisheries deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA and the European Community have come closer to a fishing
agreement, negotiators said after a third round of talks ended in Buenos
Aires at the weekend.
The two sides are negotiating an accord under which community vessels would
be allowed to fish in Argentine waters, at present closed to foreign ships,
in exchange for reduced tariffs on its exports to EC markets plus an aid and
investment package.
A community diplomat said the two sides had 'reached a substantial level of
agreement on the text and both sides are looking at the text with a view to
initialling it before the end of the year'. An Argentine official was more
optimistic, saying it should be signed by the end of this month.
Negotiators have been searching for a form of words that circumvents
Argentine law banning foreign fishing vessels from its waters. The treaty is
expected to allow EC vessels to operate in Argentine waters on a joint
venture, charter or temporary lease basis. The difficulty is that flying the
Argentine flag would force EC ships to submit to restrictive local
regulations. Under previous accords EC ships sail under their national
flags.
Another delicate item involve Argentina's claim to the Falkland islands,
which are held by Britain. The British have apparently won concessions that
exclude the Falklands' waters from the accord and limit the quota of Illex
squid available under the community accords. Argentina last month announced
that it would compete with the islanders for the lucrative squid catch, at
present monopolised by the Falklands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7037</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Moonlight vigil for Christmas
tree growers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LAST full moon before Christmas has been carefully noted by a motley
band of criminals intent on muscling in on the Pounds 40m UK market for
Christmas trees.
This year it falls on December 9, but members of the British Christmas Tree
Growers Association said yesterday they would be taking all possible
precautions. 'I have my compound floodlit, with a 24-hour security patrol,'
Mr John Godwin, president of the association, said yesterday.
Those with ambitions to sell stolen Christmas trees from the back of a lorry
could have the European Single Market in mind. In summer the association met
European growers to agree a system of standard measurements and quality.
However, the Euro-Christmas tree is still some way off - the new rules
remain 'advisory and voluntary.'
'Very few trees will match the specifications this year,' said Mr Godwin.
'But it's a start.'
About 40 per cent of British homes are decorated with real Christmas trees -
a market of 5m trees. In normal years about 1.5m trees are imported, mainly
from Denmark and Belgium. However, this year sterling's devaluation is
likely to make imports up to 20 per cent more expensive than they were last
year, according to the association, while British trees are likely to be
just 5 per cent up.
Prices for a 6-foot to 7-foot tree will range from Pounds 10 to Pounds 25
'in the more expensive parts of London', according to Major General Tony
Richardson, secretary of the association. He was expecting demand to be
strong for British trees, which he said were 'in super form' after the wet
summer.
The association, which boasts 225 growers, points out that the trees are
grown specifically for the Christmas market, so that people should not feel
they are damaging the environment by buying a real tree.
There are an estimated 40m trees growing in the UK, annually soaking up
around 50,000 tonnes of carbon dioxide from the atmosphere. After Christmas
the trees can be converted into woodchips.
In contrast, artificial trees - about 1m are sold each year - 'are made from
irreplaceable fossilised fuels and they contribute nothing to the
improvement of our atmosphere', the association points out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7038</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Government Bonds: Announcement of gilts auction wipes out
early gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FUNDING worries continued to trouble the UK government bond market with
medium-dated issues closing lower on the latest auction announcement.
The Bank of England's announcement of a gilt auction next month helped to
wipe out the morning's gains, dealers said. The Bank plans to auction a
medium-dated conventional stock, maturing between 2001-2005, on December 2.
Further details, including the amount and specific stock, will be announced
on November 24.
Dealers said the announcement pushed medium-dated issues lower. The 9 3/4
per cent gilt due 2002 fell from 109 3/8 to 109 1/32 by late afternoon.
Among short-dated stocks, the 10 per cent gilt due 1994 inched up from 104
31/32 to 105 to yield 6.58 per cent.
Dealers estimate the government only has about Pounds 4bn of funding left to
do in the current financial year, to help meet its estimated Pounds 37bn
public sector borrowing requirement. However, the market is expecting gilt
issuance in the 1993/94 financial year to be much heavier, with about Pounds
1bn of gilt issuance a week.
US Treasury prices were firmer across the board in relatively thin trading
yesterday. Earlier in the day selling at the long end had led to a modest
steepening of the yield curve, but bond prices enjoyed a late burst of
demand.
At the close the benchmark 30-year government bond was up  11/32 at 101 1/32
, yielding 7.533 per cent. The two-year note was also firmer, up 3/16 at 99
5/16 , to yield 4.605 per cent.
After Monday's curve-flattening trades, which involved buying longer-dated
securities and selling the short end, investors came in early to reverse
partially that move, with the yield on the two-year note falling farther
than on the long bond.
The long end later recovered, although there was disappointment that the
Federal Reserve did not add permanently to reserves during the afternoon by
buying outright Dollars 4bn to Dollars 5bn of securities, as some dealers
and investors had been expecting. The Fed's decision not to intervene led to
a lightening of some positions, said dealers.
Otherwise, trading was subdued in the absence of important economic news,
and in the expectation that the Fed's policy-making Open Market Committee,
which was meeting yesterday, would leave interest rates unchanged in light
of the recent signs that the economic recovery was gathering pace, albeit
only very slowly.
GERMAN government bonds traded in a narrow range ahead of today's holiday.
The Liffe bund futures contract, which opened at 91.01, moved in a range of
90.93-91.09, ending the day at around 90.97.
Dealers welcomed yesterday's announcement from the London International
Financial Futures and Options Exchange (Liffe) that it will include Treuhand
bond issues for delivery into its German government bond futures contract.
The news emerged too late in the day to have much impact on the market.
ELSEWHERE in Europe, French government bonds ended mixed with long-dated
issues closing down while shorter-dated bonds finished slightly firmer.
The yield on the 8 per cent bond due 1994 opened at 8.17 per cent and ended
at around 8.08 per cent. Dealers said the short end of the market held up
well ahead of tomorrow's auction of two and five-year paper.
Long-dated bonds ended lower with the yield on the 8 1/2 per cent bond due
2003 ending at 8.12 per cent, against an opening level of 8.09 per cent.
JAPANESE government bonds reached new highs in the cash and futures markets,
lifted by the combination of a weak stock market and an easing in money
market interest rates.
The Nikkei stock index dipped below 16,000 for the first time since August,
losing 169.51 points to finish at 15,993.48. Its fall revived hopes of a cut
in the Official Discount Rate. In the money market, dealers said the Bank of
Japan appears to be tolerating lower interest rates, as the overnight rate
slipped  1/32 to 3 29/32 per cent.
The yield on the benchmark No 145 opened at 4.63 per cent and closed at 4.59
per cent, corresponding to the day's high.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7039</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: Basque area in first
international offering
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Basque area, one of Spain's 17 autonomous regions, yesterday launched
its first international bond offering, a DM200m 10-year Eurobond arranged by
Goldman Sachs.
Previously, the region has met its financing needs in Spain's domestic
market, where it issues four and five-year debt called Euskobonds. The shift
to international funding is designed to broaden the investor base and extend
the maturity profile of the region's debt, said Mr Victor Mugica,
vice-minister of treasury.
He added the government plans to issue a greater proportion of foreign
currency debt next year.
This year, the Basque government has raised a total of Pta51.8bn, of which
yesterday's D-Mark offering accounts for about 9 per cent. In 1993, the
government plans to raise about 30 per cent of its Pta66bn borrowings in the
international market.
The DM200m Eurobond is rated AA2 by Moody's and AA by Standard &amp; Poor's, the
same rating as for Spain's debt, although the paper is not guaranteed by
Spain. The rating reflects the Basque government's consistently large
operating surpluses, modest debt burden and considerable financial
flexibility, according to S &amp; P. The Basque government can use borrowings
only for capital investment.
The proceeds of the issue are not swapped. The borrower chose to tap the
D-Mark market because, as well as being a current focus for investor demand,
rates are substantially lower than in Spain. Mr Mugica had also been
considering the dollar sector, but was discouraged by the greater volatility
of the currency and the steep yield curve - the government was keen to raise
long-dated funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7040</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Bonds: Indigestion may follow Kingdom of
Sweden's issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Kingdom of Sweden yesterday became the second Scandinavian borrower in
as many days to look to the bond markets for Dollars 2bn. However, its
three-year issue was compared unfavourably with Finland's five-year global
bonds launched the day before.
Some traders complained about the amount, the maturity and the borrowing
instrument although they did agree, largely, that the pricing looked just
about right.
Such a large amount could, however, take some time to digest, particularly
in the light of Finland's success.
After a series of deals in D-Marks, French francs and sterling over five
years, Sweden's decision to diversify its maturities with a big liquid
current coupon benchmark deal in the three-year range was not totally
vindicated. Joint lead manager and book runner J. P. Morgan confirmed that
while demand was good the issue did not sell out.
As Sweden's increased Dollars 5bn SEC shelf registration in New York is now
effective, some traders thought it odd the kingdom should launch such a
large Eurobond rather than try a global issue.
But Credit Suisse First Boston, the other lead manager, said that one of the
main attractions of the Eurobond market remained the ability to launch such
a large deal at very short notice.
The bonds bring the total raised on the capital markets under the second
phase of the kingdom's emergency borrowing programme to around Ecu6.5bn,
said Mr Staffan Crona, director-general of the Swedish National Debt Office.
This leaves a further Ecu8.5bn to be raised.
Finland's global issue, priced yesterday at the bottom of its indicated
range to yield 82 basis points over Treasuries, was still generating
excitement and comment. It vindicates the global issue concept for big
issues, say some traders.
Finland has got a better deal than anyone thought possible a few weeks ago,
and set itself up to tap residual demand in the US next year where investors
could well be persuaded to buy more at longer maturities.
Elsewhere, SudWestLB took advantage of the continuing demand for
high-quality current coupon Eurosterling paper with its Pounds 100m 10-year
8 5/8 per cent subordinated bond.
The implicit state guarantee enjoyed by German borrowers such as SudWestLB
means that in effect they cannot go bankrupt and can launch subordinated
debt at a very tight spread to gilts.
Lead manager Lehman Brothers said it had identified a particular lack of
supply of triple-A rated bonds in the 10-year range, and that the issue
traded around the reoffer spread after it broke syndicate.
In the equity-related sector, Square D's discounted convertible issue
provides Schneider, its French parent, with low-cost funds to refinance
Dollars 150m of a seven-year term loan it raised to help buy Square D in
1991.
Ireland is being talked about as a potential borrower of Dollars
300m-Dollars 500m over five years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7041</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: Liffe to include Treuhand
bonds in futures contract
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BONDS issued by Treuhand, the German agency charged with the privatisation
of former eastern German assets, will be accepted for delivery in the German
government bond futures contract, the London International Financial Futures
and Options Exchange (Liffe) announced yesterday.
The announcement was welcomed by bund market participants who said the
decision to include Treuhand issues in the list of deliverable bonds for
Liffe's bund contract would improve the attractiveness both of Treuhand
bonds and the Liffe bund futures contract.
The Treuhand bond issue is already included in the list of deliverable bonds
for the bund futures contract on Germany's Deutsche Terminborse (DTB).
However, the difference in the DTB and Liffe contract specifications has led
to a widening of the price gap between the two contracts: this arose because
the Treuhand issue is the cheapest to deliver into the DTB contract, and so
the DTB bund future is priced lower than the Liffe contract.
Liffe has 67 to 70 per cent of the bund futures contract business, against
the DTB's 30 to 33 per cent share. But some market participants warned that
Liffe would risk losing market share if it did not include the Treuhand bond
issue in its list of deliverable bonds.
The German finance ministry recently said there would be no further 10-year
Federal issues as this maturity area would be left free for the Treuhand.
The statement led to concern that Liffe might suffer in the longer term as
the number of bund issues declined.
Liffe said Treuhand's bonds would be accepted for delivery in the June 1993
contract. The June 1993 delivery will be listed for trading on November 20.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7042</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: FT-SE Actuaries indices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices and the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets are calculated by The International Stock
Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland Limited. The
International Stock Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland
Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-Actuaries All-Share Index is calculated by The Financial Times
Limited in conjunction with the Institute of Actuaries and the Faculty of
Actuaries. The Financial Times Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices, the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets and the FT-Actuaries All-Share Index are members
of the FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices series which are calculated in
accordance with a standard set of ground rules established by The Financial
Times Limited and London Stock Exchange in conjunction with the Institute of
Actuaries and the Faculty of Actuaries.
'FT-SE' and 'Footsie' are joint trade marks and service marks of the London
Stock Exchange and The Financial Times Limited.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7043</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Earnings at Larsen and Toubro
surge ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RC MURTHY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BOMBAY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROFITS of Larsen and Toubro, India's largest engineering company, surged in
the first half, contrary to the trend of falling corporate profits among
other Indian companies.
Net profits advanced to Rs566m (Dollars 19.9m) for the six months to the end
of September, from Rs490.4m a year earlier, on sales one fifth ahead at
Rs9.4bn compared with Rs7.89bn.
The group, which manufactures plant and equipment for anything from dairies
to the nuclear power industry, said it was swamped with orders as Indian
companies rushed to buy locally manufactured plant which became cheaper than
imports after devaluation of the rupee in February.
Larsen and Toubro's order book rose in the past 12 months by 70 per cent to
Rs15.36bn from Rs9.05bn.
The orders include building, for the first time in the country's history,
four well platforms costing Rs4bn for the Oil and Natural Gas Commission,
the Indian state-owned oil corporation, as well as widening the state
highway in Orissa, a dairy plant in Gujarat, a hospital in Sikkim and
upgrading a hydro-electric project in Nepal.
Looking to the rest of the year, the directors said: 'The company expects to
produce good results,' though they did not forecast any figures.
The group expects to invest at least Rs30bn over the next five years,
including Rs16.5bn on the first phase of an alumina project in the eastern
state of Orissa. It also plans to triple cement output from 2.2m tonnes to
more than 6.0m tonnes within three years.
The company was started in Bombay by two enterprising Danes, Mr Holk Larsen
and Mr Soren Toubro, during the second world war.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7044</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: New Straits Times Press rises to
MDollars 96m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE New Straits Times Press, Malaysia's largest newspaper and publishing
group, has announced pre-tax profits of MDollars 96m (Dollars 38.5m) for the
year ending August 31 1992. This compares with a profits of MDollars 82m in
the previous year.
Group turnover rose 28 per cent in the year to MDollars 375.6m. The group is
part of Renong, the Malaysian conglomerate.
A final dividend of 15 Malaysian sen has been proposed compared with 10 sen
in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7045</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: India's ITC up 28% in first half
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SHIRAZ SIDHVA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITC, the diversified Indian group with interests in cigarette manufacturing,
hotels and agribusiness, has reported improved profits and foreign exchange
earnings for the first half to September, maintaining its status as India's
leading exporter.
The Calcutta-based company, in which the BAT Industries of the UK has a 32
per cent stake, reported higher turnover of Rs18.03bn (USDollars 635.75m),
compared with Rs13.61bn a year earlier.
Export sales rose to Rs2.97bn from Rs2.24bn, and gross profits advanced to
Rs1.25bn from Rs1.01bn.
Taxable profits moved up by 22 per cent to Rs1.15bn from Rs951m and net
profits were 28 per cent ahead at Rs660m, against Rs517m.
The improvement came in spite of a five-month industrial dispute at its
Tribeni Tissues paper div-ision.
The company says it will continue to give the highest priority to exports.
It has set itself a target of achieving Dollars 1bn in international sales
by the year 2000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7046</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Santos drops its bid for Sagasco
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SANTOS, the Australian energy group, yesterday dropped a ADollars 560m
(USDollars 386m) hostile bid for Sagasco Holdings after legal action against
the bid by the Trades Practices Commission (TPC), the federal competition
watchdog.
But Santos said it would try to acquire 19.9 per cent of Sagasco, on the
market since the South Australian state government decided earlier this year
to sell its 57 per cent holding.
Santos said its decision to drop the bid was prompted by uncertainty over
the outcome of the TPC action, which is expected to be heard in the Federal
Court in March.
The group also said it was concerned about uncertainty surrounding a rival
ADollars 122m bid by Sagasco for Magellan Petroleum Australia, launched
shortly after the announcement of the Santos offer for Sagasco.
The Queensland Court of Appeal has prevented the mailing of takeover
documents from Sagasco to Magellan shareholders pending a trial of
objections filed by Magellan.
Santos said it would oppose an application by the TPC for a permanent
injunction against the offer, suggesting that it remains a potential bidder
for control of Sagasco in the long term.
'Santos has senior counsel's advice that it has a strong case and that the
TPC is unlikely to succeed at trial,' the company said. The TPC claims the
takeover would give Santos control over gas supplies on the Australian
mainland.
Santos shares closed two cents higher on the Australian Stock Exchange at
ADollars 2.37.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7047</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Foster's meets rights issue
target
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOSTER's Brewing, the Australian drinks, finance and pastoral group,
yesterday said it had successfully completed a two-for-five rights issue to
raise just over ADollars 1bn (USDollars 689m).
Mr Ted Kunkel, chief executive, said over 97.6 per cent of the shares had
been taken up, leaving a shortfall of about 21.6m in underwriters' hands.
He said the issue had been 'an outstanding success' in the face of generally
depressed economic conditions and a fall of 132 points in the Australian
Stock Exchange All Ordinaries index between the announcement and the close
of the issue.
'Foster's Brewing Group looks forward to a period of stability, and our
management is firmly focused on our worldwide brewing operations.
Shareholders have shown faith in the company and I believe that faith will
be rewarded,' he said.
The Foster's issue, which was fully underwritten, is the first big capital
raising in Australia since the failure of a ADollars 1.2bn rights issue by
Westpac Banking Corporation in September, which was 72 per cent
undersubscribed.
Foster's announced the rights issue in September, shortly after reporting a
net loss of ADollars 951m for the year to the end of June, following
write-downs of ADollars 1.9bn against pastoral, finance and investment
operations.
The group is attempting to restructure itself as a pure brewing operation,
but has been unable to dispose of many non-brewing assets. The rights issue
is intended to repair the group's balance sheet following a series of hefty
write-downs.
Broken Hill Proprietary, recently took a 32 per cent shareholding in
Foster's by buying most of the stock held by the receiver to International
Brewing Holdings, a private company formerly controlled by Mr John Elliott.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7048</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Maori consortium wins battle for
Sealord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEALORD Products, New Zealand's biggest deep-sea fishing company, was
yesterday sold to a consortium of Maori people and Brierley Investments
(BIL), the New Zealand investment holding company, for NZDollars 350m
(USDollars 182m).
They beat off a bid from a group led by Royal Greenland, a Danish group.
Sealord has been a subsidiary of Carter Holt Harvey since 1978 and has
become the leading holder of deep-sea fishing quotas in New Zealand, with 26
per cent of the allowable catch.
The controversial deal involving the Maori people is designed to settle
permanently fishery claims dating from the 1840 Treaty of Waitangi, the
peace pact signed by the British colonial powers and the Maori.
The New Zealand government has lent the Maori people NZDollars 150m to help
fund their part of the deal.
While a majority of Maori tribes supported the proposal, a minority,
including a tribe on the Chatham Islands, objected and unsuccessfully took
the issue to the Court of Appeal. They argued it was unjust for the
government to seek to settle their grievances for all time. Last night this
group vowed to continue to fight it.
Sealord's quota includes two valuable deep-sea species of whitefish: orange
roughy, most of which is sold to the US, and hoki, for which there is a
growing international market. The company is also involved in processing
squid and ling, scallops and mussels. In the year to last March it employed
1,400 people and had sales of NZDollars 250m.
Sealord estimates profits of NZDollars 40m for the year to March 31 1993. Mr
David Oskin, Carter Holt Harvey managing director, yesterday said the
company was trading ahead of budget for this year, and the new owners might
be able to extract further value from Sealord's resources.
Brierley Investments, on behalf of the joint venture company to be known as
Te Ika Paewai, said the consideration was NZDollars 337m. However after
adjustments for profit, working capital and capital expenditure for the
two-month period from September 1 to October 31, the total consideration
would be NZDollars 350m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7049</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Troubled Westpac sells Channel
Ten holding group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTPAC Banking Corp-oration, the troubled Australian bank, yesterday said
it had completed the sale of Television and Telecasters (TTL), the holding
company for the Channel Ten television network, to a consortium led by
CanWest Global Communications, a Canadian broadcasting group.
Westpac did not reveal the price for the sale, which is subject to
regulatory approval. However, CanWest said that the consortium expected to
pay about ADollars 235m (USDollars 161m), of which about 50 per cent would
be financed by a loan from Westpac.
CanWest, Canada's largest independent television broadcaster, will take a 15
per cent stake in TTL.
Other consortium members have not been named, but Television North
Queensland, a regional broadcaster which carries the Channel Ten signal, is
believed to be planning to join the consortium.
CanWest last year bought a stake in New Zealand's fledgling TV3 network, and
is believed to be planning to achieve synergies between the two countries
through common programming.
TTL, the least successful of Australia's three commercial television
networks, was acquired through a debt-for-equity swap last year.
The network had been in receivership since it defaulted on its bank debts in
September 1990.
However, the network recently announced a return to profitability after two
years of losses with a net profit of ADollars 15.2m for the 50 weeks to the
end of September.
The sale of Channel Ten heralds the end of a period of uncertainty for
Australia's three commercial broadcasters, all of which have suffered
changes of ownership in the last two years.
Channel Seven, once owned by Mr Christopher Skase's Qintex Australia group,
remains in receivership, but is profitable, and is expected to be floated on
the Australian Stock Exchange next year.
Channel Nine, the top-rated network, is making strong profits following the
acquisition of a controlling shareholding by Mr Kerry Packer's Consolidated
Press group.
Channel Nine was previously owned by Bond Corporation, the failed flagship
of Mr Alan Bond, the bankrupt entrepreneur.
The sale of Channel Ten will improve Westpac's image, which has been
battered by poor financial results, bad debts, a failed rights issue and the
recent resignation of five directors, including the chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7050</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: London exchange questions
link-up plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PLANS to establish electronic links between investors and brokers to make
international securities trades easier have been thrown into doubt by the
London Stock Exchange.
The exchange has had second thoughts about building links between its own
electronic trade confirmation system, Sequal, and two others from rival
suppliers.
Such links are an important element in the planned network through which
investors would be able to confirm trades with each other.
The exchange's apparent change of heart has provoked a sharp reaction from
institutional investors and others, and brought a threat that it could be
dropped from a list of recommended suppliers.
The exchange was one of three suppliers picked by a group of investors and
brokers a year ago to develop trade confirmation systems. It was made clear
at the outset that bridges between the three were an important element in
the initiative.
Now, though, the exchange has said that it wants more time to study the
business case for building the links before proceeding.
This has aroused suspicions that it sees the links as a threat to its own
future, since they could form the basis of a network on which investors
could deal directly with each other.
In a note to other investors who jointly commissioned the three systems, Mr
Alistair Reid, a director of Morgan Grenfell's fund management arm, warned
that the exchange risked being 'removed from the initial list of vendors.'
He added, though, that he was encouraged that the exchange has now decided
to bring forward its cons-ideration of the business case to its December
board meeting.
The exchange said yesterday that more time should be given to determining
what demand there was for electronic trade confirmation before the three
suppliers embarked on the next step of building the links.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7051</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Prices boost Brazilian tin miner
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BILL HINCHBERGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAULO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PARANAPANEMA, the world's largest tin exporter and Brazil's largest private
mining company, unveiled profits of Dollars 32.3m for the first nine months
of this year but posted a loss of Dollars 30.6m for the entire year. The
results were boosted by higher tin prices.
Reliable figures for the first nine months of 1991 were not available due to
government-mandated changes in inflation accounting procedures, said Mr
Arislando Prado, director of market relations.
In early September, the tin price peaked at about Dollars 7,200 per tonne,
up from a norm of about Dollars 5,500 during the first half of the year.
Prices have since fallen to around Dollars 5,800 a tonne.
The construction business, responsible for about 20 per cent of receipts,
remained in the red.
Administrative costs, down 22 per cent since the beginning of a
reorganisation scheme in May, also helped improve profit figures. Mr Prado
said lay-offs were primarily due to the fusion of administrative structures
of the mining and construction branches.
Paranapanema's tin output should remain stable, at about the 17,000 tonnes
produced last year, said Mr Prado.
Papel Simao, a leading Brazilian exporter of paper products, posted profits
of Dollars 1.9m for the first nine months. The year-end profit figure last
year was Dollars 2.6m.
The publicly traded company is controlled by Votorantim, Brazil's largest
conglomerate, which bought 100 per cent of Papel Simao's voting stock, and
47.7 per cent of total capital, for Dollars 190m in September.
Votorantim already owns Celpav, a competing pulp and paper producer, but
there are no merger plans, said Mr Milton Correa Henrique, finance director
for Papel Simao. Instead, the two subsidiaries are exploring potential
avenues for co-operation, he said.
Expecting a reversal of the current decline in the international pulp and
paper market, Papel Simao is investing Dollars 130m to increase cellulose
production in its Jacarei plant by 100 tonnes a day, from 550 tonnes. 'We
expect the beginning of a new upswing,' explained Mr Raul Calfat,
director-president. The project should be completed in December 1993, he
added.
The company also plans to invest Dollars 270m to expand paper production
capacity, to be ready by the first half of 1995, said Mr Calfat.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7052</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: MGM posts reduced deficit in
third term
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
METRO-Goldwyn-Mayer, the Hollywood studio now controlled by its French bank
creditor Credit Lyonnais, has posted a third-quarter operating loss of
Dollars 27.2m, com-pared with Dollars 52.5m a year earlier.
Including one-time items and interest expenses, MGM's net deficit was
Dollars 79.8m in the quarter, against Dollars 73.3m in the same period of
1991.
Revenues rose to Dollars 228.5m from Dollars 202.2m, led by video and
television licensing.
MGM is still struggling to clean up its balance sheet after being run for
nearly a year by Mr Giancarlo Parretti, the controversial Italian financier
who lost control of the studio in December.
The company said it had stepped up production and development since Mr
Parretti's departure, but it did not expect these activities to be reflected
in its results until next year.
For the first nine months, MGM suffered an operating loss of Dollars 79.4m
on revenues of Dollars 722.3m, compared with an operating loss of Dollars
110.9m on revenues of Dollars 703m a year earlier.
The company's net deficit for the 1992 period stood at Dollars 193.5m
against Dollars 233.2m.
Live Entertainment, the video distribution company 49.9 per cent owned by
the cash-strapped Carolco Hollywood studio, yesterday posted third-quarter
net income of Dollars 1.1m, or 5 cents a share, against a net loss of
Dollars 40.5m, or Dollars 3.39, last year.
Sales in the quarter rose to Dollars 91.2m from Dollars 85.7m.
The group said its improved results in the latest quarter were due partly to
higher sales and gross profit margins at Live Home Video.
In the 1991 third quarter, there was a Dollars 15m write-down in connection
with its acquisition of Vestron in July 1991.
The company said it expected its 'sales and profits will continue to reflect
this improvement in the fourth quarter'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7053</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Daihatsu suffers Y4.92bn loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAIHATSU, the Japanese carmaker which specialises in minicars, yesterday
announced that the downturn in the country's economy had forced it into its
first loss since the second world war.
Daihatsu joins Nissan and Mazda Motors as the car manufacturers which have
been hit worst by the slowdown in Japanese consumer spending.
Nissan last week declared a first-half loss and Mazda reported a fall in
pre-tax profits of more than 70 per cent.
In contrast Toyota, the leading manufacturer, and Honda have managed to
contain the impact of the downturn on their finances.
Daihatsu, which is affiliated to Toyota, reported pre-tax losses of Y4.92bn
(Dollars 39.67m) for the six months to the end of September.
This compares with pre-tax profits of Y3.63bn in the first half of last
year.
Its net losses amounted to Y4.94bn, against profits of Y2.24bn in the first
half of 1991.
The company said that it would not pay senior executives a winter bonus and
halved its interim dividend to Y1.5.
Daihatsu blamed the the sharp deterioration in its finances on rising sales
and labour costs which outstripped its 2.5 per cent increase in turnover to
Y391m for the half-year.
The value of Daihatsu's sales rose mainly due to production of higher priced
models for Toyota.
However, sales volume fell by 12 per cent to 287,000 units in the first six
months of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7054</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Solid sales growth at Nintendo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NINTENDO, the Japanese video game manufacturer, saw solid growth in both
interim sales and profits, driven by firm demand for its new video game
software.
The company, which is likely to become the third-largest profit earner among
listed Japanese manufacturers, posted a 5.5 per cent rise in
non-consolidated pre-tax profits to Y80.25bn (Dollars 647.17m) for the first
half to September, and a 13.2 per cent rise in sales to Y277.4bn. After-tax
profits totalled Y41.5bn, up 10.4 per cent.
Despite a fall in domestic consumer spending and a continued slump in
overseas economies, the company saw strong demand for the advanced version
of its video game. Domestic sales jumped by 15.4 per cent to Y101.7bn while
exports increased 11.9 per cent to Y175.6bn.
Nintendo said its video game, Super NES, had gained particular popularity in
Europe, where the company started to market the model this year.
New software using the popular game character, Mario, also contributed to
the rise in sales.
Nintendo said its most popular software product had sold 2.27m copies since
its launch at the end of September.
The company saw a 5 per cent rise in interest received, thanks to a 25.1 per
cent rise in cash in hand and deposits.
The company is renowned for not having short or long-term borrowings, or
speculative securities investments.
For the full year to March, parent pre-tax profits are expected to rise 6.4
per cent to Y166.2bn, surpassing non-consolidated pre-tax profits at
Matsushita Electric Industrial.
Sales are forecast to rise 10.3 per cent to Y560bn, while after-tax profits
are projected to increase just under 1 per cent to Y86bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7055</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Continental says shake-up plan
may offer 'significant' benefits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OTTAWA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL Airlines, the fifth largest US carrier which has been in
bankruptcy since late-1990, has filed its revised reorganisation plan with
the courts.
The new scheme incorporates the potential Dollars 450m infusion from Air
Canada and Air Partners, a Texas-based investment partnership.
That deal, announced last week, would give the two investors equity stakes
of 27.5 per cent each in the reorganised US carrier.
In the document, Continental claims that significant potential benefits may
be realised from an inter-carrier relationship with Air Canada.
It suggests that the principal gains could come in the areas of technical
operations and maintenance, commercial synergies, information systems and
fleet planning.
The reorganisation proposes:
That Air Canada could handle some of Continental's engines and components
maintainence;
That Air Canada could put more focus on Newark airport in New Jersey, a
Continental hub, and feed traffic into the Continental flight network;
That the two companies could enter a five-year technology sharing agreement,
with Air Canada paying Continental a Dollars 3m annual fee.
The document also outlines various areas of decision-making at Continental,
which would require a 'super-majority' - so that either the six directors
appointed by Air Canada or Air Partners would be in a potential blocking
position. These would include matters such as material capital expenditures,
acquisitions and asset sales.
Similar small print in British Airways' proposal to acquire a minority stake
in USAir has provoked a storm of controversy, with big US carriers arguing
that this equates to control. US rules do not permit foreigners to control a
domestic airline.
Under the revised reorganisation plan, secured creditors of Continental will
generally have their claims restructured, while unsecured creditors will be
offered shares in the reorganised airline, plus a share in any cash arising
from certain litigation.
Air Canada is exploring new options that it says the federal government
should look at before it commits any financial aid to PWA, Reuter reports
from Ottawa. 'Before the government commits itself to a bail-out of PWA they
should sit down with both parties and see if there is not something of
interest for the industry,' said Mr Denis Couture, spokesman for Air Canada.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7056</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Westinghouse considers sell-offs
to relieve exposure to property
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTINGHOUSE Electric, the embattled US conglomerate, is considering more
rapid and comprehensive solutions to the troubles of its financial services
business, which might mean further substantial reserves and force it to sell
off one or more of its businesses.
Westinghouse, with interests ranging from broadcasting to power generation,
has been plagued for more than two years by the problems of Westinghouse
Financial Services, which has a heavy exposure to poor investments in the
depressed US property market.
Westinghouse took a pre-tax Dollars 1.68bn provision in the third quarter of
last year, mainly for property problems, on top of a Dollars 975m charge to
sort out the financial services unit at the start of 1991.
The company said it had been pursuing a strategy of reducing the financial
service unit's portfolios over five years.
However, it was now conducting a comprehensive review of alternative
strategies, due to be completed in the fourth quarter or shortly afterwards,
in the light of factors such as continuing adverse economic conditions and
declining margins and yields in the Westinghouse portfolio.
The review might lead to the sale or liquidation as soon as possible of some
or all of the portfolios, involving another substantial reserve.
That, in turn, would require the sale of one or more of the group's
businesses.
Mr Paul Lego, Westinghouse's chairman, said the group would not be stampeded
into premature decisions. If businesses were sold, it would try to optimise
its return and find strategic buyers who would serve the int-erests of
employees and customers.
Last month, Mr Lego had to issue a press statement reassuring investors that
rumours the group was about to file for Chapter 11 bankruptcy were
'preposterous'.
Westinghouse's management is expected to be the subject of numerous hostile
resolutions from shareholder activist groups at next year's annual meeting
because of the group's poor recent performance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7057</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Tokyo tries to revive stock
market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S Ministry of Finance yesterday announced rule changes for initial
public offering procedures for stocks, in an attempt to revive faltering
investor interest in the country's stock market.
The changes are part of the government's emergency economic package
announced last August and are intended to reduce the risks of investors and
brokers during share offerings, and to ease restrictions for companies which
want to go public.
Mr Tsutomu Hata, finance minister, outlining the changes, said he hoped the
new rules would reinvigorate the slumping Japanese stock market.
The revision, due to be implemented in January, will allow underwriting
brokers to decide the offering price from the average bidding price of the
prior share auction.
Until now, the public offering price of 50 per cent of a new listing has
been fixed at the weighted average of the 10 highest bids in a share auction
of the remaining 50 per cent of the newly offered shares.
This led to excessive competition and unrealisticly high bidding prices,
often leaving investors and underwriters with over-priced shares.
While the current method functioned smoothly during the bull market of the
late 1980s, the sluggishness of the Tokyo stock market increases the risk
for buying newly offered shares.
By allowing underwriters to discount from the average bidding price, brokers
will be able to offer realistic prices which reflect investor sentiment.
Nomura Securities said the changes would allow brokers and investors to
quantify risks.
Last year's listing of Sony Music Entertainment, the music arm of the
consumer electronics group, provoked criticism from investors, as on the
first day of trading, its share price plunged below the initial listing
price.
Other measures include:
To nullify an auction if the number of bids falls short of 25 per cent of
the total shares offered. Under current rules, an auction would be valid
even if bids did not cover the total 50 per cent of the offering.
To lengthen the period for new offerings, now concentrated during November
to March, to a nine-month period between August and April.
To shorten the period between the auction and listing dates from 14 to 12
days.
To increase the period before the auction at which information is provided
for investors from 15 to 30 days.
See World Stock Markets
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7058</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: DoT signals approval to
Northwest Airlines
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Department of Transport has tentatively approved an essential legal
condition to the proposed integration of services between KLM Royal Dutch
Airlines, the Dutch flagship carrier, and Northwest Airlines, the fourth
largest US airline.
The DoT announced it was issuing a 'show-cause' order, seeking comment on
why it should not approve a request from the two carriers to combine their
operations and effectively function as a single carrier.
The order sets a 21-day period for comments and replies, after which the DoT
will issue its final decision.
However, the US authorities made clear the agreement 'should benefit the
public by providing better services and enabling the two carriers to operate
more efficiently'.
The DoT said it did not expect the agreement to reduce competition
substantially, but it will still require the carriers to resubmit the
arrangements for review in five years.
KLM has held a minority stake in Northwest since a Dollars 3.65bn leveraged
buy-out of the US carrier in 1989.
However, the two airlines claim any significant integration of their
respective business has been hampered by the need for immunity from
prosecution under US anti-trust laws.
Because US law prohibits a foreign carrier from owning a controlling
interest in a US airline, the two airlines argue that there is 'a very real
risk that collaborative planning, scheduling, pricing and marketing of
services could be challenged as being price-fixing and market allocation
agreements between horizontal competitors'.
The request for anti-trust immunity came shortly after the US and Dutch
governments signed an 'open skies' aviation pact, essentially allowing each
others' carriers unfettered access to the respective home markets.
The issue of operational integration arises at a delicate time for
Northwest, when financial uncertainties are hanging over the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7059</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Dayton Hudson figures reflect
current trends in US retailing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAYTON Hudson, the fourth largest US general merchandise retailer with
operations ranging from department stores to the Target discount chain,
yesterday reported a sharp improvement in third-quarter profits, up to
Dollars 57m from Dollars 35m in the same period of 1991. Earnings per share
rose from 40 cents to 70 cents.
The company said the advance reflected significantly better gross margins,
as operating expenses improved and the mark-down rate became more
favourable.
These two factors offset the modest increase in same-store sales - up around
2 per cent for the group overall in the third quarter.
During the quarter, Dayton's total sales were Dollars 4.34bn (Dollars
3.95bn), and the company is posting after-tax profits of Dollars 134m
(Dollars 109m) for the first nine months of 1992.
Dayton's figures seemed to confirm the prevailing trend in the US retail
sector - modest underlying sales growth but more significant progress at the
bottom-line, thanks to expense controls and other operational improvements.
Yesterday, a pre-holiday season survey of retailers by Deloitte &amp; Touche
echoed this message.
'Our retailer findings show some positive signs for this holiday season,'
said Mr Irwin Cohen, con-chairman of D&amp;T's retail and distribution services
group.
'Retailers have brought their businesses more in line reality over the last
several years, but seem to have heightened expectations for this season as
compared to prior years.'
The survey - based on replies from 1,175 retailers - suggests that about
two-thirds expect consumers will spend the same or more than last year. For
November and December, about 41 per cent expect comparable sales and profits
to be either flat or up to 3 per cent higher. However, about one-third of
those polled think that results will be better than this.
The most highly ranked business strategy aimed at combating competition over
the holiday season was a tightening of corporate expenses. Next came a
tightening of stock levels and third was increased promotional activity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7060</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Japanese watchmakers hit by
sluggish demand
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S two leading watch-makers, Seiko and Casio, yesterday reported sharp
falls in pre-tax profits for the first half of the year, mainly reflecting
sluggish demand in Japan.
Seiko's pre-tax profits fell by 26.4 per cent to Y1.6bn (Dollars 12.8m) in
the six months to the end of September, compared with the first half of last
year.
Turnover was 9.8 per cent down at Y137.41bn and operating profits fell by
53.5 per cent to Y2.89bn. Seiko is maintaining its interim dividend at Y5,
despite a 27 per cent decline in net income to Y678m.
Seiko blamed the fall on a sharp decline in demand for expensive and even
medium-priced watches as consumers switched to cheaper models. Sales of
cheaper styles such as sports watches remained robust, the company said.
Jewellery sales were depressed, apart from cheaper wedding and engagement
rings. Export sales were hit by the appreciation of the yen and the slowdown
in the US and European economies.
The company warned that the economic outlook for the second half of the year
remained uncertain as the stimulus from the government's emergency economic
package might be offset by the weakness of the stock market and slower
growth in export markets.
Seiko said it expected to make pre-tax profits of about Y3.2bn for the year
as a whole, down from Y3.6bn last year, on turnover of Y280bn, against
Y298.74bn in 1991.
Casio reported a 24 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Y8.58bn in the first
half of the year, despite a 3.5 per cent increase in turnover to Y171.03bn,
mainly due to a surge in sales of its small liquid crystal display TV sets.
Casio also suffered a valuation loss of Y860m on its securities holdings.
The company said exports to Europe, its main overseas market, had been badly
hit both by the appreciation of the yen and markedly slower economic growth.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7061</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Tabacalera drops 16% to
Pta16.23bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TABACALERA, the Spanish tobacco monopoly 52 per cent controlled by the
state, yesterday announced a 16 per cent drop in pre-tax profits for the
first nine months of this year to Pta16.23bn (Dollars 142.7m).
The profits setback is an embarrassment to the government as its sets out
legislation in preparation for the privatisation of Tabacalera, scheduled
for next year.
The nine-month figures, which Tabacalera blamed on a large dividend paid
last year by a joint venture it operates with Philip Morris, the US tobacco
company, makes it unlikely the group will finish the year with the 15 per
cent profit increase forecast by the company.
While nine-month profits at Tabacalera grew just 0.39 per cent, sales
advanced by 6.2 per cent to Pta492.2bn.
Last Friday, the Spanish finance ministry proposed changing the law that
obliges the state to own more than 50 per cent of Tabacalera.
The eventual flotation is likely to form part of a string of partial
privatisations next year as Madrid tries to cut its budget deficits.
The government has still not decided how much of Tabacalera to offer through
the stock market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7062</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Flaws found in Spain's bid rules
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM BURNS and PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A BITTER fight for control of a small Spanish property group, El Encinar de
los Reyes, has exposed serious flaws in the country's new takeover rules
and, according to some foreign investment bankers, threatens the authority
of the Spanish stock market regulator, the Comision Nacional del Mercado de
Valores (CNMV).
As the bidding war between the family controlling El Encinar and Banco
Bilbao Vizcaya (BBV), Spain's second largest bank, intensifies, foreign
investor attention is focusing on the CNMV's role in the dispute.
'What is happening here is enormously important; we have a set of takeover
rules and the BBV is ignoring them and being allowed to get away with it,'
said one UK investment banker yest-erday.
The Olazabal family that controls 35 per cent of El Encinar - owner of a
large residential development outside Madrid - launched a formal public
offer for a further 14 per cent of the company last month for Pta2,500
(Dollars 22) a share.
This would give them majority control of El Encinar as the target company
owns 3 per cent of itself in Treasury stock.
Under takeover rules published in June 1991 a competing bid by BBV - which
built up a stake of 24.9 per cent in El Encinar earlier this year  - should
have been formally registered with the CNMV, together with a pricing
prospectus.
Instead, BBV ran a series of press advertisements urging El Encinar
shareholders to reject the Olazabal offer on the understanding that the bank
would make an improved offer once the bid from the Olazabal had expired.
BBV said its offer would be clearly superior to the Olazabal's but never
said by how much.
Spanish takeover rules say a competing bid must be registered within 20 days
of the original, leaving the first bidder time to respond within the maximum
two months allowed for share offerings.
It is being claimed that the bank's tactic, which one Olazabal adviser
described as 'inventing a parallel takeover market', has thrown the original
offer off course.
The Olazabal family raised their offer to Pta2,750 a share and BBV replied
it would better that.
The Olazabal's yesterday offered another Pta20 but complain that while BBV
is simply allowed to sit back and promise more without saying how much more,
they are being forced to fight in the dark.
'What kind of rules do we have after this, what kind of advice can I give a
foreign company seeking an acquisition here?,' complained one Spanish
investment banker who asked not to be named.
BBV claims that it has not broken any rules.
'The CNMV has to decide whether what we have done is right or wrong and so
far it has said nothing to us,' said the bank.
An official at the CNMV admitted that 'a new (takeover) channel appears to
have been opened' by BBV. 'If we had seen any illegality we would have done
something about it'.
The CNMV says there is nothing in the takeover code to prevent successive
informal offers such as BBV's.
Critics say that this attitude severely compromises the CNMV's position as a
regulator and that in a transparent market, the written rules must be the
only guide to what can be done.
Advisers for the Olazabal family are pressing the CNMV to take a formal
position and are threatening to test the BBV bid in court.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7063</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Fiat in top management shake-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FIAT yesterday announced a streamlining of top management, splitting the
organisation into two broad sectors - industry and industrial development,
and financial control and resource management.
The aim is to prepare Fiat, Italy's largest private industrial conglomerate,
for lean times and costly investment in its main business, the motor
industry, as well as organise the divestiture of non-core activities.
The shake-up comes as Fiat prepares for the departure of chairman Mr Gianni
Agnelli who is due to hand over to his brother, Umberto, in 1994.
The new structure paves the way for the departure of Mr Cesare Romiti as the
chief executive officer, who is thought unlikely to remain after 1994.
The very obvious promotion in the reorganisation of Mr Giorgio Garuzzo, the
54-year-old chief operating officer, puts him in line for Mr Romiti's job.
Mr Garuzzo's role in the group is to be substantially expanded. He is being
put in charge of one of the two broad divisions of the new management - the
automotive industry, Fiat's diversified industrial portfolio and industrial
development. The second broad division in charge of the group's financial
control has been given to Mr Paolo Mattioli with the creation of the post of
chief financial officer.
A Fiat spokesman said the new structure would be effective from December 1.
There is no direct reference to redundancies at the head office in Turin
where more than 1,000 managerial staff are employed. However, tertiary
activities such as legal services, travel and property, would be conducted
elsewhere.
Fiat's move follows a similar shake-up by Olivetti last week. The group
relies on the motor sector for more than two thirds of turnover and Fiat's
profits are being squeezed (first-half 1992 profits fell to L655bn) by the
recession in its main markets.
It is pledged to invest some L40,000bn (Dollars 29bn) over the next decade
in the motor sector alone. Already this year it has closed a Lancia plant
near Turin but more widespread cuts could follow.
In recent weeks speculation has mounted that Fiat has been studying possible
disposals, notably its profitable store chain, Rinascente, as well as other
sell-offs including Cogefar Impresit, Italy's largest private construction
group, and its Toro insurance business.
The sale of non-essential assets is likely to be one of the main tasks of
the new chief financial officer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7064</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: ANZ surprises market with
ADollars 579m net losses for year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA and New Zealand Banking Group (ANZ) yesterday surprised the
markets by announcing net losses of ADollars 579m (USDollars 399.3m) for the
year ended September, after provisions of ADollars 1.9bn against bad debts.
Mr John Gough, chairman, said the write-offs followed a rigorous review of
the bank's provisioning policy by Mr Don Mercer, who took over as chief
executive six weeks ago.
The result was in contrast to the interim announcement in May, when the bank
reported a net profit of ADollars 171m, and forecast an improvement in the
second half. Last year the bank made net profits of ADollars 267.3m after
bad debt provisions of ADollars 1.04bn.
Mr Gough said the tougher approach to provisioning followed a reassesment of
economic prospects by the new management, which was much less confident of
the prospects for growth in the sluggish Australian economy.
However, he said the high level of provisions had not been prompted by the
tough action taken by Westpac Banking Corporation, which wrote off ADollars
2.7bn against bad debts at the half-way stage.
Mr Gough said the write-offs had cleared the decks. He forecast 'a
reasonable profit recovery in the current year, and a progressive
improvement in ANZ's performance over the next two to three years'.
ANZ shares, which traded at up to ADollars 2.63 before the announcement,
closed unchanged at ADollars 2.53, partly in response to the final dividend
of 10 cents, making an unchanged total of 20 cents.
The shares were also supported by announcements from Moody's and Standard &amp;
Poor's, the US credit rating agencies, which said the result would have no
effect on the bank's credit ratings.
However, the dividend was unfranked, compared with last year's fully franked
payment, making it less attractive to many shareholders. Mr Gough said it
would be up to five years before ANZ returned to fully franked dividends.
ANZ said its international, New Zealand and Australian retail operations
remained profitable. The Australian business banking division reported a net
loss of ADollars 797m.
Most of the division's problems are in the manufacturing state of Victoria,
which has been hardest hit by recession and the effect on business
profitability of reductions in protective tariffs.
Mr Gough said provisions against bad debts in the current year would be high
by historical standards, but much lower than the levels of the past two
years. Further reductions were anticipated in the next year.
He said the bank had changed its credit control procedures to prevent a
re-emergence of the bad debt problem, and had set up an asset management
group including outside property and receivership experts to manage
non-accrual accounts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7065</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Audi names head
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Franz-Josef Kortuem has been nominated as chairman of Audi, part of the
Volkswagen motor group, Reuter reports.
Mr Kortuem has been responsible for Audi's marketing since May this year. He
replaces Mr Ferdinand Piech who succeeds the retiring Mr Carl Hahn as
management board chairman of VW.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7066</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: BASF plans to cut workforce by
2,400
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BASF, one of Germany's top three chemical companies is planning to cut its
workforce by a further 2,400 people next year, according to members of the
works council.
The cuts, which follow 2,000 this year, will bring the payroll down to
45,000 people. The company aims to manage the reductions by natural wastage,
early retirement and non-renewal of short-term contracts.
The group, due to unveil its nine-month results in Ludwigshafen tomorrow,
closely followed by figures from rivals Hoechst and Bayer, recently
announced it was to reduce its employees' annual bonuses. A cut in this
annual payment last year was accompanied by a DM1 reduction in the dividend
to DM12.
German analysts have suggested that all three industry leaders will cut
their dividends again this year.
BASF's half-year figures, published in August, showed profits down 37 per
cent at DM972m (Dollars 607.5m), while Hoechst and Bayer fared a little
better with earnings reductions of 20 per cent and 10 per cent respectively.
There have since been no signs of any recovery in international chemicals
markets and the German industrial climate has deteriorated since the middle
of the year.
According to recent forecasts from the chemicals industry association,
overall sector profits are set to fall 30 per cent this year. BASF and its
competitors are expected to confirm the job losses and other cost-cutting
measures when they release their results in the next few days. It is normal
practice for such moves to be confirmed before announcement by works
councils comprising senior management and employee representatives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7067</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Swiss fertility drug company
rises 34.2%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARES-SERONO, the Geneva group specialising in human fertility drugs, reports
net income from continuing operations up 34.2 per cent in the third quarter
to Dollars 21.1m or Dollars 5.63 per share.
Sales grew 29.4 per cent to Dollars 214.4m, with strong performances coming
from the US, Italy, France and Germany. 'We have observed a certain
weakening in key European markets at the end of the quarter, due to strains
on governmental reimbursement schemes,' Mr Fabio Bertarelli, chief
executive, said.
For the nine months ended September, net income from continuing operations
rose 28.3 per cent to Dollars 59.7m or Dollars 15.94 per share.
Including the gain from the sale of the over-the-counter division earlier in
the year, net income was Dollars 87.8m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7068</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Whitegate Leisure
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The hot weather in May and June was blamed for increased losses at Whitegate
Leisure, the USM-quoted ten pin bowling, discotheques and nursing homes
group. In the 26 weeks to June 28 pre-tax losses were Pounds 1.41m, against
profits of Pounds 54,000. Turnover was Pounds 10m (Pounds 12.2m).
Operating profit was lower at Pounds 669,000 (Pounds 2.15m) and interest
charges were slightly lower at Pounds 1.99m (Pounds 2.1m). Losses per share
came out at 4.8p (0.1p earnings).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7069</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Alexandra Towing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Alexandra Towing, Britain's biggest tugboat company, has conditionally
agreed to a Pounds 52m takeover by Howard Smith, an Australian shipping
group quoted on the Sydney stock exchange.
Privately-owned Alexandra has 46 tugs operating towage services in UK ports
and Gibraltar. In the year to December 1991 it made pre-tax profits of
Pounds 5.1m on turnover of Pounds 40.4m.
The recommended cash offer, which carries a loan note alternative, has been
accepted by shareholders speaking for 29 per cent of the capital. It is
conditional on acceptances reaching 90 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7070</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: CML Microsystems
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CML Microsystems reported reduced sales and substantially lower profits for
the half year to September 30.
Sales by the USM-quoted group, which makes specialised electronic products
for communications and traffic control, declined 9 per cent to Pounds 6.23m
(Pounds 6.88m) while pre-tax profit dropped 36 per cent to Pounds 1.51m
(Pounds 2.37m). Earnings per share fell 39 per cent to 5.36p (8.75p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7071</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: European Motor
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The expanded European Motor group returned to profits and dividend for the
half year to September 30.
On sales ahead from Pounds 3.7m to Pounds 50.3m, the group made a pre-tax
profit of Pounds 1.52m, compared with losses of Pounds 735,000.
Earnings per share were 3.5p (losses 18.3p) and dividend payments are
resumed with an interim distribution of 1.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7072</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Sid still interested in new issues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIVATE investors are interested in buying shares in new issues, according
to ProShare, the body which promotes wider share ownership.
This counters a belief among bankers and brokers which have organised
flotations this year and found low levels of demand from retail investors,
dubbed 'Sid' since the British Gas privatisation marketing programme.
ProShare based its view on a survey conducted by ShareLink, an
execution-only stockbroker, which suggested small investors would be more
interested in issues if they had better access to the shares.
Some have found it impossible to acquire shares in flotations.
The Stock Exchange has been relaxing its new issue rules since the summer to
allow more shares to be placed rather than offered to the public because of
the lack of retail demand.
It said that it would be looking at the ProShare survey.
The Stock Exchange said it had to make a judgment on each issue as to what
was the most appropriate way for it to be marketed.
Sponsoring banks had to convince the Exchange of a lack of retail demand
before the offer structure could be changed. It said it was monitoring new
issues closely to see if retail demand was returning.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7073</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Meyer cuts jobs as profits halve
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEYER International, which owns the Jewson builders' merchants chain, saw
pre-tax profits tumble from Pounds 16.5m to Pounds 8.5m in the half year to
September 30.
This followed Pounds 2.6m of rationalisation costs as a further 400 jobs
were cut.
Operating profit slipped from Pounds 18.5m to Pounds 17.9m on turnover of
Pounds 540.5m (Pounds 566.7m). Interest payments of Pounds 6.8m (Pounds 7m)
and a lack of property profits did the rest of the damage to the pre-tax
figure. One off-setting factor was the disposal of a loss-making plumbing
distributor.
Mr Richard Jewson, chairman, said that the devaluation had added Pounds 13m
to debt translated into pounds. A deferred payment for a German company had
also extended borrowings and year-end gearing was expected to rise from 40
to 50 per cent.
In the UK, the group had been simplified into two divisions, Jewson and
Forest Products. This continuing process might double the exceptional charge
for the full year.
Jewson's operating profit fell to Pounds 7.1m (Pounds 11.4m). PontMeyer in
the Netherlands declined to Pounds 4.4m (Pounds 5.5m).
Earnings per share fell to 6.2p (12.9p). The interim dividend is maintained
at 4.2p.
COMMENT
As a leading light among the builders' merchants, Meyer was given the
benefit of the doubt for a long time before the recovery story turned sour.
Its share price has halved since August last year. Mr Jewson, who came from
the heart of the business, has had to act like a new broom - clearing out
past mistakes and rationalising from the branches upwards. If it were not
for balance sheet worries and dividend doubt, this ought to be the low point
for sentiment. Paying an uncovered final dividend may depend on whether the
market looks healthy enough to restore cover in 1993-94, which is a moot
point. A forecast full-year profit of Pounds 15m gives a prospective p/e of
22. Even if the final dividend is halved the prospective yield is nearly 6
per cent, which gives some support.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7074</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Harmony Leisure - Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Harmony Leisure recorded a loss in the six months to September 27 1991 of
Pounds 445,000, and not a profit as reported yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7075</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Sedgwick shares rise despite decrease to
Pounds 55.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOUGH CONDITIONS in the reinsurance and US insurance markets and lower
interest rates combined to depress profitability at Sedgwick Group, the
insurance broking and services company.
Pre-tax profits fell to Pounds 55.8m (Pounds 74m) for the nine months to
September 30. However, the performance was at the top end of analysts'
expectations and the shares rose 8p to 158p.
Sentiment towards Sedgwick and the rest of the insurance broking sector is
also improving as a result of a strengthening in the dollar and potential
rises in US insurance rates.
Mr Sax Riley, the chief executive who has taken over from Mr David Rowland,
said that in the US there were 'signs there for something of a change'. But
following the unexpected downturn in US insurance rates in the second
quarter this year, Mr Riley remains cautious.
During the nine months revenues from brokerage and fee income fell to Pounds
465.3m (Pounds 472.1m). 'A substantial proportion' of the decline was due to
a contraction in the reinsurance market, he said.
Sedgwick has also been badly hit by the virtual elimination of the marine
retrocession, income from which has traditionally a mainstay for the EW
Payne reinsurance broking business.
Despite successful interest rate hedging, investment income fell to Pounds
37.8m (Pounds 44m), mainly due to lower US interest rates. Interest payable
rose to Pounds 11.5m (Pounds 8.5m).
Expenses were marginally ahead at Pounds 435.7m (Pounds 435.5m) - but
increased by 2 per cent in underlying terms - partially reflecting the costs
of developing the group's European consulting business.
Although the strengthening of the dollar will boost prospects in the fourth
quarter and into 1993, its relative weakness during the first nine months
had a negative effect of Pounds 1.6m on pre-tax profit.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7076</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Capital down at Pounds 8.84m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CAPITAL RADIO, the London commercial music station, saw pre-tax profits fall
9 per cent from Pounds 9.84m to Pounds 8.84m for the year to end-September.
Mr Ian Irvine, chairman, said a difficult year had reflected the continuing
depressed state of the economy and a very short term advertising market.
However, costs and turnover had been held and the fall in profit had mainly
been the result of extra promotion costs.
Mr Richard Eyre, who joined as managing director last December, also
emphasised that Capital's weekly audience reach had increased in almost all
social groups despite growing competition.
For all adults in London it grew from 39.7 per cent in October-December 1990
to 43.9 per cent in April-June 1992.
The balance sheet remained strong with cash balances of Pounds 19.5m and no
borrowings.
Earnings per share fell 7 per cent from 9.4p to 8.7p but the total dividend
stays at 5.25p with a final of 3.5p.
A priority this year was to push up commercial radio's advertising share
from its present total of just over 2 per cent.
The share price fell 3p on the results and Mr Neil Blackley, media analyst
at stockbrokers James Capel, marked down his forecast of pre-tax profits for
this year from Pounds 10.5m to Pounds 9.5m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7077</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Nestle paid Pounds 30m to take over Clarke
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Nestle, the Swiss-owned food group, is believed to have paid slightly more
than Pounds 30m for the majority of the assets and goodwill of Clarke Foods,
Britain's second-largest ice-cream manufacturer which went into receivership
last month.
The deal means that trade creditors might salvage as much as 50p in the
pound. Clarke had debts of about Pounds 25m.
Nestle is not believed to have taken on Clarke's debts, although it is
understood to have reached an agreement over the Pounds 6m Clarke owed to
Alfa-Laval.
The Swedish company supplied about Pounds 12m-worth of equipment to the
ice-cream manufacturer after Clarke's purchase and relaunch of the Lyons
Maid brand. Delays in the installation of this equipment meant Clarke was
unable to manufacture ice-cream in time for the hottest months of the
summer. It lost many retail outlets as a result.
The Nestle bid beat an indirect attempt by Mars to gain the Clarke business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7078</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: BA's globalisation plan on target
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Airways yesterday issued a veiled profits warning for the second
half of this year while insisting that its longer term plan to become a
global carrier through partnerships and acquisitions remained on course.
After reporting a 22.7 per cent fall to Pounds 136m in pre-tax profits in
its second quarter, Lord King, chairman, said trading conditions were likely
to stay 'uncertain' for the rest of the year ending March 1993.
But he said the company had made 'significant headway' in its efforts to
become a global carrier during the last six months.
Projects included the proposed Dollars 750m (Pounds 497m) investment in
USAir, the Dan-Air takeover , the setting up of a new German subsidiary,
Deutsche BA, the acquisition of a large minority stake in the French
regional carrier TAT, and the planned launch next summer of Air Russia, a
joint venture with Aeroflot, with a few services from Moscow to other large
European cities.
BA is also considering bidding for a stake in Qantas, the Australian carrier
which Canberra plans to privatise.
But this global expansion strategy faces a number of hurdles. The biggest
undoubtedly involves BA's proposed acquisition of a 44 per cent stake in
USAir, which is still being fiercely opposed by the three largest US
carriers (American Airlines, United Airlines, and Delta Air Lines) unless
they can secure greater access into the UK market.
Both Lord King and Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive, remained
confident yesterday that the USAir deal would win US government approval by
the transaction's deadline of December 24.
Lord King said Mr Andrew Card, the US Transportation Secretary, had recently
promised a decision by Christmas Eve. 'We are co-operating fully with the
proceeding and remain confident that we will achieve a positive decision,'
he added. But the deal is still bogged down over US demands for open access
for US carriers into London's Heathrow airport, BA's home base. So far, UK
government negotiators have offered the US a gradual process of greater
liberalisation in air services between the two countries in return for US
approval of the BA-USAir deal.
US airline executives said in London this week that there were no signs of
progress in these negotiations. Without a breakthrough, it is difficult to
see the US government clearing the deal. This in turn would represent a
setback for BA since the alliance with USAir is the single biggest component
in its globalisation strategy.
Lord King would not be drawn yesterday on the possible consequences of US
government rejection of the USAir deal. 'If there is no approval, the next
day will be Christmas day; we will see where we are and have a look inside
our stocking,' he said.
BA is also still awaiting approval from the French and European Commission
regulatory authorities for its Pounds 17.3m acquisition of a 49.9 per cent
stake in TAT, which would give BA a strong foothold in the French domestic
market. Air France is leading a lobbying campaign to block the deal but Sir
Colin said BA expected to receive regulatory clearance by the beginning of
1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7079</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Singer and Friedlander to market funds in
Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN, Investments Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SINGER AND Friedlander, the investment banking firm, has formed a unit trust
company to market investment funds in Europe and take advantage of new
legislation easing cross-border sales.
Mr Tony Fraher, managing director of Morgan Grenfell Asset Management's unit
trust arm and eight other sales, marketing and management staff will run the
new Dublin-based venture.
Fund management services will be provided by Singer and Friedlander and its
own stockbroking venture, Collins and Stewart.
Mr Fraher was a director of MGAM and its management committee and was
responsible for setting up Morgan Grenfell's unit trust operations which now
have Pounds 360m under management and several top performing unit trusts.
He said: 'We will be taking advantage of the UCITS directive to sell
marketable securities throughout the EC and the Far East.'
Most Asian countries were prepared to authorise non-domestic investment
funds for sale in their own countries if the fund had met EC requirements,
Mr Fraher added.
Under UCITS legislation, trusts based in any EC country may be automatically
marketed in any other country without special permission. However,
cross-border sales of UCITS throughout the EC have stayed low, due mostly to
the inability of non-domestic funds to tap into effective distribution
networks. In most European countries, investment funds are sold through
banks who are keen to push their own products.
Mr Fraher said he would seek to overcome distribution problems by forming a
series of joint ventures with domestic distributors. The firm was keen to
purchase the assets of a mutual fund company, and would consider a non-UK
fund.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7080</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Great Portland shows 7.3% fall to Pounds
16.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GREAT PORTLAND Estates, the property investment company, reported a 7.3 per
cent decline in pre-tax profits, from Pounds 17.5m to Pounds 16.2m, for the
six months to end-September.
The interim dividend is maintained at 3.4p from flat earnings of 5.6p.
The company expects to maintain its total dividend for the year at 10p, but
warned of possible future dividend cuts. 'In view of conditions in the
property market, shareholders should not assume that the dividend can be
maintained at this level,' said Mr Richard Peskin, chairman.
He expected second half profits broadly similar to the first. 'Since I last
reported some five months ago, interest rates have fallen but no real signs
of increased economic activity are, as yet, discernible,' he said.
The fall in profits was mainly due to a rise in net interest charges from
Pounds 11.4m to Pounds 19.4m, offset by a rise in rental income from Pounds
33.3m to Pounds 41m. This resulted from a series of acquisitions in 1991-92
which reduced central London exposure from 83 per cent to 67 per cent and
increased retail and industrial property from 14 per cent to 24 per cent.
The results benefited from a fall in the effective tax rate to 21 per cent,
as a result of tax allowances on capital expenditure and prior year
adjustments.
This left post-tax profits at Pounds 12.9m, compared with Pounds 11.9m a
year ago.
Voids fell from 7 per cent of floor area to 6 per cent and from 10 per cent
of gross rental income to 7.5 per cent.
Tenants were found for over 125,000 sq ft of space, while 66,000 sq ft
returned through lease expiries or tenant failures.
COMMENT
Yesterday's 7p fall in Great Portland's share price, triggered by the
placing of a stake owned by Costain, interrupted their extraordinary recent
performance. Over the past month, the shares have risen by more than 30 per
cent, as its high dividend yield combined with lower interest rates and a
flurry of London investment deals to spark an improvement in investor
sentiment. This revival in confidence may now have run its course. Although
no one was surprised by yesterday's hint of a forthcoming dividend cut, it
underlines the pressures on Great Portland's cash flow. Some 15 per cent of
its rental income may be eroded by lease expiries and tenant defaults over
the next three years, resulting in, at best, relettings at lower rents and
at worst, heavy bills for refurbishment and empty rates. Most analysts
expect the dividend to fall by 20 per cent to 8p in the year to March 1994,
which would put the shares, at 123p, on a prospective yield of 8.7 per cent.
While that must have attractions for income funds, the case for Great
Portland's shares is less clear when the falling value of its buildings are
taken into account. On the admittedly bearish assumption that net assets
fall to 160p by March next year, the shares are on a relatively narrow
discount to assets of 23 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7081</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Shareholders in ITN given new outline on ownership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE POSSIBLE future of Independent Television News was outlined in a
three-part offer sent to shareholders yesterday.
The improved offer from Mr Michael Green, chairman of Carlton Communications
who is leading a consortium to take over the organisation, would mean:
around Pounds 13 a share for the three shareholders that have lost their
franchises - Thames Television, Television South and Television South West.
The original offer was Pounds 1 a share;
membership of the consortium which is now made up of Carlton, Central,
London Weekend and Reuters would be extended to include Granada Television,
Scottish and Anglia. The original consortium members and Granada would each
have 18 per cent and the other two would have 5 per cent each;
the other ITV companies, which would no longer be shareholders, would get a
smoothing out of the five-year news supply agreement set to average Pounds
53.3m a year over five years.
The improved package does not come in time to stop the extended offer
lapsing today.
There is also growing concern that shareholders have not seen promised
revisions to a shareholder agreement.
There are fears about whether the four original consortium members are
acting in concert, how much freedom of action ITN executive directors would
have and whether new guarantees of editorial independence are required.
If the revised deal is nailed down, a US network, possibly ABC, could join
the consortium at a later date.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Left behind in a changing market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SINCE Amstrad launched its first personal computer, the PC 1512, in 1984,
the PC market in the UK and elsewhere has changed dramatically and Amstrad -
the quintessential 'pile them high, sell them cheap' electronics success
story of the 1980s - has failed to keep pace. Today its machines are no
longer leaders in either price or performance, are still sold through the
traditional retail channels, and, with the exception of some portable
models, are mostly viewed within the PC industry as uninspired.
Driven by technology and fierce competition PC prices have been falling  -
wiping out Amstrad's price advantage.
The wide availability of low-cost components has spawned a flood of PC
market entrants. 'It is not the same market that Amstrad launched into and
pioneered, now everyone and his mother can produce a low-cost package,' says
Mr Jerry Sanders, executive editor of Ziff-Davis' PC Magazine.
Amstrad can still boast a large installed base, but brand loyalty has
evaporated. It has also lost out to a new breed of PC manufacturers such as
Dell in the US and Elonex in the UK who sell direct to their customers. Mr
Michael Spiro, finance director of London-based Elonex, emphasises that with
today's wafer-thin margins, PC manufacturers have to sell direct to retain
control of overheads. Just as important, direct sales keep a company in
touch with its customers. 'In the indirect channel you offer what is
available, not what is wanted,' says Mr Spiro.
Mr Charles Smulders of Dataquest, the market research group, also believes
Amstrad's PC strategy lacks clear focus. While some of Amstrad's new
machines are aimed at its traditional home PC market, it has also launched a
range of desktop PCs based around Intel's powerful 80486 microprocessor
which appear aimed at the business market. 'Amstrad seems stuck in the
middle ground,' says Mr Smulders.
Amstrad faces formidable competition in both markets. In the past six months
even IBM and Compaq have launched cut-price 'clones' of their own.
Amstrad still commands a 4.9 per cent share of the UK market, according to
Dataquest figures for 1991, which ranks it sixth behind Commodore, IBM,
Compaq, Atari and Apple. However, as Mr Sugar acknowledges, Amstrad is a
'me-too' competitor. It needs a 'blockbuster' product - like the old PC1512.
It is difficult to see Amstrad coming up with one.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Recession and fares war take BA down 23%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS, the world's most profitable airline, has not escaped the
combined effects of recession and the fierce airlines fares war which led to
a 22.7 per cent fall in second-quarter pre-tax profits.
Lord King, BA chairman, warned yesterday that prospects for the financial
year ending March 1993 remained 'uncertain'. Although pre-tax profits for
the first half rose 22.7 per cent to Pounds 227m, second-quarter earnings
tumbled to Pounds 136m from Pounds 176m in the same quarter last year. This
was below City expectations and BA shares fell 8.5 per cent to close 23p
lower at 248p.
Sir Colin Marshall, chief executive, said second-quarter profits were
affected by the absence of aircraft disposals, which produced a Pounds 25m
gain in the same period last year, as well as a Pounds 16m negative swing on
currency exchanges and a Pounds 6m loss on the start-up costs of the
airline's new German subsidiary Deutsche BA.
Excluding these factors, second-quarter operating profits showed a modest
2.4 per cent increase to Pounds 169m.
Although disappointed by the second-quarter figures, Lord King said the
performance was strong compared with other carriers when international
airlines are forecasting a loss of more than Dollars 2.5bn (Pounds 1.65bn)
this year. 'While we continue to achieve results which are the envy of our
competitors, we, like them, have suffered from the effects of the
recession,' he added.
Although BA continued to experience overall traffic growth, Lord King said
it did not expect an increase in high-yielding business and first-class
travel until the world economy recovers.
BA carried 13.7m passengers on scheduled services in the first half, a 9.7
per cent increase over last year. But passenger yield - the average price
paid per passenger for each kilometre flown - fell almost 6.8 per cent
because of weakness in premium traffic, aggressive pricing in the industry
and the relative strength of sterling during the period.
Turnover in the first half increased 7.6 per cent to Pounds 2.89bn. Profits
after tax in the first half rose 19.7 per cent to Pounds 182m while
per-share earnings rose 17.1 per cent to 24.7p. The interim dividend was
increased 4.1 per cent to 3.06p.
Lex, Page 20; Details, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / National Power ahead in spite of decline in demand
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONAL POWER, Britain's largest electricity generator, increased interim
pre-tax profits by 10 per cent in spite of half a percentage point drop in
total electricity demand, the first fall for more than 10 years.
The improvement to Pounds 201m from Pounds 182m was accompanied by a 10 per
cent increase in the interim dividend to 3.3p per share. It reflected cost
reductions including a 17 per cent cut in salaries during the period.
Yesterday's figures were the first in the electricity industry's interim
results season which will show above average profit increases.
The figures are bound to fuel criticism that the electricity industry was
overly protected by the government on privatisation two years ago, an issue
which has recently become more sensitive because of the coal mining pit
closures inquiry.
Mr John Baker, National Power chief executive, also released figures which
will enable an assessment of the amount of money being paid by electricity
consumers as a result of long-term contracts between British Coal and the
generators priced to bolster the coal industry.
He said that over the past three years National Power had paid Pounds 1.7bn
more for British coal under long-term contracts than it would have paid had
it been buying at the world market price, all of which was passed on to the
consumer.
The figure for last year was Pounds 480m. On that basis one analyst
estimated the total subsidy paid by UK consumers through electricity
generator sales was Pounds 750m last year.
Mr Baker said National Power hoped new agreements could be concluded with
British Coal for further long-term contracts and said there was no reason
why these could not be concluded before the government's forthcoming energy
review.
Although National Power has agreed contract terms with British Coal they
cannot be signed until all 12 regional electricity companies agree
back-to-back terms to take the electricity.
Mr Baker said that if the deals were concluded before the end of the review
they could be supplemented by additional contracts if the government decided
a larger market for British mined coal should be sustained.
The figures were largely in line with City expectations. Lex, Page 20;
Details, Page 23
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Matsushita profits fall 65.6% due to lower domestic sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MATSUSHITA, Japan's biggest producer of consumer electronics, revealed the
full extent of the fall in Japanese consumer demand when it yesterday
announced a 65.6 per cent drop in profits.
Pre-tax profits for the half-year fell to Y67.9bn (Pounds 361m) from
Y197.48bn a year earlier. Sales fell 4.3 per cent to Y3,510.7bn, the group's
first sales decline in six years. from Y3,670bn.
An increase in depreciation charges affected net-profits, which fell 78.9
per cent to Y16.4bn. Operating profits fell 57 per cent to Y87.5bn on
foreign exchange losses.
The announcement follows last month's parent company results, where pre-tax
profits fell 51 per cent, and the company announced a 10 per cent cut in
directors' salaries.
Matsushita was burdened with heavy losses at Matsushita Refrigeration, the
fridge component maker, and JVC, the audio equipment affiliate. The group
booked servicing costs of Y8.1bn due to defects found in Matsushita
Refrigeration's fridge compressors.
Other costs totalling Y15.5bn included losses stemming from Matsushita's
acquisition of MCA of the US. Depreciation costs totalled Y173.5bn, a 9 per
cent increase.
The company said while domestic sales fell 7 per cent, overseas sales fell
only 1 per cent. Sales of video equipment fell 12 per cent to Y735.8bn,
while audio equipment sales dropped 5 per cent to Y287.5bn.
Sales of communication and industrial equipment was one of the few bright
spots, rising 1 per cent to Y841.6bn, while electronic components remained
flat at Y426.5bn.
The group's entertainment revenues fell 1 per cent to Y281.2bn, where MCA
posted sales of Y212.2bn, a 3 per cent drop. However, Matsushita said in
dollar terms, MCA's sales rose 2 per cent.
The company spent Y171.5bn on first-half capital investments, a 45 per cent
fall, while research and development spending fell 2 per cent to Y205bn.
For the full year to March, the Matsushita group has been forced to revise
its previous projections down sharply due to severe domestic conditions. The
company forecasts a 53 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Y170bn, down from
a previous projection of Y385bn, on a 5 per cent drop in sales to Y7,070bn,
previously forecast at Y7,500bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Companies in this issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ------------------------------------
     COMPANIES IN THIS ISSUE
 ------------------------------------
UK
 ------------------------------------
Alexandra Towing            22
Amstrad                     21
BAe                          1
BTR                         22
Bowthorpe                   23
British Airways         22, 21
Bupa                         8
CML Microsystems            22
CRH                         23
Capital Radio               22
Carlton Comms               21
Clarke Foods                22
Cosalt                      23
East Midlands Elect         23
European Motor              22
Great Portland Ests         22
Hazlewood Foods             23
Hicking Pentecost           23
Meyer Intl                  22
Mirror Gp Newspapers        23
National Power          23, 21
Readicut Intl               23
Scottish Hydro-Elec         16
Sedgwick                    22
Telegraph Group             16
Vauxhall                     8
Vosper                       1
Vosper Thornycroft          22
Waterford Wedgwood          23
Whitegate Leisure           22
Yeoman Inv Trust            23
Yorkshire Elect             23
 ------------------------------------
OVERSEAS
 ------------------------------------
ANZ Banking                 24
Air Canada                  26
Audi                        24
BASF                        24
BBV                         24
Bramalea                    26
Brierley Investments        27
Canadian Airlines           26
Carter Holt Harvey          27
Casio                       26
Chrysler                    26
Daihatsu                    26
Dayton Hudson               26
Ferguson Enterprises        22
Fiat                        24
Foster's Brewing            27
General Motors              26
Howard Smith                22
ICI Australia               23
ITC                         27
Larsen and Toubro           27
MGM                         26
Matsushita                  21
Nestle                      22
New Straits Times           27
Nintendo                    26
PWA                         26
Paranapanema                26
Polaroid                    26
Reiseburo Kuoni             26
Sagasco Holdings            27
Santos                      27
Sealord Products            27
Seiko                       26
Svedala Industri            24
Tabacalera                  24
Telecom New Zealand         27
Westpac Banking Corp        27
 ------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Weighing up Amstrad's 30p: Tony Jackson examines Alan
Sugar's offer to shareholders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN the whole contentious history of management buy-outs in the UK, the most
contentious issue is whether the founders of public companies should be
allowed to take them private again.
Such cases always set up a particularly sharp conflict of interest. They
therefore tend to create an odour of suspicion.
The offer for Amstrad from its founder Mr Alan Sugar, as detailed in this
week's formal offer to shareholders, is among the most odorous of the lot.
The special features of the deal can be briefly enumerated.
None of Amstrad's directors can advise shareholders on the merits of the
offer, as they all hope to carry on working for Mr Sugar when the deal has
gone through.
No independent financial adviser has been employed on shareholders' behalf.
There is no forecast of Amstrad's profits. Shareholders are told there is
'little prospect of a significant regular dividend'.
The offer is materially below Amstrad's stated asset value per share. It is
also more than 60 per cent below the level at which Mr Sugar sold a 7.5 per
cent stake in the company 18 months ago.
The value of the offer - Pounds 113m - is almost precisely equal to
Amstrad's net cash in its latest balance sheet. Nearly half of that cash is
being advanced as an interest-free loan from Amstrad to Mr Sugar.
Perhaps, on reflection, this last point is not as odd as it looks. As a big
London institutional shareholder sardonically remarks, a company being
bought out normally ends up paying for the deal in the long run. It is
merely unusual to see the fact so candidly divulged at the outset.
The rest of the document bears this view out. The loan from Amstrad to Mr
Sugar will eventually be repaid by dividends from Amstrad itself.
Most of the rest of the purchase price is in the form of a Pounds 43m loan
from Lloyds Bank. That loan is to be repaid by next June. Once again, the
funds are to come from Amstrad.
If they felt philosophical, Amstrad's shareholders might view the loan to Mr
Sugar in another light.
The Pounds 50m cash is going from Amstrad's coffers via Mr Sugar into their
own pockets. It is therefore not so much a loan as the proceeds of a partial
liquidation.
How philosophical they feel may be another matter. Most will feel some
disquiet over the way the 30p offer price is justified to shareholders.
The crucial point is contained in a letter to the Amstrad board from
Kleinwort Benson, the company's financial adviser. According to the
accountants Touche Ross, Kleinwort says, Amstrad shareholders would be
likely to get less than 30p per share if the company were wound up, in spite
of the fact that net assets on the balance sheet four months ago were worth
46p a share.
In arriving at that conclusion, Touche Ross did not carry out an audit, nor
did it visit Amstrad's subsidiaries. In assessing the prospects for the
group, it relied on assurances from Mr Sugar and the rest of the board.
The nature of such assurances may be gauged from the offer document.
Amstrad, Mr Sugar tells shareholders, has no blockbuster products on the
way. It is a 'me too' competitor. It has to be streamlined. 'While no
detailed plans exist', Mr Sugar says, 'I am clear that such action would
result in a much smaller company.'
In assessing the offer, shareholders might reflect that not all buy-outs are
a bargain for management. In 1989 Magnet, the DIY and furniture chain, was
bought out in a hotly controversial Pounds 630m deal.
It was rapidly apparent that the directors had paid vastly too much. They
lost their investment accordingly and some of them their jobs. Nevertheless,
the Amstrad deal may not be a foregone conclusion. An investing institution
said yesterday: 'This could be a case for shareholders digging their heels
in, if only as a matter of principle.'
Lex, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Lithuanian poll winner will preserve links with Russia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VILNIUS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE newly elected Lithuanian leader said yesterday that he would continue to
encourage western investment but promised to safeguard economic links with
Russia.
Mr Algirdas Brazauskas, leader of the former Communists who this week won
the general election, said in an interview with the Financial Times that he
had built strong links with the centrist Russian Civic Union bloc now
bidding for power in Moscow. These forces were likely soon to prevail in
Russia, said Mr Brazauskas, whose Democratic Labour party won an absolute
majority in Lithuania's parliament.
Russia and the other former Soviet republics still provide most of
Lithuania's supplies and take the majority of its output.
'The former government said everything would come from the west - but where
is it? They said we would get western investment. I don't see it,' he said.
Mr Brazauskas is thought to prefer a gentler course towards a market economy
than western-style shock therapy. His views accord with the criticism voiced
about the Russian government by General Alexander Rutskoi, Russian
vice-president, and Mr Arkady Volsky, head of the Russian Union of
Industrialists.
The election winner, however, reiterated his belief in market reforms. 'We
will continue our agreements with the International Monetary Fund, but they
must understand that one-third of the people live in poverty and that we may
be on the verge of hunger in some areas,' he said.
Mr Brazauskas, 60, said he would delay holding a presidential election for
at least six months after his party takes power pending discussions with
political parties and the passing of an electoral law.
He will be chairman of the parliament - as was President Vytautas
Landsbergis whose Sajudis nationalist movement lost Sunday's poll - but he
did not say whether he would run for the presidency.
He reiterated that his party would now be social democratic and not
communist.
Russian economic crisis, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Amstrad
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Irrespective of whether Mr Alan Sugar is offering a fair price for Amstrad,
shareholders have a right to expect better treatment. His offer document
contains only a gloomy paragraph on the trading outlook, no profits
forecast, no comment on the last four months' performance and no detail of
Mr Sugar's plans for the company once it is in private hands. Mr Sugar
maintains that no detailed plans exist. But one can hardly imagine Lloyds
Bank is stumping up Pounds 43m on the basis of sketchy assurances.
In the absence of either non-executive directors or an independent financial
adviser to comment on the terms, the level of disclosure is inadequate. Mr
Sugar cannot expect shareholders to be happy with his offer while he gives
so little away.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Sedgwick
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The sighs of relief after sterling's depreciation must have been deafening
in Sedgwick's boardroom. Only a few weeks before Black Wednesday, the
directors somewhat sheepishly had to admit that they had virtually no
forward cover for 1993 dollar income. As investors have since appreciated by
marking the shares up 15 per cent more than the market, there is some
difference between a Dollars 2 pound and a Dollars 1.51 pound.
Financial coup or big slice of luck? Shareholders will no doubt give the
company the benefit of the doubt, but Sedgwick will reflect that it is in
the business of insurance broking, not currency speculation. It would be a
surprise if such a position arises again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Currencies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The currency markets appear to have lost patience with the Bundesbank's
tough posture on interest rates. Yesterday's signal that rates will not be
cut was immediately followed by concern for the industrial outlook. Having
already cleaned up at the expense of sterling, foreign exchange traders are
unlikely to risk their annual bonuses by aggressively gunning for the D-Mark
before Christmas. But as the recent spate of issues in the Euromarket
illustrate, investors have already started to vote with their feet.
The French franc and Danish krona have already benefited from a weaker
D-Mark and are out of the danger zone within the ERM. More remarkably,
Italy's aspiration to rejoin the system by the year-end looks like more than
wishful thinking. Having allowed the Italian currency to trade in a tight
range against the D-Mark for the past three weeks, the market is already
discounting such a move. Judging by the 5 percentage point difference
between German and Italian short-term interest rates, though, the market
will demand a hefty premium for holding lire even at a lower central rate.
For this reason alone the UK government may feel vindicated in its decision
to float sterling. But a softer D-Mark may not offer more room for
manoeuvre. Sterling has so far notably failed to catch the coat tails of a
rising dollar. Yesterday's PSBR figures are a reminder of the scale of the
deficit which has to be financed next year. Sterling may have to fall
further before overseas investors are tempted to buy gilts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: National Power
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The electricity market may be showing the signs of recession - with sales
falling for the first time in a decade - but National Power continues to
prosper. The key is aggressive cost control, and while the management has
reaped the easiest part of manpower reductions, further savings will come
from more flexible working practices. Although National Power will lose
market share in coming years, its costs will fall even more rapidly than
revenues as its least efficient plant is retired.
That healthy outlook is marred by the uncertainty surrounding the coal
industry, but at least the outline of a compromise is visible. The original
proposal was for the generators to buy 40m tonnes of British coal. If this
were augmented by contracts to buy an additional 15m tonnes next year,
declining to 5m tonnes over the following two years, the strains would be
eased. British Coal could phase its rationalisation programme, and the extra
time might mean that more pits could be made competitive. The generators
would still be buying fuel more cheaply than at present, so customers should
get lower bills, and, of course, the government's blushes would be spared.
Whatever happens to coal, National Power's biggest problem may prove to be
its own success. Profits are still rising sharply and the dividend is
covered 3.5 times even after yesterday's 10 per cent increase in the
interim. Yet releasing those earnings to investors might just attract the
attention of the regulator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: BA's economy class
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's disappointing dip in British Airways' second quarter profits
amply demonstrates the volatility of airline earnings. Though this
inevitably carries a price in BA's rating, the 20 per cent fall in the
shares over the last 10 days looks a little overdone. Next year's
prospective multiple on the basis of one City forecast, after all, is 45 per
cent below the stock market average.
There is bad news, to be sure, in the latest evidence of falling passenger
yields. It will take more than the prospect of a modest economic upturn
before the average finance director sanctions first-class travel all round.
So far, at least, BA detects no rush of eager British exporters in search of
overseas business.
Even so, investors may be putting undue emphasis on the latest numbers. News
that currency adjustments will continue to be a malign influence on profits
in the current quarter is certainly unsettling, if explicable in terms of
the lag effect of advance sales. But this will cancel itself out in the
final three months, and boost both yields and earnings next year.
Given BA's reasonably aggressive balance sheet and global ambition, the
closer the company gets to its target cash flow of 21 per cent of revenues,
the better. This is all the more so since BA has big capacity increases
planned for next summer and would be better able to keep up the cost-cutting
momentum. While a rights issue is probably inevitable at some stage, the
USAir and Dan-Air deals are manageable without it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / 'Time ripe' for farm trade deal: Dunkel says US and EC must
prepare for painful compromises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL, DAVID BUCHAN and DAVID GARDNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, PARIS, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Arthur Dunkel, director-general of Gatt, insisted yesterday that the time
had come for the US and the European Community to settle the farm trade
dispute, saying agreement would involve painful compromises. Settlement
'will mean we will not get everything we want,' he warned.
The director-general of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade was also
emphatic, after meetings with EC trade negotiators, that he detected a new
determination to reach agreement when talks resume in Washington tonight: 'I
have found two commissioners in Brussels who are convinced they are coming
to Washington this week to settle. I have found the same mood here,' he said
in the US capital.
As he left Brussels for Washington, Mr Ray MacSharry, the EC farm
commissioner, said: 'I'm there to do business and I hope they are there to
do the same. The world wants it and the world needs it.'
US officials were more cautious on the eve of the first US-EC talks since
the collapse of farm trade negotiations in Chicago two weeks ago. Mr Ed
Madigan, US agriculture secretary, said: 'We feel that we are clearly at the
outer limit of what we can do.'
The dispute, which focused on EC oilseed subsidies as well as demands for
reform of the EC farm subsidy regime, has brought the two sides to the brink
of trade war, and put in jeopardy six years of negotiations aimed at
liberalising international trade.
In the negotiations, the US will, above all, press for the EC to provide
methods of enforcing the farm production levels that are eventually agreed.
So far, the EC has said that it cannot offer any specific enforcement
mechanisms.
The French farm lobby yesterday displayed mounting concern about an imminent
Gatt agreement on agriculture. It pressed the French government to veto any
EC deal on US terms.
Mr Jean-Pierre Soisson, French agriculture minister, indicated that a veto
by Paris was unlikely. He appeared to state France's price for a Gatt deal:
'a review and renegotiation' of last May's EC agricultural reform 'to take
account of French farmers' legitimate interests.'
Mr MacSharry insisted any Gatt deal would be compatible with the new Common
Agriculture Policy. 'I have the most up-to-date statistics available to the
Community,' he said. 'We are working within the impact of the CAP,' he
added, 'and I'm blue in the face with saying it. Maybe people should start
believing the facts.'
While US officials believe Mr MacSharry may be able to resume talks after
two weeks of EC upheaval without fear of his position being undermined, they
are far from confident that bottom-line positions can be reconciled.
US negotiators insisted they had had no contact with EC counterparts since
the collapse of talks in Chicago, and had no knowledge of whether the EC was
bringing any proposals that would enable a settlement.
Curtain falls on Gatt drama, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Britain tells China it supports greater HK democracy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALEXANDER NICOLL and IVOR OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN told China yesterday that it strongly supported proposals by Mr
Chris Patten, governor of Hong Kong, for greater democracy in the territory
and that they were fully consistent with previous agreements between London
and Beijing.
Mr John Major, the prime minister, assured Zhu Rongji, Chinese vice-premier,
that Britain wished to co-operate with China to ensure a smooth transition
from British to Chinese sovereignty over Hong Kong in 1997, in accordance
with the 1984 Sino-British joint declaration on Hong Kong's future.
Their 45-minute meeting in London, described by Mr Major's office as 'brisk
and businesslike', may have gone some way towards bridging the rift in
Sino-British relations opened when Mr Patten announced his proposals last
month. China says Mr Patten's plan is in breach of the joint declaration.
Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, discussed Hong Kong at length with
Zhu during an hour-long meeting which the Foreign Office said was 'very
amicable'.
Mr Hurd told Zhu that Mr Patten's proposals represented no change in British
policy on Hong Kong and that they were consistent with the joint declaration
and the Basic Law, Hong Kong's post-1997 constitution. He invited
counter-proposals and further discussions.
Zhu aroused concern in Hong Kong with remarks in London on Monday which
suggested that the dispute might affect economic relations between Britain
and China. He asked rhetorically whether, following Mr Patten's proposals,
the joint declaration should 'go with the wind'.
Share prices in Hong Kong fell in response, with the Hang Seng index
dropping 206.31 yesterday to 6,088.52 in heavy trading.
Zhu is understood not to have repeated the implied threats in yesterday's
meetings.
Mr Patten, who is also in London for discussions with Mr Major and Mr Hurd,
told journalists: 'I hope that we can enjoy a calm and rather cooler debate
over the next few months. But it's very difficult if all that happens when
you put forward proposals is that some people say 'no', albeit very loudly.'
Mr Major also told Zhu of Britain's concern about human rights in China  -
during his visit to Beijing last year, he gave Chinese leaders a list of
names of people suspected to be political prisoners.
Lord Howe, the former foreign secretary, is to follow this up by leading a
six-member team to China for a week-long visit next month. Mr Major welcomed
Beijing's decision to receive the delegation.
World stocks, Page 41
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Letter: Wider case for industry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MARK RADCLIFFE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It is encouraging that Mr Jackson's article ('The incredible shrinking
industrial base', November 16) reaches the conclusion, albeit reluctantly,
that we have to reverse the decline in UK manufacturing. However, I would
like to push the case harder and remove his depression and reluctance.
If General Motors doesn't sell cars and consumers don't buy imports from
Asia/Pacific manufacturers, Blue Cross-Blue Shield as health insurers will
end up without the business and the jobs. Furthermore, we believe that up to
about one-third of the jobs lost in UK manufacturing over the past decade
represent sub-contracting of specialist services to specialist firms in
everything from security to catering, and that for every job in
manufacturing there is one in the service industries.
This is why we believe the CBI National Manufacturing Council initiative is
vital to the whole of the UK and why manufacturing must win a larger share
of today's highly competitive international markets.
Mark Radcliffe,
deputy director-general,
CBI,
Centre Point,
103 New Oxford Street,
London WC1A 1DU
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Letter: Fooled by own mirage of debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN C O'CONNOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, James Morgan suggests a magic debt mountain arose in east Germany
(Finance and the Family, October 31) from a 'predisposition to believe'
gilded official data, which 'started when the World Bank misguidedly
attempted to create comparable national income figures for every country in
the world'. The bank was in the crowd that wrongly accepted what central
planners said in the 1970s. But we broke away a decade ago to search for
solutions - along a trail marked by a 1985 book, Dollar GNPs of the USSR and
Eastern Europe, and this year's Historically Planned Economies (HPEs): A
Guide to the Data.
I think Mr Morgan wrongly blames 'assumptions about production and
purchasing power' and presumes that 'realising the absurdity. . .the bank
never indulged in the same exercise again'. The bank's concerns were more
specific, mainly about data quality; and are being answered as HPEs join the
bank and provide more detail, including purchasing power parities in the
UN's International Comparisons Programme (ICP), etc. The alternative
technique, relying on official exchange rates, looks more absurd at present
for the former Soviet Union and some other HPEs undergoing radical changes
in exchange regimes. There is a strong case for a tempered use of ICP-type
information in this context.
Returning to Mr Morgan's main theme, the mountain seems a conjurer's mirage
once it is described as internal rather than foreign debt. As holder as well
as issuer of such debt, the East German government seems only to have fooled
itself. It is hard to see much role there for bank data, particularly when
we corrected our mistake so long ago.
John C O'Connor,
chief, socio-economic
data division,
international
economics department,
World Bank,
1618 H Street, NW,
Washington DC 20433
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Letter: Arms to Iraq - the complex objectives and high cost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr COLIN GRANT-WILSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Surely the real irony of the so-called Iraqi arms scandal has yet to be
aired. Britain almost certainly did not sell the arms but in effect gave
them to the Iraqis. The exports will almost certainly have had Export
Credits Guarantee Department cover which will be called upon and, as there
is virtually no prospect of Iraq every repaying all its international
creditors, the arms were thus a gift. Hopefully I will be contradicted?
Colin Grant-Wilson,
Appletrees,
Market Heath,
Benchley, Kent TN12 7PB
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Letter: Arms to Iraq - the complex objectives and high cost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAVID SAWERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, One moral of the Matrix Churchill affair is liable to be lost among the
excitement about 'cover-ups': if government departments believe they have a
simple objective, such as increasing British exports, they are liable to
behave foolishly. Mr Alan Clark appears to be doing little more than express
a departmental view when he says his job as minister of trade was 'to
maximise exports despite guidelines which I regarded as tiresome and
intrusive'.
Prime ministers should ensure that ministers understand that the national
interest, and therefore government policy, represents a balance between
conflicting objectives and interests; and officials should understand this
fact.
Simple objectives such as increasing UK exports are only appropriate as
low-level objectives for low-level staff. Other considerations should be fed
into the decision process before issues reach ministers; if they are not,
the ministers should demand that they are.
Matrix Churchill represents a failure of leadership. Junior ministers and
officials were allowed to work on the over-simple objective of maximising
British exports because no superior told them otherwise; and the injection
of other considerations usually came from junior foreign office ministers.
The Foreign Office sometimes won the subsequent debates, where weapons were
involved; but the guidance from above seems to have been that exports were
always good. The prime minister and his cabinet should realise that they can
only avoid repetition of such embarrassments if they work to more complex
and adult objectives and ensure their officials do so too.
David Sawers,
10 Seaview Avenue,
Angmering-on-Sea,
Littlehampton, W Sussex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Letter: Wage bargaining should ignore devaluation-induced
inflation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Prof RONALD DORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The prime minister's speech at Guildhall this week strongly supports
the view that the government, if only by jaw-boning, has a role to play in
holding down wage increases in the private as well as in the public sector.
One useful contribution would be to seek to diffuse among all engaged on
either side of the bargaining table an idea which has been commonplace in
countries such as Sweden for a decade, but has little currency in British
discussions.
It is this: RPI-plus is a perfectly reasonable starting point for wage
bargaining in an economy with cost-plus-mark-up pricing. But there is
inflation and inflation. The increase in the cost of imports brought by
devaluation is something which makes the nation poorer. The fairest way of
sharing that loss around is not to compensate in wage packets for that part
of current inflation which can be ascribed to higher (sterling) import
prices, and to confine compensation to the other part produced by the
'spiral of justice' of ratcheting wages and prices. To make the distinction
is not only fair; it also prevents devaluation giving a kick-start to
inflation acceleration which will eventually require a more swingeing
deflation to halt.
Of course the dread words 'incomes policy' cannot be mentioned. NEDO is no
more. We have no national forum as the Swedes have where principles such as
this could be hammered out and exert some effect, however marginal, on
fragmented bargaining outcomes. But might not a chancellor capable of
nationalising 20,000 houses be bold enough to think of some modest
initiative towards creating one?
Ronald Dore,
London School of Economics,
Houghton Street,
London WC2A 2AE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Foreign Affairs: Wake up, Europe - The EC is once again
famous for its internal divisions and its failure to develop coherent
international policies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD MORTIMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Three or four years ago it was great to be European. People from other
continents treated you with respect, interest, even envy.
Americans and Japanese asked earnestly about '1992', meaning the completion
of the single market. One could reassure them, with just a whiff of noblesse
oblige, that their fears of 'fortress Europe' were largely groundless, while
privately hugging oneself with pride at the thought that they actually
cared. And then there was all the excitement about change in the east. The
collapse of east European communism was widely attributed to the contrast
between its conspicuous economic failure and western Europe's success. East
Europeans were eager to join or re-join the 'Europe' to which they felt they
belonged - the one represented and symbolised by the European Community.
Bliss was it in that dawn to be alive, but to be European was very heaven.
Alas and alack. The picture is different now. It has become quite
embarrassing to be European at a gathering such as the one I attended last
week, the biennial 'Atlantic Conference' organised by the Chicago Council on
Foreign Relations, bringing together Europeans and North and South
Americans. Believe it or not, this is 1992 and the single market is about to
be completed. But that no longer seems to count for much. The EC is once
again famous mainly for its internal divisions and its consequent inability
to do anything constructive in relations with the rest of the world.
German unification, mismanaged economically for lack of political courage,
has imposed deflation on the whole of Europe at a time of recession. The
European Monetary System, from which realignments had been effectively
phased out as a step towards a single currency, has contributed to rigidity
at a moment when flexibility is needed, and two currencies have fallen out
of it. The Maastricht treaty, intended to transform the EC into an economic
and political union, has instead led to acrimony both between member states
and within them.
Differences among member states and within the European Commission are
generally held responsible for failure to conclude the Uruguay Round trade
talks, and for the possibility of a trade war between the EC and the US.
Worst of all, western Europe has failed conspicuously to respond to the
challenge of events in the east. I was invited to the conference to present
a paper on the theme 'Western Europe looks east: what role in central and
eastern Europe?'. What could I say? I presented once again my argument for a
strategy aimed at extending the EC gradually eastwards by opening it up to
all those states which can realistically aspire to associate with western
Europe rather than with Russia, and at developing friendly relations between
this whole area and the zone to the east of it within the framework of a
pan-European security structure, based on Nato and the Conference on
Security and Co-operation in Europe (CSCE). In other words, an 'ever closer
union' of Europe from Dublin to Lublin, within a broader security zone from
Vancouver to Vladivostok; in economic terms, an integrated single market
within a European free trade area.
I ran through my programme of economic, military, institutional and
political measures aimed at realising this ambitious scheme, and found that
they went down better than I expected - especially the idea that the various
things being done for eastern Europe should be brought together in a
multilateral, Marshall Plan-style 'joint recovery programme', which would
give recipient states an incentive to overcome their differences, and so
give private investors greater confidence in the economic and political
environment.
Some constructive modifications were suggested. It is vital, I was told, not
to appear to treat Ukraine as 'a Russian problem', because a Russo-Ukrainian
conflict could be the most dangerous for the rest of Europe. Even within the
narrower Europe a distinction needs to be made between economic issues,
where the EC has to take the lead, and military ones, where a US role,
through NATO, continues to be vital. And a distinction needs to be made
between north-central Europe and the Balkans. The former is already the
scene of promising economic and political developments and has hope of
qualifying for EC membership around the end of the century. In the latter
the only immediate issue is halting and preventing war.
Unfortunately all this is based on a false premise. Western Europe is not
'looking east'. Not only has the EC not developed a strategy along the lines
suggested, but its capacity to develop any strategy at all seems to have
collapsed. Instead of finding ways to embrace and stabilise the countries
suddenly released from communism, it has watched impotently while bitter
ethnic and national conflicts resurface and degenerate into spreading
violence. Here, too, the EC's internal divisions have caused paralysis and
have been exacerbated as member states blame each other for the disasters in
former Yugoslavia. Meanwhile, the influx of refugees exacerbates social
tensions and stimulates the rise of xenophobic extremism at home.
No European leader has set out clearly for his electorate the nature of the
opportunities and dangers which events in the east have produced for western
Europe. As a result, it seems that none now has the authority to demand the
sacrifices required from domestic vested interests, notably the farming and
other producer lobbies, which oppose the opening of the west European market
to the most competitive east European products: coal, steel, textiles and
food.
To outsiders, western Europe presents a remarkably unattractive spectacle as
1992, supposedly its year of glory, draws to a close. We look like selfish
children squabbling among ourselves, ignoring the problems of neighbours
who, for the most part, are much worse off than us. At last week's
conference, one US speaker condemned the 'appalling lack of leadership and
will' which Europe has shown in response to the Yugoslav crisis, while a
South American referred to 'a degree of autism', an insistence on repeating
the same answers to radically new and different questions.
It looks increasingly likely that Maastricht, even if the right answer, is
the answer to the wrong question. At the core of the treaty is monetary
union, based on a plan drawn up before the events of 1989-91 transformed the
whole geo- political context, and of dubious relevance to the new and urgent
problems in the east. Tacked on to it is the idea of a common foreign and
security policy, which is indeed what the EC needs but which the treaty as
signed would hardly make any easier to produce. But having got this far it
would certainly be better to ratify the treaty and move on to more important
business. As it is, the EC looks all too likely to spend another year
discussing the decision-making process when what is needed is some actual
decisions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: Sic and tyred
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Having wounded the English language with the syntactical nonsense of a 'Drug
Prevention Week', the government yesterday allowed defence procurement
minister Jonathan Aitken to deliver another blow. Announcing that outsiders
would be allowed to bid to supply certain services, he said: 'We have
already contractorized 100 individual functions.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: Up and over
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
One clue to the recent decision by British insurers to exclude terrorism as
a risk covered by commercial insurance policies is the sheer enormity of the
loss arising from last April's Commercial Union bomb in London.
Hard to believe, but the Association of British Insurers now estimates the
CU-related losses at Pounds 750m, a figure which exceeds the sum paid out
for all terrorist damage in Northern Ireland since the troubles started.
Since the late 1960s the government has paid out around Pounds 620m to
compensate property owners for damage. Losses peaked in 1976-77, when the
payout amounted to Pounds 50m. After falling steadily to Pounds 15m in
1986-87, the bill last year amounted to Pounds 33m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: Swiss society
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
For months, le tout Geneve has been aflutter over the succession at Societe
Generale de Surveillance, the city's premier industrial company. Some
speculated that the chairman, the formidable Elisabeth Salina Amorini, would
herself take the chief executive's chair, soon to be vacated by a retiring
Claude Goldberg. Others feared she might bring in one of her British friends
from her days at Warburgs in London.
Such speculation has proved inaccurate. Salina has found someone who is not
British and not herself to run the group, which provides inspection services
and quality control tests for governments and companies around the world.
Nevertheless, her choice, Thierry Chereau, a Frenchman, at first sight looks
a bit odd. Chereau comes from Source Perrier, which had a rather large
quality control problem of its own a couple of years ago.
But it turns out that he was part of the solution to that problem rather
than its cause, having joined Perrier as chairman only a year ago. But he
suddenly found himself redundant after the Swiss food group, Nestle, took
over Perrier last summer. Now he will get to know the Swiss after all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: Graphic example
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Only yesterday the FT was reporting how many companies illustrate their
annual reports with graphs which flatter their performance.
Take Scottish Metropolitan Property, which was singled out because of the
generous use of its thistle logo to symbolise its profit growth. However,
Vivien Beattie of Southampton University and Michael Jones of the University
of Wales concluded that there were limits to this sleight of hand -
companies with declining performance tend to dispense with graphs. How right
they were.
Scottish Metropolitan Property's latest accounts landed on Observer's desk
yesterday showing a loss - and not a single graph.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: Safe as houses
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The man from the Halifax has come up trumps. Congratulations to Gary Styles,
senior economist at Britain's biggest building society, for winning
Observer's 'forecasting the forecast' competition.
Styles was the only entrant correctly to predict the Treasury's forecast of
the two most important economic indicators: GDP growth for 1993 at 1 per
cent and RPI at 3.25 per cent. He was not far off in predicting the current
account deficit forecast at Pounds 13bn (actual forecast Pounds 15.5bn) -
especially considering some Treasury watchers had the figure at Pounds
6.5bn. On consumer spending: Styles 0.5 per cent, Treasury guess 1.25 per
cent.
Nor were we concerned that Styles predicted a 1 per cent contraction in
fixed investment (answers up to plus 5.2 per cent but correct number 0.25
per cent) and a slightly too toppy manufacturing output increase of 1.75 per
cent (Treasury on 1 per cent).
'I've got to get something right this year,' chuckled Styles - whose own
forecasts are 1.25 per cent for GDP and 4.5 per cent for RPI - on being told
that he had won. The bad news is that he thinks the mortgage rate will be
unchanged - at about 8.5 per cent - a year from now.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Observer: PM in bank note scandal
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Paul Keating is the first Australian prime minister for years who can safely
be cleared of debasing the currency - inflation has fallen to less than 0.8
per cent since he took over from Bob Hawke just under a year ago.
But defacing it is a different matter, and the federal police think they may
be able to finger him on that score.
The alleged crime was perpetrated during a walkabout in North Queensland
when Keating unwisely signed two ADollars 5 notes at the request of a local
artist. Now the artist is selling the notes for ADollars 3,000 each, and the
premier is being investigated under the Crimes (Currency) Act, which
provides for imprisonment of up to two years.
If the case ever got to court, it could even cost the prime minister his
job. Justice minister Michael Tate has promised that the case would be dealt
with impartially.
Keating plays down the incident as summer nonsense. But there is some
evidence that it was as much a political statement as a vote-catching
exercise. The notes he signed were examples of the freshly issued ADollars 5
note carrying the Queen's portrait in place of the 19th century pioneer
pictured on the earlier design.
Keating was one of many republican Australians who unsuccessfully tried to
persuade the Reserve Bank to cancel the issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Leading Article: Time for a purge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LATEST revelations of South Africa's commission of inquiry into
political violence represent the gravest challenge yet to the integrity of
President F W de Klerk and the negotiation process itself. Allegations of
government complicity in political violence have never been in short supply;
but hard evidence has so far proved scarce.
In the past it has been possible to accept President de Klerk's repeated
denials of state involvement in the so-called 'third force'. This murky
group of right-wing extremists is conducting a campaign of assassination and
sabotage to weaken the African National Congress and inflame its already
tense relations with the rival Inkatha Freedom Party.
Credulity has become increasingly strained, however, as more information
surfaces. It ranges from allegations linking a serving senior military
officer with the assassination in 1985 of Mr Matthew Goniwe, a leading
government opponent, to the discovery in London earlier this year of two
members of South African intelligence, apparently set on silencing a
whistle-blowing colleague.
Yesterday credulity vanished. Judge Goldstone's latest disclosures do not -
so far - involve murder. But they do reveal at the very least a sordid dirty
tricks campaign against the ANC. It is not the work of one or two rogue
elements in the security services - the excuse which Mr de Klerk continues
to offer, despite evidence from the commission of top-level sanction for the
plot. The campaign was the responsibility of what the commission describes
as a large operations unit of military intelligence. Among its employees was
a former police officer with two convictions for murder, apparently selected
on the recommendation of Mr de Klerk's chief of staff for intelligence.
Greater involvement
It remains hard to accept that Mr de Klerk personally sanctioned these
tactics. But in the light of the latest information, he must now acknowledge
high level involvement. Unless he acts, he will imperil the negotiating
process he initiated. As Judge Goldstone made clear on Monday, 'no
successful and constructive multiparty negotiations are likely to be held in
the present climate of mutual suspicion and distrust . . . No investment
will take place until a democratic and peaceful climate has been created.'
If Mr de Klerk is to restore his credibility, he should first acknowledge
that state involvement in political violence is greater than he realised. He
must then give greater powers and more support to the commission, which
lacks the resources for its task. The UN secretary general was so persuaded
of the centrality of the issue of violence that he recommended to the
Security Council in August that the Goldstone commission investigate the
army and police, as well as Umkhonto we Sizwe (the ANC's military wing) and
other political armies in South Africa. The secretary general urged Pretoria
to provide finance for such inquiries, and government agreed in principle
that they should take place.
Speedy response
Resources have not been forthcoming. Hundreds of files discovered during the
recent raid cannot be investigated for lack of funds. Judge Goldstone also
complains that he has not had sufficient co-operation from the parties
concerned to do his job properly. The international community can at least
assist with resources. British legal experts and police officers have
already played an important role in the investigation of Boipatong. Judge
Goldstone's appeal for further help deserves a speedy response.
Armed with the evidence, Mr de Klerk should initiate a purge of the security
forces. No one underestimates the scale of this task. The extent and
influence of the right-wing in the services is far from clear. There is no
certainty that, should it reach the stage of confrontation between reformers
and conservatives in the military ranks, the latter will be defeated.
Mr de Klerk's resolve should be stiffened by the realisation that there is
no alternative. Unless he purges the rotten elements in the security forces,
they will destroy the transition to democracy which he himself launched some
three years ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Leading Article: Pinning it on the banks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS easy to sympathise with the public in its irritation over the failure
of banks and building societies to pass on the full benefit of recent cuts
in interest rates. It is less easy to go along with the government's
inclination to put pressure on financial institutions to pass on that
benefit intact. The excuse for such populism, spelt out in Mr John Major's
speech to the Lord Mayor's banquet on Monday, is that it will help promote
economic recovery. Yet in practice it is much more likely to do the reverse.
The public's grievance against the clearing banks rests on the suspicion
that it is being required to pay for the banks' past errors of judgment. Up
to a point the public is right. The decline in banking profitability since
the mid-1980s owes a great deal to such aberrations as lending to developing
countries, loans to over-extended property companies and ill-judged support
for such over-ambitious entrepreneurs as the late Mr Robert Maxwell.
But the banks' aberrations were also a reflection of the government's
monetary policy; and the decline in their margins was made worse by the
increasingly global nature of the competition in banking and the piecemeal
liberalisation of the clearing banks' business. Spreads in both corporate
lending and mortgage lending were squeezed. Nor should it be forgotten that
the private customer enjoyed great benefit from the growing competition for
deposits, where interest on current accounts helped depress bank margins
even further.
Wrong priorities
The real problem is that both the government and the banks appear to have
their priorities wrong. In the longest recession since the second world war,
in which an overhang of debt poses a significant obstacle to recovery, the
main objective should be to restore the capital base of the banks and
building societies so that they are able to finance an upturn. The building
societies have no immediate access to outside capital, while the banks'
ability to tap their shareholders for fresh equity is, at the very least,
questionable. It follows that the only sure-fire means of bolstering capital
is through retained profits.
That message has been grasped by the Federal Reserve in the US, which has
made bank profits a more or less explicit target of monetary policy. Yet the
Fed's interest rate cuts were arguably too timorous to achieve the desired
end, as President Bush knows to his cost. The lesson for Britain, which the
chancellor has yet to take fully aboard, is that interest rates have to fall
farther to achieve a given degree of monetary stimulus than would be the
case in a normal economic cycle. Nor is the threat to sterling from such
cuts as great as feared, since forward interest rates already discount much
of the currency risk.
Dividend policy
The banks, meantime, are perpetuating the habits of an earlier decade, most
notably in relation to dividend policy. Clearing bank dividends
traditionally were covered three times by earnings. Today they are either
uncovered or inadequately covered. Yet, to keep institutional shareholders
sweet, the banks have been tempted to maintain or increase the payout at the
expense of their reserves at a wholly inappropriate juncture.
The time has come for greater realism. The institutions should recognise
that their substantial investment in the clearing banks stands to be
enhanced, not undermined, by more prudent dividend policies. The banks
should recognise that they are sending a damaging signal to the capital
markets by leaving so many of those responsible for the disasters of the
1980s in top positions. Barclays, to name the most conspicuous case, has
appointed a top executive who was associated with the bank's period of
over-expansion to the dual role of chairman and chief executive. In banking,
of all businesses, the existence of checks and balances is crucially
important and should extend to the structure of top management and the
board.
Bankers are admittedly not alone in showing reluctance to accept
responsibility for past error. Whitehall is, par excellence, the place where
the buck no longer seems to stop anywhere. But if failure is so
conspicuously rewarded, whether in banking or government, who can blame the
public for its resentments?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / A storm in a coffee cup: Falling prices and a world glut
have led coffee producers and consumers to seek a new quota pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For the past two years, the world's coffee producers have been forced to
swallow a bitter brew. Plummeting prices and excess supply threaten the
livelihood of more than 25m coffee workers from Brazil to Indonesia. The
product, once known as green gold, is losing its lustre as the economic
mainstay of many developing countries.
An experiment with the free market has left the industry, with total sales
estimated at Dollars 34bn a year and a daily consumption of 2bn cups, in its
worst crisis for decades. After the collapse in 1989 of the International
Coffee Agreement - a pact between producers and consumers controlling
exports to ensure price stability - a world glut caused coffee prices to
slump to almost a third of the level of the late 1980s. Most growers have
been selling at well below cost for the past two years.
The current state of the industry is so serious that growers, exporters,
processors and buyers - led by Brazil, the largest producer, and the US, the
largest consumer and processor - have put aside competing interests to come
to the negotiating table. Following a first round in September, crucial
talks will begin next Monday at the International Coffee Organisation (ICO)
in London to try to conclude a new coffee pact, re-establishing quotas to
limit exports and stabilise prices in an admission that the free market has
not worked.
Hitting 22-year price lows in August of less than 50 cents a pound in New
York, coffee has been overtaken by sugar as the developing countries' main
earner after oil.
Unlike oil, however, coffee supply cannot simply be turned on and off, so
growers in the 50 main producing countries have to sell at the lower prices
or stop production. Their ability to boost prices through holding back
supplies is weakened by the considerable stocks in the hands of consuming
countries. The results are abandoned plantations across the developing world
and out-of-work coffee pickers, whose anger threatens to spill over into
social unrest. In some countries, such as Colombia, the principal
alternative crop is the coca leaf, the raw material of cocaine.
The outcome of the talks is keenly awaited, particularly in Brazil, which
has been the biggest producer almost continuously since the 1760s when
Cappuchin monks in Rio de Janeiro began growing seeds smuggled from French
Guyana.
Mr Jose Dias de Goveia, a 76-year-old farmer in Pocos de Caldas, Brazil's
coffee heartland, says: 'I've been in coffee all my life but the last four
years have been the worst I've ever seen. We're talking survival.'
Production costs are Dollars 65 a 60-kilo bag, but he is forced to sell at
Dollars 40. He has cut staff to a third, reduced land under cultivation from
500 to 400 hectares, and is producing what he calls 'ecological coffee',
because he cannot afford fertilisers.
In southern Minas Gerais, the world's most productive coffee belt, such
stories are common. Growers are abandoning coffee, which has always been a
volatile commodity and sensitive to climatic changes, for eucalyptus, nuts
and passion fruit. On many farms cattle graze between the remaining coffee
bushes. In the past three years the number of coffee bushes in Brazil has
fallen from 4.2bn to 3.2bn. Only 20 per cent are thought to be properly
cultivated; quality is suffering and thus flavour is deteriorating because
coffee prices are too low for growers to invest in fertilisers and
technology. The current crop is expected to yield fewer than 20m bags
compared with 43m in 1987-88.
Although these figures are significant, the impact of the coffee price slump
is even greater on many smaller coffee-producing nations, where coffee is
the principal foreign exchange earner. Growers have little alternative but
to turn to cocaine production to sustain their families. In Colombia,
disenchanted pickers are raw fodder for recruitment into cocaine production
cartels.
In Brazil, industrialisation has diminished coffee's contribution to export
earnings to less than 4 per cent this year compared with 21.5 per cent 15
years ago and 50 per cent in the early 1960s. However, coffee cultivation
remains a labour-intensive business and Mr Christian Ottoni, head of the
Pocos do Caldas Rural Union, warns: 'The social consequences of the price
collapse have been devastating.' He estimates that 1.5m to 2m of the 10m
workers dependent on Brazil's coffee sector are unemployed and adding to the
growing number of slum-dwellers in the cities.
Ironically, it was Brazil that scuppered the coffee accord. It was angered
by US attempts to reduce its export quota to allow Colombia and Central
America, which produce the milder varieties of coffee favoured by Americans,
to increase their exports. The Bush administration was motivated by a
determination to provide economic support for these countries in return for
co-operation in the war against drugs.
The Brazilian Exporters Federation (Febec), which had been convinced that
the world's largest producer could only stand to benefit from a free market,
has had its hopes shattered as the country has seen coffee income fall from
Dollars 2.5bn a year to little more than Dollars 1bn since 1989. Despite the
glut on world markets, Brazil is struggling to fulfil its export commitments
this year of 13m bags. It is reportedly even importing low-grade coffee to
meet the requirements of its home market - now the second-largest in the
world at 10m bags. By contrast, Colombia more than doubled its crop since
1989 to 18m bags and has seen earnings increase to match those of Brazil.
Brazil's growers put part of the blame on disgraced President Fernando
Collor's policy of deregulation. While Colombian growers have received
government subsidies and support in technology and marketing since the pact
collapsed, the Brazilian government in 1990 closed its Coffee Institute,
which controlled supply and sales. The government's curbs on subsidies for
agriculture meant growers had no access to cheap finance, domestic prices
were subjected to successive price freezes and exports were hit by an
overvalued cruzeiro. The Brazilian coffee sector was also discredited
internationally by charges in New York of insider trading in coffee futures
 -after the government's sudden suspension of coffee exports in March last
year - allegedly linked to the corruption scandal which caused Mr Collor's
downfall last month.
But Mr Luiz Sergio de Paiva, from Brazil's National Coffee Council, says
most of the blame for the current crisis must be laid at the door of the
small group of processors which dominates the market. 'It was not a free
market at all,' he says, pointing at a map on his wall. 'All the world's
coffee grows between the tropics of Cancer and Capricorn in the third world
and thus lacks planning and development. The consumers are all in Europe and
the northern hemisphere. Five big first-world companies process half the
world's coffee. In a so-called free market it will always be producers that
lose and processors that gain.'
With many Febec members facing bankruptcy, the federation has yielded to
growers' demands and is backing a new agreement. 'We did not expect that
being without an accord would be so hard or so long,' admits Mr Oswaldo
Aranha Neto, Febec president.
But coffee diplomacy is a delicate business. The International Coffee
Organisation includes 50 coffee-exporting nations (representing 97 per cent
of world production) and 21 importing countries (responsible for 80 per cent
of consumption). Negotiations bring together countries as diverse as
Germany, Cuba, Vietnam and Ethiopia, and previous talks have been
acrimonious.
The producers might seem to be in the weak position. Mr Alexandre Beltrao,
head of the ICO, estimates that producers have been losing Dollars
4bn-Dollars 5bn a year worldwide since the accord collapsed. But the tables
may soon turn. The price has started to recover quite rapidly over the past
few weeks as Brazil has admitted its crop is lower than expected, and now
stands at more than 70 cents a pound. Consumers and processors are beginning
to be worried about a possible dearth of supplies, particularly as it takes
four years for a bush to start producing beans.
Industrialists worry that the low prices have caused quality to drop even
further. Mr Beltrao points out that the income lost by producers 'is money
which should have been directed towards investment'. The price recovery is
generating renewed optimism among producers that the sector may be poised
for revival, rendering a pact academic. But prices were at 130 cents when
the accord collapsed and Mr Beltrao says: 'Prices have not risen enough to
dissuade anyone of the need for a new accord. I think by the end of the year
we'll have a framework agreement.' Negotiations on a pact may, however, be
affected by a change of administration in the two main participating
countries. The new Brazilian president, Mr Itamar Franco, is from Minas
Gerais, which produces half of Brazil's coffee, and is thought to be
sympathetic to the idea of an accord. The position of Mr Bill Clinton, US
president-elect, is less clear, though Mr Jorge Cardenas, of the Colombian
National Growers Federation, says he is not worried that a change in the
White House means the US will cool to the idea of a deal.
In September a serious hurdle was overcome with agreement on the concept of
universal quotas, covering exports of producers to all destinations rather
than just to ICO members, and guaranteeing that exports offered to member
countries would be on at least as good terms as to non-members. Under the
previous agreement, producers sold surplus supplies to non-members at
cheaper prices, which then sold the coffee on to member countries.
The remaining obstacles include a system for controlling shipments, agreeing
on prices and quota sizes. The issue of selectivity will also have to be
resolved to allow consumers to obtain the types of coffee they prefer, such
as robusta or the milder arabica.
Mr Beltrao stresses that the return to a pact would not mean the sector had
lost its taste for the free market. 'I don't see a pact as an alternative
but as a five-year transition period,' he says.
Whether the worst is over for those whose livelihood depends on coffee rests
largely on the outcome of this month's negotiations. Although a new pact
might push up prices for coffee lovers, the hope is that the ensuing price
stability and quality would act like a caffeine shot to stimulate
consumption above the 72m bags at which it has stuck. Mr Paiva warns: 'We
must remember that coffee is not the only drink in the world.'
 -----------------------------------------------
         A LOT LESS COFFEE IN BRAZIL
 -----------------------------------------------
The top overall consumers
 -----------------------------------------------
1991               60kg bags      Kg per
                   (million)      capita
 -----------------------------------------------
US                   18.89         4.52
Germany              10.48         7.92
Brazil                9.20         3.78
Japan                 6.00         2.92
France                5.56         5.84
 -----------------------------------------------
The top drinkers
 -----------------------------------------------
1991                 Kg per
                 capita a year
 -----------------------------------------------
Finland              11.51
Sweden               11.13
Norway               10.66
Denmark              10.59
 -----------------------------------------------
The top exporters
 -----------------------------------------------
Coffee year            60kg bags
1991/92                (million)
 -----------------------------------------------
Brazil                   21.74
Colombia                 15.42
Indonesia                 4.02
Ivory Coast               3.57
Guatemala                 3.29
Mexico                    2.98
Costa Rica                2.27
 -----------------------------------------------
Source: ICO
 -----------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Personal View: Omissions on options
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CRANNA and JOHN SAMUELS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The present controversy concerning directors' remuneration has neglected one
aspect of the total package: executive share option schemes (Esops). For
schemes to be effective, they must tie directors' interests to earnings per
share (EPS) growth, ensuring the decisions they make are in the best
interests of shareholders.
Unfortunately, our research indicates not all is what it should be in the
way some companies operate their schemes, and this is often hidden by the
poor levels of disclosure in annual reports.
The four issues we have identified are discounting, voluntary lapsing,
pre-emption and the lack of adequate disclosure of information pertaining to
share option schemes in company annual reports.
It is possible to discount the price at which directors can buy options by
up to a limit of 15 per cent on the market price on the day the option is
granted, the argument being that it encourages executives to establish an
equity interest in the company. Yet if the object of an Esop is to motivate
directors to work towards increasing the EPS of the company, it seems
curious to award the director an immediate 15 per cent discount for
achieving nothing.
The National Association of Pension Funds (NAPF) and the Association of
British Insurers (ABI) have raised the problem of pre-emption. By allowing
directors and other employees to buy share options, the percentage of the
total issued share capital held by other shareholders falls, and this
represents a steady dilution of their holding.
Then there is the problem of voluntary lapsing. Under most Esops, directors
are permitted to lapse voluntarily any grant of options they have been
allocated. Assuming the directors have not used their full allocation of
options, the implication is that, if they manage the company poorly and the
share price falls, they can lapse their options and be reallocated another
tranche up to the balance of their allocation at a lower exercise price.
If exercised at the right time, this would render relatively greater
profits, and invalidate any notion of incentive-based performance tied to a
steadily growing EPS. The directors should be able to show that profits are
derived from a healthier company than when the options were initially
granted, not from a randomly fluctuating share price.
There have also been calls for more appropriate explication in the annual
reports. In the majority of annual reports, share option prices and the
number of share options held by directors are given in different tables,
making it impossible to calculate who owns what and how much they are
making. Furthermore, options are not counted as a cost to the company.
Studies in the US have shown that the cost of Esops if charged against
profits would reduce them by an average of 3 per cent and sometimes by up to
10 per cent. Indeed, the US Securities and Exchange Commission has tightened
regulations pertaining to disclosure requirements for Esops.
However, issues of executive remuneration have little impact on the making
of investment decisions, and this has been reflected in the lack of emphasis
that the NAPF and the ABI have placed until recently on these kinds of
issues. These organisations increasingly recognise the need to improve ways
of measuring executive performance, and have now set out detailed guidelines
concerning Esops which go some way in addressing the issues of discounting,
pre-emption and lapsing. They have also recognised that EPS as a measure of
company performance is vulnerable to manipulation and other measures should
be incorporated.
However, the information on executive remuneration rarely trickles down to
the fund managers who ultimately should be the monitors of companies'
remuneration packages. Moreover, they are often unconcerned or ignorant of
corporate governance issues, and rarely use their proxy votes anyway. This
demonstrates the need for the ABI and NAPF guidelines to be dovetailed with
any conclusions the Cadbury Committee on corporate governance might reach
when it publishes the conclusions next month. Any overall policy should be
rigorously implemented by the institutional investors, specifically at the
fund manager level.
Otherwise there will be a danger that directors will be perceived as
discerning no limits on their remuneration. This perception may be
exacerbated because of the unsatisfactory levels of disclosure in annual
reports. The Institute of Directors takes the view that the scale of risk
that directors carry is such that any compensation is insignificant compared
with the scale of economic activity. But can this view be used to justify
curtailing the incentive element of an incentive-based emolument by the
discounting and lapsing of options, or as a recent study* shows, increasing
executive remuneration against collapsing profits?
This article is based on work done by the Entrepreneurship Group of the
Centre for Economic Performance at the London School of Economics.
*The Disappearing Relationship Between Directors' Pay and Corporate
Performance, Centre for Economic Performance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Arts: Marks and Sparks drama - Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
More and more time on British television is being devoted to what might be
called Marks and Spencer drama. ITV and BBC1 now depend on it to such an
extent that you can find an example virtually every night serving, in
mid-evening, as the keystone in the scheduling arch of one network or the
other, sometimes both. Given its popularity and high production standards,
it would be supercilious, and in some cases inaccurate, to dismiss the
entire genre as middlebrow soap opera. But given its popularity, costs, and
growing importance in the ratings, it seems as well to recognise precisely
what it is.
Then again, perhaps it is easier to say what it is not. For instance one-off
plays are scarcely Marks and Spencer drama, because with M and S you need to
be able to go back next week and find something virtually indistinguishable
from what pleased you this week. Almost all single dramas arise from the
consciousness of a single, often idiosyncratic, author. Thus the first in a
new BBC2 season of 'Performance' on Saturday, Christopher Hampton's Tales
From Hollywood, falls on four counts: it emerged entirely from his mind, was
originally written for the theatre, is not a series or serial, and was in
large part non-naturalistic.
It was splendid to see effort put into the use of studio production for
once, and the stylistic tributes to Edward Hopper, Sunset Boulevard and so
on were fun, even if the end result was a teeny bit yawn-making. But it was
not M and S.
Nor is any adaptation, from The Borrowers to Clarissa, because adaptations
are, by their very nature, finite and one of the essential characteristics
of M and S material is that you should be able to go on dishing it out
forever, or at least so long as the public maintains its demand. Thus GBH
and The Singing Detective also fall outside the genre. Not only are they
finite, they serve the haute couture end of the market: high quality and
originality, even a degree of eccentricity. Series such as Civvies may
appear at first to be Marks and Sparks material when they are screened in M
and S slots and serve the M and S clientele, but these too have to be
disqualified on the grounds that they cannot be strung out indefinitely.
Perhaps the easiest definition is a list. You can currently see Trainer
tonight (BBC1), Rumpole Of The Bailey tomorrow (ITV), Casualty on Saturday
(BBC1), The House Of Eliott (BBC1) and London's Burning (ITV) on Sunday, and
Kinsey (BBC1) and Boon on Tuesday. Other current or recent examples might
include Soldier Soldier, The Ruth Rendell Mysteries and Taggart, though once
you start including detective series it is hard to know where to stop.
Poirot and Miss Marple should probably be excluded on the grounds that they
are adaptations and therefore finite, but what about Inspector Morse? Though
the original programmes were taken from books, Morse scripts are now turned
out by a team of script writers so in that and other respects Morse would
seem to be a prime example of the genre.
What do these series have in common? They are nearly always 50 to 60 minutes
long or suitable for transmission in 60 minute slots. They are naturalistic,
with frequent use of outside locations (the amount varies, less in Casualty,
more in Boon) and each episode costs far more than twice as much as a
30-minute episode of a soap opera such as Coronation Street or EastEnders.
They constitute the high quality end of mass-production and, of necessity,
scripts for practically all of them are commissioned from jobbing writers.
A good book may be, as Milton said, 'the precious life blood of a master
spirit' and once in a while you will come across a Marks and Sparks drama
series which emerges from the mind of a single writer. Rumpole is the
obvious example, but because John Mortimer writes all of them there is never
more than a handful of Rumpole scripts each year. Mortimer might be appalled
at the ease and accuracy with which commissioned writers could turn out
Rumpole 'forgeries', but presumably that will not happen while Mortimer is
willing to continue. In other series, where 20 or 30 or even 40 scripts a
year may be called for, the use of writing teams is unavoidable.
The result is drama which, like Marks and Spencer's clothes, benefits from a
high level of quality control and is consequently consistent, safe, good
value for money, reliable and wholly predictable. Most of the population
will feel comfortable with it, and won't mind in the least if mother sees
it. We are assured there was a bare breast in this week's Casualty but if
there was it would not have shocked Auntie Ethel: amid the efforts of the
heroic nursing staff and the laughter and tears of all those fleeting
bittersweet moments among the saline drips and kidney bowls, with the prize
fighter and the fallen pylon man, some of us missed it altogether.
M and S products do not embarrass the customer or present any threat;
practically everyone feels comfortable with them. M and S products do not go
to extremes, indeed they stick as close as possible to a line through the
middle of the market in order that as few people as possible will be put
off. M and S products are reassuring and familiar. Above all M and S
products are respectable. There is the occasional risque moment in London's
Burning, as when the non-drinking driver on the disastrous basketball outing
retired with his floozy to the mini-bus this week, but the hurried
tucking-in of a shirt was the furthest that anything went.
Even within the genre standards do vary, of course. Trainer is an attempt to
make an English Dallas with lashings of glamour and rich bastards stabbing
one another's backs while the little people are ground down at the bottom.
Usually it fails because the English have neither the chutzpah of the
Americans nor their flair for off-the-wall craziness. Who could care less
about any of the characters in Trainer? Kinsey, on the other hand, does have
some interestingly developed characters, yet even they (the sparky
secretary, the villainous competing solicitor, the liberal hero Kinsey
himself) are remarkably predictable.
M and S drama is workmanlike, with plenty of narrative, and nothing to shock
you or take you by surprise. No doubt it provides pleasant evenings for lots
of people. But is that really all we require from these huge swathes of peak
viewing time? Good art, not to mention great art, has always been produced
by those who have paid close attention to life. Just as the Modern movement
rapidly became tedious because its proponents reacted too often to one
another's work rather than the whole of life around them, so M and S drama
seems all too often to be produced by people who have been observing not
life but merely other television series.
Good drama keeps on surprising you by showing human attributes which are
fresh and striking yet entirely credible judged against your own experience.
Watching a drama by Shakespeare or Michael Frayn you know that the authors
have been keeping a sharp eye on their fellow men. Watching Boon or The
House Of Eliott you are more likely to think 'I know exactly what's going to
happen now because I've seen umpteen other drama episodes like this'.
Of course Marks and Spencer suits the British very well, and M and S drama
brings the broadcasters the sort of ratings (15m for Casualty, 14m for
London's Burning, 10m for House Of Eliott in the current BARB figures) which
they could not normally expect from more individual drama.
But as we buy our respectable knickers and watch our dependable series we
should perhaps remember the sort of frills we are missing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Arts: Elegies for Angels, Punks and Raging Queens - Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
An immensely powerful performance is taking place at the King's Head theatre
in Islington. Whether every night will be a potent as the first probably
depends on the audience. In the end there are 33 characters on stage - a
record for this theatre. Sitting and standing to capacity, the audience on
Monday could only outnumber the cast by about three to one. And it is on
this total proximity, almost identification, between performers and watchers
that Elegies for Angels, Punks and Raging Queens depends for its force.
Do not be put off by the title. The operative word is elegies. The victims
of Aids (for that is what the piece is about) range widely and include a
cute little girl with a pigtail, infected by a parent; what looks like a
septuagenarian charlady; and a minister of the church who thinks it was best
when they all stayed in the closet as well as the more obvious candidates.
All suffer; all die.
Elegies achieves its effect by letting them come on one after another. When
they have done their bit, they take their place back-stage as on the Quilt
which commemorates Aids victims in individual panels which has been publicly
shown in Washington DC. The result is like a medieval tableau recording
victims of the plague.
Yet it is not gloomy. If there is a criticism of Elegies, it is that there
is an ambivalence about whether it is celebrating the good times that have
been had, despite the consequences, or is a lament that they ever took
place. The answer seems to be a bit of both, but that the suffering has
brought a lot of unexpected people together.
Elegies is conducted in rhyming couplets and is, in parts, a musical. Some
of the verse is crude: 'Now that I have kicked the bucket, All I have to say
is f-it.' Much of it is effective: 'What is it doctor, is it Aids? His
studied silence spoke in spades.' The songs are uniformly good. 'My Brother
Lived in San Francisco' may be reminiscent of a 1960s hit that praised the
same city, but the reference must be intentional and captures the change
from flower people to sufferers.
The final song, 'Learning to Let Go', which means learning to die in peace,
is sensational and is encored several times over. The show is very American.
The principal influences come from California and New York City; so does the
tinge of sentimentality. But it is convincingly played here as if Britain
has the same problems of pain and the need for sympathy.
The piece is written and directed by Bill Russell and the music is by Janet
Hood. It is worth seeing alongside Steven Sondheim's Assassins at the Donmar
Warehouse.
Both are about dancing with death, yet both have a peculiar vitality.
King's Head Theatre Club, London N1 (071) 226 1916
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Some of the best arts programmes of recent years have come out of BBC2's
Bookmark (8.10). The series returns today with an account of the English
Shakespeare Company's tour of Malawi with 'Macbeth'. Producer John Purdie
says 'Despite the language problems, Malawian audiences are weaned on an
oral story-telling tradition and live in a world where witchcraft and power
politics are daily realities. They quickly identify the plot of the Scottish
tragedy and relish the obvious parallels between Shakespeare's characters
and their own political leaders'.
Dispatches sounds like yet another of those occasions when programme makers
climb on their high horse and flay the powers-that-be for spending too
little on hospital care. What broadcasters never do is state where they
would draw the line, given that there would be no great difficulty in the
modern world of expensive high-tech medicine in spending the entire GNP on
health care (9.00 C4).
BBC2 begins Nice Town, a three-part drama in which Paul McGann and Philip
Davis play brothers one of whom decides to become a secret sperm donor for
the other's wife (9.25).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Arts: Die Frau ohne Schattten - Opera
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Die Frau ohne Schatten can seem a masterpiece, or a grossly overblown piece
of musico-dramatic manufacture, the last word in (and gasp of)
late-Romanticism, with means and ends troublingly out of balance. It was the
most ambitious and most time-consuming act of operatic collaboration between
Richard Strauss and Hugo von Hofmannsthal. The composer himself, towards the
end of the its gestation, had begun to entertain serious doubts about its
grandiose scale and substance: he was already yearning (in the words of
Michael Kennedy's admirable Royal Opera programme note) 'to strip off his
Wagnerian armour'.
The new Covent Garden production realises both the music and the libretto
with glowing colour, lightness of touch and texture, a picturesqueness of
conception that avoids both triviality and strenuous late-20th-century
relevance-seeking. It seems to frame a touchingly simple, heartfelt
statement of belief in the opera as a unified masterpiece; and its
conviction proves contagious. Indeed, for the first time I derived reward
from almost an entire performance, not just particular sections and
paragraphs.
For this the team of Bernard Haitink (conductor), John Cox (producer) and
David Hockney (designer) deserves praise individually and corporately; but
it is, as it should be, the conductor who stamps the whole performance with
its peculiar radiance of style. The characteristic of Georg Solti's Frau -
he was the first conductor (in 1967) of the previous Covent Garden
production - was its lightning-flash brilliance of sound and thunder-peal
ferocity of rhythmic drive, which suited some portions of the score far
better than others.
Here, a tender, unforced musicality seems to draw out the genuineness of
inspiration in the moments of solemnity and repose, reflecting the candour
as well as the richness of Strauss's melodic and harmonic language. The
Wagnerian armour is not stripped off, but neither does it prove
overburdeningly heavy. There is Brucknerian innocence in the
chorale-elements of the first-act close, Mahlerian clarity of line in the
accompaniments to the arias of the Emperor and Empress, and an approach to
the darker, wilder sounds and episodes that, though lacking nothing in
muscle-power, wholly avoids melodramatic inflation.
Even the carolling sweetnesses of the many-voiced Happy End, usually the
sticking point in any account of the opera, flow out with redeeming
freshness. This Frau, expertly played, finely prepared and balanced (and a
good deal less cut than previously in this theatre), is Haitink's first; it
counts as one of his most resplendent London achievements.
Hockney, working with the costume designer Ian Falconer (serendipitous Frau
surname]), concentrates on fairy-tale fantasy, on South Sea Isles opulence;
exquisite distinctness of line and quirky vividness of detail provide the
disciplining force. The succession of cloths and cutouts rising and falling,
with backdrop colours warming to hues of oriental gorgeousness, seems to
show creative kinship with the best of Disney, and with such flights of
exotic studio fancy as The Thief of Baghdad.
The most spirit-lifting episodes are those of the 'upper world'; on Monday
the effect down below was sometimes bold but less exactly judged. The
candy-stripe patterns of the dyer's hut look brighter in photograph than on
stage - altogether, the lighting, which often gives the Woman a visible
Shadow, needs refining. Much of the transformation-magic is disappointing
(visible wires, tame flood, unimposing stone-Emperor); Act 3 has a
surprisingly rumpled look.
Cox's staging works efficiently within these limitations. Apart from the
suggestion of intriguing troubled warmth between Barak and his wife early
on, he manages relatively little in the way of character-focussing, or what
the Germans call Personenregie: the cast, made up of mainly experienced
international Straussians, is not a unified ensemble. One feels that the
show as a whole is not yet quite tuned (it is shared with the Los Angeles
Music Center Opera, and will doubtless be re-worked there). But already its
airy, warming beauties draw the sting of detailed criticism.
Two of the leading quintet reach the grandest Straussian level. In the title
role Anna Tomowa-Sintow has only one fault: it is hard to believe this fine
figure of a mature and womanly soprano lacks anything at all, least of all a
shadow. Her voice, in prime condition, fills out the lines with a natural
amplitude that betokens a wonderful directness of stage personality; I love
her uncloying tenderness in the little scene with Barak, and the unmannered
nobility of her demeanour in the Trial - the climactic spoken outburst,
usually cut, is superbly handled. Her partner is the American mezzo Jane
Henschel (house debut) as a Nurse of tireless, vibrant delivery, verbal wit,
and deftly insinuating character: a wonderful account of a formidable role.
Franz Grundheber's Barak is unfailingly sympathetic, and firmly voiced,
though with less than ideal breadth and depth of tone. Paul Frey (Emperor)
sings with true musicianship - a blessing in any Strauss tenor - but
somewhat palely and passionlessly. Of Gwyneth Jones's Dyer's Wife I find it
difficult to write justly, especially since she has given such long,
honourable service in the role. How does one convey the generosity, the
almost heedless abandon with which she throws herself into it? And on the
other hand, how does one fairly - and politely - describe the vagaries of
her current vocal condition?
in repertory at the Royal Opera House until November 28
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / People: From Lambeth council to CRE
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Commission for Racial Equality, the statutory body set up in 1976 to
help promote equality of opportunity and to eliminate discrimination, is to
get its first black chairman.
Herman Ouseley (right), 46, born in Guyana and brought up in Peckham, south
London, takes over in February.
His appointment comes at a sensitive time for race relations. Immediate
issues facing him will include unemployment - which affects members of the
ethnic minority communities disproportionately and is being aggravated by
the recession - and the state of race relations law.
Although the government has shown little inclination to strengthen the Race
Relations Act in the past, the commission is arguing for changes to
'challenge entrenched forms of discrimination more effectively'. These would
include statutory provision for workplace ethnic monitoring and a
discrimination division in the industrial tribunals system.
Kenneth Clarke, home secretary, says he took a personal interest in this
'key appointment' to the CRE; the commission had secured in Herman Ouseley a
'dynamic and resourceful' chairman with proven management and leadership
skills.
Ouseley has needed these skills to the full in his present post as chief
executive of Lambeth council in south London. Lambeth has a long tradition
of controversy, sometimes marked by clashes between elected members and
full-time officers. Earlier this year Ouseley instructed his staff to walk
out of meetings if they were abused by councillors, saying he would not
allow staff to become victims of 'officer-baiting'.
Sir Michael Day, the present chairman who is coming to the end of his
five-year term of office, went to the CRE from the West Midlands probation
service. Clarke says Sir Michael had 'worked ceaselessly towards the fair
society we all want'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / People: Governor to join Scottish Hydro-Electric
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lord Wilson, who recently retired as governor of Hong Kong, is to become
chairman of Scottish Hydro-Electric, the privatised electricity company
which serves the north of Scotland. It will be his first boardroom
appointment and he will make it his major task. He will succeed Sir Michael
Joughin on April 1 1993.
Lord Wilson, who is 57, meets one of the obvious criteria for the job -
being a Scot. He took his title, Lord Wilson of Tillyorn, from the cottage
in Aberdeenshire, at the heart of Hydro-Electric's area, where he spent his
home leaves from Hong Kong.
'I have half grown up with Hydro-Electric,' he said yesterday, 'and walked
an awful lot of the hills in the Hydro-Electric area.'
However, having been either in government service or in academic life for
all his life, mostly connected with Chinese affairs, he is not a businessman
and says he will have a lot to learn.
Hydro-Electric is an attractive animal as electricity companies go, with a
rural image but a nimble performance in establishing markets and building a
gas-fired power station in England.
Joughin, who will be almost 67 when he steps down, was a farmer and
broadcaster of Conservative persuasion who was made chairman of the old
North of Scotland Hydro-Electric Board in 1983.
His bluff manner belies the shrewdness which helped him persuade the
government to privatise Scottish electricity as two companies rather than
one (to the disappointment of ScottishPower). 'Electricity will always be a
political commodity,' he says. Wilson is smoother but, from years of dealing
with Chinese, no less politically acute.
Wilson was approached by Hydro-Electric when Joughin read an 'Aberdeenshire
man leaves Hong Kong' type article about Wilson in the Aberdeen Press &amp;
Journal. The efforts of headhunters had proved fruitless.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / People: Finance moves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nicholas Whitney has been appointed chief executive of HOARE GOVETT.
Formerly head of UK research at Rowe &amp; Pitman and group research director
following the merger with Warburgs, since last year he has run Whitney
Research.
*****
Stephen Myhill, head of sales and marketing, has been appointed to the board
of BIRMINGHAM MIDSHIRES Building Society.
*****
Keith Hewett, formerly director of strategic development, has been appointed
finance director of PREMIER ADMINISTRATION.
*****
Richard Watt has been appointed head of Latin American investments at
GARTMORE INVESTMENT; he moves from Kleinwort Benson International
Investment.
*****
Mark Longden, formerly a director of James Capel Europe, has been appointed
executive director and worldwide product manager for UK and European
equities at LEHMAN BROTHERS INTERNATIONAL.
*****
Ian Strafford-Taylor has been appointed head of global securities borrowing
and lending at Union Bank of Switzerland, based in London; he moves from
Morgan Stanley International.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / People: Brian Goldthorpe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Brian Goldthorpe, one of Midland Bank's most experienced bankers, died at
the weekend after a short illness.
A straight-talking Yorkshireman, he joined Midland direct from school in
1949, rising to become deputy chief executive. After Midland was bought by
Hongkong and Shanghai Bank in the summer, Goldthorpe was chosen to become a
Hongkong Bank director with responsibility for controlling worldwide credit
risk. However, he resigned because of ill-health in September.
He is a particular loss to the bank because he was one of only a tiny number
of long-serving Midland executives who survived a series of purges of the
top management during the 1980s. Colleagues say his experience will be
difficult to replace.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Business and the Environment: Fresh concern over ozone hole
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When peasants in the remote south of Chile noticed that rabbits were going
blind and their sheep and cattle were developing cataracts, they were
witnessing the grim signs of one of today's biggest environmental concerns -
the depletion of the earth's protective ozone layer.
Last year, the Financial Times first reported a sharp increase in skin
burns, eye complaints and allergies in Punta Arenas, the town at the
country's southern tip. Since then, the animals' plight has prompted keen
interest among scientists. Thus southern Chile is about to become the
world's first open-air laboratory for studying the health effects of the
ozone layer's decline.
Each spring, a huge ozone hole opens up over the Antarctic. US satellite
measurements show that the area of severe ozone depletion extends about 6m
square kilometres beyond the borders of the frozen continent. The ozone
loss, caused by a build-up of chlorofluorocarbons in the stratosphere,
allows increased levels of cancer-causing ultraviolet radiation to reach the
earth. Scientists believe that exposure to ultraviolet-B rays can also
damage the body's immune system, weakening people's resistance to disease.
According to Bedrich Magas, a researcher at the University of Magallanes in
Punta Arenas: 'It's like getting Aids from the sky.' The ozone hole now
covers the southern tip of Latin America. Even as far north as Santiago, the
capital' scientists have measured a five-fold increase in the intensity of
radiation this austral spring.
In Punta Arenas, the increase has been even greater. A team of US scientists
from Johns Hopkins University flew there earlier this month to study the
impact of this invisible bombardment of ultraviolet rays on humans and
animals. They were alerted to the problem by reports last year of a sharp
increase in skin burns, eye complaints and allergies in the area.
It is the first time an international group of eye and skin specialists,
immunologists, optical physicists and epidemiologists will have the chance
to examine the veracity of these reports, and whether the health complaints
can be linked to overdoses of radiation. They will also study the
feasibility of setting up a full-scale project to monitor the long-term
health effects associated with ultraviolet radiation. Like x-rays, the
effects of UV-B exposure are cumulative.
Although the intensity of ultraviolet radiation hitting Punta Arenas is
still below the levels received near the Equator, what interests the Johns
Hopkins team is the impact of sudden increases in exposure. 'We want to know
whether these sharp aberrations in UV-B levels, which expose people to
several times the amount of radiation they are used to, can cause acute or
chronic health problems over the years,' says Oliver Schein, the team's
head.
The scientists are taking several devices to monitor UV-B exposure in
different occupational groups. Farmers, fishermen and office workers in
Punta Arenas will carry UV-B dosimeters similar to x-ray counters.
Kirk Gellat, a veterinary ophthalmologist, will be looking at the reports of
blindness in animals. 'It is possible,' he says, 'that animals exhibit
symptoms before humans because their lifespans are shorter.'
The pilot project is being financed by the US Environmental Protection
Agency, the Chilean Health Ministry and the University of Chile.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Business and the Environment: Charged up in the Alps - The
recent opening of the world's first household battery recycling plant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When you switch on a torch, portable radio or alarm clock, you don't think
twice about what makes it work until the power runs out. But the humble
batteries that help modern life run so smoothly also pose a serious problem
in this age of consumer plenty - they are notoriously hard to get rid of.
Not only do dry batteries contain nasty mixtures of metals - among them
zinc, iron, mercury, cadmium, manganese, lead, copper and aluminium - but
these are also sealed in packages that make the various elements difficult
to separate and capture.
Thus the disposal or recycling of batteries is a tough environmental
challenge. Until now, there has been almost no organised reprocessing of
batteries. In some places, collection and disposal take place, but
satisfactory disposal sites are difficult to find. One hazard is that
chemical reactions continue in old batteries, especially when subjected to
the weather, and mercury and other elements escape into the soil.
It comes as little surprise that the environmentally conscious Swiss are
among the first to insist that a more ecologically sound method be found for
dealing with this increasingly acute problem. Using a Japanese-developed
method, they have come up with the world's first commercial-scale facility
for recycling old household batteries, with plans to market the process
throughout Europe.
A few weeks ago, this advanced plant, capable of processing almost all types
of used dry batteries, was started up in a small village at the foot of the
Bernese Alps. The plant recovers most of the metals in marketable form and
treats the waste liquids and gases. Among common battery types, only those
with lithium cannot be processed.
The genesis of the plant was a decree passed by the Swiss government in
1986, classifying dry batteries as special waste for which there were no
suitable disposal sites in Switzerland. Another decree obliged retailers,
starting in 1989, to take back used batteries.
Immediately Migros, the aggressive and environmentally-aware Swiss
co-operative retail group, asked a group of young engineers at the
Eidgenossische Technische Hochschule (federal technology college) in Zurich
to search for an ecologically sound disposal and recycling process.
Roger Burri, one of the engineers, saw a couple of papers in research
journals outlining the efforts of Sumitomo Heavy Industries (SHI) to develop
a furnace that would separate the metals in used batteries. A visit to Japan
was arranged in 1988, and the group quickly decided that the Sumitomo
process, then on display in the form of a 500-tonne-per-year pilot plant,
was the route to take.
Its basis is an induction furnace that operates rather like an iron-making
blast furnace - at very high temperature and continuously.
First, however, the batteries pass through a shaft furnace where the organic
components are pyrolised (decomposed by heat) and most of the mercury
evaporates. The waste gases are then burnt completely in an incinerator at
1,000-1,200 deg C. Solid particles of zinc oxide, iron oxide and carbon are
washed out of the hot gas, which is then cooled and the mercury condensed.
Mercury is also distilled out of the wash water.
Residue from the burnt batteries then drops into the induction furnace where
the oxide compounds of zinc, iron and manganese are melted at temperatures
between 1,450-1,500 deg C and reduced to their metallic forms.
Carbon is added to that already present in some battery electrodes to act as
the reduction agent. Metallic vapour is drawn off to a zinc condenser, and
the remaining metals, mainly ferro-manganese, and an inert glass-like slag
are tapped continuously.
In 1989, a joint stock company, Batrec, was formed to build and operate a
plant in Switzerland based on this process, and employing SHI as the
supplier. The plant would be a straight scale-up from the pilot plant, with
the capacity to process 2,000 tonnes of used batteries per year, about half
of Switzerland's total consumption.
The project received wide support across Switzerland. Migros is the main
private sector shareholder, but other retailers and wholesalers are also
involved. From the public sector, the federal government, eight cantonal
governments, the city of Zurich and the principality of Liechtenstein have
all subscribed for shares, and some have also provided grants.
The federal government provided the site for the plant, on some vacant land
in a run-down munitions manufacturing complex near the lakeside town of
Thun. In a country notorious for its lengthy planning permission process,
Bern managed to push through approval for the plant in only six months.
The final elements in the equation were the establishment of the supply and
economic bases for the plant. The Swiss government imposed an export ban on
used batteries from the beginning of 1991, and a national battery collection
organisation was set up later in the year. At the moment, the return rate is
about 54 per cent, according to Migros.
Starting in October 1991, all manufacturers and importers of batteries in
Switzerland agreed to add 10 per cent to their retail prices to cover the
costs of processing and recycling. The funds thus collected are turned over
to Batrec at the rate of SFr 4,000 (Pounds 1,800) per tonne of used
batteries consumed, the figure the company needs to make what it considers a
satisfactory return.
The Batrec process is not cheap. The cost of the total project was SFr35m,
of which the plant accounted for SFr25m. Energy consumption is about 3,500
kilowatt hours per tonne. 'We know it is too expensive, but we want to
investigate the whole process and then work on making an economical
production system,' says Atsushi Naitoh, executive vice-president of SHI.
Burri, now president of Batrec, believes that the ideal size, in terms of
economics and the efficiency of the process, would be about 10,000 tonnes a
year. At the moment, he adds, 'we have a toy here'.
He also points out that a large portion of the construction cost was
attributable to Switzerland's very severe standards on emission controls.
Complete water and air treatment equipment has been installed. Even dioxins,
a sensitive subject in Switzerland since the 1986 leakage of chemicals into
the Rhine, are destroyed.
Burri says the main problems encountered in operation so far have to do with
balancing the charge in the furnace. For example, if the pressure in the
shaft furnace is lower than in the melting furnace, the gases from the
melting furnace flow up to the bottom of the shaft furnace. The zinc vapour
in these gases can condense and plug the outlet of the melting furnace.
Conversely, if the pressure in the shaft furnace is higher, the gases flow
from it through the melting furnace into the zinc condenser and oxidise the
liquid zinc, creating worthless zinc dross.
Batrec believes it has solved the problem by installing a plug valve which
enables it to decouple the gas streams of the two furnaces during the
unstable start-up phase. Another problem is the need to stop the process
frequently to reline the furnace. So far, the longest campaign has been four
weeks, and relining takes about a week. Burri believes the average campaign
can be raised to two months, an improvement that would raise the capacity of
the plant significantly.
As a result of Batrec's experience, SHI has agreed to form a partnership to
market the process in Europe. 'At first we saw Batrec as just our first
client, but we have changed our view. They are very good partners to promote
this technology. We are quite confident of the hardware, but we do not have
the operational knowhow,' Naitoh says.
'Through Batrec we have had concrete inquiries from potential customers, but
we are asking them to wait. We want to be 100 per cent sure of the gas
balance in the furnace.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / People: Telegraphed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dan Colson, the London-based Canadian lawyer and long-term associate of
Conrad Black, publisher of the Daily Telegraph, is to join The Telegraph
group as an executive director from the beginning of December.
He will be director with responsibility for acquisitions and external
relations, but will also be vice-chairman of the group - which publishes the
Daily and Sunday Telegraph and has stakes in a number of other newspaper
groups around the world.
Colson, 45, a senior partner of lawyers Stikeman Elliott, has been a
non-executive director of The Telegraph since 1986 and is also a director of
Hollinger, its Canadian parent. He is chairman of the executive committee of
The Telegraph's associated company in Australia, John Fairfax, publishers of
the Sydney Morning Herald and the Melbourne Age.
Sir Frank Rogers remains deputy chairman of The Telegraph. But one member of
the star-studded non-executive board, financier Sir James Goldsmith, has
decided to retire. Sir James says he is so seldom in the UK that he cannot
be present at the periodic board meetings and so cannot meaningfully
contribute to the affairs of the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Management: Frontal attack mounted on macho military style /
Case study - Rank Xerox (UK)
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The company has suffered from what the Opportunity 2000 team describes as a
military management style, resulting in an overwhelmingly macho culture -
'white, male, young and boisterous'.
The UK sales, marketing and support subsidiary of the international office
equipment group employs nearly 5,000 people, 30 per cent of whom are women.
Its aim is to increase the number of women managers to 25 per cent by 1995
from the current 15 per cent.
Each year the board announces its highest business priorities - known within
the company as the 'vital few' and equal opportunities have been accorded
this status.
An intensive programme of workshops has involved all employees, starting
with the managers. Viki Ford, Opportunity 2000 manager at Rank Xerox, says
that employee involvement has been fundamental to the long-term programme.
Discussions identified stereotyped ideas of 'men's jobs' and 'women's jobs'
as a barrier to promotion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Management: Big operation to improve the lot of women
workers / Case study - Health Service
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The NHS has come under fire from, among others, the Equal Opportunities
Commission, for being an organisation that is overwhelmingly staffed by
women but run by men.
Piecemeal measures had produced few results. Nearly 80 per cent of the NHS's
1m workers are female, making it the largest employer of women in Europe. By
the end of 1994 the aim is to increase the number of women in general
management posts to 30 per cent, from 18 per cent in 1991.
The intention is to push up the proportion of women who are members of
health authorities and trusts from 29 per cent in 1991 to 35 per cent by
1994; it is also hoped to increase the percentage of female consultants by
10 per cent each year.
A national register of women in senior management posts is being set up and
a career development manager will be responsible for providing details of
suitable female candidates for top managerial vacancies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Management: Bridging the huge east-west divide
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Managers in the formerly communist countries of eastern Europe accuse
westerners imported to teach them how to be capitalists of being aggressive
and insensitive to local culture.
This emerges from a study of 300 local and western managers working in
Hungary, Poland and Czechoslovakia, published today by GKR/Neumann, the
executive search company.
The study concludes that while the joint ventures have created opportunities
for western and eastern managers to work together, 'culture gaps' between
executives are delaying the transfer of expertise. While local managers have
a theoretical grasp of, for example, pricing policy, practical
implementation is slow and shot with temporary setbacks.
The two groups blame each other for the stumbling progress. Local managers
want greater freedom to operate the new market mechanisms. Westerners say
their eastern colleagues are averse to risk, responsibility and
decision-making.
Local managers admire the professionalism, qualifications and confidence of
their western colleagues. One said: 'My western colleagues do not know the
meaning of the word impossible.'
However, in Hungary, almost 50 per cent objected to western managers and in
Czechoslovakia and Poland, about 75 per cent said westerners were at best
'accepted rather than rejected'.
Western managers who initially dismissed cultural differences as part of a
discredited communist past are now incorporating some into business
strategy. Local managers are less likely to emphasise local limitations.
Westerners have some advice for those expecting transfers to eastern Europe:
'In Hungary it is very difficult to keep anything secret. In Poland it is
important to become an insider quickly while in Czechoslovakia managers must
give and ask for feedback.'
Contact: Trevor Morris, The Quentin Bell Organisation, 22 Endell Street,
Covent Garden, London WC2H 9AD.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Management: Great expectations / Assessing what Opportunity
2000's first year has achieved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Cynicism about Opportunity 2000, the business-led initiative launched a year
ago to improve the position of women at work in the UK, is bound to be
widespread among the quarter of the workforce now covered by the campaign.
The hype surrounding the launch, fronted by John Major, the prime minister,
inevitably raised expectations which will have been particularly hard to
meet during the past year of recession.
Short of sacking men wholesale and giving their jobs to women, sluggish
staff turnover rates will have made impossible any real attack on imbalances
between men and women in, for example, management grades. Even in the best
of times, policies need time to work through - which is why those companies
brave enough to have announced numerical targets for the appointment and
promotion of women are generally setting their sights at least five years
ahead.
However, research* published yesterday to coincide with the first
anniversary of the programme also suggests that Opportunity 2000 should not
be dismissed as a publicity stunt which is having no practical effect on the
day-to-day lives of women at work.
A team drawn from Business in the Community, the business-led umbrella
organisation responsible for Opportunity 2000, and Ashridge management
college, conducted interviews during the summer with chief executives, board
members and line managers from the original 60 or so companies which joined
the campaign. The researchers also collected data on the practical steps now
being taken by many companies to improve their attractiveness as employers
of women. These include new policies and practices on:
Recruitment. For example, Kingfisher now instructs recruitment consultants
to include female candidates on shortlists wherever possible. The
Co-operative Bank has trained managers in 'competency-based' recruitment
interviewing, designed to eliminate bias against female candidates.
Assessment and appraisal. It has often been claimed that traditional
appraisal systems may discriminate against women. Legal &amp; General has tried
to be more systematic and is developing 'gender-neutral' techniques. Coopers
&amp; Lybrand Deloitte's appraisals cover regular core skills but also include
sensitivity to the needs of clients and the ability to build relationships.
Working arrangements. Almost all participating organisations offer flexible
working arrangements to at least some staff. These include job sharing,
working from home, part-time working and temporary contracts. The Bank of
England is conducting an audit of all jobs to identify where flexibility is
possible.
Pay and conditions. Part-time workers, overwhelmingly female, have
historically found themselves in receipt of less than pro rata pay and
subject to conditions inferior to those of their full-time colleagues. More
than three-quarters of Opportunity 2000 employers now provide common terms
and conditions for all their staff; many have also taken steps to review
their pay and check that equal reward is offered for work of equal value.
Some flexibility in pensions is also available in nearly half of the
companies.
Family care. Most organisations are offering maternity arrangements well
beyond the statutory minimum for all staff and half have career-break
schemes for childcare. 'Keep in touch' schemes and re-entry programmes are
increasingly on offer for women taking and returning from maternity leave;
some companies are offering financial incentives to women to return after
having children, or are undertaking to continue paying benefits during the
period of leave.
Help with childcare. Workplace nurseries, vouchers and holiday play schemes
are now run by a number of participating companies, including Glaxo, WH
Smith, Allied Dunbar and Boots the Chemist.
Education and training. It is often claimed that women restrict their own
promotion prospects by choosing to enter the 'wrong' disciplines - for
example, pursuing careers in support functions like personnel, rather than
'core' activities, such as manufacturing. Some companies are now attempting
to overcome these barriers. Lucas Industries, for example, is launching a
new programme called 'engineering for non-engineers', which, it is planned,
will help those in non-functional areas to cross the divide.
Single-sex training has been found to be particularly effective in building
confidence and enabling women to develop their own style. Over the past year
IBM has doubled the number of women it has put through training courses.
Commitment to Opportunity 2000 among chief executives and board members has
clearly driven many of these practical improvements. However, there are
worrying signs that messages have often failed to filter down the line:
following the first year's review, strengthening communications and
increasing line-manager involvement have been identified as the areas most
in need of attention.
Line managers interviewed were often not well enough informed about
Opportunity 2000 to make a contribution. Less than half had specific targets
for their departments and some appeared to be unaware that their
organisations' declared equality goals had direct implications for them.
A recent survey by the Institute of Management appeared to show that women
themselves felt the continued existence of the 'old boys' network' was a far
greater obstacle to their advancement at work than, for example, a lack of
childcare or insufficient opportunities for flexible working.
If prejudice is to be eliminated at all levels of an organisation, and
cynicism about Opportunity 2000 is to be swept away, line managers will need
to have been drawn more closely into the initiative by the next annual
review.
*Opportunity 2000, review of the first year. From Opportunity 2000 campaign
office, Business in the Community, 5 Cleveland Place, London SW1Y 6JJ.
Pounds 12.50
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
          HOW CAMPAIGN COMPANIES ARE CHANGING POLICIES TO
                          SUIT WOMEN WORKERS
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                Available now          Available to
WORK ARRANGEMENTS          to all staff (percent)  some staff (percent)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Flexible hours                       36                     56
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Consider requests to
increase flexibility                 55                     28
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Part-time work                       40                     53
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
School-term contracts                18                     41
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Homeworking                          22                     51
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Job sharing                          31                     41
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
PAY AND CONDITIONS
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Common terms and
conditions for all staff            78                       2
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Checks on equal pay
for work of equal value             47                       8
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Flexible pensions                   47                      14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                Available now          Available to
TRAINING &amp; EDUCATION       to all staff (percent)  some staff (percent)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Training for non-
traditional work                    14                      31
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Mentoring                           14                      57
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Women only training                 16                      39
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Dealing with sexual
harassment                          12                      28
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEAVE
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Maternity arrangements
beyond statutory minimum            62                      20
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Paternity leave                     53                      20
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Parental leave                      39                       8
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Career breaks                       45                      26
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Leave for care of
elderly/disabled                    45                      14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                Available now          Available to
HELP WITH FAMILY CARE      to all staff (percent)  some staff (percent)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Work-place nursery                   6                      29
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Places at community
nursery                              6                      22
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Childcare vouchers/
allowances                           4                       8
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
After school care                    2                      14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
ENCOURAGEMENT TO RETURN TO WORK
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
In-touch schemes while
on career break                     47                      22
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Training while
on career break                     31                      22
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Re-entry training
programmes                          20                      14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Continuation of benefits
during career break                 16                      12
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Financial incentives to
return to work                       7                      19
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Recruitment: The cost of a touch of human decency - Rare
headhunter who still treats rejects as though they're worth more than ten a
penny
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT price a bit of human decency? 'Well, it's a mite controversial,'
replied headhunter Terry Ward. 'I put it at about Pounds 1.50 a head, but my
wife reckons Pounds 2 - though she includes secretaries' time, which doesn't
strike me as justified. They'd be here anyway, you see, even if we weren't
doing it . . . .'
All of which rather took the Jobs column aback. My last wish in asking the
question was to stir up marital disagreements. What prompted it was just
journalistic impulse in line with the old saw which, before the fuss over
pit bull terriers at least, stated that while dog bites man is commonplace,
man bites dog is news.
One thing rarely missing from the postbag is complaints from job-seekers
about recruiters, and vice versa. They have been biting one another so
regularly for so long that, with the idealism of mere middle-age in 1978, I
proposed a peace treaty which Britain's Institute of Personnel Management
developed into its professional recruitment code.
Alas it has not proved very effective, especially these past two years.
Indeed, to judge by the current gnashing of teeth on both sides of the
employment market, it seems clear that whether or not the first casualty of
war is truth, considerate treatment is an early one of recession.
Hence this particular hack's delighted surprise when a reader wrote in
praising a headhunter to whom he'd applied for a job, even though he'd been
rejected without nearing the interview stage.
That in itself is nothing new to the reader concerned, since he has vainly
applied for a couple of hundred others over 18 months or so. Mostly, he had
no response at all. The sole exceptions, he says, were brief acknowledgments
from employers recruiting directly, and from a few 'quality agencies such as
NB Selection, MSL and Selector'.
But on this latest occasion, the reader adds, back came a reply which
despite being a rejection, shows 'human understanding of applicants' needs'.
And having read the copy he sent along, I can see why he was so pleased.
Although confessing itself 'a standard letter', it focuses its 400-plus
words on the specific job for which he had applied. 'The response included
several videos, many customised and beautifully presented applications, and
even one compact disc.' it says. 'We received nearly 400 applications and my
interview programme includes 39 people.'
Then after indicating why the reader was not one of them, the headhunter
adds: 'However, I may well have thrown out the odd baby with the bath water
 -probably you] - but I hope you will appreciate my position.'
What particularly pleased me was that the signature below was that of Terry
Ward, whom I've known for years. He began his recruitment career with Ford,
and since 1987 has been running the Ward Executive consultancy in
Richmond-upon-Thames, in conjunction with his wife Claire.
So I telephoned him and asked how much it cost to respond to rejected
applicants with such care when as many as 400 of them come in for a single
post.
His reply was that 400 was below average these days. On three occasions
fairly recently he has had over twice as many - which in each case works out
at a response cost of Pounds 1,200-plus at his estimate and more than Pounds
1,600 at Mrs Ward's higher figure.
'It's irritating at times because a lot of applicants are totally
unsuitable,' he said, 'and at first we just sent printed cards. But when
they started coming back with rude words on them, we realised they were
making some people feel insulted, and began doing the job properly. We feel
it's definitely worth while.'
Why?
'Well, it's partly commercial. In this business it's wise to view every
candidate as a potential client. But that's not the main reason. After all,
even at Pounds 2 a head, it's a small price to pay for treating someone
decently.'
NOW to the table alongside, which gives indicators of prevailing pay levels
in City of London banks, as revealed by Day Associates' latest survey.
Compiled at the beginning of this month, it is based on data supplied by 111
assorted banks and covers 230 jobs from general manager to messenger. But
anyone wanting the full report will need to contact Joe Clark at Suite 2.31,
75 Whitechapel Rd, London E1 1DU; tel 071-Pounds 375 1397, fax 071-375 1723.
The VAT-inclusive price is Pounds 141 to concerns which take part in the
exercise, and Pounds 200 to others.
My extracts - which like all such survey figures provide at best a rough
guide to the real state of pay - are confined to 16 managerial posts. First
we have basic salaries. The lower quartile refers to the person a quarter
way up from the foot of a ranking of all in the same type of job, the median
to the person mid-way, and the upper quartile to the one a quarter way down
from the top.
Next comes the average salary and the percentage of it typically received as
a bonus. The last two columns show the percentage of the job-holders with a
company car, and its average price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: MPs force leasehold concessions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN ALLIANCE of Tory and opposition MPs has won concessions from ministers
dealing with the plans for leasehold reform. They have been forced into a
review of the low-rent test which is one of the criteria for whether
leaseholders qualify for the right to buy the freehold of the property.
The move came in the detailed committee discussion of the housing and urban
regeneration bill yesterday as four Tory backbenchers spoke out against the
low-rent rule. Mr Tony Baldry, the junior housing minister, promised that
the government would look again at the need for it.
The MPs argued that the rule was 'artificial and unnecessary'. It dealt with
a non-existent problem because the vast majority of long leaseholds were at
a low rent.
They said that keeping any low-rent test, even if the level of the
qualifying rent were changed, would merely make work for lawyers. In
response to moves led by Mr Dudley Fishburn, Tory MP for Kensington,
ministers also agreed to review the draft rule that tenants would not
qualify if more than 10 per cent of the property was in non-residential use,
for example, in the case of a block of flats above a shop.
The impression from the Department of the Environment is that the government
is more prepared to see the low-rent rule go than it is to change the 10 per
cent limit.
Ministers say that the purpose of the low-rent rule is to distinguish
between long leases where the tenant pays a premium at the beginning and
then pays a low ground rent, and the different sort of interest held by a
tenant who is on a long lease but paying a market rent. Only properties with
a low rent qualify under current plans.
However, they accept there is some evidence that the rule has been used to
try to thwart the intentions of the bill, and may well concede the point.
On the 10 per cent limit on commercial use, ministers point out that if the
commercial element is much more than that, the costs to tenants in the
property of buying it might well be so high that they would be reluctant to
proceed.
As the bill gives the leaseholders in properties that do not qualify an
alternative and individual right to extend their leases for a 90-year term
at a nominal rent, the government argues that the sort of change envisaged
might mean that tenants are given a right they are unlikely to exercise,
while being deprived of one that might be of more benefit.
Labour thus believes that Mr Fishburn has lost his chance to ensure the
change by accepting the commitment to a review rather than by voting with
the opposition.
On the other side of the argument, the government accepted a change proposed
by Mr Peter Ainsworth, Tory MP for Surrey East, to protect landlords from
speculators who acquire several leases.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Major denies Iraq exports deception
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN Major sought yesterday to calm the storm over the export of
defence-related goods to Iraq by denying categorically that ministers had
misled the Commons.
As officials defended the government's decision to re-interpret and then to
relax the embargo on exports to Iraq after the Iran/Iraq war in 1988, Mr
Major said: 'The suggestion that ministers misled the House is a serious
charge, a scurrilous charge and it has no basis whatsoever in fact.'
His remarks came after Mr John Smith, Labour leader, seized on Downing
Street's confirmation that, after the 1988 Iran/Iraq war ceasefire,
ministers had re-interpreted guidelines on exports to Iraq, asking why
parliament had not been told.
The change in interpretation was made clear by the release of previously
classified Whitehall documents to the court during the unsuccessful Matrix
Churchill prosecution.
These included an April 1989 letter signed by the private secretary of Mr
William Waldegrave, then foreign office minister, stating: 'We agreed that
we should continue to interpret the guidelines more flexibly in respect of
Iraq, as we have done in practice since the end of last year, but that we
should revert to a stricter interpretation for Iran.' The letter was
addressed to Mr Alan Clark, then trade minister.
Mr Major said the terms of the inquiry under Lord Justice Scott were 'so
wide-ranging that they cover so many aspects, that there will be nothing
that will not be fully examined'. He accused Mr Smith of being 'extremely
silly' for asking whether the inquiry would decide if MPs had been misled.
Separately, Mr John Heppell, Labour MP for Nottingham East, asked why a
trade mission to Iraq by the Nottinghamshire Chamber of Commerce had been
allowed to go ahead in June 1990.
The guidelines on exports of lethal goods to Iraq were set out in 1984 by
Sir Geoffrey (now Lord) Howe, then foreign secretary. After 1988 they were
interpreted 'in the light of developments in the peace negotiations with
Iran' - a form of words used by Mrs Margaret (now Lady) Thatcher to MPs in
April 1989.
But Downing Street officials insisted there was a distinction between
changing the guidelines and re-interpreting them.
Downing Street also confirmed that a cabinet committee chaired by Mr Douglas
Hurd, foreign secretary, was preparing in July 1990 to relax the arms trade
restrictions. Its decision was not implemented because of the invasion of
Kuwait on August 2 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: PPS posts are given to 'loyalists'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE Conservative back-benchers from the 1992 intake yesterday became
parliamentary private secretaries - the unpaid 'eyes and ears' in the
Commons for ministers.
Downing Street described those promoted as 'loyalists' in an unspoken
reminder that Euro-sceptics and other rebels must mend their ways if they
seriously seek preferment.
The five were Mr Stephen Milligan (Eastleigh), Mr George Kynoch (Kincardine
and Deeside), Mr Hartley Booth (Finchley), Mr Jonathan Evans (Brecon) and Mr
Michael Bates (Langbaurgh).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Curb on private pay ruled out
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government has no intention of imposing an incomes policy on the private
sector, Mr Michael Portillo, the chief secretary to the Treasury, said
yesterday.
However, he said in evidence to the Commons Treasury and Civil Service
committee that the government had a right to point out the danger of high
pay settlements in the environment caused by sterling's devaluation since
Black Wednesday in September.
He said British industry had granted its employees high real wage increases
instead of winning increased orders.
Mr Portillo provided an explanation for the sharp Pounds 1.16bn fall in
payments to the European Community envisaged in the government's spending
plans for 1993-94.
The cut from earlier planned levels reflected:
A reduced forecast for EC spending on agriculture.
Expectations of substantially higher receipts from the farm guarantee fund
following reform of the EC's common agricultural policy. A lower UK share of
gross contributions to the Community reflecting a lower UK share of EC gross
domestic product.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Abolition of wages councils
attacked
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE decision to abolish wages councils covering some 2.5m low-paid workers
showed the Tories' 'moral degradation', Mr Frank Dobson, the shadow
employment secretary, said yesterday.
Mrs Gillian Shephard, employment secretary, insisted they were an arbitrary
and outdated structure and an obstacle to creating new jobs.
But the move came under fire from a former Tory employment minister as Mr
Peter Bottomley warned that he would vote against abolition at a later stage
of debate on the employment bill. Given the recessionary pressures for rates
of pay for such workers to be reduced even more, it was wrong to remove
wages councils' protection, he said.
Labour signalled that this 'nastiest' element of the bill will attract
fiercest opposition, and accused ministers of pandering to their sponsors in
business. The policy would enable bad employers to undercut competitors at
the expense of employees and of taxpayers, who would have to fund extra
social security benefits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Maverick Clark is used to speaking
his mind
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS and DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ALAN Clark, the former defence and trade minister who last night was at
the centre of the arms-to-Iraq controversy, is used to being cast as a
maverick.
In government he was not afraid to speak his mind - sometimes to the alarm
of senior ministers.
Mr Clark, 64, is a rich, unpredictable and sardonic man who lives in a
castle. When asked for his comment on the Crown Prosecution Service's
decision to ask for an inquiry into his Matrix Churchill trail evidence, he
replied in typical brashness: 'Haven't got any.'
The government is aware that, should more be uncovered in the arms-to-Iraq
affair, it could become harder to distance the role of Mr Clark from
ministers still in office.
He was a trade and industry minister from 1986 to 1989, during the ceasefire
in the Iraq/Iran war.
Although it is now clear from documents in the Matrix Churchill trial that
the government was re-interpreting the guidelines on exports to both
countries, Mr Clark told parliament in April 1989 that there were 'no plans
to change the current restrictions on the export of arms to Iraq which
impose an embargo on the export of lethal equipment.'
He added: 'The guidelines are kept under review in the light of developments
in the situation there.'
Mr Clark dropped a bombshell in court earlier this month by admitting he
advised Matrix Churchill and other British toolmakers to draw up
specifications emphasising peaceful rather than military applications.
The court heard this evidence was 'inconsistent' with his earlier statements
to Customs and Excise investigators. It led to an admission by Customs that
it could no longer sustain a case against three former directors of the
Coventry machine-tool maker.
Discussing his advice to the machine tool-makers in court, Mr Clark said it
involved 'our old friend economical.'
'Economical with the truth?', Mr Geoffrey Robertson, QC for one of the
directors responded. 'With the actualite',' Mr Clark replied. He said it was
not misleading or dishonest to have made such a suggestion and did not
amount to a tip-off. It was a case of 'Whitehall cosmetics' to keep the
records ambiguous.
He denied he showed companies how best to circumvent government guidelines
on arms exports to Iraq, but said he thought the government's guidelines
were 'tiresome and intrusive'. He added it was in Britain's best interests
for the Iran-Iraq war to continue as long as possible.
It was not the only occasion in which he has been disarmingly frank. Last
year, in the New Statesman magazine, he nominated 'Love in the time of
Cholera' as his favourite book of the year because: 'For anyone who has been
in love. . . this is the book. . . It illustrates the utter dominance of the
female.'
In his last comments in the Commons before retiring from politics at the
general election, Mr Clark admitted to MPs that 'I have had idiosyncratic,
some would say tendentious, moments of behaviour which have always been
treated with great tolerance by the House'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Doubts grow on gas power costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOUBTS over the economics of gas-fired power stations intensified yesterday
as Mr Ed Wallis, the chief executive of electricity generator PowerGen, told
MPs it was unlikely that some of those being built in the UK would provide
power cheaper than coal.
Mr Wallis's comments to a Commons select committee inquiry into energy
policy come ahead of a report next month by the electricity industry
regulator on the viability of the gas stations. The construction of these is
partly behind a projected slump in the demand for coal.
If the regulator were to agree with PowerGen and others including its rival
generator National Power, there would be widespread implications for the
regional electricity companies that are in ventures to build gas stations
and for the government's review of energy policy.
However, the problems of British Coal finding a growing market for its
products were underlined when Mr Wallis said that even if BC could compete
in world markets his company would expect to reduce its share of the
company's fuel input to 60 per cent.
That compares with a current total of 75 per cent. In several years' time it
would equate to about 18m tonnes compared with a total in the current
financial year of 24m. The reduction would be a result of PowerGen's wish to
have a more diversified fuel portfolio.
On the economics of combined cycle gas turbine power stations, Mr Wallis
said the Killingholme power station in Humberside already operated by his
company would be able to supply electricity at 2.5p per unit.
This compares with the 2.8p possible from a coal-powered station in 1992-3,
assuming prices in contracts tentatively agreed with British Coal but still
to be ratified.
The select committee also heard strong criticism of the regulator, Professor
Stephen Littlechild, from Mr Peter Rost, chairman of the Major Energy Users'
Association. The Institute for Public Policy Research, a left-of-centre
think tank, wants a government group to be established with responsible for
energy policy.
It is also urging the government to adopt a national electricity generation
capacity plan to make the best of fuel resources.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: 'Loyalist' PPSs chosen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE Conservative back-benchers from the 1992 intake yesterday took their
first steps towards government by becoming parliamentary private secretaries
 -the unpaid 'eyes and ears' in the Commons for ministers.
Downing Street described those promoted as 'loyalists' in an unspoken
reminder that Euro-sceptics and other rebels must mend their ways if they
seriously seek preferment.
The appointments were:
Mr Stephen Milligan (Eastleigh), PPS to defence minister, Mr Jonathan
Aitken;
Mr George Kynoch (Kincardine and Deeside), for Mr Alastair Goodlad, junior
foreign office minister;
Mr Hartley Booth (Finchley), for Mr Douglas Hogg, foreign office minister;
Mr Jonathan Evans (Brecon), for Mr Michael Mates, Northern Ireland minister;
Mr Michael Bates (Langbaurgh), for Mr Nicholas Scott, social security
minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Wages councils battle begins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government's decision to abolish wages councils covering some 2.5m
low-paid workers showed the Tories' 'moral degradation', Mr Frank Dobson,
the shadow employment secretary, said yesterday as the bitter parliamentary
battle over the councils' future began.
But Mrs Gillian Shephard, employment secretary, insisted they were an
arbitrary and outdated structure and an obstacle to creating new jobs.
Opening the debate on the employment bill, which includes provisions to
abolish the remaining wages councils covering industries such as retail and
catering, Mrs Shephard came under opposition fire when she went on the
political offensive, highlighting the abolition of 10 wages councils by the
last Labour government in the 1970s.
This removed 600,000 employees from wages councils. 'If the opposition are
going to argue that the wages councils are a sort of safety net, they will
have to acknowledge they made some pretty big holes in it when they were
last in power,' she said.
The thrust of her argument was that the conditions that had applied when the
wages councils were created in 1909 were no longer present, since most of
the employees they covered lived in households with two or more incomes, and
there was much greater social security provision.
But Labour signalled that this 'nastiest' element of the bill will attract
fiercest opposition, and accused the Conservatives of pandering to their
sponsors in business. The policy would enable the worst employers to
undercut competitors at the expense of employees and of the taxpayer, who
would have to fund extra social security benefits.
As for the bill's new rights for trade union members, Mr Dobson warned that
they failed even on the government's own terms, since they would add to
burdens on employers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Portillo rules out private pay curb
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government has no intention of imposing an incomes policy on the private
sector, Mr Michael Portillo, the chief secretary to the Treasury, said
yesterday.
However, in evidence to the Commons Treasury and Civil Service committee, he
said the government had a right to point out the danger of high pay
settlements in the environment caused by sterling's devaluation since the
pound left the European exchange rate mechanism on September 16.
Answering questions from Mr Nicholas Budgen, (Cons, Wolverhampton South
West), Mr Portillo said past British devaluations had not produced the
economic benefits people thought they might produce.
He said British industry had granted its employees high real wage increases
instead of winning increased orders.
Speaking on the day after Mr John Major's Guildhall speech in which the
prime minister urged business leaders to control executive pay, Mr Portillo
said the government would not restrain private industry in its pay policies
and had no intention of imposing its will on the private sector.
Nevertheless, it could make statements of a 'broader sort' about pay, he
said.
Mr Portillo made clear that the government's position on public sector pay
was quite different.
One reason for its plan to limit pay settlements in the public sector to a
maximum of 1.5 per cent was to resist cost pressures and so offer better
services to business and the general public.
In wide-ranging testimony, Mr Portillo provided an explanation for the sharp
Pounds 1.16bn fall in payments to the European Community envisaged in the
government's spending plans for 1993-94.
The cut from earlier planned levels reflected:
A reduced forecast for EC spending on agriculture.
Expectations of substantially higher receipts from the farm guarantee fund
following reform of the EC's common agricultural policy. A lower UK share of
gross contributions to the Community reflecting a lower UK share of EC gross
domestic product.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Money market takes a long view
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEALERS in the sterling money-market have started to change their views on
the direction which UK base rates are taking. Some suggested yesterday that
their views might have significant implications for banks' balance sheets.
When the Bank of England signalled cuts on September 22 and October 16, the
market's view was that there was more monetary easing to come before the end
of the year. One-month and three-month money tended to be below base rates,
sometimes by as much as a full percentage point.
Since Friday's cut, however, money-market rates have taken a different
direction. The offered rates for one-month and three-month money rose
yesterday to around 7 5/16 per cent, above the base-rate figure of 7 per
cent. Dealers are taking the view that Friday's base-rate cut may have been
the last this year.
The clearing banks were adamant yesterday that the higher cost of borrowing
money in the wholesale market had no impact on the rates at which they lend
to private customers and businesses.
The head of asset management at one of the big four clearing banks said the
higher cost of borrowing sterling could be met through operations in the
wholesale market. He said that, at worst, the higher costs might affect a
few building societies which relied heavily on the wholesale sector.
Recent movements in wholesale money-market rates may, however, affect the
banks in other ways:
The fall in money-market rates reduces the returns to banks from holding
current-account deposits. Banks earn money by re-depositing cash in these
accounts in the wholesale market. Clearing-bank officials said, however,
that any potential losses will have been offset by the build-up of
fixed-interest portfolios or the purchase of gilts.
Although the market still assumes that base rates will be cut to around 6
per cent within a year, cash rates beyond that are indicating a sharp rise
in interest rates. The rate for five-year money yesterday was 7.64 per cent,
while 10-year rates were at 8.57 per cent. The rising yield curve may affect
the rates at which banks offer fixed-rate mortgages.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / More mortgage lenders fall into line over cuts in rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERAL banks and building societies yesterday announced reductions in their
standard variable mortgage interest rate in response to last week's 1
percentage point cut in base rates to 7 per cent.
Lloyds Bank said it would reduce its rate to 8.6 per cent from 9.3 per cent
for all borrowers from December 21. National Westminster cut rates from 9.25
per cent to 8.55 per cent for new borrowers and from January 1 for existing
customers.
Leeds Permanent Building Society is reducing its rates to 8.55 per cent from
9.29 per cent from today for new customers and from December 21 for existing
borrowers.
Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester is cutting its mortgage rate to 8.5 per cent
immediately for new borrowers and from December 31 for its existing
customers.
Rates at First Direct bank are reduced to 8.49 per cent from 9.25 per cent
for new borrowers and from December 21 for existing borrowers on loans which
are less than Pounds 50,000.
Chelsea building society cut rates to 8.5 per cent from 9.25 per cent for
new borrowers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Pounding is even harder overseas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BORROWING rates in other EC states are considerably higher than those in the
UK.
France has among the highest real rates in Europe, with annual inflation at
2.4 per cent, against a commercial bank base rate of 9.65 per cent. That
compares with UK real base rates of 3.2 per cent, with underlying inflation
at 3.8 per cent and actual base rates at 7 per cent.
The overdraft rate for private borrowers in France is 17 per cent on
average. Business customers pay around 16 per cent for loans of less than
two years, falling to 11.9 per cent for loans to be repaid over a longer
period. The rate paid on long-term government bonds is 8.6 per cent while
the Bank of France's intervention rate, at which it does most of its
lending, is 9.1 per cent.
In Germany, where inflation is 3.7 per cent, the rate charged on overdrafts
and secured loans is between 14 per cent and 17 per cent. Very large
companies could expect to borrow at about 12 per cent.
The Bundesbank's benchmark rates are the Lombard rate - at 9.5 per cent -
and the discount rate, at 8.25 per cent. Short-term money market rates were
8.75 per cent yesterday with the average rate on 10-year public sector bonds
at 7.35 per cent.
In Italy, the commercial banks, under strong pressure from industry and the
Bank of Italy, have reduced their prime rate to between 15.5 per cent and
14.5 per cent for leading customers. The Bank of Italy's discount rate
stands at 13 per cent. The rate for ordinary customers oscillates between
22.25 per cent and 21.25 per cent. The difference between banks' savings and
loan rates is 9 percentage points. One-year treasury bills have a rate of
about 13.75 per cent, with annual inflation running at 5 per cent.
Spain's base rate is 10 per cent, with inflation at 5.2 per cent. Overdraft
rates are between 25 per cent and 30 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Credit card holders losing out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT CARD holders have seen a drop of only 4.7 percentage points in the
cost of their borrowing in the past two years, according to figures supplied
by the Credit Card Research Group, compared with a drop of 8 percentage
points in base rates.
Base rates are now 7 per cent, but the average interest rate paid by credit
card holders is 25 per cent APR (annualised percentage rate) and many store
card holders are paying well above this.
The group, members of which include banks and building societies, said the
average credit card rate was 29.7 per cent APR in October 1990 - before base
rates fell that month from 15 per cent to 14 per cent.
Ms Elizabeth Phillips, the group's director says that only 40 per cent to 50
per cent of the cost of running a credit card is related to the issuer's
cost of funds. The other 50 per cent to 60 per cent represents fixed costs
of administering the card and dealing with fraud.
Store card borrowing is even more expensive and has been highlighted by the
Consumers' Association as credit to be avoided.
Customers at Harrods, the exclusive London store owned by House of Fraser,
are paying 34.4 per cent APR - the same rate as in January 1990 - although
the rate will drop to 29.8 per cent APR from December 1.
About a third of the business transacted at House of Fraser stores is
through its storecards. The company said: 'Almost everyone who has a Harrods
store card clears it on a monthly basis. People are well aware of their own
self-interest and use cards for convenience rather than credit.' Customers
who clear their store card each month pay no interest.
The card offered by John Lewis Partnership aims to undercut interest rates
on other store cards. It reduced its rates last month for the first time
since February 1990 to 19.5 per cent APR from 23.8 per cent APR.
Banks, building societies and high street stores are often slow to make
changes in rates. Base rates have changed 14 times since January 1990, but
few institutions have changed their rates more than a couple of times in the
same time.
Credit card issuers say they are struggling to make a profit. Credit card
and charge card fraud has increased steeply.
However, Ms Jean Eaglesham of the Consumers' Association believes the
institutions are squeezing the personal sector. 'They are relying on
customer inertia and will charge as much as they can get away with,' she
said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Lamont pressure wins broad support
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER and ANDREW TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SMALL BUSINESSES gave widespread support yesterday to Mr Norman Lamont's
call for banks to pass on recent interest-rate reductions fully and promptly
to help them survive the recession.
But while businesses said almost unanimously that small companies were
having to wait too long for their interest rate cuts, the chancellor's plea
has also revived wider concerns about the banks' attitude.
For some, it is inevitable that the banks will try to delay the good news
for small companies - their bigger clients have more bargaining power and
can shop around for loans.
For others, what one company yesterday said was the banks' 'unsupportive
attitude to anything involving risk' is far more dangerous than delay in
reducing interest rates.
But not everyone agrees that the banks are playing unfairly. The Forum for
Private Business, which represents more than 20,000 companies, says
accusations that banks have failed to pass on interest-rate cuts are false
and distract attention from the real issue of improving bank services.
Mr Stan Mendham, the founder of the Business Forum, said: 'To cry wolf over
allegations which we know cannot be substantiated would degrade our future
task of ensuring that the banks play their role in ensuring a
small-business-led recovery.'
The Confederation of British Industry commented: 'It is still unclear the
extent to which banks have or have not passed on the benefits of lower
interest rates.'
It is hard to find a good word from industry for the banks. The Specialist
Engineering Contractors' Group, which represents more than 3,800 mechanical
and electrical contractors, will be campaigning on interest rates and other
bank-related issues.
Mr Terry Cann, the group's head of marketing, said: 'On a number of
occasions different members have spoken discouragingly about the level of
support from the banks.' Yesterday Mr Cann took a call from a member
incensed by having to continue to pay more interest than he had expected.
The Federation of Small Businesses, representing more than 60,000 companies,
has written to the chairmen of the four largest clearing banks asking them
to ensure that interest-rate reductions are passed on to its members.
Mr John Harris, federation president, is particularly critical of National
Westminster Bank and of Barclays, which sets a minimum rate for some
overdrafts to small companies.
A letter from National Westminster offering an overdraft facility for Pounds
8,000 to a management training company in October stated: 'Interest will be
charged at a rate equal to the base rate from time to time plus 6 1/2 per
cent per annum subject to a minimum rate of 14.5 per cent per annum.'
National Westminster said last night that it had reduced its minimum lending
rates last week. 'This customer will have reaped the full benefit of last
week's base-rate reduction,' the bank said. A more widespread criticism was
that banks used the reduction in base rates to widen the margin charged on
loans.
'Some of our members, when interest rates previously were reduced by one
percentage point, received letters almost the same day announcing that the
margin charged on their loans was going up by the same amount,' Mr Harris
said.
Mr Stephen Crampton, managing director of London-based 3D Scanners, expects
sales to double every year for its unique 3D digitising service  - turning
solid objects into a computer-aided design model.
But he said the company recently risked failing when its bank refused to
renew a loan at very short notice.
Meanwhile, the bulk of the company's medium-term borrowings are through the
government-insured small business loan guarantee scheme.
'What is clear,' the CBI said, 'is that there is great dissatisfaction at
the way in which banks levy their charges. It is not always apparent how
banks arrive at the additional charges over base rates they make.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Small businesses bitter at treatment by banks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EACH owner of a small business who has gone to a manager at a Barclays Bank
branch seeking a loan for the past decade has been given a Campari  - on
paper rather than in a glass.
The experience was generally pleasant in the heady days of the late 1980s.
But as the recession has deepened, more of them have been left with a bitter
taste.
Campari is the acronym by which Barclays managers are trained to assess the
risk of lending to small business. Depending on their estimate of factors
such as the owner's character (the C in Campari), they set the interest on a
loan at between 2 percentage points and 7 percentage points above base rate.
Unless an owner chooses a fixed-rate loan - about 30 per cent of Barclays'
small business loans are at a fixed rate - this will not be the last Campari
he or she has. The risk that the bank attaches to the loan will be
re-assessed at least each year, and the interest margin may change
accordingly.
Criticism of the way banks lend to small businesses this week has focused on
the widening of the average margin. Barclays and National Westminster have
both raised the average margin from 3.1 percentage points 18 months ago to
3.5 points today - the cumulative effect of thousands of Camparis.
The way banks have practised risk assessment over the past year has provoked
discontent among small businesses on two grounds. One is that assessment by
local bank managers is viewed as opaque and arbitrary. The second is that
more frequent assessments have often led to widening loan margins.
The opacity of how decisions on loan margins are made is a concern of many
small businesses. Mr Stan Mendham, founder of the Forum of Private Business,
says banks tend to regard risk assessment as 'an art form'. He says
businesses would not resent payments so much if they knew how they were set.
In spite of the catchiness of acronymns such as Campari, the risk assessment
policies of banks leave plenty of discretion to local managers. National
Westminster says this has to be so because the average size of loan in its
Pounds 11bn small-business portfolio is just Pounds 15,000.
The bank provides two forms of support. One is training in applying business
tests. The Campari acronym teaches managers to examine the owner's Character
and Ability, the Purpose of the business, the Amount of the loan, the
Repayment ability through cashflow, and the Insurance of loan collateral.
Once he or she has decided on these factors, the final calculation is the
loan Margin - the M in Campari. But Barclays encourages the use of
discretion. 'If you make the process too scientific, you get bogged down,'
said Mr David Lavarack, head of small-business services at Barclays.
Indeed, the weight of the various factors has altered over time. Mr Lavarack
argues that the loan collateral - which often came in the form of property
in the late 1980s - was always considered less important than the character
of the owners and their repayment ability.
But Ms Jane Bradford, head of small-business services at National
Westminster, says the recession has reinforced the importance of cashflow
compared to property collateral. 'We try to price risk fully, and the
recession has brought home that we did not always do it in the 1980s,' she
says.
The second form of reinforcement of managers' judgment is support from
specialists in business-lending in regional offices. National Westminster
asks local managers to call on support from teams of accountants and
specialists in risk assessment at its 21 regional offices.
Discontent about more frequent reassessments and widening of loan margins
results from the recession. Barclays and National Westminster - the two
largest lenders to small businesses with total loans of Pounds 24bn to 1.7m
customers - both deny that widening margins have been created by head office
fiat.
However, it is clear that guidelines have affected both the mixtures for
Camparis and their frequency. Ms Bradford says managers are responding to
the economic climate, and the fact that small-business loans accounted for a
large part of the bank's Pounds 1.4bn UK bad-loan provision last year.
She emphasises that all businesses are given notice of loan margin changes,
and there are few cases of rises in margins of more than 0.5 percentage
points at a time.
But she defends higher pricing. 'How long can we sustain these levels of
loss without seeking an increase in margins?' she asks.
Nonetheless, the banks are being forced to find ways of softening the blows
to small businesses that margin widening represents. Mr Lavarack is
sensitive to the notion that the decision-making is incomprehensible. 'Our
managers are happy to talk over a Campari with anyone who wants,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Government borrowed Pounds 1.78bn last month
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER and PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOVERNMENT borrowing totalled Pounds 1.78bn last month, making it the first
October since 1984 in which there has been no net repayment of government
debt.
The figure reflected high government expenditure and weak tax revenues
resulting from the recession, and was in line with the Treasury's latest
forecast for a public sector borrowing requirement of Pounds 37bn this
financial year.
Last month's total, announced by the Central Statistical Office yesterday,
represented a significant deterioration in public sector finances. There
were net repayments of Pounds 0.6bn in October last year and Pounds 2.4bn in
October 1990.
The cumulative total of government borrowing this year reached Pounds 20.2bn
including privatisation proceeds. That compares with a cumulative total of
only Pounds 8.7bn in the first seven months of the financial year 1991-92.
However, ministers have made clear that the government is experiencing no
problems funding this year's greatly increased PSBR and has no intention of
abandoning its policy of fully funding the deficit. Mr Norman Lamont, the
chancellor, told the Commons Treasury and Civil Service committee this week
that the PSBR had been overfunded this year, largely because of the effects
of supporting sterling in September.
He said the government would act to compensate for this overfunding over the
rest of 1992-93, indicating that it would slow down gilts sales.
Mr Michael Portillo, chief secretary to the Treasury, told the committee
yesterday that the chancellor's intention 'on the whole' was not to make
foreign currency borrowing a feature of the government's funding policy.
Proceeds from privatisation were negligible last month. In the first seven
months of the present financial year they amounted to Pounds 5bn, taking the
cumulative PSBR excluding privatisation proceeds to Pounds 25.2bn. The high
figure came as little surprise to the markets. Many observers had been
expecting a poor figure following the big revision to the Treasury forecast
in last week's Autumn Statement.
Mr Lamont disclosed how badly government finances were hit when he revised
the PSBR forecast for this financial year from Pounds 28.1bn - as forecast
in the Budget - to Pounds 37bn. The Treasury estimates that government
borrowing in 1993-94 will rise to Pounds 44bn, although many City economists
consider that optimistic.
'I think that in the absence of any massive increases in taxation and
drastic cuts in expenditure, the PSBR is going to be a headache for this
government for the rest of this decade,' said Mr Neil MacKinnon, chief
economist at Citibank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / The chancellor's loan rate challenge to banks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Bank of England will take 'another look' at interest rates charged by
high street banks
Norman Lamont, chancellor
The latest base rate cut would remove Pounds 1bn from industry's costs
'provided it is passed on ..to small businesses as well as large'.
John Major, prime minister
'The government should publish the rates charged by banks, and warn them
that they could face an inquiry if these are not cut.'
Gordon Brown, shadow chancellor
'There is great dissatisfaction.  It is not always apparent how banks arrive
at the additional charges over base rates they make.'
CBI, headed by Howard Davies
'We may charge a higher margin over base rate for higher-risk businesses.
But it certainly is not a blanket policy.'
Midland Bank, headed by Brian Pearse
'NatWest has passed on to business customers the full benefits of rate cuts
immediately.'
Lord Alexander, chairman of NatWest Bank
'We need to maintain margins, our capital base and the best rates possible
to savers and investors.'
Jim Birrell, chief executive of the Halifax
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
                     WHAT BUSINESSES HAVE TO PAY
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Taking Lloyds                       New rates for overdrafts
Banks as an example                            MARGIN OVER BASE RATE
                                    Rate A    5.00 percentage points
                                    Rate B    4.04 percentage points
                                    Rate C    3.08 percentage points
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
                         FROM
                      JAN 1 1993                NOW
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
List of                                       Pounds 1
standing                                       item
orders and                                    listed
direct debits          Pounds 5             min, Pounds 5
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Banker's
reference            Pounds 7 + VAT          Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Use of night        Pounds 40 per annum      Unchanged
safe                   per wallet
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Audit letter       Pounds 20 per hour        Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Management fee     Pounds 55 per hour        Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Banker's draft         Pounds 12             Pounds 10
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Special cheque
presentation           Pounds 12             Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Electronic funds
transfer              Pounds 19              Pounds 18
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Stopped cheque        Pounds 8               Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Cheque returned
to Lloyds             Pounds 4               Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Intermediate
statements:
via cashpoint         Free                   Unchanged
at a branch           Pounds 3               Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Copy
statements:
last statement        Free                   Pounds 6
earlier statement     Pounds 6               Unchanged
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Vauxhall to cut output of cars
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
VAUXHALL, the UK subsidiary of General Motors of the US, is being forced to
cut its car output for the first time during the recession in the face of
weakening demand from export markets.
It is planning a cut of two shifts a week for four weeks in January at its
assembly plant at Luton, Bedfordshire, with a total production cut of 2,880
cars. Vauxhall's second plant at Ellesmere Port, Cheshire, will not be
affected by the cut.
Vauxhall's output this year is expected to reach a record of 300,000
vehicles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Long-term jobless at 4 1/2-year peak
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE number of people out of work for more than a year rose by 50,000 in the
three months to October to a 4 1/2 -year high of 956,000, the Department of
Employment reported yesterday.
Mrs Gillian Shephard, employment secretary, said the increase was the
smallest for a year and that the total was still 30 per cent below the peak
in April 1986. But the latest total is the highest since April 1988 and is
almost double the level when the upward trend began in October 1990.
More than a third of those on the dole have been jobless for more than 12
months. The number of people out of work for more than six months stands at
1,521,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Lang's mind 'open' on Scots water sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON and IVOR OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR IAN LANG, the Scottish secretary, yesterday rejected Labour claims that
he had made up his mind to privatise the Scottish water industry through a
public flotation and insisted he had an open mind.
Mr Lang was introducing a consultative green paper setting out options for
the Scottish water and sewerage industry, which is in the hands of the nine
regional councils and three islands authorities.
The document said there were advantages to bringing the private sector into
the water industry but did not reject continued public sector control.
It said a public sell-off of Scottish water services would be feasible, but
proposed a solution which would bring in the private sector through
franchising arrangements.
It is understood that between 12 and 14 companies have expressed an interest
in becoming involved with the Scottish water industry. Two are believed to
be French.
There is considerable opposition in Scotland to water privatisation. The
government says Scottish water and sewerage services will have to be
restructured because the regional councils which provide them in mainland
Scotland will disappear when local government is reorganised in the mid
1990s.
The paper says larger units will be needed to provide water services, partly
because of the scale of investment needed in the next 10 to 15 years to
comply with EC directives on drinking water and pollution. This could cost
Pounds 5bn, suggesting annual capital spending at least 50 per cent higher
than the Pounds 218m being spent in 1992-93.
The consultation paper outlines several ways local authorities could run
water services and suggests local or national water authorities separate
from councils.
However, it points out that any structure which 'opens up opportunities for
private sector investment to replace public expenditure' could 'maximise
investment potential'. Such a structure would also release resources for
services such as health and education for which there is no viable
alternative to public provision.
The paper says higher water charges will be needed, whether the public
sector or the private sector is involved.
Under the privatisation option between one and three water companies could
be set up covering the whole of mainland Scotland and floated on the stock
exchange, as happened in England and Wales in 1989. As they would be near
monopolies they would be subject to a regulator. The government would keep a
'golden share' to guard against unsuitable takeovers.
The paper says the Scottish Office, which took advice from Quayle Munro, the
Edinburgh merchant bank, has been advised that a sale 'could be successfully
achieved'. Alternatively, the companies could be sold to a single purchaser
in a trade sale, or bought out by their managers.
Another solution would be franchising - setting up non-profit companies
limited by guarantee which would own water and sewerage assets and finance
capital expenditure from borrowing. These companies would franchise the
running of services to private-sector companies, which would be subject to a
regulator.
An alternative form of franchising would involve the franchisee companies
taking responsibility for capital investment. The franchisee would in this
case need to be a substantial company.
Water and Sewerage in Scotland: Investing For Our Future. Scottish Office
Water Restructuring Division, 27 Perth Street, Edinburgh EH3 5RB. Free.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Executive salary rises 'slowing'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EXECUTIVE pay increases have slowed by 50 per cent over the past 12 months,
approaching the same level of increases as other employees, according to
data from the Monks Partnership, executive pay analysts.
But Mr John Major's appeal for pay restraint in the boardroom was not
welcomed by Lord King, British Airways chairman and one of the UK's
highest-paid chairmen, who said top businessmen needed competitive salaries
to reflect productivity.
Lord King said: 'I think we should be careful about going back to the awful
mistakes of the Heath days. We must have the freedom to run our companies,
and if we want to attract talent we have to be able to pay for it.'
Other industrialists welcomed Mr Major's call, which was made at the Lord
Mayor's Banquet on Tuesday night.
The latest estimates from Monks' clients suggest that directors and senior
managers will this year receive basic increases of about 4 per cent, down
from the 5 per cent to 6 per cent predicted in July. Monks calculates that
directors and senior managers last year received basic rises of about 8 per
cent.
However, the latest signals emerging from the private sector are mixed, in
spite of government calls to follow its public-sector pay limit of 1.5 per
cent.
National Power, the privatised electricity generator, has approved a basic
pay rise of 3.95 per cent for about 9,000 staff, most of whom also received
a Pounds 2,000 lump-sum payment for accepting a new deal on preformance pay
and flexible working hours.
The main industrial unions support the deal, meaning it is almost certain to
be accepted. Mr Doug Rooney, of the AEEU electricians' and engineering
workers' union, said the performance element was unusual for industrial
workers.
Meanwhile, several GEC subsidiaries have imposed pay freezes, including GPT,
the telecommunications group, and GEC-Ferranti. Others, including the
Anglo-French engineering group GEC Alsthom, have awarded small pay rises.
The TUC public services committee met yesterday to co-ordinate opposition to
the government's 1.5 per cent limit for the public sector, but few union
officials predict industrial unrest. The TUC wants to meet the prime
minister over the matter. Mr Rodney Bickerstaffe, leader of the public
service union Nupe, did not rule out strike action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Tube chiefs adopt tough stance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON Underground's management was yesterday preparing to take a tough line
if workers carry out their threat to strike next week over job cuts and a
new pay and conditions package.
The management is determined to win the dispute at any cost. If that means
letting people travel without paying fares because no one is available to
staff booking halls and ticket barriers, it says, then so be it.
Workers have been told that if a strike goes ahead, future redundancies
could be compulsory instead of voluntary; and that the pay rises offered to
staff who remain, averaging 6 per cent, will lapse - in which case any new
offer will be subject to the government's newly introduced 1.5 per cent
ceiling on public -sector pay rises.
Even if this tactic fails, the management is convinced that it will have
enough people available for work to keep a service running.
Many of those getting the biggest pay rises - and therefore with the most to
lose if they lapse - are operational staff such as train crews and traffic
controllers.
The tactics also include the threat that strikers will be sacked and
replaced with non-union personnel if necessary. The training period for a
driver can easily be cut from the present 12 weeks, London Underground says.
The origins of the dispute lie in London Transport's attempts to turn the
Underground into a modern, efficient, well-run railway - with one eye on the
possibility that this could ultimately lead to some form of privatisation.
After months of studying the potential for efficiency gains, the Underground
came out a year ago with a plan which set the scene for radical changes in
employees' conditions of service with the aim of increasing productivity.
Archaic working practices were to be swept away, employees would be required
to be more flexible, services such as train and station cleaning would be
contracted out - and above all, the workforce would be cut by nearly a
quarter, from 21,000 to 16,000.
Employees and union representatives opposed the changes.
The management said redundancies would be voluntary and spread over three
years; that staff who remained would end up with more interesting and
better-paid jobs; and that the minority of employees suffering a fall in pay
would have their level of earnings protected until 1995.
Negotiations over the package have been going on ever since. However,
implementation has already quietly begun: London Underground says about
1,000 employees have taken voluntary redundancy, many of them as a result of
the contracting out of cleaning services.
What seems to have brought about yesterday's crunch is an attempt to
implement the changes in the core operational areas - the running of the
trains and stations.
The RMT railworkers' union accuses London Underground of having pulled the
plug on negotiations over the new conditions of service.
London Underground says the RMT was just spinning out the talks with no
intention of ever reaching a deal.
Whatever the truth of the matter, yesterday's ballot has set the scene for a
damaging strike which threatens to bring chaos to the capital. London
Underground, however, is in no mood for conciliation.
It said yesterday: 'We have got to the stage where we either take this
railway forward into the next century or we just stopmanaging it
altogether.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Rosyth backed for Trident refit contracts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OPERATORS of Rosyth naval dockyard in Fife yesterday fired another shot
in their battle against the attempt by the rival Devonport yard in Plymouth
to become Britain's sole naval dockyard.
Babcock Thorn, the consortium that operates Rosyth, produced a study which
said that although there would be economies of scale in concentrating all
naval refit work at Devonport, these would be outweighed by the problems of
managing a large and diverse refit programme at a single site.
It would be better to have two yards under single management, with Rosyth
handling all submarine work and Devonport dealing with surface warships,
Professor Donald MacKay of Pieda, the Edinburgh-based economic consultants,
says.
Mr Malcolm Rifkind, defence secretary, is expected to announce next month
his decision on which of the two yards will refit the new Trident
submarines. If Rosyth loses the contract it is expected that it will
eventually close, with the loss of 4,000 jobs.
Pieda says that if Devonport were to become the sole naval dockyard, there
would be problems of co-ordination and control of the 6,000-strong workforce
spread over 100 sites, with reduced flexibility and responsiveness.
The power of unions would be increased and this could lead to more rigid
working practices and demands for higher pay. The trend in US and UK
companies was to go for smaller, focused units rather than single large
ones, Pieda says.
Rosyth refits all Polaris submarines as well as some surface ships, and
Pounds 120m has already been spent on building a facility to refit Trident
submarines.
Using existing facilities Babcock Thorn believes it could handle all the
navy's submarine work by 1994. Devonport could not do this until 1997,
giving Rosyth an advantage worth Pounds 150m to the Ministry of Defence.
This figure tips the balance in the cost/benefit analysis of the two options
sharply in favour of Rosyth.
Pieda notes, however, that the Ministry of Defence believes it could not
reschedule its refit plans to realise these savings. It says: 'We find this
a quite extraordinary and unacceptable argument.'
Fleet Support. Pieda, 10 Chester Street, Edinburgh EH3 7RA.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Yellow Book of City rules revamped
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE CITY's 'Yellow Book' of rules
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
virtually a bible for corporate financiers - is being revamped to make it
easier for users to find their way through its labyrinthine contents.
Officially known as the London Stock Exchange's Admission of Securities to
Listing (now rechristened The Listing Rules), this well-thumbed yellow
binder has pride of place on bookshelves across the City.
The rulebook, covering everything from applications for listings to
directors' shareholdings, has been built up piecemeal, making it difficult
to use. Many City customs and practices that have developed in recent years
are not enshrined in it.
The Stock Exchange yesterday published a draft of a new rulebook to general
approval from corporate financiers.
Included in the book for the first time is a clear statement of how the
exchange plans to enforce its rules. This has traditionally been a difficult
area, as its only formal sanction has been the draconian measure of
suspending a company's listing. The exchange has now spelt out its intention
to publicise what it considers breaches of the rules, and to censure company
directors personally where they are at fault.
Tucked away in the rewrite are at least two changes in practice. First,
accountants and others who are not members of the Stock Exchange will be
allowed for the first time to act as sponsors when companies issue shares.
Second, listed companies will be allowed to send their shareholders summary
versions of their listings particulars, saving on costs.
'They've done as well as they could be expected to do - it's not a major
overhaul, but it's more logically set out,' said Mr Daniel Rosenberg, a
corporate finance lawyer with City law firm Berwin Leighton.
Copies of the draft have been sent to all listed companies, stockbrokers,
merchant banks, accountancy and law firms. Further copies are available from
Mr Patrick Morton at the Stock Exchange.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Hospital cuts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Stobhill, Ruchill and Rutherglen hospitals in Glasgow would close under
one of four options to rationalise the city's hospitals outlined by Greater
Glasgow Health Board yesterday. The plans involve the loss of more than
3,000 health service jobs over four to five years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Essex Water to start metering
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ESSEX WATER yesterday became the second water company to introduce
compulsory metering for households.
Essex, one of the 23 privately-owned water-supply companies in England and
Wales, will start installing meters in 3,500 homes near Chelmsford in April.
Last week Anglian Water announced that it would introduce compulsory
metering to all its customers over the next 10 years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / MoD to seek Pounds 300m saving
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MINISTRY OF Defence is planning to save between Pounds 250m and Pounds
300m over the next four years by placing contracts in the private sector.
Mr Jonathan Aitken, the defence procurement minister, said yesterday that
the intended savings would come from improved efficiency as the companies
bid for work now conducted in-house by the MoD. Without the contracting out,
the MoD would have spent Pounds 1.2bn on these areas, which include vehicle
maintenance and accounting.
The scheme is about 10 times the size of previous plans to put contracts out
to the private sector, a process called 'market testing' by the government.
The bidding process has already started for the overhaul of armoured
vehicles. Other areas earmarked for market testing include payroll,
helicopter maintenance, computer and workshop management, and ship repairs
at Portsmouth.
'If it goes well, there are good prospects in the medium and long term for
more contracting out,' said Mr Aitken, who presented the scheme to more than
600 industry and union executives in Birmingham yesterday.
He said he envisaged the companies which won the contracts using the staff
who currently carry out the work.
He added that foreign companies might be excluded by UK and European
Community rules on defence contracts.
Companies that might benefit include FR Group, Hunting, Vickers, GKN and
British Aerospace.
The MoD's previous efforts at market testing produced savings of up to 25
per cent but were severely criticised in July by the National Audit Office,
the spending watchdog.
Observer, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Long-term jobless at 4 1/2-year peak
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE number of people out of work for more than a year rose by 50,000 in the
three months to October to a 4 1/2 -year high of 956,000, the Department of
Employment reported yesterday.
Mrs Gillian Shephard, employment secretary, said the increase was the
smallest for a year and that the total was still 30 per cent below the peak
in April 1986.
But the latest total is the highest since April 1988 and is almost double
the level when the upward trend began in October 1990.
More than a third of those on the dole have been jobless for more than 12
months. The number of people out of work for more than six months stands at
1,521,000.
Long-term unemployment in the last quarter rose in every region, with the
biggest increases in London, the south-east, the south-west and East Anglia.
Mrs Shephard said that additional help was being given to the long-term
unemployed through the expansion of Jobclubs and the job interview guarantee
scheme.
Mr Frank Dobson, shadow employment secretary, said government spending on
training was only Pounds 803 per unemployed person compared with Pounds
1,708 in 1989-90. He alleged that more training cuts were on the way. The
Labour party also calculated that long-term unemployment was costing the
taxpayer Pounds 8.15bn a year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Government to simplify company law
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT is to launch a detailed review of company legislation in
preparation for a bill which could be in the parliamentary programme for the
next session.
In a speech to be delivered in London today, Mr Neil Hamilton, minister for
corporate affairs at the Department of Trade and Industry, will outline his
intention to review the 1985 Companies Act, the principal piece of company
legislation since 1948.
Mr Hamilton said yesterday that the review would focus on areas which have
become 'unduly burdensome or ineffective'. A number of recent corporate
failures had raised questions about the effectiveness of existing
legislation and he outlined three principal 'reform candidates':
Simplifying and distinguishing public companies from private companies in
the act's requirements, which were scattered throughout existing
legislation. The aim would be to reduce burdens on private businesses where
there was no severe threat to protection of the public.
Tightening the act to ensure the enforcement of regulations for fair dealing
by directors of companies.
Clarifying the extent to which companies could assist people to buy shares
on their behalf.
The review is also at first designed to cover about 17 other areas,
including disincorporation of limited liability companies, insolvency
proceedings concerning Company Voluntary Arrangements, directors'
transactions and the clauses dealing with the objects of a company.
Mr Hamilton stressed that it would be part of a 'rolling programme' of
reform. There would be an initial period of discussion with organisations
such as the Law Society followed by consultative documents on specific
issues over the next few months. He said he wanted submissions to be
prepared by next summer so that the DTI could be ready with amendments if
the government could find sufficient parliamentary time during the next
year.
Publication of official statistics on trade between companies in EC member
states will be substantially delayed because of the introduction of the
single European market in January.
Intra-EC trade figures - an essential part of the UK's balance of payments
statistics - will be unavailable at least until June while British
businesses adjust to a new system of statistical collection, called
Intrastat.
Meanwhile, it has emerged that companies could face criminal penalties,
including fines of up to Pounds 2,500, for not filing the new statistical
documents on time.
Intrastat is being created to provide the trade statistics previously
compiled from documents handed by exporters and importers to Customs
officials at national borders.
Companies with imports or exports to other EC countries totalling more than
Pounds 135,000 a year will be expected to complete monthly Intrastat
returns, which are far more concise than the existing border documents. This
will affect about 30,000 companies.
If the companies do not file the documents within 10 working days after each
month, they could face fines, which were detailed in legislation laid before
parliament last week.
Customs has stressed that it will use a 'light touch' and will focus on
helping companies to introduce the procedures rather than on penalising
them, at least during the first year. The cost to Customs for implementing
the Intrastat system - including the computer equipment, staff time and
documentation - during the four years from 1990 to 1994 is estimated at
about Pounds 10m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Trade News: EC victory in steel tube dumping fight
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EC producers of seamless steel tubes have won an 18-month campaign against
allegedly unfair trading after the European Commission found four east
European countries guilty of dumping tube in the Pounds 500m Community
market.
The Commission's verdict has been greeted with relief by the west European
industry. Imports of seamless tubes, used widely in the engineering sector,
had rapidly reached an intolerable level across the EC, but especially in
Germany and Italy, the Commission said.
The decision is important for seamless tube producers such as Mannesmann of
Germany and Dalmine, part of Italy's Ilva group, Vallourec of France and
British Steel. Over the past two years, the Commission said, 11 EC tube
mills had closed, with 18,000 jobs lost in the past six years.
Mr Raymond Barbier, secretary-general of the EC steel industry's liaison
committee, said yesterday the east Europeans' share of the EC market had
jumped from 7.8 per cent in 1988 to 13.4 per cent last year, reaching 18 per
cent this year.
The liaison committee lodged an anti-dumping complaint in May last year, and
the Commission opened an investigation in December. It now says the case is
fully justified, serious injury has been caused to the EC industry and
dumping prices have been used.
'To try to resist the proven dumping of these four countries, Hungary,
Poland, Czechoslovakia and Croatia, EC producers had to reduce sales prices
on several occasions, without succeeding in reducing the flow of these
imports,' the Commission said in its judgment.
'All the Community producers are in difficulties, and further plant closures
and job losses are feared.'
From November 15, all seamless tube imports to the EC will incur 21.7 per
cent duty for Hungary, 10.8 (Poland), 30.4 (Czechoslovakia) and 17.4
(Croatia). The Croatian duty will be temporarily suspended because the civil
war has severely disrupted exports.
Seamless tubes are not covered by the 1951 European Coal and Steel Community
treaty under which main European steel producers are seeking urgent action
from the EC against allegedly subsidised east European imports. But the
problems of the tube producers and the general steel industry are
'absolutely similar,' Mr Barbier said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Trade News: Kuwait to go ahead with Dollars 2bn
petrochemical plant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUWAIT CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KUWAIT will proceed with plans to build a Dollars 2bn petrochemical complex
even if it cannot find a foreign partner, Mr Ali al-Baghli, the Gulf state's
new oil minister, said, Reuter reports from Kuwait City.
He said Kuwait would prefer to work with a foreign company which could
provide technical expertise and help with marketing the products and
training Kuwaiti staff.
But he added: 'If it does not reach agreement with a foreign partner ..the
company will proceed with implementing the project without foreign
participation.'
The project was approved in principle before the Iraqi invasion in August
1990, and state-owned Petrochemical Industries Company (PIC) has been
looking for a partner to revive it since the liberation of Kuwait last year.
The complex would produce ethylene and its derivatives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Trade News: Curtain set to fall on Gatt drama - Since
the Round began, critics agree it is worthy but tedious
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER and DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE of the world's longest-running theatre productions, the Uruguay Round,
may be nearing its final curtain at talks in Washington tonight and
tomorrow, as the EC and US try to settle rows over competing food exports,
and clear the way for far-reaching trade reform.
Since the Round was first staged six years ago, critics agree it is worthy,
but tedious to watch. But in its final scenes, the dramatis personae have
sparked flashes of melodrama, enlivening the tale for those who sat through
the monotony, and those wanting a happy ending.
The Americans woke the audience by introducing trade war into the plot: a
battery of Dollars 300m (Pounds 198.6m) punitive tariffs on EC food exports
from December 5 unless the Europeans please US soyabean farmers by agreeing
a ceiling on EC oilseeds output. Another Dollars 1.7bn of US sanctions could
follow, with the EC hitting back over US goods.
The chemistry of relations either between US negotiators, or US negotiators
and their EC counterparts, has probably influenced the Round less critically
than the volatile relationships at the EC's highest echelons. Mr Ed Madigan,
US agriculture secretary, has said negotiating with the EC is like doing so
with the Keystone Cops; US officials have said differences of opinion at the
top of the EC have led to paralysis.
Mr Madigan and Mrs Carla Hills, US trade representative, draw their
authority from President Bush, and have always entered talks with a clear
brief defined with his agreement. Mrs Hills has been as subject to the
lobbying influence of US farmers as Mr Madigan, and has apparently not
disagreed with him over the 'bottom-line' positions the US should adopt to a
farm trade deal.
The transatlantic chemistry has helped progress to a deal. As two Irishmen,
Mr Ray MacSharry, EC agriculture commissioner, and Mr Madigan appear easy
with each other. Mr Madigan's complaints have never been pointed at Mr
MacSharry, although US and EC bottom-line positions remain frustratingly
irreconcilable. It is yet to be seen if these positions can come closer.
The chemistry has helped, too, in the relationship between Mrs Hills and Mr
Andriessen. The two have come to know each other well, and caused Mrs Hills'
rather humourless, lawyerly qualities to soften. Mr Andriessen is seen to
have has played a role in counselling Mrs Hills on French obsessions,
encouraging her to moderate retaliation over oilseeds. Mrs Hills' legal
background must help explain her indignation over EC refusal to bow to two
Gatt panel rulings against its oilseeds subsidies. She believes she fought
and won fairly two legal battles, and is outraged at EC prevarication.
Mr Dunkel, who entered the frame for the first time this year when mandated
by Gatt to mediate between the US and the EC, has spent the 11 months as a
spectator, his patience and conciliation tested to the extreme. He knows his
intermediatory role has limited effect. He hovers at the margins, reminding
negotiators more is at stake than farm trade, and more countries' interests
are involved than just the EC and US. If he thinks important negotiating
time has been spent on the US-EC farm row, he has been successful, veiled as
normally in a cloud of Gitane smoke, in hiding it.
The Europeans, coming from 12 wrangling nations, offer a more numerous cast,
leading to US complaints that Washington never knows who speaks for the EC:
the European Commission, the Council of Ministers, France, Germany, or the
UK. This is a trifle disingenuous, since the US administration often appears
to European eyes as an archipelago of agencies acting out competing
sub-plots. The Americans have a point.
There are a lot of Euro-players, frequently seeming to read from different
scripts. The main ones have been: Mr Ray MacSharry; Mr Frans Andriessen,
external affairs commissioner; Mr Jacques Delors, Commission president; and
Mr Jean-Pierre Soisson, Mr John Gummer and Mr Ignaz Kiechle, agriculture
ministers respectively of France, the UK and Germany. Mr MacSharry, the
bruiser in the Euro-cast, sticks obstinately to his line when he has made up
his mind. The Americans like dealing with him because of this consistency.
'The first thing I do when I go into talks is put myself in the other
fellow's seat,' he said a year ago, as he started bludgeoning 12 unanimously
opposed EC agriculture ministers into agreeing the farm reform, ostensibly
the basis for the Round's negotiations.
Mr MacSharry's public row with Mr Delors 10 days ago helped force the EC
camp into deciding if it would (more or less) unite to try to negotiate a
deal, or prepare for transatlantic trade hostilities. Mr Delors, whose
vision relaunched Europe to greater integration, was accused of siding with
France on the farm question. Some of his colleagues suspect he nurses
ambitions to be its president. His attempts to restrain Mr MacSharry from
reaching what he sees as a deal too favourable to the US partly reflects a
desire for Europe to stand up to its 'big brother', and a romantic
attachment to rural France which he fears will erupt in ire if French
farmers feel sold out. The dispute with Mr MacSharry has damaged him in
Europe, but may end by enhancing his reputation in France.
Mr Andriessen has guided the other strands of the Round towards its end.
Ranging from services to intellectual property, they are more important but
less contentious than the farm issue. Mr MacSharry has clashed with him
frequently, believing him too accommodating to the US. The Commission
negotiates on behalf of the EC, mandated by national ministers who appear
further down the acting credits. The ministerial mandate comes from their
national leaders, often making it hard to distinguish between their
performances for the gallery and their underlying role in the plot.
Pivotal is Mr Kiechle from Bavaria. The central problem of EC agriculture is
that its prices have been set to match the high costs of a long-standing
German farm structure. When he was cajoled by his divided German coalition
partners to agree sharp price cuts in May, farm reform was in the bag. hard
Mr Soisson is the unhappiest member of the cast. Given the farm job barely a
month ago with explicit instructions to stop any deal inimical to French
farming, he fast found any deal would be worse than what French farmers have
been told. But his suggestion that Frenchmen should drink more white wine
targeted by US sanctions has added farce to the plot.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Defeat gives governors free rein on policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANY of the country's 23 Republican governors gathered this week at a
lakeside resort in southern Wisconsin appear in a sense happier since the
defeat of their candidate, President George Bush, writes George Graham.
It is as if the party's removal from power has offered them an opportunity
to speak up for a message they feel their party has not enunciated well:
what the party really stands for.
'We think it's going to be our responsibility as Republican governors to
rebuild the party,' said Governor Tommy Thompson of Wisconsin, chairman of
the Republican Governors' Association. Many Republicans active at the state
level fear that their national leaders, during 12 years in the White House,
have strayed from the straight and narrow, lured by entrenched Washington
interests or diverted from hands-on government into arid discussions.
But in the states, Republican governors - and, many of them will admit,
Democratic governors - have shown discipline in grappling with the revenue
shortfalls that beset 35 states last fiscal year. Those such as Governor
Thompson, Governor John Engler in Michigan and Governor Carroll Campbell in
South Carolina have also shown innovation in reforms of welfare, health and
educational systems.
'Now that we do not have either house in Congress nor the executive branch,
that's where the action is going to take place, where the voices are going
to be,' said Governor Thompson. 'Our programmes are going to be tested not
at the federal level but at the state level. The only parts of the country
where Republicans are setting the agenda are going to be those states where
we have Republican governors,' said Senator Phil Gramm of Texas.
The most gaping of the post-election wounds is the division over where the
party should stand on social issues, especially abortion.
Speaker after speaker in Wisconsin called for a return to the vision of the
party as a 'big tent', capable of enfolding a variety of opinions.
'The Republican party has been, and has got to get to the position of being,
the big tent. I think we have to have differences of opinion on social
questions if we are going to be a majority party,' said Governor Thompson,
adding that he believes the whole party platform will have to be changed.
'We've got to be the party of the big tent. Everybody says it. I believe it
and I hope I've practised it,' added Senator Robert Dole, Senate minority
leader. The idea that Republicans should concentrate on the economic issues
that unite them, rather than on the social issues that divide them, finds
wide party support.
However, the Republicans still have a lot of work to do before they have
pitched a tent as broad as their governors would like.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Dollars 25bn will end crisis over thrifts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR ALBERT CASEY, chief executive of the Resolution Trust Corporation,
yesterday said he could complete the overhaul of the US savings and loan, or
thrifts, industry with just Dollars 25bn (Pounds 16.5bn) in new funding,
Reuter reports from Washington.
This is the lowest estimate to date of the funds needed to complete the
overhaul, on which the RTC has so far spent Dollars 84bn.
The RTC, set up in 1989, was scheduled to close in 1996, but its activities
have recently been slowed by the failure of Congress to provide new funds.
It has been without new funds since April 1, after the last Congress failed
to vote an additional Dollars 43bn.
Mr Casey said that if he received the new funding quickly he could virtually
finish the process of closing down failed institutions and paying off
insured depositors by the end of 1993.
He said that by the end of next year there would only be Dollars
15bn-Dollars 20bn left in hard-to-sell assets, which could be managed by
existing government agencies. 'We could sunset the whole thing three years
ahead of schedule,' he said.
Mr Casey expects his agency will receive another 50 failed thrifts by the
end of next September, the deadline for failed institutions to be handled by
the RTC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Argentina acts to stabilise the peso
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA plans to take currency convertibility a step further in response
to last week's speculation, which drove the peso below parity with the US
dollar, by allowing banks and individuals to broaden hard currency holdings.
The central bank president, Mr Roque Fernandez, announced on Monday evening
that individuals could open dollar current accounts and banks could meet
central bank reserve requirements in pesos or dollars. However, wages and
taxes would still be paid in pesos.
The hope is that this will strengthen confidence in the peso and encourage a
decline in interest rates - which reached 100 per cent a year, in dollar
terms, on the interbank market on Monday. Yesterday, interest rates settled
down to 35-40 per cent, while share prices climbed 7 per cent and the peso
rose above its maximum official rate of one peso to the dollar.
The government formally pegged the peso to the dollar in April 1991, when it
made the currency fully convertible and required central bank reserves to
equal the money supply. However, confidence in the peso is ebbing, as
inflation continues rising at about 20 per cent a year, making the currency
increasingly overvalued.
Observers say Mr Fernandez's proposal - originally floated last year - is
largely psychological. The US dollar is already a de facto parallel
currency. One US analyst said: 'A lot of inflation comes from expectations
that there will eventually be a devaluation. If they were really serious,
they would abolish the peso. By keeping it, they are keeping open the option
to print money or devalue.'
However, bankers commented that other factors such as seasonally tight
liquidity, the likelihood that privatisations due for December will be less
lucrative than expected, and continuing political risk, will keep interest
rates high.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Wanted: party mechanic to lead Republicans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LAKE GENEVA, WISCONSIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ONE of the first tasks facing the Republican party after its defeat in the
presidential election this month is the choice of a new party chairman.
Candidates flocked to Wisconsin this week to impress the Republican
governors who will have an influential voice in the selection.
Some irritated the current party chairman, Mr Rich Bond, by starting to
campaign for the post before the election. Practice has it that a new party
chairman is appointed after a presidential campaign, either by the president
himself, or if he is defeated, by the party.
Senator Robert Dole, the minority leader in the Senate, and many Republican
governors believe they are their party's best spokesmen for the four years
ahead; they want a mechanic to head the party organisation - and preferably
one who will not be working on the side for one of the party's presidential
hopefuls.
'What we ought to be working on is the next election and not someone's
campaign in 1996, so I want someone who is willing to do that and doesn't
want to profit from the job,' said Senator Dole.
Governor Kirk Fordice of Mississippi added: 'I think we need somebody who is
not influenced by the Washington syndrome, who is literally from outside the
Beltway. We don't need somebody who is going to use this job to further his
career in the lobbying business.'
Among those working the hallways at the governors' meeting was Mr Charles
Black, who helped lead President Bush's campaign. This may not help him,
however, and to many leaders he is too much of a Washington lobbyist.
Former Governor Pierre Du Pont of Delaware wants to turn the party
organisation from a campaign apparatus into a policy workshop, but he may be
too much of an ideologue.
More of a mechanic is Mr Spencer Abraham, who is credited with building a
strong grassroots party organisation in Michigan and who now runs the
Republican congressional campaign committee. He is not necessarily helped,
however, by Vice-President Dan Quayle's campaign on his behalf. Similarly,
Ms Lynn Martin, the labour secretary, may not be helped by Mr Bond's
backing.
Mr Haley Barbour, a former Mississippi state party director, argues for a
'nuts and bolts' chairman who will direct the party's resources to the state
and local level. Like Mr Black, however, he may be tarred with the
'lobbyist' brush.
Other candidates have yet to emerge. 'Just hold off for a while,' Senator
Dole urged his party colleagues. 'We've got plenty of time.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UN underlines commitment to Cambodian election next year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALEXANDER NICOLL, Asia Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED NATIONS participation in the Cambodian peace process is expected to
be strongly reaffirmed by the Security Council, despite the refusal of the
Khmer Rouge to co-operate.
A draft Security Council resolution, due to be passed within a week,
underlines the determination of the international community to hold
elections in May 1993 whether or not voting is possible in areas held by
Khmer Rouge guerrilla forces.
The resolution is likely to be acceptable to all the countries which played
a big part in engineering last year's peace agreement which was intended to
end the 13-year civil war.
There are disagreements about the degree of response to failure of the Khmer
Rouge, which was a party to the accord, to abide by it. The Khmer Rouge has
refused to allow the UN access to the areas it controls, has violated the
ceasefire, has fired on UN helicopters and has not disarmed or cantonned its
troops.
The resolution is expected to state that economic penalties would be used
against the Khmer Rouge if it attempted to disrupt the elections or
registration of voters, but to stop short of mandatory sanctions. It will
also leave the way open for the Khmer Rouge to participate in the electoral
process until the last possible moment.
To deter disruption, UNTAC - the UN Transitional Authority in Cambodia  -
will maintain its military strength at 16,000 troops until the May elections
instead of cutting it to about half that as planned.
The troops will put less emphasis on cantonment of the military forces of
Cambodia's factions - which has not been a success for most of them and has
been ignored by the Khmer Rouge. Instead, UN troops will be deployed to help
ensure undisturbed registration of voters.
UNTAC is an unusually ex-tensive Dollars 1.6bn operation designed under last
year's peace agreement to steer Cambodia from its civil war to the
establishment of a freely elected government. It plans to keep voter
registration lists open until around the end of January, giving time for
UNTAC to mount a campaign to educate voters about the elections.
A Security Council decision to reinforce UNTAC's mandate reflects a belief
that Khmer Rouge forces are not strong - estimates vary from 5,000 troops to
a maximum of 30,000 - and that elections can be held without serious
disruption.
Khmer Rouge violations of the ceasefire have sometimes been exaggerated by
the Phnom Penh government, western officials say.
It is estimated that areas not held by the Khmer Rouge represent about 85
per cent of Cambodia's territory and around 90 per cent of the populace.
Officials say this would be sufficient for a new government to win
international recognition.
Officials who believe there has been progress in Cambodia point to the
repatriation of 175,000 Cambodians from Thai border camps. They say most
have chosen to return to their villages and that none has been killed
despite the danger from land-mines. The target is to re-settle the remaining
100,000 or so before the elections.
Mandatory sanctions are unlikely to be agreed because of the misgivings of
some governments, including Thailand and France, about the value and
effectiveness of sanctions against the Khmer Rouge.
Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, UN secretary-general, has recommended to the
Security Council tighter immigration controls on Cambodia's eastern border
with Vietnam and customs checks on the exportation of lumber and gems on the
Thai border.
In a report, he dismissed Khmer Rouge claims that Vietnamese troops had
infiltrated Cambodia, saying there was no evidence of any formed units of
foreign forces with the possible exception of those zones controlled by the
Khmer Rouge, to which UNTAC had no access.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Nigeria postpones civilian handover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Nigeria's handover to civilian rule has been postponed from next January to
August 27, President Ibrahim Babangida announced last night, writes Michael
Holman.
Last month the military government nullified the results of presidential
primaries, marred by widespread electoral fraud, and sacked the executives
of the country's two permitted parties. President Babangida, speaking in the
federal capital of Abuja, said that the 23 presidential candidates who ran
in the primaries would be disqualified from contesting the presidential
election now set for June 12.
The government is now expected to redouble efforts to renew a lapsed
stand-by agreement with the IMF. Negotiations have been affected by
uncertainty over the hand-over timetable. An agreement is an essential
precondition to further rescheduling of Nigeria's Dollars 30bn external
debt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / S African interest rates cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE South African Reserve Bank, the central bank, yesterday cut interest
rates by 1 percentage point in response to data showing increased weakness
in the economy and evidence that monetary policy is achieving greater
financial stability, writes Philip Gawith in Johannesburg.
Mr Chris Stals, the bank's governor, said it would be lowering its benchmark
lending rate - the Bank rate - from 15 to 14 per cent.
The rate cut, the fourth since March 1991, had been widely discounted in the
money markets.
The average tender rate for Treasury Bills with a maturity of 91 days, for
example, declined from 13.38 per cent on July 3 to 12.16 per cent on
November 13.
Mr Stals cited sustained lower money supply and credit extension figures,
and the downward trend in producer and consumer price inflation (13.5 per
cent in September) as supporting a rate cut. He also referred to recent
figures suggesting real gross domestic product shrank at an annualised rate
of 5.7 per cent during the third quarter of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / De Klerk to face calls to resign
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr F W de Klerk returned from an overseas visit yesterday to face calls for
his resignation over revelations of an official military intelligence plot
to discredit the African National Congress (ANC), Patti Waldmeir writes.
Mr de Klerk said in a television interview before leaving Britain on Monday
night that only a 'few individuals' within the security forces could have
been involved in such activities, although the judge who disclosed the plot
made clear it was sanctioned by the army's top intelligence officer, Gen
'Witkop' Badenhorst. Yesterday the convicted murderer named as the main
intelligence operative involved in the plan denied it had ever been put into
place. The man, Mr Ferdi Barnard, has been convicted of two murders and
theft.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / China pushes market reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
China is pushing through a package of reforms for its state-owned commercial
companies which will allow them to introduce shareholding, determine their
own marketing strategies and deal in foreign trade, Reuter reports from
Beijing.
He Jihai, vice minister of commerce, told the official China Daily the
reform measures would boost the state commercial sector, which has lagged
far behind private entrepreneurs in exploiting China's emerging consumer
market.
Under the reforms, state commercial companies will be allowed to determine
their own product mix, introduce shareholding systems to bring in new
capital and lease subsidiary operations to other companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Indians queue for shares
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hundreds of Indian investors queue outside a New Delhi bank yesterday to
file applications for shares in Indian Petrochemicals Corporation, the first
state-owned company to offer a public equity issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Saudi economy records 6.6% growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK NICHOLSON, Middle East Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SAUDI ARABIA'S economy grew by 6.6 per cent last year, Sheikh Mohammed Ali
Abal-Khail, the finance minister, has disclosed to a local newspaper.
Sheikh Mohammed did not specify if the figures, the first official estimates
for growth in 1991, represented real or nominal growth, nor did he quote a
figure for gross domestic product. But economists in the kingdom said the
minister's figure is in line with their own estimates of real GDP growth for
the year. The estimates for 1991 output show a sharp fall from the economy's
18 per cent real GDP growth in 1990.
However, during 1990 the economy benefited from higher oil prices after
Iraq's invasion of Kuwait and from the boost to the private sector from
supplying US forces during Desert Shield.
Sheikh Mohammed said in Okaz newspaper that the kingdom's industrial sector
had grown by 9.1 per cent in 1991, against a 8.9 per cent growth the
previous year. Much of the growth is attributable to a rise in the kingdom's
petrochemicals output.
Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter, is pumping at least 8.45m
barrels of crude a day. The kingdom recently denied reports that it was
raising production to 8.8m b/d for November.
More detailed figures on the Saudi economy's 1991 performance are expected
later next month in preparation for the kingdom's 1993 budget, expected
around New Year.
Mr Henry Azzam, chief economist at National Commercial Bank, Saudi Arabia's
biggest, said he expected the government then to announce an expansionary
budget and a continued public sector deficit.
The kingdom forecast a Dollars 8bn deficit in its 1992 budget, which
economists say is being easily covered by domestic financing.
Mr Azzam said he expects the economy to show real growth of around 6 per
cent for 1992 given the relative stability of oil prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Yeltsin seeks to restore faith of S Korean investors: Why
Russia is anxious to revive economic co-operation while Seoul-based
companies remain cautious
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR BORIS YELTSIN, the Russian president, is hoping to revive South Korean
investment confidence in his country during his visit to Seoul, which begins
today.
In spite of Russia's potential as a source of both raw materials and
high-technology, most Korean companies are cautious about its prospects.
Total Korean investment in the CIS, mostly in Russia, has amounted to
Dollars 27m since 1989, when the two countries established trade offices.
This is only about a tenth of the investment Korean companies have made
during the same period in China, another recently opened market for Korea.
Moreover, Korean investment in the CIS has declined from its peak in 1990,
when it reached Dollars 16.4m. This included Dollars 16m invested by Hyundai
in a timber and furniture joint venture in the Russian Far East, the single
largest Korean investment to date.
Investment dropped to Dollars 2.9m in 1991. Although it has risen to Dollars
7.3m during the first 10 months of 1992, only Dollars 306,000 has been
committed since June. Korean companies have been deterred by growing
political turmoil and foreign exchange problems.
Hyundai, Korea's largest conglomerate, complains that new export taxes and
foreign exchange controls are threatening the future of its timber project,
in the port of Svetlaya.
Moreover, investment confidence was weakened after Russia was unable to meet
interest payments on a Dollars 1.5bn loan and trade credit package granted
in 1990, when the two countries established diplomatic ties. The debt
problem forced Korea to withhold a second promised loan tranche of Dollars
1.5bn.
An apparent solution was reached last week when Russia agreed to pay the
overdue interest in cash and kind. Resumption of Korean credits will enable
Russia to buy more Korean goods and increase bilateral trade, which amounted
to Dollars 1.2bn in 1991 with Korea enjoying a slight trade surplus of
Dollars 48m.
Some of the credits have been used to purchase Korean production facilities
and components. But the granting of further loans has become a political
issue in this year's presidential election. 'The government is rushing to
promote economic co-operation with Russia, which is unprepared to utilise
Korean economic aid,' Mr Kim Dae-jung, the presidential candidate of the
main opposition Democratic Party, said yesterday.
Nonetheless, Korean investment in Russia should grow next year. Daewoo is
planning to invest Dollars 20m in a bus assembly plant in Khabarovsk and
Dollars 10m in a St Petersburg consumer electronics factory.
Kohap, a textile group, is developing plans with local Russian officials to
establish an industrial complex for Korean companies in the port of
Nakhodka.
Mr Yeltsin's visit will include the formal signing of a contract for a
feasibility study of a proposed Dollars 20bn project to develop natural gas
reserves in the Russian republic of Yakut-Sakha. The study, will involve a
consortium of Korean companies, including state-owned Korea Petroleum
Development, Daewoo, Yukong Oil, Samsung and Lucky-Goldstar.
Of more immediate impact will be Korean assistance in converting Russian
military factories to civilian use in return for technology transfers, in
such areas as aerospace, machinery, electronics and telecommunications.
Both Daewoo and Samsung have already imported Russian aerospace technology.
Daewoo Heavy Industries is building, from designs provided by Kamov
Helicopter Scientific &amp; Technology, pilotless helicopters that will spray
agricultural pesticides.
Russia also hopes to sell military equipment to South Korea with this week's
signing of a military co-operation treaty. However, Seoul is expected to
purchase only a limited quantity of weapons to increase understanding of the
Soviet-made arms that North Korea is using.
Double taxation and customs clearance agreements will also be concluded
during Mr Yeltsin's visit.
 --------------------------------------------------
           KOREAN-CIS TRADE
 --------------------------------------------------
Year     Amount           Surplus        Surplus
                          favours      Dollars m
 --------------------------------------------------
1989     Dollars 559m     Russia             183
1990     Dollars 889m     Korea              149
1991     Dollars 1.2bn    Korea               48
1992*    Dollars 763m     Russia              84
 --------------------------------------------------
* Jan-Sept
 --------------------------------------------------
Source: Korean Foreign Trade Asociation
 --------------------------------------------------
Korean investment in CIS
 --------------------------------------------------
Year     Amount              No of projects
 --------------------------------------------------
1989     Dollars 480,000           2
1990     Dollars 16.45m            3
1991     Dollars 2.9m              9
1992*    Dollars 7.3m             12
 --------------------------------------------------
* Jan-Oct Source Bank of Korea
 --------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Indian brokers in strike over fees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL and R C MURTHY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CALCUTTA, BOMBAY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDIAN stockbrokers yesterday staged a strike in protest at the introduction
of hefty registration fees, bringing trading on the country's exchanges to a
halt.
The strike will do nothing to restore investors' confidence in the market,
which has suffered this year from the Rs35bn (Pounds 812m) Bombay securities
market scandal.
Furthermore, it will aggravate the danger of defaults among investors and
brokers since a rapid fall in share prices in recent weeks has strained
finances. The Bombay stock exchange (BSE) index has fallen by more than a
fifth in the past month.
It was not clear last night which exchanges would open today.
Brokers were expressing their anger at the actions of the Securities and
Exchange Board of India (Sebi), the newly established industry watchdog.
The watchdog has proposed charging a registration fee of Rs5,000 plus a
turnover fee of 0.01 per cent of turnover. This has angered brokers because
the revenues they raise from trading varies greatly between different kinds
of business, such as own account trading and client account trading.
Mr Ajit Day, president of the Calcutta Stock Exchange, said the proposed
fees were 'ridiculous'.
Earlier this year brokers staged a two-week strike when the watchdog first
introduced the principle of registration. But the authorities eventually got
their way. This time, too, the brokers' protests could well fail since many
firms would be unable to sustain a long suspension of trading.
The president and vice president of the Bombay stock exchange will meet Mr G
V Ramakrishna, chairman of Sebi, this morning ahead of a general meeting of
the brokers at the exchange.
The strike coincides with a the arrest of a leading Calcutta stockbroker on
allegations of fraud in the latest twist in a payments crisis which has
paralysed trading for a week.
The exchange was closed after brokers noticed forged documents being passed
in settlement transactions. The market was re-opened partially yesterday.
Mr Day said about eight of the exchange's 630 members had serious problems
settling claims totalling about Rs150m-Rs170m.
Mr Day, who represents the fifth generation of his family in stockbroking,
regretted the fact that the crisis had blown up after Calcutta had avoided
any involvement in the scandal which this year hit the Bombay market. He
named the broker as Mr Dilip Dugar, head of a firm called Bajrang Lal
Mahabir Prasad.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Long trek ahead for S Africa on the road from apartheid: FW
de Klerk remains the only person who can complete the country's
democratisation process
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE years after President FW de Klerk started South Africa's trek away
from apartheid, the most positive thing to be said about him is that only he
can complete the process: if, indeed, it can be completed at all.
Whether or not he knew about the criminal farce perpetrated by his security
forces against the African National Congress (ANC); whether or not he has,
as must now be suspected, a deliberate policy to destabilise and undermine
his political opponents; whether or not he is, as must be open to doubt, the
'man of integrity' whom ANC President Nelson Mandela once trusted; the fact
is that the new South Africa cannot be born without him.
But after Monday's revelations of low-life trickery from the military
(involving an intelligence plot to use criminals and prostitutes to
infiltrate the ANC's military wing), coupled with growing suspicions of far
worse official crimes, doubts have been raised whether President de Klerk
has the will,stamina, tact and skill to deliver a new multi-racial
democracy.
To prove he has, he must take action to tame his security forces, or abandon
hope of a new South Africa. Failure would suggest that he is either too weak
or too devious to succeed.
The consequences of failure are already apparent. South African society is
in crisis on almost every level: every week brings revelations of official
plots to discredit the ANC and new allegations of official assassinations;
every day seems to bring to light a new government corruption scandal, an
unedifying display of venality and incompetence which may have cost South
African taxpayers billions of rands.
True to the traditions of Africa, a continent scarcely renowned for
governmental probity, no ministers have resigned as a direct result of
scandal. But the cabinet has been severely weakened none the less, as some
of the most able ministers have resigned due to ill health or mental or
marital problems.
Meanwhile, black families continue to be massacred as politicians
demonstrate lack of will to stop the violence. Leaders of the parties who
signed a national peace deal last September (including the ANC and the
mainly-Zulu Inkatha) refuse even to meet to discuss its implementation.
And the dark mood of the nation is further blackened by economic decline.
South Africa is completing its fourth dreary year of recession, and good
rains to break the drought cannot on their own guarantee substantial
recovery.
Only a political deal on a new constitution can achieve that, but progress
is painfully slow. Moderate ANC elements as well as moderates in Pretoria
demonstrate the will to do a deal to govern South Africa in the transition
to full democracy, but they have agreed few details. And even if they do,
both sides may face sabotage from their own stubborn radicals.
The two main players, government and the ANC, are due within a fortnight to
retreat to a marathon negotiating session of up to a week. But such evidence
of cozy collusion enrages Chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi, leader of Inkatha, and
peace in Natal can never be guaranteed as long as he remains estranged from
negotiations.
Revelations from the respected Goldstone Commission into political violence
have cast a further shadow on the president's reputation. Mr Justice
Goldstone, never one to jump to unwarranted conclusions, clearly believes
that he is on the trail of a Third Force of security force members used to
destabilise the ANC. Others, less circumspect, insist a Third Force had at
least some role in fomenting the violence which has left thousands dead
since Mr de Klerk took power.
Mr de Klerk has consistently shied away from his most difficult problem: how
to rein in the security forces, to ensure that they operate impartially but
without provoking a revolt. South Africa's political violence cannot be
tackled until the organs of state security prove their legitimacy and
commitment to law and order. With their Wild West morals and conservative
political views, that will not be easy.
But, as South African political scientist Frederik van Zyl Slabbert points
out, 'a new government, particularly a democratically elected one, that
inherits a recalcitrant civil service and especially an antagonistic
security force is a recipe for disaster and will make short shrift of any
democratic constitution.'
Much will depend on whether President de Klerk can regain the initiative
lost in recent months. His strategy demands a position of strength. His goal
is to legitimise the political system while retaining a substantial share of
power for whites. In other words, to reform, not to revolutionise.
But to reform the state is far more difficult than to destroy it, as Mikhail
Gorbachev can attest from his reformist experiment in the former Soviet
Union. The next few months will tell whether Mr de Klerk can succeed where
Mr Gorbachev so tragically failed.
Editorial Comment, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / French president and his party drift apart: Relations
between Mitterrand and the Socialists have sunk to a new low
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RELATIONS between Mr Francois Mitterrand and France's governing Socialist
party have sunk to an all-time low in the past few weeks as the president
prepares for life after the Socialist administration.
Both sides have increasingly distanced themselves from each other on a whole
range of issues, ever since the traumatically close referendum on European
union in September, called by Mr Mitterrand against the advice of several
senior Socialists.
What are they up to? Mr Mitterrand is seen by the French press as trying to
bolster his personal power to make life difficult for the conservatives, who
are on course for a landslide victory in the legislative elections on March
21 and 28.
The Socialists, meanwhile, are said to be resigned to growing apart from an
ailing and unpopular president, who might not last the course until the end
of his mandate in spring 1995.
While nobody in France is as clever as Mr Mitterrand in dividing the
right-wing opposition, politicians on both sides suspect he is equally keen
on tripping up his own party. Mr Jacques Chirac, leader of the RPR
conservative party, dubbed Mr Mitterrand as 'the inventor of permanent civil
war as a method of government,' in a recent newspaper interview.
Other critics believe Mr Mitterrand wants to snub both sides of French
politics at once to reflect voters' general dissatisfaction with the
political class, a tactic reminiscent of General de Gaulle's attempts to
strike an intimate relationship with the electorate over the head of
parliament.
The latest and most dramatic sign of the split between Mr Mitterrand and his
troops came with his recent call for a parliamentary high court inquiry into
former Socialist ministers' part in a scandal over the distribution of blood
infected with the HIV virus. If the case gets through its complex
administrative process, which it easily could, the chief defendant some time
early next year would be none other than Mr Laurent Fabius, the party first
secretary, until recently regarded as the president's chosen dauphin.
The noose tightened yesterday when the standing committee of the senate, the
upper house of parliament, approved manslaughter and fraud charges - the
first step to a trial - against Mr Fabius and two other former Socialist
ministers, Mrs Georgina Dufoix and Mr Edmond Herve.
All three deny the charges and say they look forward to this chance to clear
their names against what they say is a political campaign by the
conservative-dominated senate. They have the clear support of all senior
Socialists except for Mr Mitterrand, who has said non-committally that the
constitution must do its work.
Asked on television whether he felt betrayed, Mr Fabius said he would rather
keep his thoughts to himself. A leading Fabius supporter, Senator Daniel
Percheron, was more blunt. 'Mitterrand has led us to understand that we are
alone and responsible for ourselves,' he said.
The blood scandal is only the most dramatic of a series of clashes between
the president and his party.
Other examples include Socialist MPs' recent refusal to accept Mr
Mitterrand's plans to ban business donations to political parties, and the
president's encouragement of Generation Ecologie, led by a former
environment minister in the Socialist government, which two weeks ago turned
its back on the Socialists by forming an electoral pact with France's other
main ecology party, the Verts.
Mr Mitterrand, meanwhile, enraged his party on Armistice Day by sending a
wreath to the grave of Marshal Philippe Petain, reviled by many French
people for collaborating with Germany as leader of the Vichy regime during
the second world war.
The president has discreetly done this every Armistice Day for the past
seven years without attracting a row, as a gesture likely to appeal to a
minority of older right-wing voters who remember Petain as a hero of the
first world war.
But this time the Socialist party was not prepared to turn a blind eye to
what Mr Henri Emmanuelli, speaker of the parliament, condemned as an
'incomprehensible' gesture. However, Mr Mitterrand rarely acts without a
clear motive, even if he is the only one to understand it at the time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Russia makes drama out of economic crisis: Politics holds
the centre stage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN AIR of unreality has crept into the tortured debates on how to save the
Russian economy from catastrophe. Politicians talk about merging economic
programmes which are little more than rival collections of slogans, while
economists are unable to tackle real economic problems because politics get
in the way.
The most imminent danger for the country is hyperinflation, which could
destroy most of the real progress made in building a market economy. Yet the
melodramatic nature of Russian politics means that most of the government's
energies are focused on surviving the December 1 session of the
super-parliament which has threatened to remove it from office.
In the interim, the government's policy consists of talking in reassuring
tones but acting in a manner which suggests chaos within, even as it
continues to make slow headway in building a market econmy with
privatisation and other structural changes.
The ambitious aim of its six-month anti-crisis programme, announced on
Monday, is both to boost social welfare spending and to stimulate collapsing
output with a selective industrial policy. With inflation running at more
than 25 per cent a month, the government has just come up with an equally
unrealisic 1993 budget that assumes 70 per cent inflation for the whole of
next year and a deficit of just 4.8 per cent of gross domestic product. But
neither financial stabilisation nor an industrial policy are possible until
Russian authorities make the cruel choice of closing down enterprises and
making more selective use of scarce resources.
It is not even clear how far the anti-crisis plan is a real policy. In
another symptom of what one western academic called 'programmitis' - a
Russian habit of producing programmes which are discarded two months later -
Mr Yegor Gaidar, the acting prime minister, last week agreed to make
alterations to the anti-crisis plan with the help of Mr Arkady Volsky, the
head of the industrialists' lobby and a key figure in the Civic Union
opposition group.
The picture is not all dark, though. Privatisation is going ahead, and
enterprise managers are gradually changing their behaviour in response to
market notions like demand and supply. But this fragile progress may be
severely disrupted if hyperinflation becomes an everyday reality. The
government will then face a choice of trying to reimpose state price
controls and the centralised distribution of goods and services, or of
trying to get its printing presses to keep up with soaring wages - something
they failed to do earlier this year when prices were liberalised.
Some of the problems facing the government have no easy answers and will
take time: for instance, establishing normal relations with the other former
Soviet republics which are now independent states. This includes the need to
establish a clearly defined rouble zone and concerted monetary policies with
republics that continue to use the rouble, and keep trading links with those
which opt for their own currencies.
On Monday, President Boris Yeltsin ordered his government to enforce world
prices supplies of Russian energy to other republics. However, Russia has
very little choice but to create credit for these mostly bankrupt republics
if it wants to continue receiving supplies from monopolistic factories built
originally in those republics on the assumption that the Soviet Union would
remain a single country.
Meanwhile, the west is saying that Russia must observe undertakings to the
International Monetary Fund before it can get access to more of a Dollars
24bn aid package. Yet this package in itself is nothing near the sort of
help Russia needs to face unprecedented challenges
The US, for instance, is pushing for a rapid debt rescheduling which will be
paid for largely by the Germans, but is closing its own market to Russian
exports like uranium and telling Russia which countries it cannot sell arms
to.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Monetary and credit policy in Russia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Viktor Gerashchenko, central bank chairman, said yesterday that President
Boris Yeltsin's decision to include him in the government would not mean
greater government control over monetary and credit policy, writes Leyla
Boulton. He said he remained answerable first of all to parliament, even
though he welcomed moves to strengthen co-operation with the government.
It also emerged yesterday that Russia has decided to withdraw its first
Dollars 1bn credit tranche from the IMF after months of hesitation,
expressed primarily by the central bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Czechs and Slovaks vote on final split
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VINCENT BOLAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PRAGUE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE FINAL constitutional hurdle in the way of the smooth dissolution of the
Czechoslovak federation was cleared yesterday. The Czech and Slovak
republican parliaments passed a joint resolution authorising the split into
two independent republics from next January 1.
The passing of the resolution ends months of wrangling and uncertainty over
how the federation should be dissolved, with a majority of deputies in the
federal parliament holding out for a referendum on the division of the
federal state.
Yesterday's resolution is expected to be endorsed by the federal parliament,
however, thus ruling out a referendum.
The resolution was passed by 106-67 in the Czech parliament and by 73-16 in
the Slovak parliament.
Also yesterday, Mr Vaclav Havel, Czechoslovakia's former president,
confirmed that he would be a candidate for the post of president of the
Czech republic after January 1. 'I am aware of my responsibility for the
political situation in this country and I want to influence it,' he said.
According to an opinion poll published earlier this month, 57 per cent of
Czechs would like Mr Havel to become their president after the split. The
next most popular politician, Mr Vaclav Klaus, prime minister, polled only 5
per cent.
Mr Havel has so far said that he favours a direct presidential election in
the Czech republic, but members of the ruling Czech coalition have expressed
their support for a parliamentary vote, which could take place next spring.
The Czech parliament is currently discussing a draft constitution for the
republic which would limit the presidential powers, making the post largely
ceremonial.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Ukraine accuses state oil officials
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRYSTIA FREELAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KIEV
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UKRAINE's state oil monopoly, Ukrneftokhim, was dissolved yesterday amid
allegations that senior officials had amassed huge personal profits by
reselling oil purchased from Russia at subsidised prices.
The allegations, made at a press conference yesterday by Mr Yuli Ioffe,
deputy prime minister, are part of a wider anti-corruption drive launched by
the new government of Mr Leonid Kuchma, Ukraine's recently-appointed prime
minister.
Mr Ioffe alleged that a senior Ukrneftokhim official had pocketed Dollars 4m
by re-exporting oil to a middle-man in the US.
Mr Ioffe also accused the energy ministry of skimming off profits through
complicated barter arrangements for the sale of electricity to eastern
Europe. He said the state prosecutor was investigating these cases of
alleged government corruption and was likely to press charges.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Court upholds Brussels veto on monopolies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Court of Justice yesterday reaffirmed support for the European
Commission's powers to intervene directly to prevent monopolies from acting
against the wider Community interest.
In a case involving liberalisation of the telecommunications services
market, the court rejected complaints by Belgium, France, Italy and Spain
that the European Commission had abused its powers under Article 90 of the
Treaty of Rome. This is the so-called 'nuclear option' which allows Brussels
wide-ranging powers to override national opposition to the break-up of
monopolies.
The four countries brought the case in response to a Commission directive
which freed the rapidly growing market in telephone services such as fax
machines and data transfer. Telex services and mobile phones were not
covered.
They argued that Article 90 only gives the Commission the right to oversee
existing rules under the Treaty of Rome, not to take a pro-active role to
break monopolies. In effect, their aim was to ensure that the Commission
could only intervene under the authority of the Council of Ministers, and to
send a warning shot to Sir Leon Brittan, the UK Commissioner in charge of
competition policy, should he press ahead too fast on liberalising the far
bigger voice telecommunications market, an EC official said.
Sir Leon welcomed the court's judgment. But EC officials said it was
unlikely Sir Leon would press ahead with Article 90 in sensitive areas such
as voice telecommunications or energy, given the level of anti-Brussels
sentiment in national capitals.
The court, however, rapped the Commission over the knuckles on technical
grounds. It said the use of Article 90 could not be used to end long-term
contracts or 'special rights' in telecommunications, the term covering use
of the phone network by companies such as Reuters and Swift, the
international bank transfer organisation.
The court thus annulled the two clauses which referred to these in the June
1990 directive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Swedish budget deficit forecast to rise sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S huge budget deficit looks set to climb to SKr195bn (Pounds 21.7bn),
13.8 per cent of the country's gross national product, in this financial
year that ends next July 1, according to Carnegie Fondkommission, the
Swedish investment company, writes Robert Taylor from Stockholm.
Faced with mounting demands for financial support from the crisis-ridden
banking sector and the cost of escalating unemployment, the Swedish
government's current forecast of a SKr160bn budget deficit in the 1992-93
financial year is regarded by Carnegie as unrealistic. It believes that
between now and July 1, 1993, the government will need to increase its
borrowing requirement to SKr255bn on the assumption that there is no new
round of spending cuts and the krona remains at its present fixed exchange
level against the Ecu. Of this, some SKr60bn will be allocated in loans to
banks and social funds and will be recoverable.
This forecast may add to revived anxieties on the money market. Last week
the central bank intervened and increased liquidity with its decision to buy
SKr45bn of treasury bills.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / MEPs support plan on HDTV
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STRASBOURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Members of the European Parliament yesterday urged EC telecommunications
ministers to adopt the European Commission plan to promote high-definition
television (HDTV), writes Andrew Hill from Strasbourg. But some MEPs raised
doubts about funding for the Ecu850m (Pounds 691m) plan. Britain, which
chairs ministerial talks tomorrow, could veto it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Albania forced to back down on Kosovo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TIRANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Albanian government, facing domestic problems this winter because of
severe shortages of food and fuel, is diluting its traditional support for
ethnic Albanians in the neighbouring Serbian province of Kosovo.
Mr Sali Berisha, the Albanian president, no longer speaks of Kosovo as 'the
other half' of Albania, although he still backs the Kosovo Albanians'
demands for autonomy from Serbia.
Albanian officials claim the government is not committed to providing
military support for the Kosovo Albanians if fighting breaks out there. The
next flashpoint is likely to be the Serbian elections on December 20 which
the Albanian majority in Kosovo has vowed to boycott. 'The Albanian army is
not in a position to intervene against the Serbians. We don't have enough
weapons or equipment. All we can hope to do if there is conflict is to guard
our own border,' said one official. Nevertheless, officials accept that
young Albanians would cross the border in large numbers to join local
militias or help protect relatives. Attempts to reorganise Albania's
100,000-strong conscript army in the past few months have included
concentrating troops close to the northern and eastern borders with Kosovo.
Mr Berisha has called for military action by Nato and the West European
Union against Serb forces who have seized most of Bosnia. The Albanian
government has also accumulated small stockpiles of food and medical
supplies in northern towns in case refugees from Kosovo start to arrive.
However, Albania would be unable to accommodate more than a few thousand
refugees, given the government's continuing difficulties in providing basic
food supplies.
Despite being granted a Dollars 25m (Pounds 16.5m) stand-by loan from the
IMF earlier this year, intended for importing raw materials for the food
processing industry, Albania will again be dependent on European Community
food aid to get through the winter. The EC ships flour and rice to Albania
from Italy and Greece. But bread is rationed, together with other staple
foods sold at state shops, while food prices at private shops are
prohibitively high.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / US calls for Macedonia to be internationally recognised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZAGREB
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
An American fact-finding mission to Macedonia yesterday called for the
former Yugoslav republic to be internationally recognised, Reuter reports
from Zagreb. Senator Denis Deconcini and Congressman Frank McCloskey, on a
mission for the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe, said in a
statement: 'We left Macedonia convinced that international recognition of
that country would be the right thing to do, and that it should be done
immediately.' The two also expressed concern for the treatment of
Macedonia's ethnic Albanian community.
Macedonia warned yesterday that tighter UN sanctions against Serbia would be
a disaster for its own energy-starved economy. Officials in the capital,
Skopje, said that tighter sanctions would close its only rail link with
northern Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Diary of despair in war-torn Krajina: The UN is powerless to
prevent a campaign of 'ethnic cleansing'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BY THE standards of mindless barbarity that have been set in the former
Yugoslav republics over the last year and a half, the recent incidents
recorded in the south of the Krajina region might seem almost petty.
But, laid down in prosaic police reports, they provide graphic evidence of
how a vindictive campaign of 'ethnic cleansing' can be pursued under the
noses of international forces in a United Nations Protected Area.
'A Croatian woman born 1929 stated that three men in uniform came to the
field in front of her house and shot her cow. They loaded the cow on a
trailer and went away,' says a recent report by UN civilian police
(Uncivpol) sent to monitor local police work in this Serb-controlled area of
Croatia.
Another incident in the same village, Maovice, involved a 75-year-old
Croatian. 'Five armed men came to her house stole two wheelbarrows, two
wall-clocks, washing powder and soap.'
All the reports conclude by saying the local milicija, which serves as a
police force, had been informed and the case was being followed up. But the
UN is almost powerless.
The same Uncivpol station described a robbery in the Vinalic area. 'Six men,
two in civilian clothes and four in local milicija uniform, came to a
Croatian woman's house and threatened her with rifles. They stole one colour
TV and shot her dog. The six people came from the village of Certina. Before
they left they told her to leave the village, otherwise she would be killed.
Local milicija informed ..'
In Jezevic-Corici, 'five men entered four houses owned by old Croatian
people. They stole 700kg of wheat, 10kg salt, washing machine, coffee,
candles, eight hams and a table.'
The reports are from Sector South - one of the four UN Protected Areas
(UNPAs) set up earlier this year after the ceasefire in Croatia - and from
the adjacent 'pink zone'. This is additional territory the Yugoslav army had
taken by the time the UNPAs were properly established.
The UN plan is to restore this 'pink zone' step-by-step to Croatian
authority. But no progress has been made towards this goal. Nor has the UN
succeeded in its aim of 'demilitarising' and disarming the protected area,
where it has 2,300 French, Czechoslovak and Kenyan troops. Sector South
forms part of the self-proclaimed 'Republic of Serbian Krajina', and UN
officials describe their mission there as 'quite frustrating'.
Although neglected and economically backward, Krajina is strategically
crucial since it virtually separates Croatia's southern Dalmatian region
from the rest of the country. All main road and rail links pass through it.
Tension is particularly high at Drnis, in the 'pink zone' to the south of
the region. Up to last year Croats made up a large majority. But, according
to UN officials, most have gone and Serb refugees from other areas have been
moving into the empty houses.
A typical case reported by the Uncivpol's Drnis station reads: 'On October
29 an old Serbian woman, aged 79, was threatened at night by four men in
civilian clothes to leave her house in Badanj ..She thinks that because she
was married to a Croat, they may believe she is also a Croat. Local police
informed. To be followed up.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Polish PM may face crisis: Row grows over calls for
referendum on abortion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GROWING pressure in Poland for a referendum on abortion is embarrassing
Prime Minister Hanna Suchocka and threatening discord in the governing
coalition.
Strict laws banning abortion and bringing in prison sentences for both
doctors and women who perform such operations are almost certain to win a
majority in parliament in a forthcoming vote.
However, a national committee led by Mr Zbigniew Bujak, a left-wing deputy
and former Solidarity leader, is pressing for a referendum on the issue.
A meeting of Ms Suchocka's Democratic Union (UD) party in Poznan voted to
back a referendum, prompting the prime minister to say the vote was 'the
greatest setback in the four months her government had been in existence'.
'This decision means that I have moved away from the Union,' she added,
tearing up her delegate's ticket. Ms Suchocka is a supporter of the abortion
ban and fears the political consequences of allowing the referendum go
ahead.
The UD is one of the main parties in Poland's governing coalition. A key
coalition partner is the right-wing Catholic ZChN party which is a
determined supporter of a strict abortion ban.
Its alliance with the UD will be hard pressed to survive a bruising
referendum campaign in which the Catholic church will battle fiercely to
defend its version of the draft law.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Germany closer to asylum reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY'S ruling coalition and the opposition Social Democratic Party are
expected to open talks later this week on amending the constitutional right
to asylum following the outcome of the SPD's emergency congress which ended
yesterday.
By agreeing to amend the country's asylum laws, as well as voting to allow
German troops to play a role in United Nations peace-keeping missions, the
party has clearly shifted towards the centre, leaving the traditional left,
and the pacifist wing increasingly marginalised.
The decisions, which both require constitutional amendments, also
strengthened the authority of Mr Bjorn Engholm, the SPD leader, who
threatened to resign if the party congress defeated these two proposals.
Government officials yesterday said talks between the coalition of the
Christian Democratic Union/Christian Social Union and Free Democratic Party,
and the SPD should begin as soon as possible.
'Asylum is the number one issue on the political agenda. We are very glad
the SPD voted to amend article 16 of the constitution,' a foreign ministry
official said.
Mr Volker Ruhe, the defence minister, said the SPD's decision to drop its
opposition to any role for German troops in international peace-keeping
efforts, was 'a step in the right direction.'
After a heated discussion, punctuated by references to the Nazi period and
Germany's militarist tradition, delegates agreed that German troops should
start playing a role in peace-keeping missions, but only under a UN security
council resolution.
They agreed that the Bundeswehr, or German army, should provide back-up for
humanitarian relief operations, but not play a role in peace-making.
Nevertheless, the decision represented a considerable shift in policy when
compared to last year's SPD congress which excluded any mention of a role in
UN peace-keeping operations.
Mr Klaus Kinkel, the German foreign minister, has proposed that the
Bundeswehr be deployed in any crisis in the world provided it operated
within the guidelines of a UN Security Council resolution and that any
peace-keeping activities obtained the consent of both sides in the conflict.
The coalition and the SPD agree that the Bundeswehr should not participate
in any Nato or Western European Union activities which take place outside
Nato territory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Police asked to quiz former trade minister: Probe sought
over Clark evidence in arms to Iraq affair
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON, RALPH ATKINS and JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POLICE have been asked to interview Mr Alan Clark, the former trade
minister, about his evidence in the Matrix Churchill affair.
The move came as the prime minister vigorously dismissed charges that he and
cabinet colleagues repeatedly misled parliament over arms-related sales to
Iraq.
In his angriest outburst over the issue Mr John Major told MPs any
suggestion that ministers misled the House of Commons over the export of
defence-related goods to Iraq 'has no basis whatsoever in fact'.
The Crown Prosecution Service said the Metropolitan Police had been asked to
carry out inquiries relating to inconsistencies in the evidence given by Mr
Clark to Customs and Excise investigators and later at the trial of three
businessmen accused of breaching arms embargoes on Iraq.
Mr Clark's testimony at the Old Bailey 10 days ago that the government had
approved the sale of sophisticated machinery which could be used to make
weapons, along with evidence in 500 pages of government documents released
to the court, led to the acquittal of the three former Matrix Churchill
directors.
A Customs official said last night: 'Mr Clark's statement sank our case.'
The official said Mr Clark gave two witness statements during the
investigation. Customs say both were at variance with what he had said in
court. Customs passed papers about Mr Clark's evidence to the CPS last week.
The collapse of the case against the directors of the Iraqi-owned machine
tools manufacturer has raised a storm of controversy.
Mr Clark, who retired from politics at the last election, yesterday refused
to comment on the CPS's decision.
Customs have refused to release transcripts of Mr Clark's witness
statements. However, they are understood to repeat his earlier insistence
that he did not encourage companies to breach export controls to Iraq.
This stance was apparently largely contradicted by Mr Clark under
cross-examination. During the trial he agreed he had indicated that
companies applying to the Department of Trade and Industry for export
licences could stress the peaceful applications of so-called 'dual use'
machine tools. The advice not to mention the potential military use from
applications was 'our old friend economical . . . with the actualite,' Mr
Clark told the court, paraphrasing an expression 'economical with the truth'
made famous by Sir Robert (now Lord) Armstrong, former cabinet secretary,
during the Spycatcher case in the mid-1980s.
Mr Clark also told the court he found the government guidelines on arms
exports 'tiresome and intrusive'. The tools involved were of little concern
as they were 'pedestrian technology'.
The decision to call in the police will focus attention further on the role
played by Mr Clark personally in the affair rather than that of other
ministers.
Mr Major has already distanced himself from Mr Clark. In the Commons last
week he said Mr Clark had assured him in 1990 that correct government
procedures had not been breached. However, yesterday's move is likely to
provoke concern among defence lawyers who have warned that Mr Clark could be
made the scapegoat for the government over the affair.
In the Commons yesterday Mr Major stressed that the terms of the inquiry
under Lord Justice Scott, who began work yesterday, were 'so wide-ranging
that they cover so many aspects that there will be nothing that will not be
fully examined'.
Page 11
Maverick Clark is used to speaking his mind
Major denies deception Letters Page 19
'I have never given a nod and a wink to anyone in my life. The whole thing
is highly defamatory '
 - Alan Clark, December 3 1990, denying he helped companies avoid export
restrictions
'We are back with our old friend economical . . . with the actualite '
 - Alan Clark at the Old Bailey, November 4 1992
'It wasn't until his testimony . . . that I had any reason to believe that
what he had told me . . . might not correspond with his oral evidence '
 - John Major at PM's questions, November 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Stock &amp; Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 --------------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 --------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,679.2 (-0.4)
Yield 4.50
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,055.62 (-2.65)
FT-A All-Share 1,272.58 (-0.0%)
FT-A World Index 133.8 (-0.5%)
Nikkei 15,993.48 (-169.51)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,193.32 (-12.42)
S&amp;P Composite 419.27 (-1.41)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 --------------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 3% (3 1/16%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 3.209% (3.198%)
Long Bond 101 1/32 (100 21/32)
Yield 7.533% (7.564%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 --------------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 7 5/16% (Same)
Liffe long gilt future: Dec 99 23/32 (Dec 99 25/32)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Jan) Dollars 19.175 (19.25)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
Gold
 --------------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Nov) Dollars 334.4 (333.9)
London Dollars 334.15 (335.75)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 --------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.5215 (1.523)
London:
Dollars 1.52 (1.5195)
DM 2.43 (2.415)
FFr 8.1825 (8.145)
SFr 2.2075 (2.185)
Y 189.25 (189.75)
Pounds Index 78.1 (77.9)
 --------------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 --------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.59225 (1.5928)
FFr 5.3625 (5.368)
SFr 1.4475 (1.438)
Y 124.4 (124.75)
London:
DM 1.598 (1.59)
FFr 5.3825 (5.36)
SFr 1.453 (1.4375)
Y 124.5 (124.8)
Dollars Index 65.5 (65.2)
Tokyo open Y 124.25
 --------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Furore grows over Bosnian refugees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY and SHEILA JONES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A POLITICAL outcry greeted the government's refusal yesterday to accept as
refugees 175 Bosnians stranded on the Slovenian border with Austria.
Opposition parties charged the Conservatives with callous inflexibility and
one Liberal Democrat MP drew parallels with the British repatriation of
German Jews in the 1930s. International aid officials also condemned the
decision.
In the House of Commons, Mr John Major, countered opposition attacks over
the case by insisting the refugees were no different from 2m other displaced
people in former Yugoslavia.
He repeated earlier pledges that the UK would take some 600 recommended by
the International Red Cross or the United Nations High Commissioner for
Refugees and was ready to look at further cases.
The prime minister insisted that a distinction had to be drawn between
economic refugees and legitimate cases for asylum for those facing
persecution.
'With the best will in the world, we simply cannot take everyone who, for
understandable reasons, wants to leave Yugoslavia,' Mr Major told MPs.
Britain has taken in far fewer refugees than some other European countries
since Yugoslavia's disintegration over a year ago, though some countries,
such as France, have taken even less.
Since Yugoslavia's breakup, the UK has taken in 4,000 refugees compared with
Germany's 253,000. Sweden and Switzerland have taken more than 70,000 each,
while some 50,000 have gone to Austria and Hungary.
Numbers have been smaller elsewhere. France has taken in only 1,108, Ireland
200 and Spain 120. The vast majority of refugees are from Bosnia-Hercegovina
and Croatia, where ethnic fighting has been worst.
The furore over the refugees, bused to the Austrian border on their way to
the UK by a Leeds-based charity, Alert, has put British immigration policy
under scrutiny. Britain has accepted six of the 183 refugees and two are
awaiting a decision.
Austria said yesterday it would provide the refugees rejected by Britain
with shelter for three months until permanent sanctuary could be found. The
refugees had waited a week on the Austrian border.
Senior ministers yesterday fought a rearguard action against the attacks led
by Alert and taken up by Labour and the Liberal Democrats.
Mr Kenneth Clarke, the home secretary, defended his refusal to accept all
but six of the refugees on the grounds that they failed to meet criteria
laid down by the authorities.
He said that Alert had been warned of the rules before the buses left the UK
to collect them. While offering sympathy, Mr Clarke said the charity had
ignored the warnings. 'At no time did they have any basis for raising the
hopes of the unfortunate people concerned.'
Mr Chris Lamb, an Alert official who has been at the Austrian border with
the refugees, said on BBC radio that the British authorities had obstructed
the charity's efforts to fulfil visa requirements, and that they had never
been told by the gov-ernment not to go to the border.
The refugees had been 'absolutely shattered and appalled' by the decision,
Mr Lamb said.
Mr Tony Blair, Labour's home affairs spokesman, said the government's rigid
approach failed to acknowledge that a senior Red Cross official had
recommended the refugees' evacuation and that the charity had prepared
accommodation for them in Yorkshire.
Amnesty International, the human rights organisation, described the decision
as 'disgraceful'.
Diary of despair, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World News In Brief: Footballer fined Pounds 20,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wimbledon footballer Vinnie Jones was fined Pounds 20,000 by the Football
Association and suspended from the game for six months, suspended for three
years, after being found guilty of disrepute over his involvement with a
controversial soccer video.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World News In Brief: Major to tour Europe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Prime minister John Major will visit EC capitals next week, in his capacity
as holder of the European Community presidency, to lay the ground for next
month's Edinburgh summit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World News In Brief: Convicted doctor allowed to practise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Consultant rheumatologist Dr Nigel Cox, 47, convicted of attempting to
murder a terminally ill patient at the Royal Hampshire County Hospital in
Winchester and sentenced to 12 months' imprisonment suspended for a year, is
to be allowed to continue to practise. The General Medical Council's
professional conduct committee ruled that his case should be concluded with
no further action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / All-out strike called on London Underground
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON and RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON COMMUTERS could face chaos on the capital's Tube network after
members of the RMT rail union yesterday voted 3-1 to take indefinite strike
action from Monday night.
The vote, by 55 per cent of the union's 11,000 members on London
Underground, is a protest at the most radical plan to shake up pay and
conditions on London Underground in 40 years.
However, London Underground says it is not prepared to yield on the reforms
and claims to have the full support of Mr John MacGregor, transport
secretary, for a showdown with the unions.
It also says it has enough staff willing to run a strike-breaking service.
Some passengers will be able to travel free as there are unlikely to be
enough ticket staff.
Earlier this week Mr Ian Arthurson, London Underground's director of
passenger services, wrote to the leaders of all three rail unions and their
members warning that strik-ers would risk dismissal.
Mr Jimmy Knapp, RMT general secretary, said: 'The only way to deal with
bullies is to stand up to them and that is what RMT members will do.' Some
union officials privately admit their members may be intimidated by such
tactics and seem less confident of victory than in 1989, when the
Underground suffered 17 one-day strikes.
Other union officials say they hope to be able to follow the coal unions in
winning public support for a strike against redundancies. The union says the
plan will cut 5,000 of the 21,000 Tube jobs and reduce pay for 30 per cent
of staff, although earnings will be protected for three years.
The RMT vote follows decisions by the TSSA white-collar rail union and the
Aslef train drivers' union to ballot their roughly 3,000 members on strike
action and action short of strikes. The unions say TSSA and Aslef members
have overwhelmingly rejected London Underground's plan in internal
consultations.
However, the response by TSSA members was small and nearly 50 per cent of
Aslef drivers who received the new contracts from London Underground have
accepted them.
Negotiators at TSSA and Aslef say members are not principally concerned
about pay but rather about the effect on conditions - for example,
withdrawal of cover for staff on meal breaks.
London Underground said only 40 per cent of union members supported the
strike call. 'On past performance that means they would have difficulty
sustaining a strike. We believe the majority of Underground workers see the
benefits that are on offer to them. We would be very surprised if there were
to throw these benefits over board in a futile strike.'
Mr Wilf Proudfoot, assistant general secretary of RMT, said: 'I am confident
we will get the support of members. What London Underground want to do is
unprecedented in modern Britain.'
Tough stance, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World News In Brief: Osborne to sell manuscript
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Playwright John Osborne, 62, is to sell the hand-written manuscript of his
1956 stage play Look Back in Anger to pay for dental work, auctioneer
Sotheby's said. It is expected to fetch up to Pounds 40,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AG4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Foreign property investors calm over tax fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MOST foreign investors in American property are likely to increase or at
least maintain their current investment levels, unless there are
unfavourable changes to the US tax code this year, according to the
Association of Foreign Investors in US Real Estate.
Mr James Fetgatter, executive director of the association, said that foreign
investors have been alarmed by 'the talk' in the presidential campaign,
during which President-elect Bill Clinton said he would raise new revenues
by getting foreign businesses to pay 'their fair share'.
A survey of the association's 90 or so institutional members found one third
planning to raise their investment levels if the tax climate remains
favourable. About one third plan to retain current investment levels, and
the remainder plan to reduce their levels of investment.
The association's members ranked Washington DC as the most likely target of
investment. 'The perception is that the city is a stable, solid market due
to a captive audience of many law firms, lobbyists, government agencies,
diplomats and so on with a steady demand for office space, housing and
retail stores,' Mr Fetgatter said.
On the list of cities most likely to draw foreign property investors,
Atlanta ranked second, followed by San Francisco and Seattle. New York City
was a distant fifth.
Half of those surveyed said the property market in New York had worsened
over the past year.
Overall, foreign investors have not much changed their opinions of US
property investment in the last year, although 70 per cent said they viewed
the outlook for US property investment more negatively than five years ago.
Mr Fetgatter said foreign investors were about evenly divided regarding
their 1993 investment plans because of the mixed signals about the future of
the US economy.
Foreign investors became a significant factor in the US market in the early
1980s. Investment accelerated in the mid-1980s and levelled off by 1989.
According to the US Commerce Department, foreign investment in US real
estate now totals about Dollars 35bn.
Members of the Association of Foreign Investors in US Real Estate include :
Deutsche Bank Capital Corporation, Olympia and York, Banque Indosuez,
Mitsubishi Estate, Fuji Bank, Sumitomo Life Realty, the Shell Pension Fund
and Philips Pensions Fund.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Flying start for Russia's satellite-launch industry: The
vast former Soviet space facilities have turned to commerce - fiercely
undercutting western operators
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIA has launched itself into the world's commercial space industry. With
it, the promise of cut-price space services took off, bringing the promise
of cheaper telephone links, satellite broadcasting, navigation and weather
forecasting.
Russia's first western client is Inmarsat, a London-based consortium of 64
national telephone companies that operates satellites for mobile
telecommunications.
Inmarsat placed two contracts last week: a launch on Russia's Proton rocket
for Dollars 36m, and another for an identical satellite on Europe's Ariane
rocket for Dollars 62m.
The price advantage of the Russian launch, which proved so attractive for
Inmarsat, threatens the established market leaders in Europe and the US. It
is already fuelling demands for protection from low cost rivals in the
Dollars 2bn-a-year space launch industry.
A second Russian contract could follow within weeks. Washington-based
Intelsat, which operates satellites for ordinary telephone links and has
more than 120 members, will decide early next month whether to buy from
Russia.
This would be the best possible start for Russian space commerce. It would
create the formidable partnership of the world's largest space industry -
Russia launches about 70 rockets a year - and the world's biggest
independent international satellite owners: Intelsat and Inmarsat have 30
satellites in orbit and plan to launch 14 more by mid-1996.
By comparison, Arianespace, the current market leader, offers about 10
launches a year.
Satellite operators which buy Russian change the economics of the business.
A communications satellite costs up to Dollars 140m and a western launch
between Dollars 50m and Dollars 100m. Insurance adds another 15-20 per cent
and then there are networks of dishes on the ground. A typical satellite has
a working life of just 10 years.
Even China is said to be concerned about Russian competition. It made its
first two cut-price western launches in the last few weeks but would be no
match for the vast Russian space machine.
The three western companies that dominate the industry, General Dynamics and
McDonnell-Douglas of the US and market leader Arianespace, are already
fighting back.
Mr Charles Bigot, chairman of Arianespace, argues that no level-headed
company would buy launch services from Russia. 'Russian and Chinese launches
are for gamblers or those under political pressure,' asserts Mr Bigot.
Gamblers because Moscow has no track record in commercial satellite
launches. Insurance rates will be high, as they have been with China, and
the lack of experience may leave a satellite in an inaccurate orbit,
shortening its lifespan.
The political pressure, he argues, has come from Washington, which controls
large minority stakes in Inmarsat and Intelsat through a statutory body
called Comsat.
Mr Charlie Lloyd, managing director of commercial launch services at General
Dynamics, agrees. 'The Bush administration showed a desire to use the launch
vehicle industry as a tool of foreign policy without regard to the effects
on on the industry and its workers.'
Industry sources point to the US decision to allow the export of the first
US-built Intelsat satellite for launch in China. Permission was given within
days of the US sale of F-16 fighters to Taiwan, to which China had objected.
Intelsat denies that it is under pressure to work with China or Russia. 'As
an international organisation we have an obligation to consider
international bids,' it says.
The political dimension to who launches satellites has encouraged US
politicians to join the fray.
Mr Al Gore, the new vice president, said in a speech last month: 'The
emergence of (space industry) competitors from non-market economies
increases the opportunities for predatory pricing - the very same economic
weapon that foreign countries employed in the 1980s to target and destroy
the American manufacturing base.'
With simple mechanisms of control, through Comsat and the granting of
satellite export licences, President Bill Clinton may not be able to resist
calls to save US jobs.
The calls are likely to grow in volume because another new competitor could
be about to make its mark.
Japan is also bidding for the next Intelsat launch contract. The country has
only a small aerospace industry and no working rocket. But it has emerged
from obscurity in many other industries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Romania given associate membership of Community
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIRGINIA MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUCHAREST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ROMANIA yesterday became the fourth eastern European country to become an
associate member of the European Community.
Associate membership will give Romania greater access to Community markets
and additional technical and financial assistance. The long-term aim is full
EC membership, an agreement initialled in Brussels yesterday says, but this
could take around 10 years and depends on Romania's economic performance.
Czechoslovakia, Hungary and Poland were granted associate membership last
December. Romania and Bulgaria began joint negotiations with the EC last
May, but Bulgarian officials said recently that despite six rounds of talks,
they were still some way from agreement, chiefly because of a dispute over
access to the EC for Bulgarian agricultural products, especially wines.
Community officials yesterday indicated that Bulgaria could be granted
associate membership by the end of the year provided it drops demands for
guaranteed access to the EC market.
Bulgaria is eager to gain access to EC markets for highly competitive
products in agriculture, textiles and steel, but has run into resistance
from recession-hit EC companies in the same sectors.
Differences on trade quotas slowed progress at talks between the community
and Bulgaria last week in Brussels.
EC officials visiting Bulgaria on Monday said it was up to Bulgaria to
accept the association accord as offered by the community and then discuss
export quotas, or to prolong negotiations.
Bulgarian officials maintain that their country's political and economic
performance ranks it close to Poland, Hungary and Czechoslovakia and it is
important for its stability to be treated on the same footing as these
countries.
The IMF has approved the release of Dollars 77m to Romania, the third
tranche of credit granted out of this year's Dollars 360m standby loan, the
Romanian national bank said yesterday. Romania's fulfilment of objectives
agreed with the IMF up to the end of September had made payment possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Major set for Iberian talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LISBON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr John Major, the British prime minister, will visit Portugal on December 1
for talks about the forthcoming European Community summit in Edinburgh,
Reuter reports from Lisbon.
A Portuguese government spokesman said Mr Major would meet Portuguese Prime
Minister Anibal Cavaco Silva and hold talks with Spanish Prime Minister
Felipe Gonzalez on the same day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Riot police in Athens battle with anarchists
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
POLICE charged hundreds of Greek anarchists rampaging through central Athens
yesterday, hurling petrol bombs and setting office buildings alight, Reuter
reports from Athens.
For the second night running, police used batons to disperse more than than
500 anarchists who set fire to two banks, a post office, the building
housing an office of the ruling New Democracy party, about six bus ticket
booths and a fire engine.
The youths moved through the capital by trailing behind a march marking the
anniversary of the 1973 Athens student uprising against the military junta
which ruled Greece between 1967 and 1974.
On Monday, Greek anti-riot squads fired teargas and battled with some 200
anarchists who swarmed through streets near the polytechnic.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: GM to reduce 81% stake in
National Car Rental Systems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL Motors, which is looking to sell off non-core assets, announced
yesterday that it wants to rid itself of a 'significant part' of its 81 per
cent stake in National Car Rental Systems, the large US car rental company.
It also revealed in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission
that it might take a fourth quarter charge of some Dollars 300m over
National, though it did not spell out why
However, it added that the charge would be roughly offset by gains from the
sale of its Allison Transmission division and the disposal of a 50 per cent
holding in Korea's Daewoo Motor. Both these deals had already been
announced. Allison is being sold to ZF Friedrichshafen of Germany.
GM, which wants both to conserve cash and concentrate on restoring the
profitability of its core North American vehicle operations, is mulling over
the sale of both non-automotive business and some parts operations.
The disposal of National Car Rental Systems represents a significant change
of course since, in the late 1980s, the Big Three Detroit manufacturers
bought up significant stakes in car rental companies in an attempt to
bolster market share.
However, the policy of cut-price deals with both captive and independent
rental companies meant that the Big Three tended to lose money on these
sales, and also saw sales of new cars suffer as the second-hand market was
flooded with lightly-used rental vehicles.
GM bought 45 per cent of National in 1988 and lifted the stake by another 36
per cent at the start of this year.
Mr Jack Smith, who took over as GM's chief executive at the start of this
month, following a board room coup, has pursued a policy of cutting back on
fleet sales, which totalled around 550,000 in the 1992 model year, down some
30 per cent from 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Electricity distributors in trading link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
East Midlands Electricity and Yorkshire Electricity, two electricity
distributors with adjoining markets, are to merge their retailing and
appliance servicing operations.
The new company, a further sign of consolidation in the electrical business,
will be equally owned by the two distributors, and will have turnover of
more than Pounds 125m.
It will operate as an independent company based in Normanton, West
Yorkshire, with Mr Martin Watts as managing director. The site belongs to
Yorkshire and East Midlands will make an undisclosed compensating payment.
Mr John Harris, chairman and chief executive of East Midlands, said the
merger would yield significant economies of scale with increased
distribution efficiency and the centralisation of head offices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Electricity distributors merge retail
activities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EAST MIDLANDS Electricity and Yorkshire Electricity, two electricity
distributors with adjoining markets, are to merge their retailing and
appliance servicing operations.
The new company, a further sign of consolidation in the electrical business,
will be equally owned by the two distributors, and will have a turnover of
more than Pounds 125m.
It will operate as an independent company based in Normanton, West
Yorkshire, with Mr Martin Watts as managing director. The site belongs to
Yorkshire and East Midlands will make an undisclosed compensating payment.
Mr John Harris, chairman and chief executive of East Midlands, said the
merger would yield significant economies of scale with increased
distribution efficiency and the centralisation of head offices.
He also forecast 'an excellent opportunity to increase margins' thanks to
the larger company's stronger purchasing power. But the merger will entail
an unspecified number of job losses.
Mr Malcolm Chatwin, chief executive of Yorkshire, said the company would
operate through seven out-of-town superstores and more than 100 high street
shops.
The merger comes shortly after the decision by Midlands Electricity to join
the retailing operation formed by Eastern Electricity and Southern
Electricity. That business, with 311 shops and a combined turnover of about
Pounds 250m, ranks as the UK's third-largest electrical retailing business.
Although regional electricity companies are keen to diversify into
retailing, many of them have had difficulty making a profit. Yorkshire's
business made a modest profit last year after recovering from loss. East
Midlands' business made Pounds 1.3m in its last full year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Survey of Turkish Finance, Investment and Industry (9): Aid
plan to link new republics / Telecommunications - the Soviet collapse
presents an opportunity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THE central Asian heads of state attending last month's Ankara summit
were able to get a line home, then they only have one organisation to thank
for the service.
In the wake of the collapse of the Soviet Union, PTT, Turkey's state-run
telecommunications company, is embarked on an ambitious project to join
these former soviet republics with the Turkish telephone network; and,
through Turkey's automatic transit system, to provide a communication
link-up with 198 countries in Europe and beyond.
Officials are keen to stress this is an aid project, funded by the Turkish
government budget, to help set up a basic telecommunications infrastructure.
But the plan is a daring one, 'gifting' technology today in the hope of
long-term commercial gain tomorrow. It is one of a number of government
projects now under way, to cement the growing political and economic ties
between Turkey and its long-separated Turkish-speaking neighbours.
Renting space from Intelsat, and beaming a two-way transmission from dish
antennae in each of the countries to an earth station in Turkey, the PTT has
set out to satisfy the most urgent needs of government offices, embassies,
businesses and hotels.
The first stage, a satellite link with the digital exchange in Azerbaijan,
was inaugurated on May 3 this year. Kazakhstan is already in operation.
Kygyzstan should be up and running next month.
Turkey's state telecom corporation will supply coin boxes, telex facilities
and fax machines. Meanwhile, the country's private phone companies are
installing public exchanges. Netas, a former state-owned company, now a
joint venture with Northern Telcom of Canada, has installed its DMS
switching system in Kazakhstan; while Teletas, part owned by Alcatel of
France, is supplying its System 12 to Uzbekistan and Kygyzstan.
Initially, the PTT is supplying some 2,500 lines to each republic with the
ability to increase capacity to 30,000 lines. In addition, local trunk lines
within each country are being installed. Using the same system, Ankara is
also beaming Turkish state television, and hopes to take their programmes in
exchange.
The government is footing the bill. Mr Cengiz Anik, head of the
international division at PTT, estimates the cost of what is in essence a
turnkey project at around Dollars 20-25m.
The Central Asian link-up is just one of a number of projects now being
handled by PTT's international relations division - 'PTT's window on the
world,' as Mr Anik calls it. Through the Sarp gate, there is now a cable
link with Tiblisi, which means Georgia's telecom authority can tap into
Turkey's international gateway switching system to transmit to Europe and
beyond.
The PTT is also doing its bit to end the isolation of the former Yugoslav
republic of Macedonia, still only formally recognised by Turkey and
Bulgaria. Mr Anik says 60 lines now reach the capital, Skopje, through a
'terrestrial' or land telecommunications link from Sofia, the Bulgarian
capital. Through the Macedonia connection, Turkey is also able to
communicate directly with Albania, which in turn is linked to Italy and the
European mainland. The operations are apparently quite profitable. 'We
expect to make Dollars 150m from the division this year,' says Mr Anik.
Taking their lead from PTT, Turkey's private telecom groups are venturing
where others fear to tread. Even before the final break-up of the Soviet
Union, Netas had signed a Dollars 20m contract with Azerbaijan to supply
digital switching systems for public exchanges, as well as the smaller Dicle
rural exchange.
The deal envisages setting up a joint venture to manufacture the Dicle
system with the Azeri state telecom company. Mr Tanju Argun, the company
chairman, says the Netas DMS family is the first digital switch to be
installed in the former Soviet Union. Netas has had to be very flexible on
payment negotiations. Indeed, the company is understood to be taking payment
in the form of aluminium and other resources under barter arrangements.
Netas believes it has a product to match the market. The DRX-4 or Dicle
rural exchange comprises 512 lines, and is ideal for village-size
communities. The robust nature of the hardware means it is well suited to
hard geographic conditions. 'The switch is designed by customer input, not a
technology-driven product,' says Mr Argun.
The system, for example, is able to work in temperatures ranging from 0 to
50 degrees C, compared with 35 degrees for a normal system, and at altitudes
of of up to 3000m. It is easy to install. It comprises what the technicians
call a 'fully distributed architecture, built on models and groups'. The
great beauty of the system is that the design means a local failure will
have little impact on other subscribers.
'Its the easiest thing in the world to have two people talking. The much
more difficult part is the maintenance and administration,' says Mr Suat
Baysan, of Netas's research department. He estimates that, of the total
software costs, 30 per cent is devoted to call processing and the rest tied
up with administrative issues like billing.
Before the Soviet collapse, Netas had been in discussion with officials at
the Leningrad Institute of Technology, trying to unravel some of the
problems. 'But you can't just put an exchange there and assume it will work.
Every state has different signalling systems,' says Mr Baysan.
'Its like a museum,' says Mr Argun, the Netas chairman. 'There are all types
of products. And its going to take a huge R &amp; D requirement to interface
some of the products.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Russian gold plan still in
doubt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE CONTINUING and long-running controversy over whether a small Australian
mining company should be allowed to develop Russia's largest hard rock gold
deposit appears far from over despite Australian claims to have done a deal.
Mr Boris Yatskevich, deputy chairman of the State Geology Committee, said
that the local Siberian producer in which the Australian company, Star
Technology, has undertaken to buy a 31 per cent stake, did not hold a valid
licence to the Sukhoi Log deposit.
He said this was because Lenzoloto, the Russian producer, had failed to
confirm an earlier licence to the deposit with his committee within a month
of the appearance in July of new Russian legislation on licensing this
summer. He also suggested, however, that this permission would not have been
granted anyway because the deal harmed Russian interests. 'If you've got a
fine diamond why give it to a middleman. I've been looking for a legal way
to stop this deal and I have found it.'
A lawyer for Star, however, cited a resolution by Mr Yegor Gaidar, the
acting prime minister, ordering the Committee to ensure the right of
succession for Lenzoloto, as a newly-formed joint-stock company, to the
resources for which it held licences when it was still an ordinary
state-owned enterprise. Mr Yatskevich said, however, that the resolution,
issued in April, had been superseded by the licensing legislation that
appeared afterwards.
He said he believed that Mr Gaidar, who also happens to be under severe
political pressure to support Russian industry, would 'follow the letter of
the law and the interests of Russia' by putting the prized deposit to a
tender reserved for Russian companies. If that failed to attract adequate
backing for the project, major foreign mining companies such as the UK's
RTZ, the world's biggest mining group, which had all expressed a interest in
the project, would be invited to second tender.
He expected Mr Gaidar to take a decision on the issue very shortly.
Star and Lenzoloto have been saying that all they are waiting for now to
close the deal is the declassification of information about the undeveloped
mine - which like anything to do with gold in the former Soviet Union been a
state secret.
But the information has so far not materialised, and, according to Mr
Yatskevich not just because of resistance by the Interior Ministry and the
Economics Ministry to declassification - but because Russia had no taken a
final decision on whether Star should have access to the information.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Telecom NZ profits advance 2.6%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TELECOM Corporation of New Zealand yesterday reported a 2.6 per cent rise in
net profits to NZDollars 184.8m (USDollars 96.3m) for the six months to
September 30 from NZDollars 180.2m a year earlier, in spite of a fall in
operating profits to NZDollars 1.22bn from NZDollars 1.28bn.
Telecom NZ, whose main shareholders are Bell Atlantic and Ameritech, the US
telecommunications groups, announced an unexpected 11.25 per cent rise in
dividend.
Analysts said this was a sign that the company expected earnings to rise
strongly in the second half following a review of services, cost structures,
capital spending and revenue streams. Telecom NZ is listed on Wall Street,
London and main Asian exchanges as well as in New Zealand.
Mr Peter Shirtcliffe, chairman, said the company had performed well in an
environment of intensifying competition, by combining cost reduction
programmes with carefully focused growth strategies.
He said the result was satisfactory as the period did not include earnings
from the Auckland white and yellow page directories, which contributed
NZDollars 16.5m last year. These results will be included in the final
quarter's figures.
Mr Shirtcliffe said there was a continuing decline in some revenue streams
including from national calls which were down 13.8 per cent because of
competition. Earnings from international calls were also down.
Cellular revenue rose 25.4 per cent, with cellular connections up 34.1 per
cent compared with September 1991. National call volumes were up 1.6 per
cent, which Mr Shirtcliffe said was a reflection of a strengthening economy.
Smartphone and payphone revenue rose 68.4 per cent.
The company had handled competition successfully and held 86 per cent of the
market at September 30. Mr Shirtcliffe said the current review was designed
to produce important improvements which will result in earnings growth and
shareholder value. This would produce exceptionally strong cash flows and a
strong balance sheet. It would be helped by new technological services and
new products.
Operating expenses fell to NZDollars 876m from NZDollars 930m and operating
earnings rose to NZDollars 348m from NZDollars 338m. Investment income fell
to NZDollars 20m from NZDollars 27m and tax took NZDollars 77m compared with
NZDollars 87m.
Earnings per share were unchanged at 8 cents and the interim dividend is
being raised to 7.25 cents a share from 6.5 cents.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Kuoni forecasts profits growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REISEBURO Kuoni, Switzerland's largest travel agency, expects net profits to
rise sharply in 1992 to between SFr35m and SFr40m (Dollars 24.30m-Dollars
27.70m), thanks to higher sales and cost cutting.
Last year, the group's net profit fell 21 per cent to SFr21.3m.
Sales in the first nine months were close to SFr2bn, up 18 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / International Company News: Svedala Industri acquires US
pump group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM, MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SVEDALA Industri, the Swedish mining equipment group, has acquired Denver
Technologies of the US in a deal which will make the Swedish company a world
leader in the supply of pumps and process equipment to the mining industry.
The announcement did not supply financial detail about the deal. The US
company which is strong in the North American market has annual sales of
Dollars 75m and a workforce of 700 people.
By contrast Svedala has annual sales totalling more than SKr8bn (Dollars
1.3bn) and employs 10,000 people with 80 per cent of its operations
conducted outside Sweden.
'The companies complement each other both in terms of geographic markets and
product range,' said Mr Kjell Akesson, business manager of Svedala's
business area for pumps and process equipment.
'This acquisition is part of the company's ongoing strategy to strengthen
our position as a leading supplier to the mineral processing industry.
Finanzauto, the Spanish earthmoving equipment supplier which is part of the
South African Barlow Rand group, has increased its stake in its Portuguese
subsidiary Sociedade Tecnica de Equipamentos e Tractores (Stet) to 96 per
cent from 59 per cent, Reuters reports from Madrid.
Finanzauto, which is the sole Caterpillar dealer in Spain, spent Pta620m
(Dollars 5.45m) lifting its stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: BTR raises Dollars 13m from US sale
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BTR, the industrial conglomerate, has sold US Supply, a Missouri-based
distributor of plumbing products, for Dollars 13.2m (Pounds 8.7m) cash.
The buyer was Ferguson Enterprises, the largest wholesale plumbing
distributor in the US, and a subsidiary of Wolseley, the UK building
distribution company.
BTR acquired US Supply as part of Thomas Tilling in 1983 and put it into the
Summers distribution group in 1987.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Vosper gains 17% on strong order book
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VOSPER Thornycroft, the warship designer and builder, reported a 17 per cent
increase in pre-tax profit for the half year to September 27 on the back of
more than Pounds 700m of orders, mainly for export.
The Southampton-based group increased pre-tax profits from Pounds 7.1m to
Pounds 8.3m on increased turnover of Pounds 90.5m (Pounds 74.8m).
Profits were boosted by an increase in interest income to Pounds 3.8m
(Pounds 2.2m). Cash rose temporarily to Pounds 111m but is expected to fall
to about Pounds 60m at the year-end as payments are made to equipment
suppliers.
Funding delays on the fourth Saudi Arabian minehunter, coupled with last
year's deferral of an order for more Sandown class minehunters for the Royal
Navy has led to 50 more lost jobs. Losses this year were 150 against earlier
predictions of 350.
Mr Peter Usher, chairman, said there would be no more redundancies and hoped
to be recruiting by the end of next year.
The recent devaluation of the pound was 'tremendous news' and boosted the
group's position in the Middle East versus mainly French and German
competitors.
The group believes prospects for further orders for ships remain good given
unrest and uncertainty in many areas of the world since the end of the cold
war.
Non-defence orders were Pounds 11m, compared with Pounds 3.5m in the first
half last year and Pounds 13.6m in the year to March 1992.
The group plans a number of selective non-defence acquisitions in the next
year.
Earnings per share were 17.8p (15.5p) and the interim dividend is 4.7p
(4.1p).
COMMENT
Vosper has ameliorated the normal risk associated with defence-related
companies by ensuring that exports account for more than 95 per cent of its
orders. The government's options for change may have resulted in the
deferral of a follow-up order for Royal Navy minehunters but that is hardly
a significant setback given that MoD orders account for just 3.5 per cent of
sales. The group is more concerned about receiving funding for further Saudi
Arabian minehunters which is why it wants to by-pass the lead contractor,
British Aerospace, and deal directly with Saudi Arabia. With forecast full
year pre-tax profits of Pounds 19m and earnings of 40p the shares look cheap
on a prospective multiple of a little more than 10, representing a 33 per
cent discount to the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Bridge contract
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Pounds 7m steelwork contract for the privately financed Pounds 300m toll
bridge across the River Severn is to be awarded to Cimolai of Pordenone in
northern Italy. The project is a joint venture by John Laing of the UK and
GTM Entrepose of France.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Ex-Bupa staff challenge court move
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A COMPANY formed by redundant staff of Bupa, Britain's largest private
healthcare group, will this week seek to overturn a court order secured by
their former employer, Alan Pike writes.
First Choice Health launched its Pure Health Plan - described as offering
'enhanced private medical cover for competitive premiums' - on November 2.
The following day, Bupa obtained a High Court order allowing it to search
the new company's offices.
A statement from First Choice Health yesterday said that its offices in
London, Beckenham and Bradford were raided simultaneously by Bupa on
November 4 'to search for evidence to substantiate suspicions by Bupa that
First Choice Health had been acting in breach of confidentiality in
obtaining business'.
It added that Bupa's suspicions were groundless, and that it was applying to
have the court order overturned. It would also seek costs and damages for
interference with its business.
Bupa confirmed that it had obtained the order 'to prevent misuse of Bupa
confidential information'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKRCBABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / World Trade News: Unctad to build trade information network
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (Unctad) plans to set
up 19 'trade point centres' by mid-1993, paving the way for development of a
global information network for international trade.
The centres are intended mainly to help small and medium-sized companies in
both rich and poor countries, to reduce the cost of trade transactions and
gain better access to world markets by exploiting information technology and
electronic data systems now used routinely by big corporations.
Officials say widespread adoption of paperless trading alone could cut
transaction costs 25 per cent by the year 2000. The UN puts these costs at
Dollars 300bn (Pounds 198.6bn), some 10 per cent of world merchandise trade,
implying potential global savings of Dollars 75bn.
Fears exist that small companies, especially in developing countries and
eastern Europe, could face exclusion from an increasingly globalised trading
system based on paperless transactions.
'Unctad's main concern is that everyone is able to share equally in the
modern technology,' says Mr Jean Gurunlian, head of Unctad's trade
efficiency programme.
Experts from 70 countries meet in Geneva this week to discuss implementing
Unctad's plan. Experience from about 19 pilot projects will be considered at
a world symposium on trade efficiency set for 1994.
The centres are financed mainly by governments and/or the private sector,
though the US, Switzerland, Germany and Italy have contributed to Unctad's
development work. Companies will pay a fee to use the centres, eventually to
be linked in a global network.
The idea is to bring together all participants in a trade transaction
(buyers, sellers, banks, insurers, customs authorities), the technology used
depending on the country's level of development.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKSC7AG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921118
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 NOV 92 / Moscow cash crisis hits German exports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SANDER THOENES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BETWEEN 1954 and last year, Sachsische Kunststofftechnik Freital exported
12,000 plastic moulding machines from East Germany to the Soviet Union. This
year, it has yet to export one.
'Demand for our products in this country is so huge that we could never
produce enough,' said Mr Kurt Mitsch, the firm's representative in Moscow.
'But the Russian customers have no money.'
For 40 years, Russia was the main customer for East German products. But
last year's collapse of Comecon, the economic community of the Communist
Bloc, led to a sharp drop in East German trade with Russia. The recent fall
of the rouble, a rising D-Mark and severe cash shortages in Russian industry
have slowed German trade with Russia to a trickle.
In 1991, East German supplies to the former Soviet Union dropped 50 per cent
to DM10bn (Dollars 6.2bn), and another steep drop is expected this year.
Many exporters have cut working hours and staff, while the textile industry
may have to lay off 90 per cent of its 450,000 employees.
For Deutsche Wagonbau, maker of nearly all the coaches used on Russian
railways, Russian demand is three times higher than its production capacity.
But marketing director Mr Hans-Dieter Heinrich says Deutsche Wagonbau has
yet to find a way to finance the DM1.5bn delivery of about 1,500 coaches and
cargo wagons to Russia in 1993, a deal that covers 70 per cent of its annual
production.
If the Russian government can not find the money and the German government
does not intervene, Deutsche Wagonbau will have to shut down much of its
production line, Mr Heinrich said. He fears for 11,000 jobs at the factory
itself, and for at least another 60,000 jobs in the supply industry.
East German businessmen accuse the German and Russian government of dragging
their feet on credits. Most exports from the former GDR to Russia should be
paid through Hermes export guarantees, provided by the German government
with preferential treatment for East German companies.
So far, however, only half of the nearly DM5bn allocated for export credits
has been used in Russia. The Russian and German governments had been
expected to finalise the Hermes credits by May, but recently the deadline
was moved to March 1993.
According to Mitsch and other businessmen, the German government has delayed
the process by demanding new guarantees from the Russian government,
particularly on the malfunctioning bank of international trade, the
Vnesheconombank. The Russian government has in the meantime changed its list
of priority goods, requesting medical and consumer goods instead of machine
parts, for which the Hermes credits were intended.
Mr Mitsch fears that his business in Russia may not survive to see the
credits approved.
For the German government, previously the largest lender and investor in
Russia, the bill for bailing out the East German economy has been bigger
than expected, and there is simply no money to pay for Russia's bill as
well.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Cancer drug recommended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AN advisory panel of the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) yesterday
recommended marketing approval for the drug Taxol to treat ovarian cancer
which does not respond to standard treatment, writes Karen Zagor in New
York.
Bristol-Myers Squibb, the manufacturer, said it submitted its new drug
application about two and a half years ahead of schedule. The FDA usually
follows the panel's recommendations. Analysts have predicted sales of Taxol,
derived from the bark of rare Pacific yew trees, of up to Dollars 50m
(Pounds 33.1m) next year, growing to about Dollars 350m by 1995.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Petrobras president quits as
fuel price row surfaces
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Benedito Moreira, president of Petrobras, the Brazilian state oil giant,
resigned yesterday along with his finance director after a dispute with Mr
Itamar Franco, Brazil's new president, over fuel prices.
The move came after a meeting in which Mr Franco again delayed approving
increases in fuel prices to keep up with inflation, now running at more than
26 per cent a month. Mr Moreira said last week that the company was losing
Dollars 10m per day because of the failure to make the usual monthly
adjustment for inflation.
Mr Moreira is not the first president of Petrobras to complain about the
government using fuel prices as a tool to repress inflation. Last year the
company - one of the largest in Latin America - made its first loss.
Mr Moreira first offered his resignation six weeks ago after the suspension
of President Fernando Collor amid a multi-million dollar corruption scandal.
He resubmitted it last week amid the furore over prices.
The company's new president is 54-year-old Mr Joel Mendes Renno from Mr
Franco's home state and a former president of Vale do Rio Doce, the state
mining company. He previously worked at Petrobras between 1981-1986 and will
be the company's sixth president in just two and a half years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Governor warns Indonesian banks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANK Summa, suspended from clearing operations last Friday with bad debts
exceeding Rp1,000bn (Dollars 313m), had no immediate prospect of resuming
normal activity, according to Dr Adrianus Mooy, governor of Bank Indonesia
(BI), the central bank.
Dr Mooy accepted that others among Indonesia's 215 banks faced problems of
bad debt and poor management, although not on the scale of Bank Summa. The
sector's bad and doubtful debts, excluding Bank Summa, amounted to about
Rp7,400bn or 6.3 per cent of the sector's loans, according to BI officials.
'It's very important for the banks to look ahead and see whether they can
still survive . . . given their capabilities so far as capital and
management,' he said.
'Very soon all these banks will be screened . . . through the application of
prudential regulations,' Dr Mooy added. Banks have been told to increase
their capital to 7 per cent of risk-weighted assets, up from 5 per cent, by
next March.
He said that Bank Summa, the country's 10th largest private bank and owned
by the Soeryadjaya family, had failed to keep to a plan agreed with BI for
the injection of new capital.
The first of three instalments, scheduled in three-month intervals beginning
last September, had not been made. When suspended, Bank Summa owed Rp66bn to
BI and Rp15bn in inter-bank lending.
Dr Mooy said 17 private banks were negotiating to raise more than Rp150bn,
in order to take over Bank Summa's small-scale depositors with performing
loans. This would save depositors but make Bank Summa's restructuring even
more difficult.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: DoT signals approval to
Northwest Airlines
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Department of Transport has tentatively approved an essential legal
condition to the proposed integration of services between KLM Royal Dutch
Airlines, the Dutch flagship carrier, and Northwest Airlines, the fourth
largest US airline.
Yesterday, the DoT announced that it was issuing a 'show-cause' order,
seeking comment on why it should not approve a request from the two carriers
to combine their operations and effectively function as a single carrier.
The order sets up a 21-day period for comments and replies, after which the
DoT will issue its final decision.
However, the US authorities made clear yesterday the agreement 'should
benefit the public by providing better services and enabling the two
carriers to operate more efficiently'. The DoT said it does not expect the
agreement to substantially reduce competition, but it will still require the
carriers to resubmit the arrangements for review in five years' time.
KLM has held a minority stake in Northwest ever since a Dollars 3.65bn
leveraged buyout of the US carrier in 1989. However, the two airlines claim
that any significant integration of their respective business has been
hampered by the need for immunity from prosecution under US anti-trust laws.
Because US law currently prohibits a foreign carrier from owning a
controlling interest in a US airline, the two airlines argue that there is
'a very real risk that collaberative planning, scheduling, pricing and
marketing of services could be challenged as being price-fixing and market
allocation agreements between horizontal competitors'.
The request for anti-trust immunity came shortly after the US and Dutch
government signed an 'open skies' aviation pact, essentially allowing each
others' carriers unfettered access to the respective home markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Westinghouse forced to consider
sale of businesses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTINGHOUSE Electric, the embattled US conglomerate, warned yesterday it
was considering more rapid and comprehensive solutions to the troubles of
its financial services business which might mean further substantial
reserves and force Westinghouse to sell off one or more of its businesses.
Westinghouse, with interests ranging from broadcasting to power generation,
has been plagued for more than two years by the problems of Westinghouse
Financial Services, which has a heavy exposure to poor investments in the
depressed US property market.
Westinghouse took a pre-tax Dollars 1.68bn provision in the third quarter of
last year, mainly for property problems, on top of a Dollars 975m charge to
sort out the financial services unit at the start of 1991.
The company said yesterday it had been pursuing a strategy of reducing the
financial service unit's portfolios over five years. However, it was now
conducting a comprehensive review of alternative strategies, due to be
completed in the fourth quarter or shortly afterwards, in the light of
factors such as continuing adverse economic conditions and declining margins
and yields in the Westinghouse portfolio.
The review might lead to the sale or liquidation as soon as possible of some
or all of the portfolios, involving another substantial reserve. That in
turn would require the sale of one or more of the group's businesses. Mr
Paul Lego, Westinghouse's chairman, said that despite clamour for a quick
remedy, the group would not be stampeded into premature decisions. If
businesses were sold, it would try to optimise its return and find strategic
buyers who would serve the interests of employees and customers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Wacoal tumbles despite sales
rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WACOAL, a Japanese underwear maker, yesterday reported a sharp fall in
profits despite a rise in sales, due to lower margins and the cost of
redeeming warrant bonds.
Taxable profits fell 13.5 per cent to Y6.3bn (Dollars 50.8m) on a 4.3 per
cent rise in sales to Y66.2bn. Net profits fell 9.3 per cent to Y3bn.
Wacoal said its spring and autumn sale campaigns boosted sales of woman's
underwear by 6.2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Continental Airlines files plan
to reorganise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL Airlines, the fifth largest US carrier but in bankruptcy since
late-1990, filed a reorganisation plan with the courts late yesterday
afternoon.
This incorporates the potential Dollars 450m investment from Air Canada and
Air Partners, a Texan investment partnership - a deal announced last week,
and which would give the two investors equity stakes of 27.5 per cent each.
Copies of the plan were not immediately available, but it is understood that
secured creditors generally receive close to the amounts they are owed.
Unsecured creditors will get stock in the restructured company, which, at
book-value, is reckoned to give them a return of about 5.5 cents on the
dollar for amounts owed by the carrier and 6.6 cents for sums owed by the
parent holding company.
Aside from bankruptcy court approval, the investment requires a green light
from the US Department of Transportation, which must agree to the
involvement of Air Canada, a foreign carrier.
It seems likely that some decisions by the Continental board will need a
majority of votes to pass, and that Air Canada, with six board seats, will
be in a potential blocking position.
This could raise the sort of control issue which has dogged British Airways'
plan to invest Dollars 750m in USAir, another US carrier, in return for a
large minority stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAHAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Family hopes to buy Henry Barrett arms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FAMILY MEMBERS hope to buy the main businesses of Henry Barrett Group, the
Bradford-based steel and industrial fasteners company which was placed in
administrative receivership on Friday.
Mr James Barrett, 37, and his brother, Richard, 35, have offered Pounds 12m
for the steel stockholding and building divisions, employing 450 out of the
group's 750 people, . They were not placed in receivership.
The brothers, who helped bring the group to the market in 1987, are backed
by two venture capital funds and advised by Touche Ross. The receivers,
Grant Thornton, are in talks with other possible buyers for Lindapter
International, the special fastening subsidiary, which is also not in
receivership.
Mr James Barrett said the proposed purchase would secure the jobs and
creditors of the stockholding and building divisions, accounting for about
Pounds 60m of group turnover of Pounds 100m. It is likely to be less easy to
find buyers for the subsidiaries now in receivership, principally Westbury
Tubular Structures and Don Reynolds, which makes flat-panel cladding.
Henry Barrett grew rapidly during the last building boom and its shares
peaked at 280p in 1989.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Appeal Court bars water claim
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CONSUMERS WHO issued writs against South West Water after about 20 tons of
aluminium sulphate was accidentally introduced into drinking water at the
company's treatment works at Camelford, Cornwall, in 1988 were barred by the
Court of Appeal yesterday from claiming 'exemplary and aggravated' damages
in addition to normal personal-injury compensation.
The court allowed the water company's appeal against a High Court judge's
refusal to strike out the additional claims.
The water company admits breach of its statutory duty to supply wholesome
water and agrees it is liable to pay normal compensation. But the 180
claimants want to sue for exemplary and/or aggravated damages. They are to
seek leave to appeal to the Lords.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Fears of delay to BR sell-off
spread to DoT
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH and RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FEARS THAT the privatisation of British Rail may be delayed have spread to
the Department of Transport.
Some people in the department believe the bill may not be published until
February. That would mean it would almost certainly not receive final
parliamentary approval until next October or November.
The setback has been caused by the postponement of debate on legislation
already before parliament, paving the way for privatisation of British Rail
and British Coal. The paving legislation would allow the two organisations
to prepare for being sold, for example by appointing advisers.
Until recently Mr John MacGregor, the transport secretary, maintained that
he intended to publish the rail privatisation bill this month in the hope of
winning royal assent next summer.
The sale of British Rail's freight operations would have started soon
afterwards and the franchising of passenger services was intended to start
in April 1994.
The rail and coal paving bill was due to be discussed in detail by the House
of Lords last month, but was put on hold because of the row over pit
closures. Even if it is brought back to the Lords before Christmas, it is
unlikely to be passed by parliament until late January.
The privatisation bill itself cannot be introduced until the paving bill has
been approved.
British Rail would welcome a delay to privatisation. Sir Bob Reid, BR
chairman, told the cross-party Commons transport committee earlier this
month that 'major questions' needed to be resolved before the plans went
ahead.
Mr Robert Adley, Tory chairman of the committee, has urged postponement of
the legislation to allow his committee time to study the government's
proposals.
One of the biggest uncertainties concerns the introduction of a system of
charging train operators for the use of railway tracks. Coopers &amp; Lybrand,
the accountants advising the government, have yet to produce its report on
the track access regime.
Many private-sector companies interested in running trains have said that
they cannot decide whether privatisation will prove attractive until they
have seen the Coopers &amp; Lybrand report.
Editorial Comment, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Attack on bank interest rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANY leading banks were behaving like 'back street moneylenders' by imposing
excessive interest charges on small businesses, Mr Michael Bates (Cons,
Langbaurgh) told the Commons last night.
He said some of their customers were still being charged 16 per cent or 17
per cent interest even though base rates had been reduced to 7 per cent.
Mr Bates, supported by an unusually large attendance of Tory backbenchers in
the final debate of the day, said the lack of effective competition
indicated that the high-street banks were behaving like a cartel.
He said that because of over-charging by the banks the national economy was
being 'short changed' and not securing the full benefit of the Pounds 1bn a
year which should result from each percentage point reduction in base rates.
Mr Bates called on the government to make it clear to the banks and other
lending institutions that their practices were unacceptable.
Mr Anthony Nelson, economic secretary to the Treasury, said the widespread
concern demonstrated by the support Mr Bates had received from his backbench
colleagues was reflected in the letters in his ministerial postbag.
While confirming that Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, intended to have
further talks with the chairmen of individual banks, he ruled out a
government inquiry into their codes of practice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Mercury to launch new service
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGO DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MERCURY Communications will today launch a new service offering business
customers the benefits of a private telecommunications network without
having to lease and maintain their own infrastructure.
Mercury said its 'virtual private network' service would be up to 30 per
cent cheaper than conventional private networks. Call charges would also be
cheaper than using the public network.
It said it expected the market for such services to exceed Pounds 500m in
three to four years.
British Telecommunications, Mercury's larger rival, already offers a similar
service. But unlike BT's service, which is charged on a flat-rate basis,
Mercury's charges will vary according to the amount the service is used.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Mercury extends business service
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MERCURY Communications will today launch a new service offering business
customers the benefits of a private telecommunications network without
having to lease and maintain their own infrastructure.
Mercury said its 'virtual private network' service would be up to 30 per
cent cheaper than conventional private networks. Call charges would also be
cheaper than using the public network.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / China hints at trade link with HK row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALEXANDER NICOLL, Asia Editor and IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA indicated yesterday that it was prepared to link its dispute with
Britain over Hong Kong with the two countries' future economic relations.
The warning was contained in a speech to the Royal Institute of
International Affairs in London by Zhu Rongji, the vice premier who is
chiefly responsible for carrying out China's economic reform programme. He
was recently promoted to the Communist party Politburo.
Zhu, who is due today to meet Mr John Major, Britain's prime minister, was
unexpectedly forthright in publicly raising the Hong Kong issue and
insisting that proposals for greater democracy by Mr Chris Patten, Hong
Kong's governor, breached agreements between London and Beijing.
'We regard it as a matter of principle, and the Chinese government has
always been firm on matters of principle,' he said.
Mr Douglas Hurd, foreign secretary, yesterday firmly endorsed Mr Patten's
proposals, saying after a meeting in London with the governor that they
fitted into the framework agreed in the 1984 Sino-British Joint Declaration
on Hong Kong's future. Mr Hurd met Zhu separately, and last night hosted a
dinner at which Zhu and Mr Patten were guests.
Zhu's speech, after emphasising the need to adhere to agreements on Hong
Kong, went on immediately to stress recent growth in trade with Britain.
Asked whether he meant to imply that the two issues were linked, he replied
simply: 'Let's wait and see.'
The Joint Declaration had heralded the best ever period in Sino-British
relations, Zhu said. However after Mr Patten's proposals, China had to ask
itself whether agreements with Britain should be cast to the winds.
The proposals, he said, contravened the Joint Declaration and what he
described as an agreement on convergence of Hong Kong's political system
with the Basic Law, Hong Kong's Beijing-drafted post-1997 constitution. This
appeared to refer to recently published correspondence in 1990 between
London and Beijing, which Beijing says constituted a secret agreement.
Britain says it contained no such accord.
Zhu said: 'We want co-operation and not confrontation. But no one should
expect confrontation to force us into concessions, and no one should make
any wrong judgment about this.' He hoped the Hong Kong government could
return to the consultation process stipulated in the Joint Declaration.
He claimed that the proposals were unpopular in Hong Kong. Asked about
opinion polls indicating that they were popular, he said: 'We have seen all
kinds of polls. They have different results and they vary from time to
time.'
Mr Major is expected to make clear Britain's view that China should discuss
the proposals for the 1995 Legislative Council elections, around which the
dispute centres. Mr Patten has repeatedly challenged Beijing to come up with
alternative proposals.
Ivo Dawnay, Political Correspondent, adds: Mr Major unequivocally endorsed
Mr Patten's Hong Kong policy last night claiming there was 'no one better'
to lead the colony through to the handover to China in 1997.
In a speech to the annual Lord Mayor's banquet at London's Guildhall, the
prime minister said the governor's initiatives were entirely consistent with
the 'one country, two systems' strategy outlined by Mr Deng Xiaoping, the
Chinese leader.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Bhutto set for clash on march
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FARHAN BOKHARI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISLAMABAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THERE was little hope in Pakistan last night that the government of Prime
Minister Mr Nawaz Sharif and opposition parties led by former prime minister
Ms Benazir Bhutto could avoid their most bitter confrontation tomorrow.
Opposition activists will try to march into the capital, Islamabad despite a
ban on protesters entering the city.
Ms Bhutto has planned the march in the hope of a comeback on a populist
tide. She claims thousands of her supporters have been arrested since the
weekend .
The march could pose a serious test for the ruling alliance but political
observers do not foresee an immediate change of government.
A large turnout would intensify political pressure on Mr Sharif, who came to
power in elections two years ago after Ms Bhutto's government was dismissed
on charges of corruption.
Mr Sharif appears to have become vulnerable since a split earlier this year
within the ruling Islamic Democratic Alliance led to a break with the
Mohajir Qaumi Movement (MQM), the powerful regional party in Karachi,
Pakistan's largest city and heart of the country's corporate and financial
sectors.
Though he still claims to have a simple majority in Parliament, he has lost
the two-thirds majority which gave him the opportunity to bring about
constitutional changes. There are also new concerns about the economy, with
the government estimating recent flood damage at between Rs40bn and Rs50bn
(Pounds 1.05bn and Pounds 1.28bn).
Opposition activists, who have repeatedly accused the government of
corruption and failure to resolve important national issues, are demanding
an interim 'national consensus government' representing a broad spectrum of
political parties as a prelude to'free and fair elections.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Elections postponed in Kenya
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Kenyan authorities yesterday formally postponed the first multi-party
elections in 26 years from December 7 until December 29, Reuter reports from
Nairobi.
The delay follows a High Court ruling last week upholding an appeal by
opposition groups for more time to nominate candidates to challenge
President Daniel arap Moi's 13-year-rule.
The new date was announced in a terse statement by the Electoral Commission,
which has been accused by opposition groups of bending the rules to favour
Mr Moi.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Danes confident on treaty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   COPENHAGEN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Danish prime minister, Mr Paul Schluter, yesterday said he was
optimistic of finding a solution to the country's Maastricht treaty problem
at the EC summit in Edinburgh next month despite the cool reaction of its
partners, writes Hilary Barnes in Copenhagen. He was speaking after meeting
the seven political parties which back the so-called 'national compromise'
calling for special arrangements for Denmark.
An opinion poll published in business newspaper Boersen yesterday indicated
that if there were a vote now on the national compromise, 45.2 per cent no,
with 16.8 per cent undecided.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / French face transport strikes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A wave of strikes will disrupt France's public transport this week, halting
the Paris Metro at rush hours and disrupting trains and airlines, according
to the unions, Reuter reports. Metro drivers are protesting at changes which
they say will mean longer working hours. The Communist-led CGT union has
called a 24-hour rail strike for Thursday and another a week later to demand
wage rises and protest against planned job cuts. Public transport unions
have called a 24-hour strike on November 27 in all provincial towns to back
wage claims. Pilots and ground staff at Air France are also to stop work on
November 27 in protest at plans to cut 5,000 jobs over three years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Bundesbank revises annualised M3 money supply growth rate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Bundesbank has revised the annualised M3 money supply growth rate for
September upwards to 9.3 per cent from 9.1 per cent, Reuter reported from
Frankfurt yesterday. M3 rose by an annualised 8.8 per cent in August. The
bank set a target of 3.5-5.5 per cent for the year, but concedes this target
cannot be met.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UN votes for tighter sanctions against Serbia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS at the UN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE UN Security council last night voted to tighten sanctions against
Serbia, empowering states to halt shipping, if necessary, and inspect
cargoes and destination documents.
The measure, aimed at Danube and Adriatic traffic, follows reports of
extensive violations of the UN embargo, particularly in oil shipments,
through falsified papers.
In approving the resolution without dissent, but with China and Zimbabwe
abstaining, Security Council members ignored an 11th-hour appeal by Mr Ilija
Djukic, Yugoslavia's foreign minister, for the lifting of sanctions. He
called the ban harsh, one-sided and unjust.
The rump state of Yugoslavia consists of Serbia and Montenegro.
There have been allegations of vessels flying the Greek and Maltese flags
violating the UN embargo. The governments of both countries have promised
investigations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World News in Brief: Russia's auction delayed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Russia will begin auctioning off shares in state-owned enterprises next
month rather than this because legislation requires notice of between two
weeks and one month for share auctions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7236</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: ACIL to make fresh offer to
repurchase receipts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIAN Consolidated Investments (ACIL), the Australian investment
company which owns the former Bell Resources, is making a second offer to
repurchase the receipts of convertible bondholders with whom they are
involved in a legal dispute.
The first offer closed last month with a level of 40 per cent acceptances.
The original dispute arose when bondholders tried to exercise a put option
providing for early repayment of principal at 117.7 per cent of par value on
November 13, 1991.
Instead, bonds were redeemed at 103 per cent of their par value, when the
company exercised its call option, and gave receipts to bondholders.
Earlier this year, the UK Court of Appeal decided in favour of the
investors, however ACIL has pursued the matter and is currently waiting for
the House of Lords to decide whether to allow an appeal.
The latest offer to buy back receipts is on the same terms as the first
offer, at a price of 10 cents on the dollar, compared with 14.7 cents a
dollar, if the Court of Appeal's decision is upheld.
However, a House of Lords appeal may take some considerable time.
Mr Colin Henson, executive director of ACIL, said yesterday that the appeal
will go ahead even if the company succeeds in buying back the majority of
receipts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7237</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Electricity rebates
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SCOTTISHPOWER, the elec tricity generator and distribu tor, is to pay
rebates totalling Pounds 20m to nearly 1.7m house holds because inflation
was lower than expected.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7238</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Disconnections up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE than 8,000 households had their water supply cut off for non-payment of
bills in the six months to the end of Sep tember, the industry regulator
Ofwat said yesterday. The fig ure was nearly 8 per cent higher than in the
same period last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7239</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Sell-off possible for Scots water
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT will today set out its options for bringing private-sector
capital into the Scottish water and sewerage industry. Although these are
likely to include pri vatisation by means of a stock market flotation, other
possi bilities are to be advanced.
Strong opposition to sation has arisen following the disclosure in July by
Mr Ian Lang, Scottish secretary, that he was looking at ways 'in which the
private sector might contribute enterprise and investment' to Scottish
water. An opinion poll showed only 4 per cent of Scots in favour of
privatisation.
Apart from creating compa nies and then selling them off, private capital
could be brought in by granting conces sions to run and invest in water
services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7240</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Tougher Citizen's Charter pledge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STRENGTHENING existing charters for public services rather than publishing a
stream of new ones will soon become the theme of the Citi zen's Charter
programme, Mr William Waldegrave, minister for public service, said last
night.
He said that the emphasis would shift to reviewing the 26 charters already
prepared, especially once charters had been published for the courts and for
further and higher edu cation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7241</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (14): Lighter vehicles may be
the key - Car population growth is outstripping gains in fuel economy and
cleanliness
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE world motor industry is driving hard for greater energy efficiency and
lower environmental impact, but it is still going backwards.
The relentless desire of the world's population to acquire or retain
personal mobility - still only just starting to be assuaged among many
populous Third World countries - means that vehicle population growth
continues to outpace gains in fuel efficiency.
On the environmental front the notable victory which, since the early 1970s,
the catalytic converter has scored against some exhaust pollutants - notably
acid rain-causing oxides of nitrogen - is now viewed as, if not pyrrhic,
then far from total.
The 'cat' may eliminate 90 per cent of nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide and
hydrocarbons.
But it can do little about carbon dioxide, an inescapable product of
combustion and which has leaped up the list of perceived culprits in
relation to global warming.
Indicative of the problem is that for every gallon of oil consumed by a car
in the form of fuel, about 19 pounds of carbon dioxide are released into the
atmosphere.
The measure of both the energy consumption and environmental problem becomes
even clearer when it is realised that in 1953 there were 53m cars on the
world's roads. Now there are 430m and the car population is being added to
at a rate of about 9.5m a year.
The world's truck and bus fleet is growing at a rate of about 3.6m units a
year and currently stands at around 140m. Add around 100m motorycles, the
population of which is growing at around 4m a year, and it is likely that by
as early as 2010 the total vehicle population will be approaching 1.1bn.
Engine design has been improving consistently, with precisely-metered fuel
injection systems, multi-valve cylinder heads, and variable ignition and
camshaft systems all contributing to improved fuel consumption per cubic
centimetre of engine capacity.
However, that is to consider the engine in isolation. Data from
organisations such as the US Environmental Protection Agency and Japan's
Ministry of Transport indicate that in the past few years fuel efficiency in
terms of overall miles per gallon has started to go backwards.
This is a consequence of consumers, their memories of oil crises fading
throughout the 1980s, demanding faster, more powerful cars fitted with many
more convenience systems such as central locking and electric sunroofs. Cars
have thus become heavier, and require comparatively more fuel to propel
them.
From next year, as increased concern about the environment and fuel
efficiency starts to work its way through the industry's vehicle design
processes, car and light truck mileage per gallon should start to increase
again. However, this can do no more than slow the rate of growth in demand
for vehicle fuels.
Greater energy efficiency in the transport sector in the broader sense
requires government policy actions on a wider front, stresses US motor
industry and energy consultant Michael Walsh.
The propensity of the developing world to follow industrial nations down the
road to private motorisation can be affected significantly by public policy
towards land use, housing and all forms of transport infrastructure, Mr
Walsh pointed out to a recent Institute of Mechanical Engineering conference
in London.
At the heart of such policies ought to lie housing planning to minimise the
incentive to use private motorised transport, between home and workplace for
example.
But the prognosis for the sprawling 'mega-cities' which have sprung up
haphazardly around some developing world capitals is hardly good. With
little strategically-planned housing, commercial or transport infrastructure
to cater to such populations, traffic congestion and high energy wastage
appear likely to eclipse that of developed world cities as income rises
sufficiently to make vehicles affordable to the majority.
The developed world, at least, is now committing, albeit belatedly,
substantial resources to addressing the problems.
At the vehicle technology level, added impetus has been given to research
and development by the recognition that, in increasing fuel efficiency
through reducing consumption, there are knock-on environmental benefits
through a pro rata reduction in carbon dioxide emissions.
Complementary to this is the encouragement being given in many countries to
greater use of public transport and of more intensive use of individual
cars.
In North America, for example, residents of cities from Seattle to
Washington are now well acclimatised to urban freeway lanes usable only by
cars with more than one occupant.
In Europe, through collaborative EC research projects such as the Prometheus
programme involving all indigenous European vehicle manufacturers, the
technology is being advanced which, by the end of the decade, should provide
European car and truck drivers with route guidance and congestion avoidance
advice systems expected significantly to lower fuel consumption through
avoiding wasted mileage and fuel-wasteful 'stop-start' motoring.
Cities like Munich, meanwhile, are experimenting with traffic advisory
systems aimed at eliminating much of the fuel wastage associated with
drivers simply cruising around seeking somewhere to park.
During one peak hour monitoring exercise in a corner of the city, some 70
per cent of cars on the move were found to be looking for somewhere to park.
The intention is to have permanent monitoring of all parking spaces
available in the city centre, with drivers being able to ascertain whether
space is available before setting out on a journey (and, city authorities
hope, opting to take public transport instead).
Synchronising traffic lights and reducing other obstacles to free traffic
flow are also seen as contributors to increased energy efficiency of road
transport.
While the primary objective of the 'red routes' - severely restricting
roadside parking - being introduced in London is to speed commuting traffic
flows, they, too, are playing a role in reducing fuel consumption by
reducing 'stop-start' and thus allowing engines to operate more efficiently.
Complementary to this approach is the planned reintroduction by Volkswagen
of 'eco' cars - in which the engine cuts out completely whenever the car is
motionless in traffic and restarted automatically when a gear is engaged and
the accelerator pressed.
It is an approach first tried by VW in the mid-1980s but which foundered
because of consumer reluctance to trust the engine to keep restarting.
Greater trust in car technology, however, is leading VW to try again.
The pursuit of greater energy efficiency through weight-saving in vehicles
is now firmly back on the agenda. Within the next three years Audi will
launch its first car incorporating an aluminium body - much lighter than
steel.
Other manufacturers are expected to follow the same route, to the extent
that aluminium is now expected to outpace composite plastics as the 'growth'
material of the 1990s. lt will go some way to offset the additional weight
of cars dictated by more complex on-board systems and ever more rigorous
safety standards.
In terms of whole-life energy efficiency, the old argument against aluminium
 -that it involves a far greater energy input to make than steel - is being
increasingly offset by its ability to be repeatedly recycled at low cost.
Downsizing of cars is also seen as a promising route to greater fuel
efficiency, with industry forecasts suggesting average per-vehicle fuel
consumption improvements of up to 35 per cent can be achieved by the year
2005 through a combination of smaller cars, new materials and engine
technology improvement, including a more widespread switch to economical
diesels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7242</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (15): Factories plug their leaks
 -Fuel costs keep heavy industry on its toes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ENORMOUS gains in energy efficiency have been achieved over the past 20
years by the world's manufacturing industries, which account for about 40
per cent of the world's energy use. But recession and energy policy
uncertainties have demoted efficiency measures in the list of industry's
priorities.
The major energy-intensive industries - pulp and paper, chemicals,
glass-making, iron and steel and non-ferrous metals - still recognise the
need for further improvements on top of the gains already made. Even so,
some large energy efficiency projects have been postponed to conserve cash.
In industries where energy is a much lower proportion of production costs,
the current record is rather patchier. Improvements, typically, are coming
indirectly from manufacturing initiatives such as reorganisation and newer
equipment which have been introduced for other reasons.
A book by energy experts Lee Schipper and Stephen Meyers, to be published in
the UK on Thursday*, chronicles the sharp reductions in energy intensity -
energy use divided by production - made by manufacturing industries in eight
key OECD countries between 1971 and 1988.
The largest reduction, 37 per cent, was in chemicals, followed by the stone,
clay and glass sector with a decline of 32 per cent, ferrous metals and
paper and pulp with 27 per cent each, and non-ferrous metals with 26 per
cent. Non-energy intensive industries also notched up a 37 per cent
reduction, reflecting the trend towards higher value per unit of physical
output as light manufacturing shifted towards 'high-tech' products.
While structural change within the main energy-intensive sectors inevitably
played a part in this achievement, the authors believe that most of the
decline was due to the reduction in the energy intensity of producing
particular products.
Three main factors contributed to this, they say: improvements in operations
and maintenance, and retrofits with low-cost equipment; changes in process
equipment or 'add-on' energy technologies requiring significant investment;
and introduction of new production processes, often involving construction
of a new facility.
In the UK, combinations of these options have been widely introduced by the
main energy-intensive sectors, which are well aware of the sensitivity of
energy efficiency in the broader environmental context. Investments can
range from building an entire combined heat and power (CHP) plant to
purchasing the latest 'widget' to control energy use in a particular
production process.
Over the past two years, total UK investment in energy efficiency has fallen
by 28 per cent, according to the Association for the Conservation of Energy.
Industry, it says, has probably been affected as badly as the residential
sector, although manufacturers with high energy costs are continuing to
spend.
The overall reduction in investment masks some big variations. Spending on
CHP projects has been less affected by the recession than other
energy-efficiency investments, such as control equipment or cavity wall
insulation.
There are about 140 CHP projects in the industrial and commercial sector -
the most recent was a 7.5MW plant developed by BP Energy for English China
Clays near St. Austell, Cornwall, and opened last month.
Mr David Green, director of the Combined Heat &amp; Power Association,
attributes the relative buoyancy of CHP to the higher priority given to
energy efficiency because of the general 'greening of industry', and the
fact that companies with more than 1 megawatt of annual demand can now shop
around for their power needs. CHP consequently becomes an issue worth
looking at.
CHP can cut companies' power bills by 30 per cent, and most companies can
make savings of 20 per cent, he says. It is because CHP can achieve this,
and reduce the UK's carbon dioxide emissions, that the Government has set a
target of at least doubling the current 2,000MW of CHP capacity by the end
of the century.
If companies are holding back from investing in CHP, says Mr Green, it is
not because of the cost but because of the general uncertainty over UK
energy policy, and remaining regulatory barriers to CHP which the
association is working to have lifted. These include obstacles to the export
of excess power generated at one site to an adjacent company.
In the UK, ICI is a classic example of a company - and an industry - where
controlling energy costs, and understanding the close link between energy
efficiency and emissions, is crucial for business success. Over the past 20
years, ICI's worldwide production has more than doubled while energy use has
been reduced by 10 per cent and carbon dioxide emissions cut by 20 per cent.
Further reductions in energy use will come with the completion of the Enron
power station at Wilton on Teesside, which will provide ICI's Wilton site
with a significant proportion of its steam and power, and replace several
older facilities.
As for improving process efficiency, design and technology changes have
reduced the energy consumption per tonne of ammonia produced by two-thirds
in ICI's modern plants, compared with the old coke-based process.
In the steel industry, constant improvements in energy efficiency are being
made at individual plants. An example unveiled last month at British Steel's
bloom and billet mill in Scunthorpe involves a bank of frequency inverters
produced by the Powys-based Control Techniques.
The 25 inverters enable the speed of the combustion air fans on the mill's
soaking pits to be varied between 360rpm and 2,400rpm - they previously ran
at a constant 3,000rpm. The energy saved this year will be enough to keep
the whole mill running for a week.
Another major energy user, the glass industry, has focused its efforts on
the manufacturing processes to reduce energy consumption, along with glass
recycling. Fuel for melting can be 20 to 25 per cent of manufacturing costs,
and improvements in refractory technology and in regenerators have made a
big difference both to product quality and energy efficiency. Furnace
insulation has also been shown to reduce heat loss by 50 per cent.
And some relatively low users of energy have also made impressive gains in
energy efficiency. The UK brewing industry consumes more than Pounds 50m of
energy a year - only about 3 per cent of production costs. But, according to
Dr David Long of the Brewers Society, the average energy consumption to
produce a litre of beer has fallen from 3.03 megajoules in 1976 to 1.97 in
1990.
Some allowance, he says must be made for brewery amalgamations and closures,
but that is offset by increased automation and the continuing swing to lager
which have added to the electricity load.
For the future, the major energy users will continue whittling away at their
costs - and are being encouraged to do so by government agencies and
industry organisations. One of ICI's key environmental objectives
established last year was to implement an even more rigorous energy and
resource conservation programme, from which substantial benefits are
expected by 1995.
There is also growing recognition that smaller companies need more help
finding out about energy efficiency measures, and a need to end what ACE
sees as a general reluctance to look at 'low-tech' solutions such as
insulation.
* Energy Efficiency and Human Activity: Past Trends, Future Prospects.
Cambridge University Press.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7243</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (13): Answer to a miner's prayer
 -Coal still has some tricks up its sleeve
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOVERNMENTS, power engineering manufacturers and coal companies are spending
more than Dollars 1bn a year between them on a worldwide research and
development effort, intended to transform dirty coal into a fuel that can
match the cleanness and efficiency of natural gas.
One demonstration of what can be achieved is AES Shady Point, a 320MW
cogeneration plant in Oklahoma, which has low emissions not only of sulphur
and nitrogen oxides but even of carbon dioxide. Two hundred tonnes a day of
CO are extracted chemically from the flue gases (using a solution of
monoethanolamine) and, after purification, sold for carbonating soft drinks.
The new coal-burning technologies - fluidised bed combustion (FBC) and
integrated gasification combined cycle (IGCC) - can bring sulphur and
nitrogen pollution levels down almost to the levels achieved with natural
gas.
But their net efficiency (40 to 43 per cent) is still well below the 52 per
cent of the best natural gas combined cycle (NGCC) plants. And even if their
efficiency matched natural gas, they would still contribute more to the
greenhouse effect. When burned, coal inevitably produces more CO than gas,
which contains far more hydrogen combined with the carbon.
The idea of large-scale removal of CO from power station flue gases was
generally regarded until a couple of years ago as too fantastic to
contemplate - and some experts believe it is still a fantasy. Although it is
possible to extract CO, as AES Shady Point demonstrates, the costs of the
process and the billions of tonnes per year of CO added to the atmosphere
through fossil fuel burning seem prohibitive.
Recent studies under the International Energy Agency's Greenhouse Gas R&amp;D
Programme suggest, however, that CO capture and long-term disposal may after
all be technically feasible, environmentally acceptable and economically
bearable.
Industrial users (in chemicals, oil recovery and food and drink
manufacturing) could consume only very small amounts of recovered CO.
Somewhat larger quantities could be pumped into old mines or oil and gas
fields, but in the long term the only option for disposal is pumping liquid
CO into the ocean depths.
Preliminary estimates suggest that CO scrubbing and disposal in a North Sea
gas field would add about 40 per cent to the cost of electricity generated
by a IGCC plant - a huge burden but not totally prohibitive if the
greenhouse effect turns out to be a more serious global threat than most
scientists believe today.
For the next decade, however, the priority will be to make the coal
combustion process itself as clean and efficient as possible.
There is 'a ferment of innovation' in coal burning, says Walter Patterson,
energy analyst and author of a recent FT Management Report on coal
technology.* 'The world's engineering companies and their enlightened
clients are spending very large sums indeed, in a hectic race to expand the
range of advanced coal use technologies, improve their efficiency and
enhance their environmental performance,' he says. 'What is more, they are
succeeding.'
Thirty-eight clean coal plants are operating in the US, where coal's share
of the electricity generating market is increasing and the federal
government and industry are jointly funding a Dollars 5bn clean coal
programme over five years.
In Europe and Asia too, scores of advanced coal burning plants are being
planned and built. But in the UK, where much of the original research into
clean coal technology was carried out, the level of activity is now very low
compared with other countries with substantial coal industries.
British Coal's clean coal test facility at Grimethorpe in Yorkshire closed
down earlier this year, though work is continuing at the Coal Research
Establishment at Stoke Orchard, Gloucestershire. But CRE's future after the
planned cuts and privatisation of British Coal is also uncertain.
All the main generating equipment manufacturers are involved to a greater or
lesser extent in developing FBC and IGCC systems.
Most of the clean coal power stations developed so far use fluidised bed
combustion (FBC). This involves burning powdered coal in a bed of pulverised
limestone, which acts as a chemical trap for any sulphur emitted from the
fuel. An upward flow of air keeps the bed in constant motion like a boiling
kettle. One turbine is driven by steam produced in boiler tubes in the
fluidised bed and a second by the hot exhaust gases.
The main variants are circulating fluidised bed combustion (CFBC), in which
the air flows so fast that the bed loses its top surface and fills the
combustion chamber with a swirling cloud of fine particles, and pressurised
fluidised bed combustion (PFBC), in which the whole chamber operates at
between five to 20 atmospheres pressure.
Integrated gasification combined cycle (IGCC) plants have a gasifier in
which coal reacts with steam and oxygen to produce a raw fuel gas containing
carbon monoxide, hydrogen and methane. This gas is cleaned chemically to
remove pollutants before firing in a gas turbine to generate electricity.
The hot exhaust then produces steam to power another turbine.
FBC plants are particularly well suited for burning coal of low or variable
quality and for cogeneration (producing both electricity and heat). IGCC
plants offer better performance when good quality coal is available, though
the technology is less well developed than FBC. The next important
development will be the opening, scheduled for 1993, of a 285MW IGCC
demonstration plant designed by Shell at Buggenum in the Netherlands.
Further improvements may be possible through combining the best features of
IGCC and FBC. One hybrid is British Coal's proposed topping cycle
technology.
British Coal has formed a consortium with PowerGen, the electricity
generator, and GEC Alsthom, the Anglo-French generating equipment
manufacturer, to develop the topping cycle. Chris Buck of GEC Alsthom says
the group is 'enthusiastic' about building an experimental 75MW plant to
demonstrate the technology, which would have export potential. But it cannot
go ahead until uncertainties about support for the project and the future of
British Coal are resolved.
Dawes accepts that no clean coal plant built in the UK today can generate
electricity as cheaply as a new natural gas plant, because the latter is
technically so much simpler that its capital costs and non-fuel operating
expenses are inevitably lower. Early in the next century, however, lower
fuel costs for coal could tip the balance against gas.
Advocates of coal gasification point out that the technology offers
utilities a flexible approach to building new power stations. They can start
by installing a turbine generator burning natural gas, then add a coal
gasifier when the price of natural gas rises high enough to switch to coal
and finally fit a steam turbine - completing the integrated combined cycle -
when extra capacity is required.
*Coal-Use Technology In a Changing Environment, Financial Times Management
Reports, Pounds 215.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7244</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (12): As free as the wind -
There's nothing quixotic about renewables
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE range of renewable energy sources potentially available to replace
fossil fuels and nuclear power is bewilderingly large.
Wind, hydro, tidal, wave, geothermal, solar, biomass and industrial and
municipal wastes all have passionate advocates - and one problem for
governments supporting research and development into alternative energy is
knowing how to allocate funds between different technologies.
A study carried out last year for the UK government by the Energy Technology
Support Unit (ETSU) at Harwell concluded that it would be technically
feasible to generate 25,000 MW - about half of the country's current
electricity requirement - from renewable sources by 2010. That would require
today's meagre renewable generating capacity to be increased 100-fold over
the next two decades.
In practice it will not be possible to build up alternative energy sources
as rapidly as that. The UK government's target for renewables is a modest 2
per cent of generating capacity by 2000; Greenpeace, the environmental
pressure group, says 10 per cent is a realistic target for then.
The main sources are:
WIND power, generally thought to have the best prospects in the UK, the most
consistently windy country in Europe. According to the ETSU report, its
technical potential is huge - 17,000 MW onshore and 12,000 MW offshore by
2010. The Greenpeace scenario would mean building 6,000 to 9,000 wind
turbines onshore and 500 to 1,500 offshore by the turn of the century. The
turbines vary in diameter from 25 metres up to 100 metre monsters.
California is leading the worldwide development of windpower; the state
already has 15,000 turbines, grouped in large 'wind farms' along mountain
ridges, with a total generating capacity of 1,500 MW. In Europe, Denmark is
ahead, with 320 MW of wind power installed.
Wind power may be clean but it is visually obtrusive. Planning applications
to build wind farms in the UK are already being opposed by people who see
them as potential blots on beautiful landscapes. Indeed planning problems
may eventually scupper many of the 58 wind projects proposed in the UK.
Offshore turbines would not meet such objections but they are more expensive
than onshore wind farms.
WAVE power was regarded in the 1970s as the most promising alternative
energy source - some enthusiasts went so far as to predict then that wave
energy would provide half of UK electricity demand in the next century. The
government's wave power R&amp;D programme investigated 300 devices. But the wide
range of wave heights encountered off the British coastline made the
engineering and anchoring of wave devices more difficult and expensive than
expected, and the programme was scaled down during the 1980s.
Now the UK R&amp;D programme focuses on small shore-based devices. A prototype
75 kilowatt (KW) device is being tested on the Scottish island of Islay. But
ETSU put the total potential capacity of wave power no higher than 130
megawatts (MW).
TIDAL power seems a more promising technology for harnessing the energy of
the oceans. Indeed a 240MW tidal barrage has been operating successfully on
the Rance estuary in France since 1967.
In the UK, the much-discussed Severn Barrage could generate up to 8,000MW of
electricity, as much as six large nuclear reactors and enough to satisfy 6
per cent of the country's power demand. The trouble is that it would cost an
estimated Pounds 9bn to build - more than the public or private sector could
be expected to put up under current circumstances. A smaller project which
has also been proposed is the 700MW Mersey Barrage, though this would
inevitably cause extensive environmental changes in the wetlands around the
Mersey estuary.
GEOTHERMAL energy - making use of heat within the earth - is another power
source which looked more promising in the 1970s than it does today in the
UK. But prospects are much brighter elsewhere in the world.
Geothermal plants in Europe are predicted to reach a total capacity of
1,500MW of power and 7,000MW of heat generation by 2000, but experts say the
future of geothermal energy lies in the Mediterranean basin rather than
northern Europe.
HYDRO-electricity cannot expand on a large scale in the UK without causing
unacceptable environmental damage. Even so, there is scope for adding
unobtrusive small-scale hydro generating equipment on some rivers. ETSU said
this could add up to a significant 500MW of capacity by 2010.
SOLAR energy has considerable potential even in the cool cloudy British
climate. The traditional means of exploiting the sun's energy is to use it
to heat up water or air. But recently scientists have been making rapid
progress in improving the efficiency of photovoltaic cells which convert
solar radiation directly into electricity.
The ETSU report put the potential capacity of photovoltaic electricity in
the UK at 7,000MW but concluded it would be too expensive for widespread
application. However, the latest research into photovoltaic cells suggests
that they could compete with other renewable energies.
BIOMASS energy, derived from growing plants and trees for fuel, is
attracting increasing funds for research and development throughout the
world. By 2010 the UK could be generating 3,000MW of electricity by burning
trees and straw, according to ETSU. Greenpeace believes 370MW is realistic
by 2,000 - equivalent to 300,000 tonnes per year of trees and straw.
The most promising biomass technique for the UK may be to grow willow or
poplar in a system known as arable coppice, in which cuttings are planted at
very high densities (10,000 trees per hectare) and harvested by machine
every three to five years. If all land used for over-producing food were
used for energy crops, the equivalent of 10m tonnes of coal could be
produced.
In summary, it seems today that the renewable energy sources with the
greatest potential under UK conditions are first of all wind power, followed
by solar, tidal and biomass. But all of them will need to be nurtured for
several years through some form of subsidy if they are to come at all close
to achieving their full potential.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7245</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (11): Cleaner, sweeter, hotter -
Andrew Baxter explains why gas fired turbines are hurting coal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE arguments rage about the future of the UK coal industry, the privatised
electricity generators and the new independent producers continue investing
heavily in combined cycle gas turbine (CCGT) power stations.
Whatever the merits of this strategy for UK energy policy, and however much
critics complain that the UK is building far too much generating capacity
for its needs, it is clear that CCGT using natural gas has established
itself virtually worldwide as the most energy-efficient method of thermal
power generation in bulk.
Energy efficiency has become one of the major reasons for the success of
CCGT, although not the only one. Compared with traditional large coal-fired
plants, shorter construction times, reduced emissions and lower capital
costs - because the plants are usually slightly smaller - are also important
reasons for their success.
For the uninitiated, combined-cycle plants take the exhaust gases from a gas
turbines through a waste heat recovery boiler to generate steam, which in
turn powers a steam turbine. This means that thermal efficiency - the amount
of energy from the fuel that can be converted into electricity - can be as
high as 55 per cent for CCGT, depending on the design of the plant and its
use.
That compares with 40 per cent for the best coal-fired generation, and about
35 and 43 per cent for simple-cycle gas turbine and steam turbine power
plants respectively.
As for nuclear power, high thermal efficiencies are less of a priority than
controlling capital costs, and the relatively low temperature of steam
produced by pressurised water reactors (PWRs) and boiling water reactors
(BWRs) limits the thermal efficiency to little more than 30 per cent,
according to Steve Thomas and Francis McGowan of Sussex University's Science
Policy Research Unit*.
Raising energy efficiency is partly a financial priority - it clearly makes
sense for electricity generators to get the most from their fuel resources.
Mr Mike Sharpe, director of power generation at Siemens UK, says that every
one percentage point of thermal efficiency gained is worth about Pounds 3m a
year in additional revenue for the operator of a typical 1,000MW combined
cycle plant.
Clearly, however, the environmental aspect of efficient fuel use is
important. Not only is the CCGT process inherently less pollutive, it is
also a more efficient use of fossil fuels which have taken millions of years
to create and can only be used once.
In January, Siemens claimed a new world record for commercial thermal power
plant efficiency with a rating of 52.5 per cent at the 1,350MW Ambarli
project near Istanbul. The result was obtained in acceptance trials on the
first of three 450MW 'gas and steam blocks,' and the peak load figure was
higher still at 53.2 per cent.
With the new General Electric Frame 9F gas turbines and the latest series
from Siemens, thermal efficiency of around 55 per cent is now possible, and
the financial savings for their customers make it worthwhile for the
equipment producers to continue raising the threshold.
The consensus in the industry is that thermal efficiency can be further
improved. 'I think there is the capability for efficiency to approach 60 per
cent as the years go by,' says Mr Sharpe. GEC Alsthom's European Gas
Turbines unit (EGT), meanwhile, believes it could take a decade a more for
the target to be achieved.
Improving the efficiency of CCGT could be particularly important in the UK
if the forecasts of generating overcapacity prove correct. Depending on the
design, some CCGT plants suffer quite sharp losses of efficiency if they are
not operated at peak loads.
Even reaching 60 per cent, however, will depend on success for a number of
separate technology developments. In the power generation process itself,
achieving higher firing temperatures in the gas turbine will be crucial -
the hotter the gas turbine, the greater will be the exhaust temperature.
General Electric's 9F turbines are the hottest in the world at 1,260 degC,
giving an exhaust temperature of 583 degC. Raising gas turbine temperatures
to 1,500 degC over the next few years will require further steady advances
in blade design and materials, and in cooling systems.
But there are challenges. If the process design requires a gas supply at
high pressure, a considerable amount of energy will be taken up powering a
compressor, says Mr Sharpe.
Environmental concerns also play a part in the efficiency equation. For
example, the best source of coolant for a turbine is usually water from a
nearby river, which can be returned after use. When this is not possible,
cooling towers can be used, but are often considered unacceptable for
environmental reasons.
A solution is a dry condensing system which does not need water but can
reduce overall efficiency by half a percentage point. In very cold
temperatures, however, the system can be more efficient than a cooling
tower, according to Mr Sharpe.
Another important contribution to greater efficiency will come from
increasingly sophisticated computer models controlling the operation of CCGT
plants. Their aim is to optimise the power station's performance by striking
the right balance between the use of the gas turbine and the steam turbine
as power demand ebbs and flows.
Although CCGT has won converts from power producers worldwide, proponents of
small-scale power plants never tire of reminding the power industry that
even CCGT wastes virtually half of its fuel's energy. In contrast, combined
heat and power (CHP), which turns the waste heat into steam or hot water for
use by industry or in the home, regularly achieves efficiencies of 75-80 per
cent, and 90 per cent has been recorded in some cases.
Although there would be no theoretical problems with a large-scale CHP
plant, the challenge frequently would be to make use of the large quantities
of heat produced by a plant similar in size to the CCGT stations now in
vogue.
On a smaller-scale, CHP may be much more efficient but normally requires
infrastructural spending on distribution if used for, say, district heating.
But there are hundreds of successful examples of such applications,
especially in Scandinavia, and some have been around a relatively long time,
such as a 20-year-scheme in Nottingham which harnesses a refuse incineration
plant and a coal-fired power station to provide sufficient power for 2,000
dwellings.
*The World Market for Heavy Equipment. Nuclear Engineering International
Special Publications, 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7246</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (10): Moment of truth in a North
London semi - David Lascelles had a shock when his house was audited
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GETTING your own home rated for energy efficiency
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
or lack of it - can be a moment of truth.
I recently asked the National Home Energy Rating scheme to look at our North
London semi-detached. It was not exactly designed with energy efficiency in
mind. Built just before the first World War, it has large rooms and high
ceilings which eat up heat. A wide bay at one corner of the house is more
window than wall, and the attic is poorly insulated.
Even so, we have tried over the 15 years we have owned it to cut down heat
waste. Eight years ago, we installed a new gas boiler, and we fitted
individual thermostatic valves to all the radiators. We draught-proofed
doors, double glazed most of the windows and blocked up unused fireplaces.
We also converted most of the loft into a playroom, and sealed it off from
the rest of the house with its own separate heating arrangements.
Even so, Vic Harrison, our assessor, broke the bad news. After feeding all
the information into his portable computer he told us that we rated only 2.5
on the NHER scale of one to 10. What's more, we were contributing more than
20 tonnes a year to the carbon dioxide in the atmosphere. In short, the
house was a bit of a disaster.
Two things pulled us down badly. One was the loft which Harrison said was
letting out lots of heat, despite all the boarding and carpeting we had put
in. The other was our 'new' boiler which turned out to be hugely
inefficient, spewing half its heat up the flue.
Harrison's computer was uncannily accurate in guessing what our gas and
electricity bills amounted to: Pounds 1,500 a year, which made it difficult
to challenge its rating.
So what could we do about it? The computer's main recommendation was to
install a new boiler of the gas condensing type. Although this would cost
Pounds 1,700, it would save us Pounds 196 a year, giving us a payback of
just under nine years.
Predictably, the computer also advised us to insulate the loft properly at a
cost of Pounds 850. This would save us Pounds 275 a year, a payback of just
over three years.
With various other bits and pieces, including thicker insulation on the hot
water tank, the computer's total recommendations added up to Pounds 3,010.
This would produce savings of Pounds 516 a year, paying for itself in just
under six years. In so doing we would raise our rating to 4.9, which is just
above the national average, and cut our carbon dioxide emissions to only 12
tonnes a year.
The big question now is: will we do it? Three thousand pounds seems an awful
lot of money to spend, particularly at a time when domestic gas prices are
set to go down, not up.
And how can we be sure that the promised savings will materialise? Will we
even stay in the house long enough to earn the payback. And if we don't will
the house command a higher price in the market because of the extra work we
carry out?
Our initial reaction is to sit tight: there are too many uncertainties.
Besides, with a bit of effort - draught-proofing some windows, turning down
the radiator valves a notch - we can probably achieve savings without
spending any money at all. I'm sure the experience will also have a
subliminal effect: we'll be more energy-conscious without even realising it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7247</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (9): It's all a matter of will -
Known techniques can bring big rewards
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW WARREN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EVER since the UK's Energy Efficiency Office was set up just prior to the
1983 election, there has been a recurring theme concerning the potential
savings that can be achieved by following the advice it proffers.
A succession of energy and environment ministers - and, for that matter, two
Prime Ministers - have gone on record, stating that the use of
cost-effective technology and techniques could cut existing bills 'by at
least 20 per cent'.
During this period only the relevant savings figures have altered. In 1983,
the UK spent Pounds 35bn per year on fuel; knocking 20 per cent off that
figure would have saved Pounds 7bn each year. In 1992 ministers now put the
total UK energy bill at Pounds 50bn - and the concomitant saving at Pounds
10bn.
Such savings each year from fuel bills could then be spent on other goods
and services. The economy would benefit from the increased cash flow, jobs
would be generated by the extra spending, and the capital expenditure would
be recouped - but in how long?
In its evidence prepared for the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change
(which itself did much of the groundwork for this summer's Earth Summit in
Rio de Janeiro) the Government estimated in detail what could be achieved
'if consumers were to take up the easily attainable and economically
attractive opportunities that are available'. It later published this work
(through the Stationery Office as Energy Paper 58).
The truth is that this 20 per cent savings figure is predicated on the use
of well-established techniques rather than new technologies. These primarily
are 'good housekeeping' (eg mending broken windows, servicing vehicles,
closing doors) and 'monitoring and targeting' of performance (eg logging
fuel bills). Beyond that are 'retrofit investments with a payback period of
around two years'.
The technologies which have qualified for inclusion within the basic two
year payback period have varied over the years, according to the price of
fuels. But given the tightness of the requirement, they are currently
relatively few: draughtproofing, compact fluorescent lightbulbs, some
insulation, some thermostatic controls, a few industrial motors.
However, the Government report does acknowledge that the potential savings
are very different, if alternative qualifying criteria are used. If
investments with a five year payback period were permissible; if the best
available economic techniques were always deployed (the BATNEEC principle);
if energy efficiency was automatically the primary consideration - then the
cumulative saving potential would be very different.
Most tellingly, the Government researchers urged that allowance should be
made for further developments in the effectiveness of various energy-saving
techniques, across the 15-year period under consideration.
Putting all these criteria together the cumulative savings potential on the
current energy bill becomes not 20 per cent, but 60 per cent of current
levels. There is little doubt that, of the new measures which tripled this
figure, the one most likely to deliver is the development of new
energy-saving technologies. Or, more likely, the streamlining of many
existing technologies to make them even more effective.
In practice, it is the only one the market-place is likely to welcome
without some external stimuli - such as tougher standards or offering
taxbreaks or grants to shorten five-year payback periods.
Even so, there are many examples of energy saving techniques and
technologies which are not installed or used, despite their apparent
economic sense.
That has been one of the main motivations behind the European Commission's
THERMIE scheme. It is specifically intended to promote the rapid
implementation of the best new energy technologies. As such, it can play a
critical role in improving energy conservation and the use of renewable
energies.
Between 1975 and 1992, the UK received support of Pounds 218m (Ecu312m) from
THERMIE and its predecessor programmes. For both hydrocarbons and solid fuel
research, the UK received easily its fair share of resources.
But Britain has not done so well for funds from energy saving, or for
renewable energy; it obtained only 12 per cent and 10 per cent respectively
of the budget, although its fair share is closer to 18 per cent.
For 1993, THERMIE is due to enter a new phase. Increasingly, it will
concentrate upon technologies designed to reduce environmental damaging
emissions of carbon dioxide and sulphur dioxide.
Over recent months many other schemes designed by the EC to assist energy
saving have been decimated.
The wide-ranging legislative programme intended to upgrade energy efficiency
standards, under the SAVE banner, has effectively become voluntary - and is
thus likely to prove far less effective in reducing energy consumption, and
hence carbon emissions.
Legislation which has been approved, (like that on domestic gas boilers),
will effectively deliver only one-third of the emissions savings originally
identified. The ALTENER scheme for renewables is far less ambitious than
originally projected.
Which makes the success of the THERMIE programme all the more important. A
budget of Pounds 250m (Ecu350m) has been allocated by the EC to THERMIE for
1993 and 1994 alone.
Bids for 1993 have to be submitted by December 1, 1992.
To alert British businesses of this opportunity to the potential, the
Department of Trade and Industry has been mounting a series of briefing
seminars around the country. The DTI official in charge, David Irving, says:
'We would like to see even better results in the current THERMIE round. But
that depends in the first instance on British industry coming up with good
ideas.'
There is undoubtedly an enormous potential market, not just in Britain but
throughout Europe, for energy conservation equipment.
Mr Irving's boss, Michael Heseltine, the President of the Board of Trade,
has identified a Pounds 230bn market across the EC alone for technologies
intended to combat global warming.
It is a market for which the main economic powerhouses - Germany, Japan,
America - have all set up specific programmes intended to gain a substantial
slice of the action.
But Britain's market for energy efficiency equipment has recently been
sliding backwards, not forwards. Investment levels are down 28 per cent in
two years.
The potential, however, remains enormous. So great as even to dwarf the 20
per cent reduction target set way back in 1983, and which is still far from
being achieved.
Andrew Warren is director of the Association for the Conservation of Energy
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7248</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (7): A special breed of savers -
Deborah Hargreaves meets the contract energy managers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FROM energy-saving light bulbs to the installation of their own power
plants, companies across the UK are perceiving the benefits of efficient
energy management.
Even moderate users of fuel can make significant cost savings by conserving
energy and, in the current recession, all efforts at reducing costs are
under review.
In an attempt to cut down spending on energy, many industrial users, as well
as public and private institutions are contracting out the management of
energy consumption and resources to specialist operations.
Mr John Ashcroft, managing director of AHS Emstar, the UK's largest contract
energy manager, says the company has seen a steady climb in business in
recent years, 'which hasn't in any way been diluted by the recession'.
Contract energy managers offer to make cost-savings for their customers
which range from the largest companies to public libraries, leisure centres
and hospitals, by taking over the responsibility for energy provision.
Energy saving is not just about turning off unnecessary lights: these
specialist companies offer a variety of services ranging from fuel
purchasing to funding the installation of a company's own power plant which
the contract manager will then operate.
Mr Simon Lloyd, business development manager at BP Energy, an offshoot of
British Petroleum, reckons a company can look to save 10 per cent or more in
its energy costs by bringing in outside managers.
Contract energy management companies will provide tailor-made contracts for
their customers which can be as complex or as simple as required. But, in
many cases, a manager is developing a strategy for a company in the
rapidly-changing UK energy market.
'The energy market has started to look more complicated following the
government's privatisation initiatives and many of our customers are not
geared up to searching for fuel at the best price,' said Mr Ashcroft. The
company will build up an approach to the energy market with its corporate
customer stretching over a period of time. The contract manager will force
down costs and keep them down, regularly reporting energy costs to the
company's management - 'there is a danger that in some companies energy
management becomes flavour of the month and is then forgotten about, but you
can't afford to turn your back on it as the energy market is rapidly
changing and strategies need constant updating.'
This is why typical contracts with energy managers extend over five to 10
years and often longer. BP Energy, for example, recently embarked on a
10-year contract with English China Clays to provide a combined heat and
power station for the company's Par Harbour site - its largest facility
which has an energy bill of Pounds 4m a year.
While helping to cut the company's overall energy costs, the new plant will
also reduce English China Clays' exposure to electricity price volatility as
well as cutting down its emissions of greenhouse gases.
Combined heat and power schemes (CHP) provide many environmental benefits
for large energy users. AHS Emstar has provided Northumbrian Water with a
plant for recycling energy which offers significant cost savings. The
operation involves heating sewage sludge and collecting the bio-gas given
off. This is then passed through a CHP plant where it is used to generate
electricity to run the pumps at the sewage plant. The heat generated is used
again to heat up the sludge.
The specialist contract energy management company will often provide access
to funding for CHP plants and other installations which are then largely
paid for in cost savings made for the company. AHS Emstar recently provided
Pounds 10m for Tunnel Refineries to build a CHP plant which is saving the
company Pounds 500,000 a year in energy costs.
The recession is forcing many companies to reduce energy bills, but contract
energy management companies estimate that their services have touched very
few of the UK's potential customers.
Mr Ashcroft reckons that eight per cent of the potential market is being
supplied at a total value of roughly Pounds 200m a year. Mr Lloyd says that
turnover at BP Energy has doubled in the past two years as awareness of
contract energy management has grown, along with a trend that has led many
companies to contract-out various corporate functions.
AHS Emstar was created a year ago by the merger of Associated Heat Services
with Emstar, previously part of the Shell group. The company now offers a
panoply of energy management services as well as bulk purchasing for fuel.
However, companies specialising in specific areas of the energy management
business are also carving a niche in the market. Ex-Or, for example, is a
company which designs and produces energy saving lighting control systems
for industrial and commercial use. The company has recently set up a system
for Marks and Spencer's largest warehouse at Hayes in Middlesex which
ensures that lighting is turned off on the building's 249 storage racks when
they are unattended. Since lighting can make up three-quarters of the
electricity costs for such a facility, switching the lights off can make
huge savings.
Contract energy management is a growth area in spite of the declining size
of many UK companies. So far, intensive energy users such as paper
processing plants and industrial processes which require a lot of fuel have
proved the most eager customers. But the energy managers claim that most
industrial and commercial operations have much to gain from taking their
energy needs in hand. With only a tiny percentage of the potential market
supplied, contract energy management could be one of the few growth areas in
the current recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7249</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (8): Overheated and
under-insulated - Homes are often the biggest source of waste
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE private home is one of the world's great energy wasters. But experience
shows that people who can afford to make their homes more efficient cannot
be bothered to, while those who most need to save energy lack the means to
do it.
In a report on energy efficiency and the environment published last year,
the International Energy Agency pointed up another problem: people only tend
to make major energy improvements when they build a new home or change
houses. The report says: 'Though the technical potential for energy
efficiency improvements in heating and cooling end-uses might be
substantial, savings are limited by the slow turnover of the building
stock.'
A large proportion of energy efficiency campaigns are aimed at breaking this
vicious circle. The British government launched its latest one at the end of
last month. 'Helping the Earth begins at home' will run for three years with
a budget of Pounds 10m to drive home the message from the Earth Summit about
the dangers of energy waste and global warming.
Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary, said: 'By taking the right
measures every home could save Pounds 100 a year and reduce its carbon
dioxide contribution by one and a half tonnes, a cut of 20 per cent.'
The campaign is aimed at encouraging people to insulate roofs, lag water
tanks and turn off lights. House insulation is important because space
heating accounts for 57 per cent of energy consumption. The department of
the environment reports that between 1974 and 1989 the percentage of houses
with loft insulation rose from 42 per cent to 89 per cent. It estimates that
domestic energy efficiency measures have reduced the consumption of
delivered energy by around 32 per cent between 1970 and 1990.
But in spite of these signs of improvement, there is still a long way to go.
The National Energy Foundation, based in Milton Keynes, Britain's energy
efficiency 'capital', has developed an energy efficiency rating scheme for
private homes. Though still in its infancy and so far applied only to fewer
than 1m of the UK's 21m homes, the results have been revealing.
The average British home rates only four on a scale where a score of 10 is
ultra-efficient. Of the total stock, 11m are estimated to be below the
national average. Although there has been substantial improvement in recent
years, the IEA ranks the UK 10th out of the 11 top industrial countries in
terms of the energy required to heat domestic dwellings (only Austria fares
worse). The NEF estimates that if all homes were improved by only one rating
point, the resulting energy savings would be Pounds 2.2bn a year, or 4.5 per
cent of the national energy bill. The reduction in carbon dioxide emissions
would be 24m tonnes, a cut of four per cent.
So why are these savings not being achieved?
Mr Richard Tinson, the NEF's director, blames an energy policy that is
tilted too far towards the supply side. When the gas and electricity
industries were privatised in the 1980s, the government did not want to do
anything to hurt their markets. 'There is a lack of political will,' he
says.
He would like to see a proportion of energy spending - say one per cent of
the Pounds 20bn spent to heat, power and light building in the UK each year
 -redirected into efficiency work.
One aspect of the problem is a tax system which places VAT on building
supplies but exempts domestic fuels, making it cheaper for people to burn
more fuel than buy loft insulation. Against this, however, investment in
insulation should provide a return in terms of energy savings which is tax
free. Any tax on domestic fuel would hit low income households
disproportionately hard, which is why the government is unlikely to
introduce one without parallel benefits.
Another problem is a regulatory regime which has traditionally rewarded
suppliers more on the basis of how much they sell than how much they
conserve. While both Offer, the electricity regulator and Ofgas, its gas
counterpart, are supposed to encourage energy efficiency, there are limits
to their powers.
However, Ofgas took a step forward earlier this year when it introduced an
'E factor' into the price formula regulating domestic gas. This will allow
British Gas to pass on any costs which it incurs in the cause of improving
energy efficiency, though these will have to be approved by Ofgas first.
On the other hand, Prof. Stephen Littlechild, the electricity regulator,
concluded after recent consultations on energy efficiency not to create an E
factor for electricity. Instead, he believes that promoting competition will
encourage generators and distributors to go for the most efficient forms of
energy. However, the consequence of this could be lower energy prices in the
home, and therefore less incentive to save there.
Much of the effort of British Gas and many of the electric utilities will be
channelled through a newly-formed Energy Saving Trust, an independent entity
chaired by Lord Moore, a former Cabinet minister, to promote energy
efficiency in the home. This pooled effort of the energy supply industry
will seek out the best ways of achieving these goals. Pilot schemes will be
set up to help low income households make better use of their energy, and
stimulate investment in fuel efficient technology, such as better boilers.
However the reluctance of Prof. Littlechild to create an E factor could
reduce the interest of the electricity companies in supporting the scheme
since they will not be able to pass through the costs like British Gas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7250</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (6): An ever-present challenge -
Building standards have risen dramatically
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TECHNOLOGY for improving the energy efficiency of buildings has been around
for decades. But the proudest claims for some of today's high-specification
designs in Britain would make Scandinavians snigger, as they were achieving
similar standards half a century ago.
Closer to home, a couple of hundred Salford council houses built in 1975
would still put to shame the figures touted by modern designers who insist
they have made some giant step forward.
These endless cycles of 'discovery' spring from the fact that buildings
offer such obvious scope for improvement. They absorb almost half the
country's energy output and emit twice as much carbon dioxide as that which
belches from vehicle exhausts. Domestic buildings alone use half our gas and
a third of the electricity.
The problem is that energy efficiency has to be constantly re-invented.
During booms, occupiers take anything they can get; in slumps few will pay
extra for some nebulous long-term saving. Individual advances are forgotten
then rediscovered.
Overall standards have improved enormously, however, as building regulations
are cranked up to higher specifications. The latest upgrade was designed to
make minimum insulation levels 20 per cent more efficient and many
developers automatically work to a much higher benchmark.
New housing may fall far behind standards in other countries but still
scores seven out of 10 on the National Energy Foundation scale compared with
a miserable national average of four.
Using timber frames stuffed with insulation well above minimum standards
helped Laing Homes score an average of nine on one range of flats. Other
factors such as siting and internal layout for maximum solar gain are also
crucial.
A handful even manage a perfect 10. 'In one flat this was achieved by
switching to low-energy light bulbs while another was given a larger hot
water cylinder and fan-assisted storage heater,' says sales director Pauline
Land.
Custom Homes scored 9.7 on a show property at the Ebbw Vale Garden Festival
by using a heat recovery system, and putting six inches of Rockwool
insulation in the walls and nine inches in the roof. Builders Butcher &amp;
Slater scored a similar 9.3 through similar efforts on a 'green' home in
Huddersfield.
But these near-perfect scores are exceptions to the general run of new
houses. High land values usually force compromise in siting and internal
layouts, while the current fierce price competition has seen some volume
builders quietly drop high-profile experiments in super-efficient designs.
'Buyers are still not that keen to pay extra for better performance,' says
Ms Land. Running costs as low as Pounds 5 a week can appeal to first-buyers
although the up-front price tends to take priority. Housing associations
have more incentive to produce efficient designs because they rent to
low-income families, but even they are often hamstrung by cost limitations
imposed from above.
Commercial developers face similar problems of making progress in a dead
market. Air-conditioning became almost an industry standard for office
blocks during the 1980s and both institutional landlords and tenants now
expect such comforts. But they do not come cheaply.
'Annual energy costs can be as high as Pounds 23 a sq metre compared with
around Pounds 4 for naturally ventilated buildings,' says David Hitchcock of
property consultants Richard Ellis.
Some experiments have set out to prove that reverting to older methods would
not be regressive.
Two years ago Argent Group took advantage of the new BREEAM system of
energy-rating created by the Building Research Establishment to back designs
for a 'green' office block in Basingstoke.
'We felt occupiers were already looking for buildings that were both cheap
to run and environmentally friendly,' says development manager David
Partridge.
Glazed towers trap the sun, warming the air and drawing ventilation
naturally through the building. Energy costs would have been 25 per cent of
an air-conditioned block. But the slump intervened and the experiment
remains unproven until some enlightened owner-occupier comes along - 'the
idea was right and could still be used somewhere else,' says Mr Partridge.
Developers would welcome the chance to phase out air-conditioning, which
adds as much as 30 per cent to building costs. But most are unsure that it
can be ousted from city centres, where tenants expect to be sealed away from
traffic fumes and noise.
It can be made more efficient, however. Almack House, a prime 100,000 sq ft
building in the heart of St James's, scored highly on the BREEAM scale by
adopting such techniques as computerised electrical and mechanical services
and special glass which collects solar heat. 'Good management can save up to
Pounds 7 a sq metre in running costs,' says Mr Hitchcock.
But economics raise their head again on such schemes. Almack has a
'facility' for a heat recovery system but, with a pay-back as long as five
or 10 years, it is beyond even an enlightened developer like the Dutch
pension fund PGGM, to install. That will be up to some future occupier.
Advances are being made, though. Another of the developer's buildings has a
basement full of table-tennis balls filled with salt water. These are cooled
each night with cheap electricity, cutting the cost of air-chilling during
the day. As a bonus, this reduces demand for roof-top plant, which
diminishes noise and nuisance to neighbours.
Erik Batstra of the fund's development subsidiary, Belt Mountains BV, is
keen to push forwards the boundaries of efficiency because he wants to
attract international tenants. And his experience in Germany is that they
will not put up with power-hungry services just because this is the local
market norm.
In fact, just as homebuyers hold the key to better housing, so business
occupiers are crucial to the shape of future commercial buildings. 'If we
could persuade owners and tenants to accept a temperature band expanded by a
mere degree or so, it would go a long way towards more efficient, greener -
and cheaper - buildings,' says Mr Hitchcock.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7251</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (5): A spanner in the natural
gas works - United Kingdom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES and BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE major review of energy policy which was recently announced by Mr Michael
Heseltine, the trade and industry secretary, could throw a spanner into the
energy efficiency works.
Prompted as it was by the public outcry over closure of the coal pits, its
unspoken purpose will be to find ways of sustaining demand for power, and
particularly coal-fired power.
To people interested in energy efficiency, this can only mean one thing:
less efficiency. Although a review of environmental and energy efficiency
targets is not officially on the agenda, ministers admit privately that
these may well suffer from the pressure to burn more coal. Among the options
before the government are to postpone deregulation of the electricity market
in order to delay the switch from coal to natural gas, or to scrap part of
the UK nuclear programme to make room for more coal-fired stations. Both
these options would increase the UK's carbon emissions.
Mr Heseltine has promised a White Paper early in the new year, and says he
will propose changes to the law if necessary. The irony is that this is
happening only five months after Mr John Major, the prime minister,
subscribed to pledges at the Rio Earth Summit to try and reduce emissions of
harmful greenhouse gases.
Those pledges were going to be difficult enough to achieve at the best of
times. Like other EC countries, the UK has promised to bring output of
carbon dioxide back to its 1990 level by the year 2000. The level registered
in 1990 was 160m tonnes. The government recently scaled down its forecast
for the year 2000 (in light of lower-than-expected economic growth,
principally). But at 166m-201m tonnes it remains disturbingly high.
Government officials maintain that there is scope to bring that down by a
further 20m tonnes, but it would require a major effort on the conservation
front, since the UK is among the larger emitters of greenhouse gases in
Europe.
The UK's overall position on energy efficiency is average for an industrial
country. According to the Energy Efficiency Office, which is part of the
Department of the Environment, it is comparable to France, slightly better
than West Germany and slightly worse than Japan in terms of energy consumer
per unit of GDP. It does a lot better than the US. Its carbon dioxide
emissions are about 2.7 per cent of the world total, and amount to 2.8
tonnes per capita, close to the European average.
Thanks to a string of energy efficiency and environmental measures, progress
has been made on a number of fronts. Industrial, power station and domestic
emissions have been stable or declining for the past two decades. One of the
more promising developments is the growth of combined heat and power (CHP)
schemes to produce usable heat as well as electricity. These can be applied
to hospitals, large hostels and industrial sites. The environment department
estimates that there are currently CHP schemes at 600 sites in the UK
accounting for three per cent of electricity generated.
But emissions continue to rise in the transport sector, posing the toughest
problems for conservation policy.
Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary, has proposed road pricing or
higher vehicle taxes to bring the growth in check, but the verdict must
await a special study being carried out by the department of transport, and
due for completion next year.
The number of cars on the road - which account for 80 per cent of road
vehicles - has risen from about 2.5m in 1951 to about 20m in 1990. The
Department of Transport projects that the volumes of most kinds of traffic
will nearly double over the next 30 years.
Although Mr Howard has also expressed interest in the EC's carbon tax
proposal, his support for it has been guarded. The official UK position is
that the proposal should be studied, but with an eye on the downside as well
as the up.
But the government's record on energy efficiency has come under attack from
environmental and trade lobby groups for its failure to address what they
claim are major structural problems.
The Association for the Conservation of Energy, which represents the energy
efficiency industry, points out that while economic growth fell in 1991,
consumption of energy rose, meaning that the UK actually became less rather
than more energy efficient last year. It blames 'an overwhelming bias'
towards supply rather than efficiency investments.
This includes the tax and regulatory system, and the absence of proper
incentives for people and businesses to overcome the barriers to investing
in energy saving.
The new Energy Saving Trust set up by the government will help British Gas
and the regional electricity companies identify projects to help their
domestic customers use energy more efficiently. It intends the costs of the
investments to be passed through to electricity and gas consumers in their
bills. However, environmental groups have argued that the Trust's impact on
the UK's standards of energy efficiency is likely to be small.
The furore over the coal closures has shown that the UK's good fortune in
being the most fuel-rich nation in Europe can also be a curse. Entire
sectors of the economy and many jobs depend on demand for fuel, and this
adds to the bias against conservation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7252</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (4): Lessons for the west -
Japan sets a cracking pace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW WARREN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN is widely acknowledged as the world leader in the field of energy
efficiency and the exemplar for other developed industrial countries in
getting value from the fuel they burn.
A wide panoply of financial and other incentives has been deployed by
government and business organisations to help industry, business and
householders to use energy more sparingly.
They include:
free energy audits for companies of 300 employees or less;
tax concessions on investment in new energy-saving equipment;
credit for conservation measures, including co-generation schemes, from
numerous sources, including the Japan Development Bank;
low interest loans from the Housing Finance Corporation to help pay for
insulation and efficient water heaters;
annual observance of a national energy saving month every February.
It is not easy, however, to compare Japan's performance with that of other
countries. The conventional mechanism for comparing different countries'
programmes is to divide their Gross National Product by energy consumption.
This measure is favoured by the International Energy Agency and, by this
yardstick,the Japanese record is truly impressive.
In the 15 years after the Yom Kippur War first alerted the world to the
danger of energy profligacy, Japan succeeded in using 34 per cent less fuel
to produce the same amount of goods and services. In contrast, the UK was
using 25 per cent less energy per unit of GDP, the US 26 per cent less.
Relying only on the GDP/energy ratio can be misleading, however. A country
which chooses to de-industrialise and concentrate upon service industries
can appear vastly to improve its ratio, but in practice it does little to
reduce wastage. Put simply, an insurance broker can create the same amount
of GDP as a steel worker - but by definition he requires far less fuel to
operate.
Nations which cut back on their manufacturing output during the 1980s can
thus report superficially attractive energy efficiency improvement figures,
the UK being an obvious example. That did not happen in Japan.
During the 1980s it developed into a powerhouse producing many of the
world's key consumer durables. Strong domestic demand gave Japanese
companies a firm base from which to export, stimulating frequent model
changes to keep demand high.
One can argue that Japan's discipline in energy usage was an integral factor
in bringing about this economic success. A detailed study of the Japanese
energy scene* yielded seven key conclusions:
a successful energy efficiency programme can play a key role in expanding
international competitiveness. Symptomatic of this is the recent initiative
to inaugurate centres around the Far East to promote Japanese energy
efficiency technologies, as part of the world-wide response to the threat of
climate change.
successful energy saving programmes require long-term objectives, with
policies set accordingly. Once introduced, initiatives are maintained and
not, as in Britain, left to run on a stop-start basis.
minimum efficiency standards are needed for industrial plant, for buildings
and for appliances. These require regular updating and to be mandatory not
voluntary.
these standards or 'sticks' need to be accompanied by 'carrots'. Japan uses
a wide range of incentives, grants and regulations to encourage energy
conservation investments.
although fuel prices are appropriately 40 per cent higher than in Europe as
expressed in conventional exchange rate terms, in terms of cost to
disposable income the difference is not that great. It is a myth that higher
fuel prices alone have stimulated Japanese energy efficiency.
a single agency, under the industry ministry, MITI, with considerable
finance and influence throughout Government, administers the programmes.
Japanese companies are required by law to have well-trained and qualified
engineers in place as energy managers. Attempts by the European Commission
to replicate such training requirements were withdrawn earlier this year,
perceived as a breach of the concept of 'subsidiarity'.
most important is the establishment of the principle that economic growth
does not require more energy use. (In the UK, by contrast, the decline in
GNP since 1990 has been accompanied by higher energy use.)
This principle seems to be accepted by the Japanese people, most of whom do
not wish to see more energy consumed than at present. Indeed, a majority are
willing to sacrifice increases in living standards to improve the world's
environment.
These conclusions were drawn from a recent extensive opinion survey of 3,750
Japanese. It was initiated by the Prime Minister's office, following his
Government's commitment to stabilise green house gas emissions. It was
intended to provide evidence about how individual Japanese felt about the
best way to achieve such stabilisation.
Only 32 per cent thought that more energy consumption was needed for an
improved economy. Contrary to some Western stereotypical views of alleged
Japanese indifference about the environment, 40 per cent said they were
personally willing to retain present levels of energy use, and a further 14
per cent to reduce levels, to aid the environment.
* Lessons from Japan; Association for the Conservation of Energy 9 Sherlock
Mews, London W1M 3RH; Pounds 15
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7253</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (2): Fences become higher - EC
programmes are under pressure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEASURES to improve European energy efficiency are under threat from
economic slowdown, rising transport volumes, integration of the former East
Germany and arguments about the acceptable form of an energy tax.
Those are the underlying messages of recent environmental reports from the
European Commission and of its investigation into new directives to
encourage energy efficiency.
The EC's use of energy has risen steadily in the past decade, mainly because
of the growth of road and air transport. The most recent comprehensive
figures show that in 1989 the EC - which did not then include the East
German Lander - consumed 752.8m tonnes of oil or oil equivalent (mtoe), an 8
per cent rise on the 1981 level.
During that period the use of energy by transport, which accounts for nearly
a third of EC energy consumption, grew by 31 per cent, more than offsetting
the 9 per cent fall in industrial use of energy.
The EC has a long-standing target of improving the efficiency of final
consumption of energy by 20 per cent between 1985 and 1995. At the Rio Earth
Summit in June it added a second energy-related objective: the stabilisation
of emissions of the 'greenhouse' gas carbon dioxide, mainly produced by
burning fossil fuels, at 1990 levels by the year 2000.
The EC's record is by no means the world's worst - in 1989 the 12 EC
countries emitted 760.9m tonnes of carbon, or 12.9 per cent of the world
total. That translates to 2.34 tonnes per capita, less than half the US's
level of around 5 tonnes per capita and compared with 0.2 tonnes per capita
for developing countries.
However, it has been clear that the EC targets would be unachievable without
new measures. The Community's policy has had three main planks: its SAVE
programme to encourage energy efficiency; a proposed tax on energy and its
carbon content to encourage energy conservation; and separate national
measures.
SAVE - the Specific Action for Vigorous Energy Efficiency (SAVE) programme -
was proposed two years ago following anxiety that the Community was making
little progress towards its targets.
The latest draft directive, published in June, lists seven measures for
countries to take:
certification of carbon dioxide emissions from buildings caused by energy
use;
billing heating, air-conditioning and hot-water costs on the basis of
consumption, not flat rate tariffs;
promoting third-party financing of energy efficiency investments in the
public sector;
thermal insulation of new buildings;
regular inspection of boilers;
regular inspection of cars;
energy audits of businesses.
Expectations of SAVE were initially high. In the November 1990 proposal for
the programme, the European Commission projected that SAVE would reduce the
final demand for energy in the EC in 2010 by 100 mtoe per year, a reduction
of 12 per cent compared with levels if the programme was not introduced. It
would also cut primary demand for energy in 2010 by 160 mtoe per year, and
cut carbon dioxide emissions by more than 500m tonnes per year - more than
15 per cent lower than projected levels.
However by June 1992, estimates of its impact were nearly nine times lower -
a reduction in carbon dioxide emissions of only 61mt.
Mr Andrew Warren, director of the European Association for Conservation of
Energy, says 'SAVE now is a sad thing compared to what was originally
envisaged. Nowhere does the draft directive specify what countries must do,
beyond 'taking appropriate measures'. Originally there were quite specific
standards.'
One reason for the scaling down of projections appears to be cost: countries
and their national utilities have been reluctant to foot the bill for the
necessary investment and marketing, particularly in mid-recession. A second
reason appears to be that political attention switched to the more ambitious
and more controversial proposals for a carbon or energy tax.
EC countries have made clear that they cannot hope to stabilise carbon
emissions without a tax, and the Commission has proposed an initial level of
Dollars 3 a barrel of oil or oil equivalent, rising to Dollars 10.
The German government has given particularly strong backing for the
proposals, partly because the integration of the former East Germany has
sent its carbon emissions soaring.
Of the 1bn tonnes of carbon dioxide emitted by Germany each year, around a
third comes from the eastern states although they have only a fifth of the
combined population. They are still heavily dependent on lignite, a
particularly 'dirty' form of energy. Although lignite, or brown coal, is
gradually being phased out, the number of cars in the east is rising fast -
the government projects it will soon double.
However, German industrialists have bitterly attacked their government's
support for the tax, saying that it could cost German industry DM 12bn-15bn
by 2000, and that the consumer will ultimately bear the costs.
The Commission's studies acknowledge the side-effects of the medicine - they
estimate that the proposed tax could cut 0.25 per cent off EC real GDP
growth in the second and third years after introduction, and 0.07 per cent
over the first 13 years. The political difficulties in introducing the tax
are therefore great, particularly with several countries on the brink of
sharp recessions.
Proposals for the tax are now stalled while the EC countries reflect on the
costs and consider whether they could afford to introduce it unilaterally,
even if the rest of the OECD countries did not.
Economic slowdown - which is just beginning to affect several of the
continental European countries - is making the EC's energy efficiency and
conservation measures more difficult to implement. At present, in spite of
several years of intense discussion, much less progress has been made than
was envisaged and the targets still look elusive. The one compensation is
that recession is also reducing the demand for energy and reducing the
emission of unwanted gases - but that is not a long term solution.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7254</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (3): Here come the ozone men -
Clinton and Gore will move with caution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS said that Bob Crandall, head of American Airlines, walks through
company headquarters switching off lights before leaving work in the
evening.
Mr Crandall's idiosyncratic approach to reducing energy consumption, though
perhaps apocryphal, illustrates US industry's changing attitude towards
energy efficiency in a nation wary of regulation.
The departing Bush administration has been sharply criticised by
environmental groups and politicians for its reluctance to mandate any
legislation towards environmental protection, preferring to rely on
incentives to encourage corporate and industrial responsibility.
President Bush's credibility as the 'environmental president' was shaken
severely at this summer's Rio Earth Summit, partly by his reluctance to
attend the summit at all, and partly by his moves to weaken a treaty to
combat global warming and his refusal to sign a treaty to protect endangered
species.
With a new administration ready to take office at the end of the year, a
large question mark hangs over industry about future policies. It seems safe
to assume that the new administration will be more receptive to legislation
aimed at encouraging efficiency and protecting the environment. Vice
president-elect Al Gore has a reputation as an environmental activist. But
it seems equally probable that the Clinton administration will continue to
pursue an environmental policy which does not undermine jobs or the economy.
In the area of petrol consumption, for example, Mr Clinton's position
appears somewhat flexible. During the election campaign, Mr Clinton said he
supported higher fuel-economy standards of 40 to 45 miles per gallon from
their present levels of 27.5mpg. Following a study by the Natonal Academy of
Sciences which raised questions about the practicalities of increasing fuel
economy standards above 37mpg, Mr Clinton indicated that the higher range
was merely a goal.
Although the US has improved its efficiency significantly since the 1970s,
energy efficiency does not come naturally to a nation with a wealth of
natural resources. The US has about 25 per cent of the world's coal
reserves, and low energy prices, which do not reflect the full costs of
production and use, have further encouraged consumption.
The biggest improvements in efficiency have been made in space heating and
driving. But in other areas, such as homes, appliances and buildings, the US
uses some 30 per cent more energy per unit of activity than other countries.
In addition, it is estimated that the US emitted 22 per cent of the world's
carbon dioxide in 1989, although it has less than 5 per cent of the world's
population.
While there is a growing acceptance of the benefits of energy efficiency in
the US, there remains a large degree of uncertainty about what role, if any,
federal government should play in enforcing programmes. A recent study by
the American Council for an Energy Efficient Economy found that: 'Energy
efficiency improvements lead to more jobs and higher personal income at the
national level, in addition to saving consumers money, reducing energy
imports and cutting pollutant emissions associated with energy.'
Earlier this year, Mr Steve Nadel of the American Council for an Energy
Efficient Economy told a congressional briefing that the Department of
Energy could do more to improve the efficiency of electricity generation.
According to Mr Nadel, power production efficiencies could be improved to
about 40 per cent from 30 per cent by using modern generating equipment.
To date, the government's main thrust has been to persuade business that
energy efficiency saves money. The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has
developed an energy efficient lighting programme, called Green Lights, aimed
at reducing air pollution by encouraging companies and local governments to
replace existing lighting systems with more energy efficient equipment.
Participation is strictly voluntary, but the EPA has made great strides in
persuading companies that they will save a significant amount of money by
enrolling in the programme. According to the agency, more than 425
businesses have enrolled in Green Lights since it was launched in 1991. The
EPA estimates it has been installed in 2.65bn square feet of office space,
saving about Dollars 6bn a year in utility bills.
Following the success of its Green Lights initiative, the EPA recently
introduced a second programme, Energy Star, to encourage computer
manufacturers to produce energy efficient personal computers.
The programme is aimed at addressing the surge in electricity use among
businesses, largely because of the increased presence of high technology and
power-dependent equipment in offices. About 5 per cent of electricity
consumption in the commercial sector is used by computers, and this is
expected to double by the year 2000.
Most of the biggest computer makers in the US, including Apple Computer and
IBM, have signed the EPA agreement to market energy-efficient personal
computers and monitors which will automatically switch to low energy
consumption when not in use. These measures could cut personal computer
energy consumption in half, producing savings of about Dollars 1bn in annual
power costs.
In addition to the EPA's attempts to get businesses to improve their
efficiency voluntarily, there have been some regulations passed in recent
years to encourage efficiency. Around 20 US states now allow utilities to
earn a return on their investments in conservation programmes such as energy
audits. As a result, Pacific Gas and Electric offers customers incentives to
improve their energy efficiency, which the utility estimates will save about
18m tonnes of carbon dioxide in the next 10 years.
There is also legislation to set minimum efficiency standards for lamps,
electric motors and small commercial heating and ventilation.
Some companies are implementing conservation policies of their own.
Minnesota Mining &amp; Mineral (3M), for example, has introduced a programme to
reduce its energy use by 20 per cent between 1990 and 1995.
Meanwhile, industry and environmentalists alike can only wait to see what
the Clinton presidency will mean for further efficiency initiatives in the
US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7255</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Energy Efficiency (1): A change of priorities -
The present energy glut contrasts with the 1970s oil shortages which turned
conservation into a burning issue. Today the efficient use of energy is
regarded as good for business and vital for the earth's environment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHO needs energy efficiency?
Why bother about conserving energy if fuel resources will be abundant well
into the next century? Why invest in more efficient machinery if the price
of oil is at its lowest in real terms for 20 years? Why alter your lifestyle
if it is not endangered?
Alas, for the energy efficiency industry, there are no compelling answers to
any of these questions, which probably explains why many of its members are
gripped by a sense of frustration these days. The old arguments about
looming scarcity, insecure supplies and threats to ways of life have lost
their sting. The world has survived the nightmare scenario of a major war in
the Gulf with its energy lifelines intact.
It may be, of course, that the prevailing attitudes are profoundly misplaced
and are fostering a dangerous level of complacency. Yet the abundance of
world energy resources was reconfirmed only two months ago at the World
Energy Congress in Madrid. The WEC's experts said: ' ..there is no global
shortage of primary energy now, and none is anticipated to 2020.'
The WEC also concluded that the price of oil, which effectively dictates all
energy prices in the long run, will rise little in real terms before the
second quarter of the next century.
'Nobody will feel pressures in the next five to 10 years by using energy at
the same level of efficiency as they do today,' says Dr Lee Schipper, an
energy efficiency expert at the Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory of the
University of California. He recounts that while recently staying at a hotel
in Stockholm, the shirt he sent for cleaning was handled by a laundry 30kms
out of town. 'That shirt travelled 60 kms just to be washed,' he notes.
So what do the conservationists have going for them today? They can still
rely on the puritanical streak in advanced industrialised countries which
accepts that energy conservation is a good thing in itself. They can also
count on the steady underlying gains in efficiency which happen anyway,
spurred by competition and the spread of technology, amounting to about one
per cent a year.
Large strides continue to be made in energy efficient techniques, notably in
the power generation industry where new turbines can at last produce more
power than waste heat. This decade should also bring substantial efficiency
gains in East Europe and the former Soviet republics where wasteful habits
are rapidly being driven out by the transition to market economics.
But the achievement of major advances in industrial countries will need an
important new stimulus.
The most likely one to emerge is concern about the environment. Worries on
this score have grown steadily as the danger of global warming has touched
the public imagination. Since the greenhouse gases which have been blamed
for the phenomenon are largely caused by consumption of fossil fuels, a
remedy clearly lies in energy conservation.
This year's Earth Summit in Rio de Janeiro provided a focus for action. But
the debate there showed up deep divisions within the industrial nations
about the seriousness of the threat. The member countries of the European
Community adopted a target of reducing their carbon dioxide emissions to the
1990 level by the year 2000. But the US remained unconvinced of the need for
such defined goals.
As a result, Rio failed to produce a concerted plan of action. The
international treaty on climate change which was adopted there contained no
deadlines or targets on carbon emissions and was widely denounced as a flop.
Since Rio, the persistence of the world recession has further dampened
enthusiasm for measures at either global or national level.
In the UK, the crisis over the run down of the coal industry could even lead
to postponement of the carbon emission targets because the government may be
forced into promoting coal use to save miners' jobs.
The weakness of the environment as a spur to greater energy efficiency is
that - unlike the threat of fuel shortages - it does not drive up prices and
unleash corrective market forces. If it is to have any effect it will have
to be through government action, either regulation or taxation.
The last 12 months have seen much debate about a possible carbon tax to
promote greater energy efficiency. The EC Commission has been designing a
plan for a such a tax, starting at the equivalent of Dollars 3 per barrel of
oil, rising by annual Dollars 1 increments to Dollars 10.
There are, however, considerable doubts whether this would have much effect.
The greatest emission reductions need to be achieved in transport - the
sector which has historically made least progress - but petrol is already so
heavily taxed that even Dollars 10 a barrel would not be prohibitive.
Politically, too, the tax has made little headway because of the reluctance
of individual countries to adopt a measure which would handicap their export
industries. Although EC environment ministers agreed to explore the idea,
the likelihood of it being adopted in the foreseeable future is remote. Both
the US and Japan are unenthusiastic.
Thus energy efficiency remains in the domain of national initiatives. Some
are substantial. Italy is proposing to spend Lire 2,611bn over three years
on a conservation grant programme which it hopes will save the equivalent of
4m tonnes of oil a year (about 2.5 per cent). But many are also very small,
commensurate with the low level of the perceived threat.
Much of the problem is that individuals and businesses are reluctant to
invest in energy efficiency. Dr Colin Myerscough, director of industry and
general policy at the UK's Energy Efficiency Office, identifies three main
barriers: lack of information, low capital priority, and hidden costs such
as extra wiring needed to install energy efficient appliances. There are
further barriers in a tax system which favours domestic fuel consumption
over conservation equipment, and a regulatory regime which rewards the
electricity industry for selling as much electricity as it can.
This means that governments will have to take the lead. 'Energy efficiency
can only become real if tens of thousands of people invest money in it. And
that means governments spending money,' says an official at the Paris-based
International Energy Agency.
The potential for efficiency improvements is, by common consent, very high.
In a study for the Stockholm Environment Institute, Dr Schipper forecast
that energy intensity would fall by 24 per cent by the year 2010 if existing
trends continue. But if an 'efficiency push' was launched through a 25-50
per cent increase in energy prices, energy intensity would fall by 41 per
cent. Some of the biggest gains would come through more efficient home
heating, and a rise in the miles per gallon achieved by the average
automobile from 26 to 35.
But with a 'vigorous effort' based on energy prices 50-100 per cent higher,
energy intensity could fall 60 per cent. Here, cars would do 60 mpg,
aircraft would consume half as much fuel as they did in 1985, and home
appliances 75 per cent less electricity than they do today. The spur to
change on this scale, Dr Schipper says, would be 'a massive commitment to
reducing carbon dioxide'.
As things currently stand, however, changes of this order are little more
than pie in the sky. The World Energy Congress concluded that the annual
global increase in energy efficiency should be raised from its present level
of 1.8 per cent to 2 per cent - a small enough rise in appearance but one
which, in practice, could prove painfully hard to deliver.
'The message of the WEC is that western industrial countries can do
something about energy efficiency, and ought to - to help conserve energy
resources and protect the environment,' says Mr Richard Tinson, director of
the National Energy Foundation, a UK charity which promotes energy
efficiency in the home.
But the sluggish response to calls for greater efficiency does not
necessarily mean that the case for energy efficiency lacks force: the
existence of a large energy efficiency industry, ranging from research
through manufacturing to proliferating consultancies is evidence that large
sums are spent in this area. However the case cannot have been made
sufficiently convincingly if potential and reality remain so far apart. Time
will tell whether the gap is due to imprudence or a hard-nosed reading of
the facts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7256</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (19): Driving a hard bargain - Car
rental
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILLIAN UPTON, Editor, Business Traveller magazine
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CUSTOMERS renting cars have never had it so good. It is now quicker, easier
and cheaper than ever before to rent a car.
A combination of the recession and new market entrants has brought
innovation and more competitive prices as car rental supply now outstrips
demand.
All the leading companies - and there are six significant players in the UK
market, Avis, Hertz, Europcar, Budget, Eurodollar and Alamo - have
introduced one or all of the following: express desks to save queueing,
virtually inclusive prices to eradicate those surprising extras on the bill,
speedier reservations and reward schemes for frequent users.
American car hire giant Alamo's foray into the UK market probably started
the price war. Although it is one of the smallest operators in the UK its
aggressive pricing has been successful at its 17 locations in the country.
Some are off-airport.
'We're value for money, it's a realistic price we offer,' explains Alamo UK
marketing manager Janet Ball. Alamo operates on a national tariff, whereas
some of the other car rental companies have different prices for airport and
central London rentals. Like its competitors, Alamo has an express product
for corporate users. This includes an express desk to avoid queueing,
upgrades, guaranteed rates, special offers and discounts. Next year will see
the UK launch of its charge card in a further bid to speed up the payment
procedure.
The equivalent express product is Club Gold at the much larger operator,
Hertz. Geared to the frequent user, it offers no queues, no form-filling or
signatures and personal recognition at the counter. It was launched in
Europe 18 months ago and is now available at 50 airports in Europe and at
170 in North America.
Avis goes one better, as befits the UK market leader, with an Avis Club
umbrella product driven by a personal ID number. This has several benefits.
One is a reward scheme called Avis Options launched in May this year with
low attainment levels. For example, rent once and receive free parking at
Heathrow. Also launched this summer was Best Deal Promise, which triggers
the best price from wherever you rent as long as you are an Avis Club
member. Preferred Service is geared to a paperless transaction. By signing a
direct debit no paperwork is necessary and you go straight to your name box
and collect the keys to your car. Also a queue bypass facility called Avis
Express has been running for some years.
'You could argue that the recession has brought this on,' says Bruce
Tranter, sales and marketing director of Avis UK. 'People have been educated
to think about bargains and prices are being driven downwards.'
Book a Group A car (the lowest category rentable car) and drive away in a
Group B car at no extra cost, book a Group B car and drive a Group C car
instead. And upgrades are not the only perks. Since the recession started,
time and mileage tariffs have been substituted by an all-inclusive tariff
(CDW - Collision Damage Waiver) but you will probably still have to purchase
PAI, Personal Accident Insurance.
Europcar Interrent UK has probably suffered more than most during the
recession but has responded with innovation. In autumn it launched an
all-inclusive rate called UK Traveller starting at Pounds 39.50 a day for a
Group A vehicle. But it is not available to the casual walk-up customer;the
car must be booked through central reservations to ensure the rate and it is
inclusive of unlimited mileage, CDW and value added tax. The only extra is
PAI.
UK Traveller is one of four products the company launched in September to
simplify car rental. 'They aim to take the mystery out of car rental rates.
It's one of the biggest issues facing our industry,' says Tim Harford,
managing director of Europcar Interrent UK.
'We've got to be a little bit different from Hertz and Avis. The industry
leaders have adopted gimmicks, like theft protection at Pounds 2, Pounds 3
or Pounds 4 per days but our CDW includes loss arising from accident, damage
or theft,' says Mr Harford.
The other three products launched in the autumn are UK Traveller Plus,
designed for small to medium-sized corporate users spending under Pounds
75,000 a year on car rental, which will trigger an unlimited mileage rate.
The third product is Local Traveller designed for the leisure user and
starting at Pounds 32 a day inclusive of CDW and VAT. The last product is
Weekend Rates, including unlimited mileage, CDW and VAT on two, three and
four-day weekend rates from Pounds 53 a day.
Budget pipped Europcar to the post as regards its rates-driven launch this
year. Budget launched fully inclusive rates in July, valid until the end of
the year for business travellers at 3,600 locations in 46 countries. The
lead-in booking time has been reduced from 24 hours to just 12 hours. (Book
through central reservations or on its freephone number.) The minimum rental
period is one day. The rate includes unlimited mileage, CDW, all taxes and,
unusually, PAI.
'Businesses are really looking more closely at what they're spending their
money on,' said a Budget spokesperson. 'Some companies are taking out the
pool car and substituting a rental car as and when required. It's far
cheaper that way.'
The Dollars 64,000 dollar question is how long can it last? More and more
car rental companies are now located on-airport, which has intensified
competition and driven down the margins.
'Margins are not good in the short term,' admits Mr Tranter of Avis, 'but
we're offering better products so we'll get bigger volume.'
"The industry is not in the medium term going to be able to offer the same
level of deals,' believes Europcar's Harford. He believes that as car rental
companies have to start to absorb the residual values of second-hand cars so
rates to corporate customers will increase, by around 10 per cent. 'The
margins are very thin on major accounts,' says Mr Harford. 'We're under
great pressure.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7257</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (20): Small, intimate and private
 -Hotels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILLIAN UPTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BIG IS not always best when it comes to choosing an hotel. Cavernous
lobbies, throngs of people queueing to check in or check out, or to use the
lifts, restaurants and conference facilities are not everyone's idea of a
hotel stay.
And it need not be. Smaller, independently-run hotels have come into their
own over the past few years as they are the antithesis of the big,
impersonal, all-steel and glass hotel of the Eighties.
The smaller hotel sells itself on intimacy, privacy and a more restful
atmosphere.
The big chains obviously still offer advantages such as a spread of
properties worldwide and consistency of product - especially preferable in
Third World countries. Membership of loyalty clubs in the big hotel chains
offers benefits such as early check-in, late check-out, room upgrades, room
guarantee at busy periods, and so on.
Standing up for the Small is Beautiful lobby is Small Luxury Hotels of the
World (SLH). It was launched as a hotel consortium in January 1991. Some 90
hotels situated in 16 countries, not one of them part of a large chain, they
are mainly in the four- and five-star hotel categories. Members include
Raffles in Singapore, the Lancaster and Balzac in Paris and the Ritz in
London.
'People don't like standardisation any more. We offer a more personal
service,' said Brian Mills, managing director of SLH. Not all SLH properties
have 24-hour room service or business centres but all have concierge and
valet.
In tandem with this move has been the emergence of smaller-sized hotel
groups - in the deluxe and lower echelons - which also offer this same mix
of comfortable ambience and high quality service, in hotels not usually
offering more than 200 rooms. For example, the exemplary standards of the
Rafael group of hotels, all in old character buildings, such as the
Rafael-managed 132-room Breidenbacher Hof in Dusseldorf.
Meanwhile, much larger, deluxe hotel groups synonymous with ultra modern
buildings are surprising the travelling public. Four years ago, Inter
Continental opened in a beautiful landmark building called The Willard in
downtown Washington DC. The Hyatt hotel chain has segmented into smaller
properties called Park Hyatt. The Four Seasons-owned Regent group is soon to
open in a 14th Century former monastery in Milan.
In the UK, some of the four-star properties in the Edwardian Hotels Group
are located in old buildings. For example, a row of 10 Regency terrace
houses was converted into the 224-room Vanderbilt Hotel on London's Cromwell
Road.
Another group, Sarova, which has half a dozen four-star hotels in London,
has a few gems, such as the Rubens, a 189-room hotel in Victoria dating back
to 1912. Rooms are decorated in Regency style.
Common to all these hotels, large or small, is new technology, which is
releasing hotel staff to spend more time on customer service. The
InterContinental hotel chain which, together with Sheraton, are the foremost
business-oriented hotels in the world, is using high-tech in this way.
Members of InterContinental's hotel loyalty club, called the Six Continents
Club, receive an innovative no-stop check-in as well as a raft of usual
benefits such as priority reservations, late check-out and room upgrades.
Each customer is pre-registered, collected from the airport and, five
minutes before arrival, the driver calls ahead so that the car can be met by
the guest relations officer and the customer whisked straight to his/her
room. This has been tested for the past six months at Inter Continental's
London, New York and Berlin properties.
'That's infinitely better than seeing the top of their head behind a
counter,' explained Bob Collier, senior vice-president strategic marketing
at InterContinental.
Holiday Inn has realised that its least motivated and lowest paid workers
get to meet the customer first, at the front desk. In an attempt to improve
customer service it is introducing two technology-driven enhancements,
better training modules, particularly for these staff, and a more
sophisticated reservation system which should respond more quickly and find
room for the long-stay customers which were being refused bookings through
its incumbent system, Holidex.
Technology-driven customer profiles are standard to most hotels. Spreading
fast are toll-free booking numbers (freephones), points for a fax or laptop,
video check-out, breakfast ordering by TV (available in Marriott and
Sheraton hotels), Voice Mail (an answerphone facility in the room pioneered
by Westin hotels), and live reservation systems which allow the customer an
instant confirmed booking. In general, new hotels are in the vanguard of
high-tech gadgetry.
Smart, independent hoteliers can still offer some of the technology
advantage, without the capital outlay, by joining a marketing or
reservations consortium. SLH's much larger rival is Leading Hotels of the
World (LHW) while in the three and four-star sector there is, for example,
Best Western and a relative newcomer to Europe, Flag International Hotels.
Flag boasts more than 500 three- and four- star hotels, most of which are
privately-owned and mainly located in Australia and New Zealand.
'All our properties are on-line to our live reservation system so it's a
guaranteed reservation. There's no chance of horror stories like someone
turning up and having never heard of the booking ' says David
Curtis-Brignell, chief executive officer of Flag International Hotels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7258</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (21): Unladylike practices -
Gillian Upton on problems faced by businesswomen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILLIAN UPTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'IT'S RARE to find a friendly receptionist who isn't patronising and who
doesn't tell everyone in the reception area what your room number is.'
'Stewardesses pay little attention to women travellers, they are far too
busy 'fawning over' male business travellers.'
'Restaurants seem embarrassed to have women eating alone and put them in a
corner and frequently forget them.'
These quotes illustrate some of the problems encountered by the growing band
of female travelling executives. The comments have been taken from various
surveys of women travellers undertaken by The Businesswoman's Travel Club
(BWTC) since setting up in the UK in the late Eighties to persuade the
travel industry - principally airlines, hotels and restaurants - to change
its attitudes towards women and to take account of their practical and
security needs.
The travel industry has been slow to wake up to the needs of female business
travellers. It was so easy when the majority of business travel was
undertaken by men; facilities and services were developed to meet their
needs expressly.
But two things have changed. The global recession has forced the travel
industry to go after any business, particularly those smaller market
segments they could afford to ignore in the good days. Second, the growth,
albeit from a small base, in the number of travelling women executives has
been significant over the past couple of years.
American Express believes that the number of women travellers in the UK
alone has jumped from 11 per cent in 1989 to 17 per cent last year.
Hotels generally have to be credited with attempting to improve in-room
facilities over the period although this improvement is not industry-wide.
Hotels aware of the problems have installed skirt hangers, hair dryers,
better lighting, better-positioned mirrors and bathrobes. But there is still
a problem getting irons in rooms.
Other items that women travellers have lobbied for fall into the security
area so are pertinent to both sexes. Most good hotels now have in-door spy
holes and door chains.
Product enhancements in hotels (and some in airlines, male or female
overnight toiletry kits, for example) and female images in industry
advertisements have silenced some of the critics, but staff attitudes have
not changed.
Far Eastern airlines, in particular, still fawn over the men. At check-in,
airlines often ignore women, presuming them to be travelling with the man in
front and also presume women have a greater tolerance of crying babies by
sitting them next to mothers with children. Stewardesses still assume the
man sitting next to a woman is her husband.
Hotels and restaurants general adopt the same attitude, assuming that women
are not there on business. Even though a woman has made it clear she is the
host, the waiter will still give the wine to the man to sample and also
present him with the bill. It is common to hear of restaurant staff sitting
lone women at the worst table - by the kitchen door, toilets, or behind a
pillar.
It is no wonder that so many women choose not to patronise hotel bars and
restaurants and opt for an in-room video and room service. Some hotels
attempt to circumvent this problem by reserving a table in their restaurant
for individual women to meet and eat together. One London hotel which runs
this is the Langham Hilton. 'Our biggest complaint from women was having to
sit in their room on their own,' explained general manager Rudi
Jagersbacher. 'We have two or three people using it each evening.'
However, the most vociferous lobbyists would prefer that the problem be
tackled at source by changing attitudes, which are ingrained, particularly
in older staff.
'One of the toughest things is to re-educate the staff,' admits Ramon
Pajares, general manager of Four Seasons Inn on the Park in London. His
comments also reflect the pan-European situation as he is also general
manager and regional vice-president Europe for EHMA (European Hotel
Managers' Association).
'Younger staff can handle it so much better; they only need guidelines from
management,' says Mr Pajares. 'It's a problem in older staff, they need
repeated training. You can't give them a lecture once and forget about it,
you have to monitor it. You must tell them not to place women in a corner,
to talk freely to them as they would any man on his own, and so on.
'More than anything else staff don't know how to handle the situation. They
either over-react and alienate the women or ignore them.'
The BWTC culls the opinions and comments from its 200-strong UK members to
offer a database of hotels recommended for their positive attitude and
pertinent facilities for female travellers. In the French capital Le Crillon
makes the list, in New York the Penta, Plaza and Lowell, in Hamburg the
Hotel Europaischer Hof and Hanseatic, in London the Basil Street Hotel and
at Gatwick the Stanhill Court hotel.
'You can put locks on the doors but if the front office staff still show the
room key number or shout it out it's still no good,' explains Ros Martin,
general manager of the BWTC.
'Attitudes are improving but there's still a long way to go,' says Mr
Martin. 'Individually-run hotels do it better than chains - with the
exception of the Lady Crest rooms at Forte Crest - and we do find that those
hotels managed by women are more aware of the problem.'
In London, for example, only four of the big chain hotels are run by women
general managers: The Sheraton Belgravia, Athenaeum, Conrad Chelsea Harbour
and the May Fair Inter-Continental. Some 20 per cent of the clientele of the
May Fair is female. General manager Dagmar Woodward believes the higher
ratio of female receptionists now standard to most hotels has helped ease
the attitude problem.
'I think what is important is not getting special or different service but
the same service, with the exception of security. Well-lit corridors are
important and we put female guests as close as we can to the lifts, on the
main corridor,' she says.
'What's important in a restaurant is not being put in a corner, or next to a
single man or four rowdy men. Women also have more self-assurance now, and
that helps too.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7259</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (17): A secretary in miniature -
Roy Terry tries out gadgets designed to ease the traveller's life
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROY TERRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MODERN business travellers who need a secretary to organise their lives can
opt instead for a personal digital assistant no bigger than a box of cigars.
This product of the electronic age comes in a variety of forms, and can do
most things expected of a secretary.
It can wake you up in the morning with an alarm call, tune you in to the BBC
world service, prompt you to keep appointments, allow you to consult
information stored in your desktop computer, supply you with dialling codes
and telephone numbers, take dictation, answer almost any query, correct your
spelling, and even talk to you in five languages.
What it cannot yet do is type your letters automatically, but engineers are
working on it.
PDAs have all the functions one would expect in a pocket-sized personal
computer (PC) - a database, word processor, 'agenda' or diary, and a
calculator. But the engineering wizards in the companies manufacturing these
marvels of miniaturisation, have come up with distinctive extras which they
hope will catch the imagination of executives.
Take the Psion Series 3 palmtop, described by the makers as 'the most
powerful pocket-sized computer in the world'. Tell it where you are, and it
will supply the dialling code for more than 400 cities at the touch of a
button. Match that with a list of telephone numbers stored in its memory,
and you can keep in touch with contacts around the globe.
Apart from that it has features which can keep the bored executive amused
for hours on end - if you have time to read and understand the lengthy
instruction books which come with most PDAs.
Hewlett-Packard, on the other hand, describes its HP 95LX as a 'true
companion to the desktop PC'. What this means is that anything the desktop
can do, the HP 95LX does on a smaller scale. Worksheets, documents, letters
and other files needed on your travels can be transferred from your desktop
to your pocket computer. It can also print out any document on an equally
portable printer.
The Sharp IQ-8400 is an electronic organiser that enables you to have on
hand a wealth of reference material, such as a thesaurus, incorporating a
spell-check facility, bilingual dictionaries for English/French and
English/German, and an eight-language translator of common phrases, which
includes Japanese. It also has a to-do function, which acts as a reminder of
essential tasks for the day.
The Olivetti Quaderno is one step along the way towards the voice activator
 -the ultimate aim of all designers. Olivetti calls it a voice management
facility. A microphone enables you to record spoken notes and messages, and
these voice files can be integrated on to text files where they are played
back on cue, enabling you to update your information.
A variation on PCs and organisers is the Sony Data Discman, which can best
be described as a hand-held electronic library. No bigger than a
blockbuster-sized paperback, you can access a variety of discs, among them
the Concise Oxford Dictionary, Hutchinson's Encyclopaedic Dictionary, a Golf
Guide to Europe, a Time Out Guide to four cities and, soon, the Financial
Times Guide to European companies.
All these PDAs have one disadvantage, especially for touch-typists. As one
user said: 'To use the keyboards, you need a pencil-sharpener for your
fingers.'
This is where the Amstrad Notepad comes into its own. The keyboard is 11 3/4
inches wide and comfortable to use. Although it cannot fit into your pocket,
it will easily slot into your briefcase. The Amstrad's main selling point
is: 'If you can't use this computer in five minutes, you'll get your money
back.' Only the worst cases of colour blindness are likely to be asking for
the return of Pounds 199.99.
What these portable PCs cannot yet do is keep you up to date with world
events. The Philips World Receiver radio is small enough to fit into a
pocket, yet sophisticated enough to tune into stations worldwide. It has a
world map on a liquid crystal display, 13 shortwave bands and direct
frequency key-in with 18 presets. Competing against it is the Sony ICF SW55,
with a 25-station name memory.
Most PDAs have built-in alarm calls, but none can boast the accuracy of a
new clock from Junghans. An internal antenna picks up a radio time-signal
from the National Physical Laboratory, and the clock resets itself
automatically. It even adjusts for British Summer time and, across the
Channel, it will reset itself to local time.
A regular little chatterbox is the Interpreter, which speaks fluent English,
French, German, Italian and Spanish. Enter a key word, such as 'car', and it
displays 'Can I hire a car?' instantly. Press a button for German, and it
will speak: 'Darf ich ein Auto mieten bitte?' Its memory includes 700
commonly-used phrases across 14 categories, and, in practice, it could talk
for 20 hours without repeating itself.
Battery shavers have been available for some time, but none has been as
light as the latest models. The Braun Pocket Battery Traveller weighs only
224 grammes with the batteries, and includes a pop-up long-hair trimmer. The
Philishave also includes a trimmer, and has a battery which lasts for two
weeks after an eight-hour charge. The Philips Ladyshave can be used in and
out of water, and its two batteries last for 35 minutes.
A real boon for women who need hair rollers is the latest Carmen Curl.
Instead of electricity or gas, it relies on activated carbon sachets which
are first shaken and then inserted into the rollers heating them
automatically.
The latest dictation machines are lighter than ever before. Sony claims that
its M-909 is the 'world's smallest tape recorder'. It is 67.6mm wide, 64.6mm
long and 18.5mm deep, or about 2 1/2 inches square by less than an inch
thick. Philips relies on its more conventional Pocket Memo range, which
weigh from 145 grammes to 185 grammes.
After the day's work, what better than a round of golf on a famous American
course? It might be thought of as a toy, but the Pro Golf II offers wind and
weather variations, and even your swing can be adjusted. You can hook,
slice, land up in a bunker or produce the perfect putt from the edge of the
green. With a little practice, you can play like Nick Faldo - theoretically,
of course.
The business traveller, equipped with all the gadgets available these days,
is bound to need something special in the way of luggage. What better than a
Piggyback trolley case which converts into a luggage cart? Simply raise the
pull handle, fasten other cases with the retractable strap, and you are
laughing while everybody else scrambles for a trolley.
Bon voyage. . .
Personal digital assistants: Amstrad Notepad - Pounds 199.99; HP 95LX
palmtop - Pounds 339; Sony Data Discman - Pounds 349.99; Psion Series 3 256K
 -Pounds 249.95; Sharp Palmtop Computer PC3000 IBM PC compatible - Pounds
599; Olivetti Quaderno - Pounds 680; Sharp IQ Electronic Organiser - Pounds
179.99.
Radios: Philips World Receiver AE3905 - Pounds 199.99; Sony ICF SW55 -
Pounds 249.99.
Alarm clocks: Junghans Digital alarm clock - Pounds 49.95.
Dictation machines: Philips Pocket Memo 393 - Pounds 149.50; Sony M909  -
Pounds 199.99.
Personal care: Philishave HS825 rechargeable - Pounds 57.95; Philips
Ladyshave - Pounds 19.95; Braun Pocket Battery Traveller - Pounds 19.95;
Carmen Curls - Pounds 10.16.
Games: Pro Golf II - Pounds 59.95.
Translators: Interpreter MkII - Pounds 149.95.
Luggage: Silhouette Piggyback - Pounds 175.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7260</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (18): Only the best connections -
Stewart Dalby pages through the guides to countries and airways
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEWART DALBY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BIBLE for air travellers going from or through Britain has long been the
ABC World Airways Guide, published by the Reed Travel Group.
This year, following extensive research, Reed has published an upgraded
version of the guide called, ABC World Airways Corporate Edition. As well as
steering air travellers through the complexities of airline schedules (it
includes information on 450,000 domestic and international flight schedules
and connections for the world's airlines), the guide gives full airport and
destination details, a survey of airlines' business classes, airline seating
plans, travel clubs/lounges, duty free shops, transport to city centres, car
rentals, currency, business hours and public holidays, passport/visa
requirements, vaccinations, hotel details, city maps and business and social
hints.
ABC World Airways Corporate Edition is published monthly in two volumes. An
annual subscription costs Pounds 306.
For business travellers who like to plan their own itineraries or to make
changes en route there is a family of three pocket - sized ABC Executive
Flight Planners.
These are condensed versions of the ABC World Airways Guide. They are also
published monthly and cover Europe, the Middle East, Africa, Asia and
Pacific, and the Americas. Each one includes details of direct flights to,
from, and within each region, plus the most useful transfer connections.
An annual subscription for 12 monthly editions costs Pounds 69. Reed Travel
Group is in Church Street, Dunstable, Bedfordshire, LU5 4HB (telephone 0581
600111).
A third publication by the Reed Travel Group is the ABC Rail Guide, which
includes timetables and fares. Updated every month, it covers all services
in London and southern England, with complete details of rail services and
fares between all Britain's main towns and cities. It costs Pounds 72 for an
annual subscription from the publishers. It is also available from most
leading bookshops, price Pounds 5.25.
For European connections and rail routes, a goodguide is Thomas Cook
European Rail Timetable. This costs Pounds 7.95, including postage, or is
available on an annual subscription for Pounds 95 from Thomas Cook Travel
Management, PO Box 36 Thorpe Road, Peterborough PE3 6SB.
Thomas Cook publishes a number of other specialised books on air travelas
well as its renowned guidebooks. Some of these are also available in a
computer disk format, for an IBM-compatible personal computer.
During the 1980s so many general travel and guide books were published that
the choice is endless.
Sarah Anderson and Simon Gaul, the joint proprietors of the Travel Bookshop,
have written, A Guide to Guide Books Abroad, 1992, published by Thomas Cook
at 50p. The Travel Bookshop is in London's Notting Hill at 13 Blenheim
Crescent, London, W11 2EE (telephone 071 229 5260).
The pamphlet makes the point that original guide books published in the 19th
Century, such as Baedekers, John Murray, Cooks and Augustus Hare, are worth
collecting and are also good value in revised editions.
Many travellers today still find them useful because of the good
descriptions they often provide of buildings.
Another point which emerges is the predominance of two different types of
guide - those catering for economy travellers for and those aimed at
tourists in search of culture or gourmet food. Among the success stories in
the 1980s have been Rough Guides and Lonely Planet publications, which tell
how to travel cheaply.
For slightly better - off tourists, Michelin guides, Travellers Handbooks
and Blue Guides remain great favourites.
Four other guide series, in particular, are worth mentioning. Fodor, a US
group, is long established and publishes a wide range. They list top hotels
and good restaurants. They are updated each year, and cater mainly for
American travellers. Fodor guides cost just under Pounds 10 in the UK.
Diplomatic and business contacts who travel frequently in eastern Europe
swear by Insight guides. They are often written by local authors and the
first chapters consist of a series of essays on history and culture.
Simon Gaul at the Travel Bookshop recommends the Cadogan guides, which are
relative newcomers and are aimed at the upmarket traveller. They are well
produced and seem well suited to the business traveller.
The Berlin guide, for example, opens with practical hints, followed by
sections on history, suggestions for walks and other attractions. Prices for
Cadogan guides start from Pounds 9.95.
I prefer The Economist guides which have sections on the economic scene, the
industrial scene, business awareness planning and reference, as well as
practical information such as the addresses of embassies. But a problem in
being so succinct and topical is that these guides quickly become out of
date.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7261</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (15): Rhythms to drive the blues
away - Dr Michael McGannon sums up the latest research on beating jet lag
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DR MICHAEL MCGANNON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUSINESS travellers with hectic flight schedules have reported to medical
researchers two main sources of stress - jet lag and Aids.
The chances are good that health and professional performances will be
compromised by the accumulated stresses of international travel, unless
steps are taken to overcome the problems.
The scientific evidence shows that long-distance air travel through multiple
time zones can precipitate health problems, ranging from temporary sleep
disturbances to debilitating heart disorders.
Call it what you like, rapid time zone change syndrome, circadian rhythm
shifts secondary to transmeridian travel or jet lag, this modern phenomenon
is simply another example of how modern technology and behaviour patterns
have been allowed to override human biology. Jet travel has caused a
fundamental mismatch between normal sleeping habits and the fast-track
business world that expects business people to be as alert at 3am in Tokyo
as they were at 9am in London or New York.
During the past 30 years, great advances have been made in understanding the
basic neurophysiological processes governing the processes of adaptation to
light and darkness.
An entirely new field of research has been born: chronobiology. Proper
functioning of many of the body's vegetative functions, including
sleepiness, wakefulness, appetite, intestinal function and body temperature,
are directly dependent upon the natural light-dependent cycle known as the
circadian (diurnal) rhythm.
Because this circadian or diurnal rhythm generally runs on a 25-hour cycle,
it will constantly reset itself on a daily basis instead of lagging behind.
This naturally elongated schedule explains one curiosity of jet travel:
travelling eastward, say from New York to London, will shorten the calendar
day, thereby catapulting the traveller's biological cycle into the following
morning when the normal pattern dictates sleep. This results in severe
fatigue, loss of mental lucidity, disorientation as the rhythm searches for
a new reference point by which to re-set itself.
Using various external prompters such as light, meals, activity and social
interaction to resychronise the body, the brain is generally able to reset
one to two hours of lost cycle a day, so that the trip eastwards might throw
you off for a week.
Of those external cues used by the body to adapt itself, light is the single
most powerful synchronising agent for resetting the biological clock in the
brain; the suprachiasmatic nucleus (SCN), which is connected to light
sensing cells in the eye.
According to pioneering research on light at Harvard University, resetting
the biological time clock can be accomplished by precisely timing exposure
to bright light at certain times during the circadian cycle.
This resets the clock earlier or later or simply deadens the cycle's peaks
and troughs. Related research also shows that the pineal gland, located deep
in the brain, Descartes's 'seat of the soul', actually secretes a powerful
light-related hormone - melatonin - which has a fundamental role in the
resetting of the body's time clock.
Furthermore, researchers at the Johnson Space Center have shown that the
prolonged immobility of overseas flights causes the body to excrete
excessive amounts of potassium essential to optimum physical performance.
This loss accounts for the decreased muscle strength, diminished physical
(and mental) reflexes, confusion and, quite possibly, disturbances in heart
rhythm. Physical exercise (the day of the flight) helps release potassium
into the blood, thus compensating for losses resulting from flight
immobility.
Given the obvious individual differences between people, there does not
appear to be a universal remedy for jet lag. What follows are practical ways
to capitalise on the latest research findings.
When I asked several hundred successful travelling managers what strategies
they used to battle jet lag, two strategies were reported - abstinence from
alcohol and exercise.
Solutions to battling jet lag should be divided into three groups: Before
departure: First, try to re-set your biological clock. For long trips of a
week or more, it really pays to try to gently change the daily rhythm (by
one hour a day before departure) to simulate the new time zone. In other
words, if travelling from Europe to the west coast of America (where bedtime
is about nine hours earlier), get to sleep one hour earlier every day for 3
to 4 days before departing.
For shorter trips of two to three days, attempt to 'tough it out' by
sticking to the home schedule. That way, at least, you will not need to
adapt twice in as many days and can arrive home hitting the ground running.
While in flight: If you are really serious about beating jet lag there are
several 'absolutes'. Proper hydration is one absolute, because humidity of
the aircraft's cabin air can be uncomfortably low (3 per cent).
Re-humidifying the air to more comfortable levels (25 to 35 per cent)
requires about 200 litres/hour on a Boeing 747 or two tonnes of water for a
10-hour flight: that can get very expensive.
Your strategy should be the same as the flight crew: re-humidify yourself]
Kill two birds with one stone by drinking at least one glass of orange juice
(potassium and water) every hour while awake. Do not worry, an overdose of
orange juice is not possible] Furthermore, resist the seduction of free
alcohol and coffee, two substances that will induce lethargy by wringing the
system dry and causing potassium losses. Alcohol and coffee will set you up
for the worst case of jet lag possible.
Before dozing off (something which will be easy if the body has been
previously fatigued by exercise), do a few arm lifts: using the arm rests,
lift your weight (discreetly) off the seat several times. This will help
keep the blood circulating well while you sleep.
After arrival: Promise yourself that you will arrange your schedule (by
arriving the day before meetings) to accommodate a physical work-out
sometime prior to appointments. This will ensure that the vital organs
(including the brain) receives well-circulated blood richly saturated with
oxygen.
Until the light researchers find a way to install bright light on aircraft
or in hotels in a way that safely dissipates the heat generated and makes it
accessible to all, use exercise and light together to reset the body's time
clock.  Chronobiologists say the best time to do this for eastbound
passengers would be to take a jog (or any aerobic work-out) mid morning or
early evening. Jogging or working out in bright light will hold back the
clock until you catch up. Do not go to bed until the evening and then stick
to local schedules.
Studies on soldiers involved with large troop manoeuvres abroad reveal that
jet-lag diets and over-the-counter anti-jet-lag pills have little scientific
validity.
Light therapy, combined with an intelligent assortment of hydration and
exercise, appears to be the best drug-free treatment for those whose
sleep/activity patterns are disrupted by travel.
I am amazed to find that modern executives are still victims of folklore
when it comes to Aids. In brief and simple terms, you cannot acquire the
Aids virus, HIV, by casual contact (parties, pools, conferences, the
workplace, toilet seats or insect bites). It is spread by having sex with
HIV-infected individuals, intravenous drug use and receiving contaminated
blood products. Engage in high-risk activity and you will become a high-risk
yourself.
For those who have stayed for relatively long periods in developing
countries, certain routine tests should be considered upon return, including
a complete blood count and smear, liver function tests, urinalysis, TB skin
test and when exposure is reported or suspected, serologic tests for Aids,
Hepatitis B and various parasites.
Lastly, be proactive in your approach to dealing with modern travel because
if you are failing to plan, you are planning to fail]
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7262</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (16): Getting your money's worth
overseas - Stewart Dalby shops around for the best deals in changing cash
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEWART DALBY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD JENKINS of Hillhead, the former president of the European Commission,
undertook an exercise in money-changing in Europe. He estimated that if a
traveller left Britain with Pounds 100 in banknotes, visited all 12 EC
capitals and changed currencies 11 times (Luxembourg does not have its own
currency) the sum would have dwindled to Pounds 28.50 by the time it was
changed back into sterling.
The losses would have been incurred solely on commission fees and took no
account of exchange rate movements.
He admitted that seasoned business travellers would not behave in this way.
'I deliberately kept the amounts small to make a point. If you are shifting
large amounts of money around you would not be hit so hard.'
But his exercise emphasises the first rules of travel: change money as
seldom as possible and change large amounts. The fewer the transactions, the
less the handling fees.
That said, what is the most efficient way for the business traveller to
carry cash?
Mr Ian Spight, the director of financial services for Thomas Cook, says:
'There is not one single cheapest way of travelling. Certainly there is no
way of going abroad at nil net cost.'
For business travellers, Mr Spight feels it depends on the destination.
'Broadly speaking, I would recommend business travellers to take currency
and make extensive use of chargecards.'
However, he advises the individual business person to look at local
conditions. 'Germany, for example, one would expect to be a cashless
society. But, in fact, charge cards are not as extensively used there as
elsewhere.'
He also stresses the importance of using local currency for the smaller
bills. One way an inexperienced traveller incurs losses is arriving at
airports with only traveller's cheques, which have to be changed for taxi
fares or tips. It can be expensive to change large denominations at
airports. Changing traveller's cheques at hotels can be even more costly.
The business traveller has to make a calculation based on a number of
factors including cost, convenience and security. For travel to eastern
Europe, Mr Spight recommends D-Marks or dollars in small bills and suggests
that charge cards be used for larger bills.
In the former Soviet Union, the best currency to use is dollars. For most of
western Europe, the local currency is best. In the Far East, dollars will
prove useful except in Japan where the yen is obviously the best currency.
In the Middle East, Africa and Latin America, it depends on the country but
dollars are generally a safe bet. Do not come home with too much of the
local currency because it might prove difficult to find a bank willing to
exchange it.
It pays to shop around, particularly at times of currency turmoil. Exchange
rates can differ from bank to bank and so can charges. Thomas Cook has a
commission rate of 2 per cent for banknotes. Most of the clearing banks and
building societies have similar charges. But these can vary depending on the
amounts changed. Some banks also charge a handling fee.
American Express offices in the City of London charge a straight Pounds 2
fee for currency banknotes rather than a percentage of the amount changed.
However, for some currencies its rates of exchange are not as competitive as
the clearing banks.
Restaurants and hotels in eastern Europe now accept most charge cards. In
the countries of the former Soviet Union charge cards are accepted in the
large hotels used by visitors.
If a charge card is used to draw money from a bank there is usually a 1.5
per cent handling fee. When paying by charge card abroad, the costs to the
traveller are losses on foreign exchange.
Charge and credit cards and local currency are the best method of settling
accounts in terms of convenience, but they present problems in security.
For example, travellers who visit the countries of the former Soviet Union
report that crime is now a serious problem. Muggings and other thefts from
foreign visitors are a particular problem in Moscow.
There are a number of other methods of funding travel.
Banks can transfer money to banks abroad at a fee but this could prove
expensive. It can also be inconvenient because it means visiting a
particular bank during business hours.
Another method is to use Eurocheques. These are used extensively in shop,
restaurants and hotels throughout western Europe. They are a method of
drawing on one's own bank account while abroad. They are safe, but can also
be expensive. At Lloyds Bank, for example, it is necessary to buy a
Eurocheque card. This costs Pounds 9 but lasts two years.
Thereafter there is a 30p charge for each cheque plus commission of 1.6 per
cent.
The cheapest way of travelling safely is to take traveller's cheques.
'Providing they take currency traveller's cheques, that is franc traveller's
cheques for France, and so on, then it can work out cheaply. Sterling
traveller's cheques are cheaper to buy, but then there is the possibility of
exchange losses and handling charges at the other end,' Mr Spight says.
American Express and Thomas Cook traveller's cheques are widely accepted but
it pays to shop around. American Express in London charge one per cent
commission when selling dollar traveller's cheques. Providing the cheques
are cashed in an American Express office there is no further charge. Thomas
Cook charges two per cent for foreign currency traveller's cheques and one
per cent for sterling. The problem with sterling is that banks abroad charge
a handling fee and there can also be exchange losses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7263</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (13): On track for change -
Richard Tomkins looks at BR's monopoly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIRST, the bad news for rail travellers in Britain. Remember all that talk
about Richard Branson's Virgin Group setting up a luxury inter-city train
service featuring hostess service, seat-back video and on-board business
centres, all for the price of a normal British Rail fare? The plan's off.
It foundered on the rock of a provision in the Transport Act 1962 requiring
BR to operate with due regard to efficiency and economy of operation. That,
said BR, meant that it could not allow Virgin on its tracks unless Virgin
undertook to compensate it for every penny of profit it lost as a result.
Clearly, any such arrangement was a non-starter from Virgin's point of view.
The result is that business travellers are stuck with BR's monopoly over
train services, at least until privatisation. But now, the slightly better
news: BR seems to have picked up ideas from the private sector in its latest
marketing campaign.
For this, passengers must thank the recession. In the present financial year
BR's InterCity sector is looking at a Pounds 50m hole in its revenues,
partly because the number of passenger journeys has fallen and partly
because people are trading down from first class to standard class.
InterCity has responded by tightening its belt, cutting costs and paring
investment to the bone. But that, it says, is not enough: so beyond that, it
is also fighting to fill empty seats by launching the biggest package of
marketing measures it has ever deployed.
One prong of the campaign is to widen the range of bargain fares - for
example, through a re-introduction of the Boots promotion, giving shoppers
at Boots stores vouchers that they can trade in for tickets. These offers,
however, are aimed at leisure travellers more than the business market. The
main benefits for business travellers are improvements in service.
For example, customer welcome teams will be introduced to station concourses
at big InterCity stations. These will consist of hosts and hostesses dressed
in a distinctive claret uniform, walking the concourses and offering help to
passengers. The first teams are already in action at London's Euston, King's
Cross and Paddington terminuses and Bristol Temple Meads.
Meanwhile, the most frequent InterCity services, such as those between
London and Gatwick, Bristol, Leicester, Birmingham and Norwich, will be
re-packaged as InterCity Shuttles from next year. The idea is that
passengers intending to travel these routes, at least from the London end,
will no longer need to worry about timetables. Instead, they will be able to
turn up at a designated platform at any time of day in the knowledge that a
train will be there, ready to depart and with its buffet open.
There are big changes to on-board catering, too. The traditional dining-car
with its set menu will largely be replaced by so-called Express Diners -
restaurant cars offering an all-day menu aimed at meeting a perceived demand
for lighter meals. People will be able to make up their own meals from a
choice of starters, main courses and desserts.
On Pullman trains and some other services timed for business travel, the
more traditional menu will be retained. But it will be improved, with a
wider choice of dishes: the autumn menu in Pullman, for example, will
include 'Best of New British' cuisine alongside international and vegetarian
dishes, and a new wine range is to be introduced later.
A number of improvements are being made to the frills of business travel.
There will be a new look for table settings in Pullman and first class, with
brighter and warmer colours. First class passengers were last month being
given a free copy of a novel - The Firm by John Gresham. A series of
exclusive telephone numbers is being introduced across the country for
booking first class tickets. And for Silver Standard travellers - typically,
the cost-conscious younger business traveller paying the full standard class
fare - there is free tea or coffee in china cups instead of plastic ones, a
choice of free biscuits and pastries, and the addition of hot toast to the
Pounds 4.95 breakfast.
There are also improvements to sleeper services. On all sleeper trains the
first class sleeper fee now includes a continental breakfast and newspaper,
with a full breakfast available in lounge cars; and a lounge car has been
added to the Fort William sleeper, which is renamed The West Highlander.
One reason why InterCity has reacted to the downturn in business in this
manner is that it operates in a ferociously competitive market.
Surprisingly, railways account for only 10 per cent of UK passenger journeys
exceeding 50 miles: of the rest, cars account for 88 per cent, air 1 per
cent and coaches 1 per cent.
However, the big question this marketing campaign is likely to raise in the
mind of most business travellers is whether it is not simply a case of
rearranging the deckchairs on the Titanic. What is the point of making minor
changes to the quality of service, they may ask, if people cannot rely on
the trains to run on time?
Certainly, there is nothing to be proud of in InterCity's record. Last year
only 84 per cent of its trains reached their destinations within 10 minutes
of the scheduled time, against a government target of 90 per cent; and the
cancellation rate of 2.2 per cent was far above the target of 0.5 per cent.
One reason for this poor performance is the increasingly decrepit state of
InterCity's assets. Although the London King's Cross to Edinburgh line has
recently emerged from an extensive modernisation, plans for a Pounds 750m
upgrade of the London Euston to Glasgow line are on indefinite hold, and the
InterCity 125 trains running on the Great Western lines out of London
Paddington will soon be due for replacement.
Unfortunately for passengers, the present pressures on public spending leave
little likelihood that these investment needs will be fulfilled by the
government in the foreseeable future. The result is that passengers may have
to wait for rail privatisation before they get the trains they want - and
that is not due to draw into the platform until at least April 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7264</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (14): Reward schemes cut - Are
travel perks on the way out? asks David Churchill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE tough economic conditions of the 1990s, have the corporate conference
and incentive travel trips of the 1980s had their day?
At a time when companies are having daily to face up to the harsh realities
of recession, the exotic sales conference to Florida or the Far East may
seem in bad taste and provide the wrong public relations message to staff
and customers.
Yet, while there is no doubt that companies have cut their conference and
incentive programmes during the recession, there are still some who believe
that a motivational conference or incentive trip (often the two are very
similar) is the best way to win business.
'Where there's a will there's a way,' points out Mr John Fisher, managing
director of motivation company Page &amp; Moy Marketing. 'Companies that want to
keep their conferences and incentives will usually come up with a reason for
it.' Nowadays, he adds, many incentives are termed as 'educational' or
'factory' visits rather than straightforward travel rewards.
Operators in the conference and incentive travel business - one of the most
important parts of the overall business travel market - insist that the
motivational need for such travel is more important now than ever before.
'Conferences motivate people,' insists Ms Janice Eagelson, marketing manager
for the De Vere Hotels group whose portfolio includes the refurbished Grand
Hotel in Brighton. 'This is particularly important for sales staff who spend
most of their time on their own.'
Mr Paul Swan, managing director of conference production company Spectrum
Communications, adds: 'Sales staff need even more reassurance in times like
the present and a good conference can take care of this. The sales executive
can look round and see tangible evidence of the size and strength of the
company.
'With business disasters all around them every employee needs reassurance
that he or she is led by a winning team that has a strategy to get the
company through.'
The conference and incentive travel market is split into several distinct
sections. At their grandest are the international conventions when people
arrive from all over the world to discuss a particular subject. Then there
are company conferences which provide a platform for staff from one company
to meet in pleasant surroundings to communicate and discuss corporate
objectives.
But the most popular area is the incentive travel trips, often thinly
disguised as conferences. They are really rewards for staff or dealers and
distributors who have performed well. The motor, life assurance and computer
industries are all heavy users of these type of incentives even in the
present recession: the benefits to the companies are too great to stop such
travel entirely, although the type of reward is changing.
'While group incentive travel remains an important motivational tool, the
number of reward schemes targeted at individuals are increasing very
rapidly,' points out Mr Nick Bender, general manager of Thomas Cook's
incentive travel business. 'There is no doubt that travel is used as an
incentive simply because it works best.' Thomas Cook has, therefore,
introduced worldwide travel vouchers which can be given as a reward to
individuals.
What is also changing as a result of the recession is the length of
conference and incentive travel trips as well as the destinations. Events
are often shorter and the places visited less exotic.
'Some companies are becoming a bit wary of taking their top performers off
for at least a week away from their business,' points out Ms Barbara
Crawley, managing director of the Motivtravel incentive house.
Short-haul trips, therefore, are increasingly used as rewards. Mr John
Lawson, chairman of the Incentive Travel and Meetings Association and
managing director of Motivational Travel Management, suggests another reason
for short-haul's popularity.
'Companies are less willing to book business class seats, so while two to
three hours in short-haul economy seating is acceptable, most people find
seven to eight hours in economy to a long-haul destination is not so much
fun, especially when they have been used to a higher grade,' he suggests.
Out of the UK, therefore, Paris is still the top short-haul conference and
incentive destination. Moreover, in a bid to capitalise on this, Eurodisney
is launching a scheme to attract conference and incentive business to the
resort, especially during the winter months.
Paris's popularity, however, may be hindered by the recent devaluation of
sterling against the French franc which makes it more expensive as a
destination. Within Europe, therefore, the trend may be towards better value
for money destinations such as Spain and Portugal.
But while short-haul conference and incentive travel is the name of the
game, some companies still believe that long-haul travel is a better
motivator. The problem, however, is finding sufficiently new and exciting
destinations. 'There is no doubt that some companies want fresh ideas and
high quality,' says Mr Lawson. 'Whether it's short haul or long haul, the
over-riding demand is for an incentive experience that works well and is
better than they have had before.'
Hong Kong is cited by conference and incentive travel organisers as pushing
hard for business out of the UK. But the 'hot' destinations to watch over
the next few years are Venezuela, Boston, Vancouver and Buenos Aires.
The one drawback to the growth of the conference and incentive travel
market, however, remains the tax implications. Mr Fisher from Page &amp; Moy
points out that the acid test for tax is whether or not there is a
qualification element. 'If delegates have to qualify to attend, then it is
taxable, including costs for partners,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7265</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (11): Manners mean a good deal -
Roy Terry looks at etiquette and cultural differences in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROY TERRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE story is told of a fountain pen manufacturer with a product that was
guaranteed not to leak ink when clipped on a shirt or a suit pocket. In its
advertisements the company used the slogan 'Avoid embarrassment, use XYZ
pens.' It went down well in most countries but in Spain, to its own blushes,
the company discovered it was advertising a contraceptive - in Spanish the
word 'embarrassment' also means pregnant.
This is a good example of 'faux-amis,' as the French put it, or 'false
friends,' words which mean something different in another language.
Frederick Marsh1, an international marketing consultant, gives another
example in a paper on European Community countries prepared for a UN agency.
"A well-known British car manufacturer wanted to launch a car in Germany
with the name Silver Mist,' he says. However, it realised that in German the
word 'mist' means animal excrement or manure, and was forced to think again.
Something similar applied to an exporter of mist-producing curling irons
called Mist-Stick.
Language
These examples confirm the problems highlighted in a recent study of 2,000
companies by the Institute of Manpower Studies2 for the Department of
Employment. More than 60 per cent of the companies had dealings with foreign
executives, mainly French, German, Spanish and Italian speakers. All these
companies identified some language problems, and 23 per cent said lack of a
particular language created a barrier to business.
Cert3, a Nottinghamshire-based training consultancy, teaches executives
'foreigner-friendly English.' Marianne Aston, the architect of the course,
says the main difficulty is that when talking to people whose first language
is not English, British executives use words that are too complicated and
sentence structures that are too convoluted. She argues that if executives
follow a few simple rules communication will be easier.
For instance, if you want to say someone has a lot of money, say they are
rich. Avoid expressions such as 'well-off,' 'loaded' or 'well-heeled.' Even
people who speak no English will understand 'OK' but few will know what
'gobsmacked' means.
Idioms are open to misunderstanding. 'At the end of the day' could be
interpreted as meaning that something is wanted by 6pm, and 'pull your socks
up' could have foreigners reaching under the table.
Numbers are another source of confusion for the unwary and uninformed. In
French and English the number 21 is expressed with units of 10 spoken first
 -twenty one. In German and in Dutch it operates in reverse - one and
twenty. So it is wise to double-check that a telephone number, for instance,
has been noted down correctly.
Take care, too, in Austria or southern Germany where toilets in hotels and
other public buildings may be indicated with a double zero - 00. Also, it is
worth remembering that when a German makes an appointment for 'halb neun' or
'half nine' it indicates a meeting at 08.30 hours and not 09.30. The same
applies in Dutch. Such a misunderstanding could have unfortunate
consequences because punctuality in Germany and the Netherlands is vital.
Behaviour
Some companies in the Institute of Manpower study rated understanding of
foreign cultural and business behaviour above language ability. Mistakes of
this kind were thought to affect business relations greatly. Lack of
understanding local conditions could also increase stress on employees, the
study revealed.
One company described how an employee had arrived distraught at a meeting
because of a misunderstanding with a taxi driver. The employee had objected
to parting with a briefcase. The driver then tried to wrest the case from
him not to make off with it as the employee believed, but to place it in the
boot of the car, as the law required.
A good example of cultural differences is quoted by Mr Marsh. A Scandinavian
company wishing to sell baby clothes in Belgium discovered that the goods
were virtually unsaleable because in most regions clothes for baby girls are
trimmed with blue and those for baby boys with pink.
In some European countries such as Spain the custom of 'kissing' the hand of
a lady when being introduced is still practised. However, the term 'kissing'
is a misnomer because usually there is no physical contact between hand and
lips.
Greetings
On formal occasions in Germany the hands of women are raised to the lips and
kissed. In Italy, cheek kissing is sometimes practised by women. Again, this
does not actually involve kissing. The cheeks are merely rubbed, first one
side then the other, and a soft lip-smacking sound is made.
Shaking hands on meeting and on parting is common in Germany, Belgium,
France and Italy and ignoring this custom, especially in France, will cause
offence. In France, it is wise to try to shake hands with everyone in a
crowded room.
Observing the correct forms of address is vital. In Spain, the surname of
the host is likely to cause confusion because there are usually two family
names. Only the first should be used because the last one is the mother's
name. For instance, in the name Jose Lopez Garcia, the correct form of
address face to face or in correspondence is Senor Lopez.
Germans are very formal when speaking to each other and will address even
close colleagues as 'Herr Strauss' or 'Frau Schmidt.' Titles are used in
Germany, France and especially in Italy, where Dottore is the most common
form of address for Italians with university degrees. Other titles in use in
Italy are Ingegnere (engineer), Avvocato (lawyer or advocate) and Architetto
(architect). It is correct to use them on their own without a surname.
In Germany, it is customary to address professional people as, for example,
Herr Doktor or Frau Direktorin. It is bad manners not to use titles but
referring to someone as Herr Doktor when they are not is also frowned upon.
In France, the practice is less common although older people still welcome
being given a title. The head of a company will expect to be addressed as
'Madame (or Monsieur) le President.' It is a title which is borne for life.
Even after retirement it is customary to refer to an individual by the most
prestigious title acquired during a career.
The Continental equivalent of 'Miss' in English is now the form of address
for very young women only. In France, women are usually called Madame, even
if single; in Germany, 'Fraulein' is used only for young girls; and, in
Italy, 'Signora' (with or without a surname) is customary for all women,
married or single.
Germans answer a telephone by giving their surname but in Italy the
individual answering a call is likely to say 'pronto' - 'I am listening.'
Belgium has three official languages - Flemish, French and German. Choosing
the wrong language is very bad form and the mistake is not likely to be
easily forgiven.
Dining out
In France, especially, correct business etiquette is crucial. Marie-Helene
Descamps, attachee de presse for former President Valery Giscard d'Estaing,
is an authority on do's and don'ts at the lunch table.
She says there are two kinds of business lunch - building up relations
without expecting anything in return and to discuss a deal in the making, or
to celebrate a deal afterward. Deals should be concluded in the office never
over a lunch table, says Madame Descamps.
A successful business luncher in Paris must have a stock of business
anecdotes and subjects of conversation to last through the hors-d'oeuvres,
main course and cheese. When the cheese is out of the way, then business can
be discussed. The idea is encapsulated in the colloquial French expression
for a judiciously chosen moment: 'entre la poire et le fromage' although the
phrase is confusing because cheese actually precedes dessert in France.
In Germany, business meals are not as common as in the UK or in the US and
tend to be strictly social occasions. Foreigners are rarely invited to
dinner and such an invitation suggests a very advanced association.
The opposite applies in Italy where entertaining is an essential part of
business life. Dining in Italy is almost a ceremonial and deciding who pays
is a game which must be won by the person issuing the invitation. Guests
should offer to pay but in the end should defer to their Italian host.
In Tuscany, even the clumsiest effort to speak Italian over the lunch table
will bring enthusiastic praise. Do not discuss business because the Italian
lunch is a social event not an occasion for concluding a deal.
All this tends to illustrate that for the British, when they cross the
Channel there are perils around every corner. For too long the British have
expected almost everyone to understand English and tend to lose patience
with those who do not. The old imperialist attitude that the British way is
best and that everything foreign should be studiously ignored or, at best,
tolerated with mild amusement, is as outdated as a viceroy in India.
Today, the rule for British business people must increasingly be: 'When in
Rome, do as the Romans do.' Anything else is not only downright rude, but
bad for business.
1 Marsh Business Services (telephone 071 233 3123). 2 Cert (telephone 0777
860 835). 3 Foreign Language Needs of Business. Institute of Manpower
Studies, Mantell Building, University of Sussex, Falmer, Brighton, Sussex
BN1 9RF. Pounds 30.
Further reading: The Economist Business Guides to France, Germany, Italy and
the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7266</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (12): Workhorses of the industry -
Travel Agents
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUSINESS TRAVEL agents are the workhorses of effective corporate travel
management. The good business specialist should not only know the best deals
on offer but also be able to secure them because of the muscle that agency
has due to the volume of bookings. Good agents also are able to provide
their client companies with a global reach to enable them to do business
anywhere in the world - as well as providing detailed management information
on who has travelled where and at what cost.
Small wonder, then, that the accepted wisdom of business travel management
is: if you find a good agent then never let that agent go.
Unfortunately, good agents who do all of the above and more are not
necessarily that easy to find. Corporate complaints about business agents
range from executives who bemoan long waits for interconnecting flights when
they find a colleague from another company has been booked direct through,
to company accountants who cannot cope with the excessive amount of data
provided by the agent when all they want is a brief summary.
It is hardly surprising, therefore, that some leading buyers of business
travel are negotiating directly with suppliers such as airlines, hotels and
car rental companies to meet their needs. They believe that the volume of
business and agency commission saved can give them a better deal.
But the increasing complexity of business travel in the 1990s would make
most companies, large or small, prefer to use a specialist agent. Small
companies, however, have had problems in the past in gaining the support and
benefits that specialists can provide.
'Companies which spend up to Pounds 600,000 on business travel have not, in
the past, been offered by the industry the service levels and cost
management opportunities they deserve,' observes Mr Bill Kirkwood, head of
sales and marketing for Thomas Cook travel management.
Thomas Cook commissioned research from Mori which found that small companies
were often desperate for help to achieve the best price for travel in line
with the needs of individual travellers. 'The research showed that some
customers thought they had to go to a bucket shop to get the kind of air
fares they see advertised in the newspapers,' says Mr Kirkwood.
It also showed that smaller companies rated local service as being more
important than global networks. According to the survey, the important
criteria for a business travel agent were for easy booking, fast delivery of
tickets and the opportunity for regular meetings to keep the agency
appraised of the client's needs. Reliability and flexibility were also rated
as critical.
Thomas Cook has responded to this marketing niche by providing a 'fair fares
policy' for small (and large) companies. It will quote a fare for the travel
that has been requested and will also research other fares, guaranteeing to
offer the cheapest alternative within the restrictions applying to the
traveller.
It is these restrictions - such as when you need to fly and whether you
might need to change dates and times - that are usually the cause of higher
fares being offered. The simple rule of business travel is that the more
flexibility executives want built into their travel schedules, the higher
the fare.
But while small companies may represent a market not to be forgotten, there
is little doubt of the growing demand for business travel agents to have
world-wide clout. American Express, with an estimated worldwide revenue from
business travel of more than Dollars 4bn, is probably the largest group
which fulfils the travel agencyfunction of providing the interface between
the supplier and client on an international basis.
Vying for second place in the international league are Carlson of the US,
which recently acquired the A. T. Mays agency chain in the UK although with
most of its business travel turnover still in the US, and Wagons-Lits, which
last year bought Pickfords Business Travel from NFC. Wagons-Lits owns
agencies in 40 countries and has partnerships with agencies in a further 79
countries.
Thomas Cook and Wagons-Lits used to have a formal marketing agreement which
limited their spheres of influence: since that deal broke up a few years
ago, both companies have made strenuous efforts to expand their global
coverage. Thomas Cook, which does not own its operations in the US, can be
expected aggressively to seek new world-wide coverage following its
acquisition.
Hogg Robinson, a UK-based service organisation, has also joined the trend
towards globalisation through helping to develop an international network,
Business Travel International.
Mr David Radcliffe, Hogg Robinson's business travel director, makes clear
that the new arrangement is customer-driven. 'Customer demands for greater
cost savings have increased immeasurably over the past few years and through
the purchasing power of BTI they can avail themselves of maximum savings,'
he says.
Newcomers to the BTI consortium this year include Japan's Nippon Travel
Agency, Spain's El Corte Ingles, Global Travel in Singapore and Kuoni Travel
of Switzerland.
The drawback to increasing globalisation of travel agencies, however, is
largely one of logistics: collecting information and exercising control over
a large number of locations or operations. It is here that the development
of Computer Reservation Systems (CRS) will play an increasingly important
role in the 1990s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7267</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (7): Surprisingly conservative
city - Hong Kong
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HONG KONG may be a miracle of peaks, steel and glass, but the first thing
the business traveller needs to prepare for is the surliness of the city's
antiquated taxi drivers. The scruffy-but-efficient Kai Tak airport is on the
edge of the Kowloon peninsula, a 30-minute taxi ride away from the main
business hotels on Hong Kong island.
English language and charm are at a minimum in the colony's taxis, but the
fare compensates for this. A trip into the Central district of Hong Kong
island will cost just HKDollars 75 (USDollars 10), including the toll for
the cross-harbour tunnel.
There are three main districts for business hotels. Central is the core
financial district and the Mandarin Oriental was always the traditional
choice. But it is rapidly being superseded by more luxurious five-star
offerings in nearby Admiralty and Wanchai, such as the austerely impressive
Grand Hyatt and the sumptuous Island Shangri-la.
Alternatively, for those with a yearning for the past (an unfortunate
preference in such a modern city) there is the grand old Peninsular, located
a short Star Ferry ride from Hong Kong island, at the tip of the 'Golden
Mile', the principal tourist shopping district that runs along Nathan Road.
Hong Kong is blessed with a remarkably cheap and efficient transportation
system. Taxis are prevalent and inexpensive. The Mass Transit Railway links
the main urban areas of Hong Kong Island and connects with the tourist and
residential centres of Kowloon, with an efficiency which will shock the
European visitor.
The more traditional Star Ferry and Hong Kong island tram system continue to
operate at a more leisurely pace for Dollars HK1. The main railway station
is in Kowloon, with trains heading to the New Territories and the border, or
through to Guangzhou (Canton).
Hong Kong is renowned for being the Mecca for Chinese cuisine, but it offers
a wide variety of food. For the businessmen who wants to be where the action
is, the favourite destination for the 'power breakfast' remains the Mandarin
Grill. At lunch-time, to rub shoulders with the Chinese tycoons, go to Fook
Lam Moon, in Wanchai. It offers excellent though pricey Cantonese food, but
do not expect either decor, or knives and forks.
For a glimpse of the expatriate Taipans, you should angle for an invitation
to the Jackson Room at the exclusive Hong Kong Club. In the evening, Karaoke
Bars have become de rigueur and Hong Kong offers every range of the spectrum
from glitz and fountains to sheer sleaze.
Wanchai still has a range of 'girlie' bars, housing remnants of the Vietnam
rest and recreation era. Tsim Sha Tsui offers stadium-sized 'Hostess Clubs',
including the famous Club BBoss (formerly Club Volvo), where you are driven
to your table in a pink car.
A more relaxing evening could be spent taking the Peak tram (a funicular
railway) up to the Peak Cafe, where the views and food make a magnificent
combination. For a western-style night club, JJ's at the Grand Hyatt is now
in vogue.
Hong Kong is a surprisingly conservative city; for business, a suit and tie
are an essential penance, even in the height of Hong Kong's humid summer.
Another necessity is a stack of name cards.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7268</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (9): Easing the difficulties -
Paris
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PARIS can seem a difficult city in which to do business because neither it
nor its inhabitants like making concessions to foreigners.
But there is no need to be dismayed by the off-handed approach of average
Parisians, or by the city's famous traffic jams.
The visiting business traveller can easily manage by following three general
tips - for getting around, finding hotel accommodation and for eating.
Transport: Wherever possible, travel by metro. This is an efficient and very
cheap way of avoiding the hair-raising experience of Paris traffic, even
though taxis are also cheap by European standards. Within the city
boundaries, a metro stop is never more than 500 metres or so away and trains
pass every 90 seconds at peak hours. This means you can guarantee to cross
the city in around 20 minutes. Few taxi drivers can legally beat that, at
least not in business hours.
That leaves you with the problem of finding your way to meetings by foot
from your metro stop. The best map is the pocket version of the aptly named
L'Indispensable, available in stationers everywhere.
The principle of Paris street lay-outs is simple: numbers ascend in the
direction of the flow of the Seine (east to west) in streets parallel with
the river, or start with low numbers near the river to high ones further
from it, in streets perpendicular to the Seine. In both cases, odd numbers
on the left, evens on the right.
Hotels: Avoid the standard international chains - that would be a waste of a
visit to Paris and could damagingly indicate to French business contacts
that you are out of touch. It is possible to put yourself up with style and
taste in almost any price range, from the 1,400 hotels in the city.
To start at the top, there is the Ritz in Place Vendome (former home to
Hemingway and Coco Chanel), Plaza Athenee in Avenue Montaigne for the better
sort of media folk, or the Crillon, next door to the US embassy on Place de
la Concorde for glitterati of all types.
For more sensible budgets, the recently refurbished Montalembert, just off
rue de Bac on the left bank, is admired by the designer crowd, or there is
L'Hotel, a temple of Art Deco in rue des Beaux Arts, where Oscar Wilde eked
out his last days. Pavillon de la Reine, near the fictional site of
Inspector Maigret's flat just off Place des Vosges has great charm.
For travellers paying for their own accommodation, the best strategy is to
go for one of the several score of picturesque small hotels around the back
streets of Saint Germain or on the Ile Saint Louis.
Food: Choosing a restaurant suited to your guests' taste and your own budget
is probably easier than in most cities, because more detailed guide books
have been written on eateries in Paris than most European capitals.
The key is to leave enough time to do some homework. The Michelin rosette
system is quite a good guide to quality, and accurate on prices, though it
is a good idea to get a second opinion from another good guide, like the -
often more critical - Gault Millau. Any good hotel should have both volumes.
Any hotel proprietor worth his salt will be happy to provide advice, because
food is a serious subject in Paris.
Here are a few personal favourites:
Le Grand Vefour in Palais Royal, for a lovely 18th Century interior and a
menu that more than merits its two Michelin rosettes;
Chez Pauline in nearby rue Villedo for unpretentious Lyonnaise cooking, a
fine range of Armagnacs and a pleasant atmosphere; or
Chez Georges in rue du Mail for an up-market bistro.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7269</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (8): Some of the glitz has faded -
New York
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEW YORKERS still like to think of their city as the brashest place in
America, but when Los Angeles went up in flames earlier this year, New York
started to seem like a kinder, gentler city.
Recession has wrought subtle changes in Manhattan. Some of the glitz and
glitter has gone, done in by the loss of thousands of highly-paid jobs. But
the city's spirit remains remarkably resilient.
Some things have not changed. The business climate may be difficult, but the
pace of life is as frenetic as ever. As a result, there are still too many
people trying to cram too much into a day and visitors should be prepared to
have meetings unceremoniously delayed or cancelled.
With the number of homeless in New York now swollen to about 80,000, begging
has become something of an art form. Requests for donations to the United
Negro Pizza Fund (a play on the United Negro College Fund) are par for the
course, as are recitals of bad poetry. Perhaps the most original, and
annoying, is a musician who uses his saxophone as an instrument of torture,
squawking loudly on crowded subway cars until the captive passengers pay him
to stop.
The recession has not relieved the city's perennial traffic jams. Traversing
Manhattan at mid-day or rush-hour is still a nightmare. The most reliable
form of transportation is walking, if the distance is manageable. For
greater distances, the subway belies its reputation by being reasonably fast
and safe.
Otherwise, cabs are comfortable and remarkably cheap when compared with
London. Unlike London, however, cab drivers do not need to know their way
around the city before getting behind the wheel. Nor do they need to speak
English.
For the business traveller on a pre-recession expense account, the Carlyle
is the creme de la creme of luxury hotels in a city bursting with fine
lodgings. Other top dollar options include the Lowell, the Pierre and the
Waldorf-Astoria.
Room rates at the Royalton and Paramount, both refurbished by French
designer Philippe Starke, are surprisingly reasonable given the abiding
trendiness of the hotels. Although the bedrooms tend to be small, the public
rooms provide hours of entertainment and views of some of the most beautiful
people the city has to offer.
For those travelling on a more moderate budget, the Algonquin, on West 43rd
Street, is one of the city's more charming large hotels, although the
service is less reliable than at some of the chains. The Esplanade, on West
End Avenue and 74th Street, has reasonable rooms at reasonable rates.
For longer stays, the Surrey House on 76th Street and Madison Avenue, or the
more economical Embassy Suites Hotel on 47th and Broadway, provide
reasonably priced bedroom-and-lounge suites.
At the lower end of the market, the Days Inn on 57th Street and Ninth Avenue
is the most cheerful option.
Eating out remains an abiding pleasure in New York, with enough variety to
accommodate every palate and wallet. Recession has made it possible to get a
last-minute table at Lutece, although advance reservations are still
recommended. Other top-end favourites include Bouley, Auerole and Arcadia.
With tens of thousands of restaurants in the city, it is worth asking
friends or colleagues for recommendations. Or pick up a copy of the
amusingly idiosyncratic Zagats restaurant guide, which conveniently lists
restaurants by price, location and type of food.
It is also worth checking the Dollars 19.92 lunch specials, which were
introduced during the Democratic Convention and are still to be found at
many of the city's better restaurants.
After hours, New York still offers a plethora of theatre, film, music and
art. But it is the oddities that give the city its quirky character.
Visitors in the summer should look out for the weekly screenings of silent
movie classics, complete with live organ accompaniment, at the Cathedral of
St John the Divine, near Columbia University on the Upper West Side.
Other New York institutions include the Knitting Factory, home of jazz tuba
players and unconventional poets, which the New Yorker describes as 'the
club most likely to feature an electric-rake player . . . it's like a frat
house for the avant-garde.'
New York is still a Mecca for jazz fans. Unfortunately, many of the best
acts go to the Blue Note, perhaps the most over-crowded, over-priced,
soulless club in the city. Apart from the quality of the music, the Blue
Note's main appeal is its small size. Music-lovers with a limited budget
should sit at the bar. Other options include Sweet Basil and Village
Vanguard.
The jury is still out on the editorial content of the new New Yorker, but
the listings section remains fairly reliable. New York magazine has a more
extensive selection.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7270</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (10): Polite but confusing capital
 -Tokyo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT FIRST sight Tokyo can seem a dense, bewildering city. A jumble of
confusing signs, large neon-lit avenues criss-crossed by a warren of dimly
lit narrow alleys.
Too many people come - or do not come - because they are fearful of Tokyo's
complexity and apparent impenetrability.
For Europeans especially, who are used to wide streets and squares, to come
to terms with Tokyo will require some work. But in essence, as long as
people are confident it is one of the easiest capitals to use, at least on
the surface.
One of its main attractions is its safety. No need to worry constantly about
your bag being stolen by a passing mugger, even late at night. It is also in
most respects - such as its excellent subway system - a highly efficient,
well-organised place, full of polite people.
Most visitors start at Narita international airport, which is a relatively
quiet oasis about 90km out of the city. A taxi into Tokyo will be very
expensive.
Better either to take the train into Ueno junction and then get on the
subway or one of the limousine buses which will take you to your hotel or
the bus terminal near the heart of the city.
Tokyo has a wide variety of hotels from the expensive high-quality Okura,
opposite the US embassy, to cheap guest houses.
An excellent and convenient hotel which offers a range of rooms, some with
views over the Imperial Palace moat, is the Fairmount Hotel.
For the adventurous there are many excellent ryokan, traditional
Japanese-style inns, which serve excellent food such as the Ohgaiso in Ueno
park which has a 19th Century house in its courtyard.
Getting around Tokyo can be alternately very easy and hugely difficult.
The most important tip: if you do not know exactly where you are going,
never leave home without a map. If you are meeting someone, get them to send
you a map beforehand.
The reason is simple. Getting from one part of the city to another -
Otemachi, the financial district to fashionable Omote Sandoto, for instance
 -is disarmingly simple. The subway is cheap, highly efficient and has signs
in English. Taxis are not expensive but take longer.
If you use the subway make sure you get out of the station at the right
exit. Most subway stations have many exits, often a long way away from one
another.
Getting out at the right exit helps a lot. There are no street signs on the
many minor streets and alleyways. If you do not have a map you can spend
hours wandering around searching for your destination.
There are no end of good places to drink and eat in Tokyo, whether in the
Ginza main shopping area, Roppongi the night club district, or out in the
neon-lit rabbit warren of Shinjuku, home to the main red light district.
There is no theatre district to speak of such as Broadway and fewer cinemas.
If you want to watch an English or French language film you should be able
to find one in the Tokyo Journal listings magazine.
If you are staying in the city over a weekend, try to get out for a day.
Take the shinkansen bullet train to historic Kyoto or the local line from
Shinjuku which will take you to the temples of Kamakura by the sea.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (6): Ready to take off in a big
way - Asia-Pacific
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE the airline business travel markets in Europe and the US have had to
face up to the impact of recession, the Asia-Pacific region has suffered
relatively less from the west's economic problems and is regarded as one of
the crucial growth markets of the 1990s.
Even the economic problems in Japan has not seemed to blight this demand,
though a number of Japanese companies are following their western
counterparts by seeking to downgrade the class of travel in an effort to cut
travel costs. But the buoyancy of other parts of the region, such as Hong
Kong and Singapore, is keeping the airlines busy.
The region's potential has inevitably led to extra capacity being put on all
routes by airlines eager to capture a bigger share of a growing market. The
extra capacity, however, is still some way ahead of the market - which has
helped to keep prices in the premium cabins stable and led to discounts at
the back of the aircraft.
Asia's largest international carrier is JAL which is developing its route
network with Europe, such as a twice-weekly flight planned for next year
between Tokyo and Milan. JAL is also increasing its capacity on its Asian
routes with, for example, extra Boeing 747s being used on its China
services.
JAL's supremacy on the international routes is increasingly being challenged
by All Nippon Airlines which has benefited from the switch to Heathrow from
Gatwick.
The problem for both airlines, however, remains the shortage of airport
capacity within Japan. Big expansion projects at the Narita and Haneda
terminals serving Tokyo, along with the new Kansai International airport off
the coast of Osaka which is due to come on stream in mid 1994, will double
capacity by the mid 1990s.
The Japanese carriers also face a strong challenge from other airlines in
the region, especially Korean Air, which has carved out a niche for business
traffic into Seoul from Europe and the US and has made inroads into the
Japanese market.
What makes it difficult for western carriers in the region is the
traditionally high level of service from Asian carriers such as Cathay
Pacific, Singapore Airlines and Thai Airways International. All three have
well-deserved reputations for the quality of their first and business class
services and are constantly upgrading them to keep ahead.
Cathay Pacific, for example, earlier this year revamped its first class
product and is understood to have similar plans for its Marco Polo club
class service next year.
Readers of Business Traveller magazine, moreover, recently voted Singapore
Airlines, Cathay Pacific, and Thai International as the second, fourth, and
sixth best airlines in the world for business class services. Singapore's
Changi airport was also voted the best airport in the world for business
travellers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (5): Flying high with cut-price
seats - United Kingdom
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN SPITE OF the recession, demand for air travel within Britain has held
surprisingly firm, albeit helped by continued keen pricing which may be good
news for the passenger but has not helped profitability for UK airlines. The
past year, in fact, has been characterised by a restructuring and
rationalisation within the industry.
Earlier this year, for example, Brymon Airways and Birmingham European came
together as Brymon European Airways in a logical move to make the best use
of their resources, while British Airways restructured its regional
operations under a new name, British Airways Regional.
Since Brymon European is 40 per cent owned by BA - and 40 per cent owned by
the parent company of Denmark's Maersk Air - there would eventually seem to
be further scope for Brymon to come fully within the BA fold.
But while BA remains the main player in the UK market - its shuttle services
to big cities remain a profitable and successful part of its operations -
there is a feeling in the industry that its eyes are rather more firmly
fixed on international routes than on its regional networks.
The same might also be said of British Midland which has for some time made
no secret of its expansion plans into Europe.
BM's problem has been the shortage of 'slots' (take-off and landing
allocations) at Heathrow to fuel this expansion, which forced it earlier
this year to abandon its Heathrow-to-Liverpool route to free the slots for
European routes.
The shortage of slots at Heathrow for domestic services is an irritant to
many UK business travellers who are forced to drive or go by train and tube
to Heathrow simply because of the non-availability of a connecting service
from their local airport.
Thus the decision by scheduled carrier Air UK to base its operations at
Stansted Airport in Essex, even though the airport's growth has so far
failed to live up to expectations.
Air UK believes it provides a different option for business travellers from
that offered by either BA or BM, especially for those based in north or east
London, the Midlands and the eastern part of the country where access to
Stansted is more convenient than to Heathrow or Gatwick.
The airline flies more than 1,200 flights a week to 15 destinations within
the UK. Not all of these are out of Stansted: for example, it has six
flights every day from Norwich to Aberdeen.
Air UK, however, also operates to mainland Europe and has just expanded its
service, for example, from Newcastle to Amsterdam following the demise of
Dan-Air.
The outlook for business travellers: more of the same, but with perhaps the
emergence of new niche carriers serving purely regional airports as the
business climate improves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (4): Leading carriers engage in
fierce dogfight - North Atlantic
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The busiest and most competitive segment of the business air travel market
remains the north Atlantic routes between the US, UK and, to a lesser
extent, continental Europe. The UK is by far the biggest European market for
non-stop flights to and from the US, with one third of all transatlantic
capacity using UK airports.
Over the past year the arrival in the UK of such dominant US carriers as
United and American, plus the growth of Delta, has created a far greater
challenge to British Airways than had seemed likely just a few years ago.
Competition from the two main US carriers - Pan Am and TWA - had been muted
as these airlines increasingly lost out following the dereg-ulation of air
services in the US in the early 1980s.
BA's position was also strengthened by the strict controls on airlines using
Heathrow Airport which, because of its vast numbers of connecting flights,
is preferred by business travellers over UK gateways such as Gatwick and
Stansted.
All that changed when Uni-ted and American took over the routes previously
operated by Pan Am and TWA and the government's 'open skies' policy scrapped
the controls on Heathrow.
The result has been a fierce dogfight between the principal carriers for
business hit by the weak economies on both sides of the north Atlantic.
The extra capacity put on at a time of sluggish demand has inevitably led to
fierce price discounting, although this has mainly been felt in
economy-class seating rather than in business cabins.
Yet the paradox of north Atlantic travel at present is that at the same time
as there are too many seats chasing too few passengers, many of the aircraft
on key routes into North America are flying with almost full loads.
The reason, according to Mr Ron Spiers, publisher of the ABC World Airways
Guide, is that discounting at the back end of the aircraft is forcing
airlines to upgrade some passengers into business class cabins. The
airlines, not surprisingly, deny this is happening.
Another factor, especially for the US carriers, is the widespread popularity
of their frequent flyer programmes. These not only offer the chance to fly
free but also the opportunity for regular travellers to upgrade their class
of flight to business or first at no extra cost.
BA has been at a competitive disadvantage in this area, forcing it to offer
its own Air Miles frequent flyer pro-gramme. Similarly, BA has also found
itself at a disadvantage by not having access to the connecting routes
within the US enjoyed by its rivals.
Hence its decision to acquire a stake in the troubled USAir airline,
although this move may now be blocked by the new administration of
president-elect Clinton.
While BA may have its problems, for executive travellers the competition in
this key market is generally leading to rising standards of service and
choice in the business class cabins.
But business class fares are not being subject to the same degree of price
competition for the simple reason that the airlines cannot afford to do so.
If recession continues, however, then the battle over the north Atlantic can
only intensify.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (3): Jockeying for position -
Europe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS' decision to take over the ailing Dan-Air's scheduled
European routes is just the latest jockeying for position among UK and
European airlines ahead of the planned liberalisation of European air routes
when the single market comes into force next year.
Virgin Atlantic's Richard Branson, for example, who pulled out of a deal
with Dan-Air, is looking at the prospects for developing a European service
to rival his long-haul operations to the US and Tokyo.
The key question, however, remains how far and fast the plans to de-regulate
European air routes will come into effect - or will the determination by
some national governments to protect their airlines make the changes more
apparent than real?
The agreement reached by EC transport ministers last June has three main
elements to it. It allows airlines of one EC country to establish airlines
in other EC countries; it creates pricing freedom in theory, subject to
certain restrictions; and will enable any EC airline the right to pick up
traffic within one member state and carry it on to a second destination
within that country.
For example, BA flying from London to Frankfurt will be able to pick up
passengers in Frankfurt and carry them on to Berlin.
But, as with many EC developments, the proposed moves do not go as far as
some airlines would have wished. A full 'pen skies' policy, for example,
would have allowed EC airlines the right to fly freely inside another EC
country; this has been delayed until April 1997 at the earliest.
British Midland has been the most vocal in its opposition to the present
restrictions on European air routes. In a recent report, it pointed out that
11 of the 15 busiest air routes in Europe continue to be served by the two
respective leading airlines from each country, charging identical
business-class fares and with almost identical schedules.
'The EC needs to back up its proposals with real teeth, by loosening the
financial ties between states and their airlines and ensuring it has a
mergers and acquisitions policy in place to prevent a further reduction in
consumer choice,' argued Sir Michael Bishop, BM's chairman.
BM estimates that British business travellers are paying more than Pounds
200m a year more than they need to because of the airline duopoly on
principal European routes.
More competition and lower fares could prove something of a problem for
European airlines, especially as they rely heavily at present on business
class passengers to keep routes profitable.
BA's Club Europe operation, for example, earns the airline nearly half its
European revenue even though Club passengers make up just a quarter of its
total.
Moreover, there are clear signs that European business travellers are
becoming increasingly unwilling to pay higher fares on short-haul routes.
Both Lufthansa and Swissair, for example, have finally abandoned their first
class cabins in Europe to concentrate on business class instead.
But even with improvements in service both on the ground and in the air,
many executives are deciding to trade down and fly economy on short-haul
European routes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (2): Battle rages in the skies -
International carriers are offering more services to maintain their share of
lucrative business class traffic
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRITISH AIRWAYS' recent decision to spend some Pounds 80m
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
plus another Pounds 20m in advertising - to upgrade its Club World services
on all long-haul routes is a clear example of just how seriously the world's
airlines are wooing the business traveller.
As the recession shows no real sign of ending, so BA and the other leading
international carriers are being forced to offer an increasing range of
services and perks to maintain their share of lucrative business class
traffic.
Everything from neck massage from a resident masseuse aboard Richard
Branson's Virgin Atlantic aircraft through to luxury limousines taking
executives from door to door are being used to win business.
But executives are not as easily persuaded by such blandishments as they
were in the late 1980s. The reason, however, is not of their choosing:
rather, it is a result of the decision by many companies to downgrade the
class of travel for their executives. When a seat in economy class - or
coach as it is known in the US - from London to New York costs a tenth of
the business class fare, then it is easy to see why companies are
increasingly instructing their executives to save money and fly in the
cheaper seats.
For the airlines this is serious news: the yield from full-fare paying
business class travellers is the most profitable part of the airline
business. While this has been the case for many years it is even more
important now as first class passengers are becoming increasingly scarce -
only about one in every five first class seats is now sold at full fare -
and economy class seats are being offered at heavily discounted prices.
Hence the importance for airlines of wooing corporate travellers. The battle
is being fought in two ways: enhanced services on the ground and in the air;
and by customer loyalty programmes for frequent flyers.
It is this second approach - frequent flyer programmes - that is currently
at the sharp end of the battle for business. The practice of rewarding
passengers for flying with a particular airline by giving them a chance to
fly again for nothing was first used in the US market after deregulation in
the 1980s. At first, it seemed a brilliant marketing idea, similar to the
explosion of trading stamps in securing customer loyalty in the 1950s and
1960s.
But the drawback soon became clear: passengers flying free hit yields and
margins with the inevitable result that many airlines were forced either
into Chapter 11 administration in the US or out of business.
Yet when the British government adopted an 'open skies' policy across the
north Atlantic routes, the US airlines which jumped into the market  -
primarily American, Delta and United - all brought with them frequent flyer
schemes. British Airways was forced to follow suit last year and award Air
Miles for frequent flyers (who now qualify as members of its Executive Club
scheme). Other European airlines have also had to join in.
The result has been twofold. For the airlines, it has meant that yields on
certain flights have been hit further as a proportion of travellers are
flying free. Every month, for example, some 25,000 people fly free on BA as
a result of collecting sufficient Air Miles.
For the frequent traveller, however, the availability of such schemes has
provided a welcome perk. But should they get the benefit of being able to
take themselves and their families on holiday as a result of belonging to a
frequent flyer scheme when the airline tickets have been paid for by their
companies?
The dilemma is a difficult one for companies and individuals. Mr Bill
Kirkwood, marketing director for Thomas Cook travel management, points out
that a good corporate travel policy will identify a frequently used route
and negotiate a favourable corporate rate with one carrier. 'But a serious
conflict of interest can occur if staff ignore the low corporate rate
dictated by the travel policy and book a more expensive ticket that rewards
them personally for their loyalty,' he says.
Mr Kirkwood acknowledges that many executives see the perk of frequent flyer
schemes as compensation for long periods away from home. 'That accepted, it
is still more cost-effective for the company to find a more direct way to
compensate its high mileage travellers while at the same time making them
keep to the most cost-effective travel policy.'
A recent survey carried out by Mori of corporate travel buyers on behalf of
Wagons-Lits Travel found that just over half the 400 companies surveyed felt
the benefit should return to the company rather than to the individual. Air
Miles, however, neatly sidesteps this issue by refusing to allow companies
to register for its system - only named individuals can apply for and
receive the frequent flyer rewards.
Perhaps the only way such schemes may come to an end - apart from an airline
being forced out of business by the heavy liability to fly passengers for
nothing - is if the tax authorities decide to get tough. The perk is clearly
taxable, but so far the Inland Revenue has taken no action.
The uncertainty surrounding the future of such schemes - and their potential
cost to the airlines - makes improving service for business travellers a
better bet to win customers.
BA has been in the forefront of many business class initiatives in recent
years and has won a well-deserved reputation for its Club World cabins.
Readers of Business Traveller magazine, for example, recently voted it the
best airline overall.
What BA now plans to do is to offer Club World travellers more control over
their journey, starting with its new Lounge Pavilion at Heathrow's terminal
four. 'Our research shows that passengers continue to feel stressed in
airports,' points out Mr Robert Ayling, BA's director of marketing and
operations. 'They want to be cocooned in a relaxing environment before
getting on to a plane.' The new lounge will be more like a hotel lobby than
existing airport lounges, he adds.
In the air, BA is redesigning the 6,000 Club World seats on its 71 long-haul
aircraft to give better back and leg support as well as making the 'ears' on
each side wider to give greater privacy. It is also installing eight-channel
videos in the back of each seat to give passengers the freedom to watch what
they want.
BA is not alone in upgrading its in-flight services - Emirates, for example,
is also installing seat-back videos - and other developments on the way
include better in-flight telephone and fax facilities on long-haul
transatlantic flights.
On the ground, most attention is being focused on improving the speed and
efficiency with which executives can get from their office, on to the plane,
and to their destination at the other end of the flight. Limousine transfers
are now quite common, although they tend to be offered by the smaller
airlines with fewer flights than the major operators.
Perhaps the most interesting development for business travellers whose
travel budgets are being squeezed has been initiated by Virgin. This has
been to create a new section on the aircraft, called Mid Class, for
full-fare paying economy passengers who typically are executives. A full
economy fare, which allows greater flexibility than discounted tickets, can
often cost two or three times as much as the cheap fares. For business
travellers forced to downgrade, however, travelling with the leisure
passengers can be irritating.
Hence Virgin's move to offer a separate section with bigger seats and better
check-in facilities for full-fare paying economy ticket holders.
As yet, the move is not being copied by the other airlines who still hope to
lure travelling executives into the higher-yielding business class cabins.
But if the recession continues unabated, then the pressure to downgrade may
prove irresistible for some.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Survey of Business Travel (1): The going gets harder -
Travel has become less fun and less safe and, as companies seek to cut
costs, it is less comfortable too. Nevertheless, despite advances in
technology, there is still a need to meet customers face-to-face
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TO MANY who only step on to an aircraft to fly to their two weeks in the
sun, the life of the business traveller must seem enticing: first class
seats, luxury hotels, and a different city every week.
Those who spend lonely nights in identical hotel rooms crunching peanuts
from the minibar and watching inferior television in languages they do not
understand know that the reality is different. The excitement of new cities,
taxis and people certainly exists, but there is little time for sight-seeing
and the novelty soon wears off.
For many, business travel is not fun - and is probably now less fun than it
was. The collapse of communism in eastern Europe has taken travellers to
cities they have never visited before, some of them beautiful. But the
infrastructure needed to support business travel is often not there.
Throughout the world, travel is now less safe than it was. There are not
many cities in which travellers can confidently set out for a night-time
stroll. For women travellers, the confinement to hotels is all the greater.
One travelling woman executive said she had been attacked twice in recent
years, once in Rome and once in Paris. In the Paris attack, the assailant
was a policeman, ostensibly breaking up a demonstration.
Above all, in these difficult economic times, many travel in less comfort
than they used to. The recession has resulted in companies looking at how
much they spend on foreign travel and whether savings can be made. They can,
and business travellers are living with the results.
'If you asked companies five years ago how much they were spending on travel
they would look at you blankly. Now they can tell you, not quite to the last
dollar, but almost,' says Mr Anthony Keeler, chief executive of Business
Travel International, an alliance of travel groups including Hogg Robinson
of the UK and Kuoni of Switzerland.
Before the recession, flying first or business class and staying in luxury
hotels were seen as perks of the job. Mr Keeler says: 'When times are good
and staff are in short supply, companies offer the sort of package that will
attract people. It is different when times are tough and there are a lot of
people out there looking for work.
'The travel authorisation process has become much tougher. In years gone by,
it was easier to get a first-class ticket to Tokyo than get a new chair for
your office. You have no control over the chair, or the desk, or the carpet
that you have in your office. In this hard world, travel is now no
different. One customer said to me: 'I don't want to spend a penny on travel
 -let's start from there.' Travel is a cost and, like any cost, it can be
controlled.'
A recent survey by Mori for Wagons-lits Travel found that nearly half of the
400 senior executives and secretaries surveyed said their companies were
instructing travellers to use cheaper hotels and flights.
Mr Richard Lovell, Wagons-lits Travel managing director, says: 'While there
is belt-tightening and budgets seem to be reduced, travellers are learning
to build business from the back of the aircraft.'
Nearly 40 per cent of staff responsible for booking trips say their
companies are sanctioning fewer business trips. About 30 per cent, however,
say there has been no change in the number of trips taken.
Cost-cutting has resulted in some trips being shorter. To save money,
however, some are staying away for longer, fitting more cities and
appointments into each trip. Mr David Miller, director of Midland Securities
Services, a division of Midland Bank, says he keeps his trips to the
continent short. If he is travelling to New York, on the other hand, it
seems a waste not to schedule meetings in Boston and other North American
cities at the same time.
Mr Keeler believes that to compensate for the hardships, business travellers
are receiving better service everywhere from hotel and airline staff who
need to compete more keenly for customers. 'There's a lot better
understanding of where their money is coming from,' he says.
Not all travellers agree. A senior London-based executive at Salomon
Brothers says: 'The only place that works properly is the Far East. Japan,
Singapore, Hong Kong, and I would even include Australia, are in a class of
their own.
'Eastern Europe is at the other end of the scale. So is Latin America.
Western Europe is not as good as the Far East in overall service, efficiency
and design of hotel rooms. The airlines in Europe are better than the hotels
 -I'm a big fan of British Airways.
'I find America worse than Europe. In many hotels in New York and Washington
you don't even get minibars. And unless you come out with a serious tip on
the first day you don't get good service.'
She adds that hotel rooms outside the Far East are still not designed for
women travellers. 'There's a shaving socket, but there's nowhere to plug in
your hair dryer. You find me a woman who uses the hotel hair dryer - they
don't. There's nowhere to plug in a contact lens boiler either. In the Far
East you find facilities like that.'
In a Tokyo hotel she told the management that she needed a hairdresser
before her appointments started and not later in the day. The hotel opened
its salon in the early morning.
Despite the drive to cut costs, few business travellers believe that the fax
machine, telephone or video conferencing facilities have proved adequate
replacements for travel. It is still necessary to meet customers
face-to-face.
Mr Miller said, however, that he had noticed an increased tendency to plan
trips properly in advance. 'Our own sales team used to make trips that
involved cold-calling. We're now making sure that more of the earlier work
is done over the phone and by correspondence. Now, flying out to visit
someone is something you do further down the line rather than as a first
step. There's much more planning and much more asking 'what do I want to
achieve from this trip?''
Arriving at face-to-face meetings with more advance information about a
customer's requirements has proved beneficial, he says, which raises the
question of how many of the changes in business travel over the past two
years will turn out to be permanent.
The Wagons-lits survey found that about 30 per cent of companies do not
expect to increase their business travel in the next two to three years. Of
those who did, 30 per cent expected to be doing more travelling to the US,
29 per cent to the Far East, 24 per cent to France, 22 per cent to Germany
and 19 per cent to eastern Europe.
Mr Bill Kirkwood, sales and marketing director of Thomas Cook Travel
Management, argues that now that companies have discovered they can drive
down travel costs, they are unlikely to return to the easy-going days of the
past, even when the recession is over.
Mr Miller has his doubts. 'When the good days come again, it wouldn't
surprise me if cost controls were relaxed, human nature being what it is.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Shares fall as base rate hopes fade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INCREASING concern that further reductions in domestic interest rates may be
postponed until next year made for a poor start to the new trading account
in the UK stock market yesterday. Share prices, on the downward path from
the opening, took a turn for the worse at mid-session when early losses in
government bonds were suddenly extended. However, traders detected few signs
of selling pressure, and Seaq-reported trading volume was nearly one third
down on Friday's total.
The market's concern is focused on prospects for future government funding
in the light of the forecast for the Public Sector Borrowing Requirement
incorporated in his Autumn economic statement last week by Mr Norman Lamont,
the UK chancellor of the exchequer. Equity strategists warned that
government bond yields could be forced higher next year, and that bond sales
could 'crowd out' potential investment in equities.
However, there were few signs of nervousness ahead of today's October PSBR
number, which was expected to be relatively low. Nor was the stock market
expecting surprises from the important speech in the City of London last
night from Mr John Major, the UK prime minister.
Equities opened lower and, with stock index futures at a discount, and both
short sterling and the money markets signalling fading confidence in a
further base rate cut before Christmas, losses were extended.
An attempted rally was abruptly terminated when government bonds turned off
and by late afternoon, the FT-SE Index was nearly 20 points down. A weak
start to the new Wall Street session, where the Dow Average was 18 points
down in early trade, left London to close a shade above the worst but still
listless.
Traders referred to yesterday's trading session as 'a washout,' and saw the
market remaining lacklustre for some weeks. One experienced dealer saw the
Footsie trading in the 2,650 to 2,675 for the near term.
The FT-SE Index closed the session at 2,679 for a net loss of 17.9. The Seaq
network reported trading of 434.1m shares compared with 628.4m in the
previous session; retail, or customer, business on Friday was worth Pounds
1.2bn, maintaining the improved levels of the past two months.
Firmness in the US dollar brought only modest support for the international
stocks which also reacted to warnings of poor economic prospects in Germany.
Some pharmaceuticals once again reflected worries over possible medical
funding policy under the new US president.
Domestic interest-related stocks suffered as doubts grew over prospects for
the further one point reduction in base rates so widely predicted by sector
analysts. Losses in the store and consumer groups were modest but there were
larger falls among the building and contracter issues which have become
heavily dependent on interest rate perceptions.
Significant losses were also marked against the domestic banking issues,
some of which also suffered from adverse comment in the investment press
last weekend. Bank stocks have benefited from the fall in UK base rates
because this trend is likely to reduce their burden of bad and doubtful
debts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PROSPECT of no further cuts in interest rates until early next year at
the earliest put a cloud over the derivatives market in subdued trading,
writes Christopher Price.
The December contract started quite firm at 2,695, despite the gloomy
weekend media comment and good two-way business meant a slow rise in the
morning session. However, weak gilts and short sterling opened up
arbitraging opportunities as December traded at a par or below its fair
value level for most of the session. December reached its high point of the
day of 2,708 at lunchtime.
In the afternoon, firmer sentiment that interest rates would remain at 8 per
cent for the rest of the year depressed the mood, which together with a weak
opening on Wall Street combined to send December down.
A minor rally was staged in later trading, although dealers said that the
sombre mood would overhang the market at tomorrow's opening. December closed
at 2,684, a discount of some five points to its fair value level of around
nine. Volume was 8,177 contracts.
A quiet traded options market saw 21,676 contracts traded of which nearly
8,000 was in the FT-SE 100.
British Steel was the top traded option with 1,316 contracts, the July 40
puts at 5p notching up 400 in one trade. Next came Barclays (1,076
contacts), Asda (1,010) and British Gas (764).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: BS at low in heavy turnover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INTERIM losses from British Steel (BS) might have been widely anticipated
but they still prompted the biggest turnover in the London stock market
yesterday. Also, the closing share price was strongly supported by heavy US
buying and the net fall gave a rosier picture than that seen by many UK
analysts.
Mr Peter Deighton of Smith New Court summed up the seeming anomaly when he
said; 'I can't understand how a major company passes its dividend and the
share price only comes off 3p.' The US has been buying Steel for long-term
recovery and now owns some 30 per cent of the stock. Mr Deighton said there
was a growing worry that unless the European Commission comes up with some
solution to the current squeeze on prices and volumes that support could
easily be reversed.
Forecasts for Steel's full-year losses were held to a range of Pounds 150m
to Pounds 180m. The shares gave up 3 to to 46 1/2 p, touching the previous
all-time low reached two months ago, with 22m traded.
Ratners supported
A sharp rise and busy turnover in Ratners confirmed growing confidence
amongst some in the market that the troubled stores group was making headway
against its current trading problems. The rise also prompted renewed talk in
some quarters that Ratners may be again discussing with its US executives
the possibilty of a management buy-out. This option was first said to have
been mooted a year ago, but has taken on a new urgency as Ratners fortunes
have gone from bad to worse. The group recently unveiled a rise in half-year
losses to Pounds 30.6m and debts of over Pounds 250m.
The sale of its US operations, which made operating profits of Pounds 5.1m
in the same period, could raise in the region of Pounds 300m. There was also
speculation yesterday that UK sales may have picked up and that some
institutions were clambering aboard in expectation of a good Christmas
trading period. The shares jumped 3 3/4 to 19 1/2 p in volume of 8m. The
price of Ratners shares has now more than doubled in the last two weeks.
BOC active
Industrial gases group BOC fell sharply in early trade on confusion over the
reporting of its full-year profits. However, the stock recovered when it was
appreciated that the headline figure included an exceptional charge and BOC
shares closed a penny firmer at 681p.
BOC is one of the the first UK companies to employ a new accounting
directive which alters the basis of the profit and loss account. As a result
it included Pounds 117m from the sale of US home healthcare business
Glasrock. When that was stripped out the profits came in around Pounds 342m,
still below the forecast range but acceptable. Partly because the shares
have come back a long way over the past few weeks several securities houses
improved their recommendation. Hoare Govett shaved its 1993 forecast to
Pounds 385m but altered its stance from hold to undervalued while a more
bearish Smith New Court came down to Pounds 372m from Pounds 380m but argued
that the stock should be bought on weakness.
Utilities switch
The water and electricity stocks marched higher during early trading but
thereafter moved in opposite directions with the waters retreating amid
'take-profits' adivce from brokers and the electricity companies tending to
mark time.
Panmure Gordon, the stockbroker, was among those recommending a switch out
of waters and into the 'recs'. 'We've told our clients to 'top-slice' the
waters which we feel at now at or close to fair value,' said Mr Angelos
Anastasiou, utilities specialist at Panmure. Mr Anastasiou said the 'recs
have been left behind.'
County NatWest was another broker to argue the case for the electricity
companies; 'The electricity companies would be well advised to exercise
restraint at the interims; we expect the sector average at the interims to
be little more than 10 per cent but anticipate growth of around 12-13 per
cent for the full year which makes the yields offered by some 'recs'
extremely attractive,' said County.
The poorest performers in the waters were the Footsie constituents, North
West Water, which dipped 7 to 497p, and Anglian which fell the same amount
to 477p. Seven Trent closed 3 off at 466p. Among the 'recs' London jumped 7
to 451p and South Wales 7 to 534p.
Concern over the potential tie-up with USAir and selling ahead of interim
results today left British Airways 8 1/2 off at 271p on heavy turnover of 6m
shares.
GPG, the old Guinness Peat banking group suspended around the 23p mark
resumed trading at 17p.
Barclays Bank was easily the heaviest traded of the big banks after the
weekend Press highighted long running market suspicions that the bank may
have to make provisions against possible losses arising from its loans to
Imry, the property company. Barclays shares, given a rough risd in recent
weeks by a series of earnings downgrades by all the leading broking houses
and forecasts of a probable cut in the bank's dividend, dropped 8 to 349p on
turnover of 5.2m.
The Imry worries plus last week's warning by stockbroker Panmure Gordon of
increasing and widespread bad debts in the banking sector, put the skids
under most of the banks.
Natwest mirrored Barclays, droipping 8 to 370p on 2.8m, while Lloyds fell 5
to 476p and HSBC 4 1/2 to 538p. TSB eased 4 to 136 1/2 p. The two big
Scottish banks move din opposite directions withthe bad debt scenario
casting a shadow over Bank of Scotland, 3 off at 117p. Switching from Bank
of Scotland, however, enabled Royal Bank to edge up 3 to 177p.
Life assurance shares were weighed down by vague suggestions that a line of
Legal &amp; General were on offer. Legal shares settled a net 15 weaker at 390p.
Commercial Union, due to announce third quarter numbers tomorrow - most
analysts looking for a marginal loss during the quarter - were fractionally
higher at 564p, but other composites were generally easier.
A big week for the insurance broking sector saw Sedgwick, scheduled to
reveal third quarter figures this morning, 7 off at 150p and Willis Corroon,
reporting third quarter numbers tomorrow, 6 down at 189p.
Companies with heavy exposure to the US benefited from the strength of the
dollar. Glaxo gained 12 to 812p, although the shares traded as American
Depositary Receipts were easier in early US dealing. Wellcome lifted 9 to
982p and Medeva gained 12 to 223p.
Weekend press comment on the European Fighter project helped British
Aerospace improve 3 to 137p.
Submarine manufacturer VSEL suffered from what one analyst called a
'misjudged press story' about the standard nuclear checks carried out on its
new Trident submarine. The shares have also performed well since results
last week but fell 14 to 494p yesterday.
Fears of losses at Euro Disney, which reports its interims on Thursday, sent
the shares plunging 65 to 918p.
Food manufacturer Unilever attracted attention as worries over the plight of
the German economy and nervousness about the group's dividend growth left
the shares 23 lighter at 1056p xd.
Hazlewood Food was in demand ahead of results tomorrow, the shares edging
forward 3 to 135p.
Kingfisher's tie-up with US group Staples was well heralded and the shares
retreated 8 to 545p. Better received was the news from Storehouse that it
was selling its loss-making Conran Stores which operates 19 Habitat branches
in the US. The shares rose 2 to 171p.
Mirror Group performed well as executive changes pushed back prospects of a
management buy-out and that the new appointments heralded a more commercial
line. The shares closed 1 1/2 higher at 71p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (60).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Treas. 3pc '66 Aft., AMERICANS (10) Abbott Labs., Bankers
NY, Chase Manhattan, Colgate-Palmolive, Cont'l Bank, Gen. Elect., Hasbro,
Lockheed, Morris (Ph), Time Warner, BANKS (1) Bank Leumi (UK), BUSINESS
SERVS (1) Penna, CHEMS (1) Engelhard, CONGLOMERATES (1) Wassall, ELECTRICALS
(1) Ericsson, ELECTRONICS (1) Electrocomps., FOOD RETAILING (1) Kwik Save,
HEALTH &amp; HSEHOLD (3) Amersham, Astra, Huntleigh, HOTELS &amp; LEIS (1) Millwall,
INSCE BROKERS (1) Alex. &amp; Alex., INSCE COMPOSITE (2) Allianz, USF &amp; G, INV
TRUSTS (19) Abtrust New Dawn Wts., Abtrust Prfd. Zero Pf., Baring Tribune,
Broadgate, Drayton Blue Chip Zero Pf. English &amp; Scot., Fulcrum Zero Pf.,
Govett Amer. Smllr. Co's, Henderson Euro. Zero Pf., Indonesia Equity Fund,
Do Wts., Jakarta Fund, Kleinwort High Inc. Zero Pf., Malacca Fund, Murray
Intl., River Plate Zero Pf., Scot. Natl. Zero Pf., US Smllr. Co's, Do Wts.,
MEDIA (4) Carlton Comms. 6 1/2 pc Pf., Haynes, News Intl., TVS Ent. 7.4pc
Pf. '08, MISC (4) Bluebird Toys, Gestetner, Rhino, Waste Mngemt., OTHER
FINCL (4) Cattle's, Lon. Scottish, Perpetual, S &amp; U, PACKG, PAPER &amp; PRINTG
(1) Jarvis Porter, TELE NETWORKS (1) BT, TRANSPORT (2) Forth Ports, GATX.
NEW LOWS (57).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Treas. 8pc '09 A, BLDG MATLS (2) Darby, Tudor, BUSINESS
SERVS (3) Air London, CRT, REA, CHEMS (1) Caird, CONTG &amp; CONSTRCN (1)
Prowting, ELECTRICALS (1) Bennett &amp; Fountain, ELECTRONICS (3) Control
Techniques, Kewill Syst., Peek, ENG AERO (1) Rolls-Royce, ENG GEN (8)
Bromsgrove, Dobson Park, Folkes N/V, Prospect, Richardson Westgarth, Simon,
Widney, Wilkes, FOOD RETAILING (2) Appleby Westward, Geest, HEALTH &amp; HSEHOLD
(1) Swallowfield, HOTELS &amp; LEIS (3) Bristol Scotts, Resort, Wembley, INV
TRUSTS (5) Aberforth Split Level, Archimedes Inc., I &amp; S UK Smllr. Co's, JF
Fledgeling Wts., Lloyds Smllr. Co's Pckg. Units., MEDIA (4) Aegis 9 3/4 pc
Pf., HTV, Lopex, VTR, MISC (2) Assoc. Brit. Consultants, Toye, MOTORS (2)
Abbey Panels, Caffyns, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Lasmo Ops., OTHER FINCL (1) Baltic 7pc
Pf., OTHER INDLS (2) Elkem, Headway, PACKG, PAPER &amp; PRINTG (3) Intereurope
Tech., Stat-Plus, Usher Walker, PROP (2) Merivale Moore, YRM, STORES (2)
Cantors, Dunhill, TEXTS (1) Martin Intl., MINES (5) Anglo Amer. Gold, Aztec
Expl., Gold Fields SA, Placer Pacific, Western.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow falls despite signs of
revival
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
DESPITE new signs of economic life, US share prices fell across the board in
light trading yesterday, writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 27.29 at 3,205.74, at
its lows for the day. The Standard &amp; Poor's 500 also finished lower, down
1.61 at 420.82, while the Amex composite slipped 2.86 to 386.83. The Nasdaq
composite, which has performed strongly in recent weeks on exceptionally
heavy buying, gave back some of its recent gains, declining 3.15 to 634.01.
Turnover on the NYSE was 174m shares. The morning's economic statistics
failed to spur demand for stocks, even though the 0.3 per cent rise in
October industrial production and the 0.1 percentage point gain in capacity
utilisation were both slightly higher than forecasts.
Instead, investors focused on a few third-quarter earnings reports, notably
from Toys 'R' Us and Kmart, which disappointed expectations, and on a big
earnings downgrade of the airline industry from Wall Street.
At one stage share prices staged a brief recovery, aided by comments from
President-elect Clinton which suggested he would not be scaling back his
plans to aid the economic recovery, but a late sell-off sent shares to new
lows.
Airline stocks fell sharply after after the securities house First Boston
drastically reduced its earnings estimates for the industry. Delta Air
Lines, which saw its 1993 estimate slashed from a profit of Dollars 2 a
share to a loss of Dollars 3.50 a share, plunged Dollars 3 3/4 to Dollars 53
1/4 . UAL fell Dollars 5 to Dollars 118 7/8 , AMR, parent of American
Airlines, dropped Dollars 2 to Dollars 63 1/4 and USAir eased Dollars  1/4
to Dollars 13 1/8 .
Kmart fell Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 27 1/4 after reporting that third quarter
net income was 27 cents a share, only slightly better than the 25 cents a
share recorded a year earlier. Although the per-share earnings figure was
distorted by the impact of newly issued shares on the calculation, Kmart's
performance in the quarter disappointed some investors.
There was a similar response to the earnings report from Toys 'R' Us, which
showed profits up marginally to 12 cents a share in the July to September
period. The news left the toy retailer's shares Dollars  5/8 lower at
Dollars 36.
American Reliance fell Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 6 1/4 on the American Stock
Exchange after reporting a third-quarter loss of Dollars 11.92 a share, a
sharp deterioration from the 45 cents a share profit in the year-ago period.
On the Nasdaq market some leading technology stocks ran into selling as
investors consolidated recent gains. Borland International fell Dollars 1
1/4 to Dollars 28 3/4 , Microsoft gave up Dollars  1/2 at Dollars 92 3/4 and
Oracle Systems, undermined by a broker's downgrade, dropped Dollars 1 1/2 to
Dollars 21 3/4 .
Canada
TORONTO stocks ended sharply weaker, pressured by a steep rise in Canadian
prime rates which sidelined many players and sent ripples through Canada's
stock, bond and currency markets.
The TSE-300 composite index ended down 33.1 points or 1.01 per centt at
3,236.4 on light turnover of 28.5 million shares worth CDollars 258.6
million, compared with volume of 49.26 million shares on Friday valued at
CDollars 467.48 million.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Paris falls on fading hopes of
further rate cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE was no clear trend among continental bourses yesterday, as French
equities weakened and Italian shares continued to power ahead, writes Our
Markets Staff.
PARIS fell back on fears that last week's interest rate cut was the last
reduction for some time. A weak start on Wall Street contributed to the
easier tone as the CAC-40 index fell 24.07 to 1,772.73 in thin turnover of
FFr1.7bn, generated mainly by arbitrage and domestic activity.
Euro Disney dropped FFr5.15 or 6.5 per cent to FFr74.70 following negative
weekend press comment in the UK. An article in a US newspaper quoting a
recent sell recommendation from Paribas which described Euro Disney as a
'high-risk' share also prompted selling.
Michelin dropped FFr8.10 or 4.2 per cent to FFr186.50 after the release of
nine-month sales whichshowed a decline in the third quarter.
Among smaller stocks, Pernod Ricard, which last week downgraded its 1992
earnings outlook, lost Fl 4.1 to Fl 395, while several large blocks of Bic
were crossed yesterday as the shares rose by FFr3 to FFr904 with 65,200
shares traded.
FRANKFURT ended a mixed day with distinct contrasts among senior blue chips
and the DAX index fell 1.57 to 1,546.95 after last week's 4.1 per cent gain.
Turnover fell from DM6.7bn to DM4.8bn.
Siemens rose another DM9.30 to DM588, reinforced by last week's
better-than-expected results. But Daimler dropped DM14.60 to DM539.40 on
unexpectedly low car and truck deliveries since July, and a forecast of a 22
per cent drop in net profit. Several securities houses have downgraded their
earnings estimates for Daimler in the past few days. Mr Harry Jaarsma of
Dresdner said that his bank had dropped its EPS forecasts from DM55 to DM49
for 1992 and from DM50 to DM40 for 1993.
Other notable winners among DAX constituents included Schering, up DM9.50 to
DM745.50: Mr Jaarsma said that higher interest income, following sales of
subsidiaries should help the company offset weakening in both agrichemicals
and pharmaceuticals. Continental, lifted by technical support, rose DM3.70
to DM205.50.
MILAN continued its recent rally in active trading on the first day of the
final account of 1992, with persistent privatisation hopes and speculative
buying by domestic investors fuelling the rise. The Comit index added 11.42
or 2.5 per cent to 472.38 in turnover estimated at near Friday's L410bn.
State-controlled banks remained in the limelight, with Credito Italiano
adding L80 to L2,910, Banca Commerciale Italiana up L441 or 10 per cent to
L4,801 and Banca di Roma L173 higher at L2,450.
Other state-owned companies were in demand, and trading in shares of
Alitalia and Assitalia was delayed due to an order imbalance. The airline's
shares stopped trading at L770, up 3.1 per cent or L23 from Friday, while
shares in the insurer closed up L1,045 or 11.8 per cent to L9,895.
Trading was suspended in Sme pending details from its parent company, Iri,
on how it plans to sell parts of the food company.
ZURICH ended lower, the SMI index falling 15.9 to 1,913.4 after weekend
polls showed that the Swiss electorate would reject membership of the
European Economic Area (EEA) at a referendum in December.
Swissair bearers fell SFr35 to SFr435, on fears that the national carrier
would find access to the European market more difficult if EEA membership
was rejected.
MADRID continued to rise on Friday's better-than-expected inflation data,
but profit-taking saw it close off intraday highs in active trading. The
general index put on 1.15 to 203.81 in turnover up from Pta13.4bn to
Pta14.6bn.
Nine-month earnings reports from Telefonica and Repsol left the former Pta10
better at Pta1,040 after an earlier gain of Pta30, and the latter flat at
Pta2,485.
STOCKHOLM gained in moderate trading as domestic interest rates fell back
and last week's money market turmoil appeared to subside. The Affarsvarlden
general index rose 5.0 to 725.8 in turnover of SKr430m after SKr527m.
The forestry sector led the gains on speculation that the central bank will
soon be forced to abandon its fixed exchange rate policy and allow the krona
to float. Stora B shares jumped SKr15 to SKr192.
Ericsson B shares were up SKr4 to SKr133 on hopes that its nine-month
earnings report, due on Thursday, will be stronger than expected.
AMSTERDAM ended mixed to firmer, as the CBS Tendency index rose 0.4 to
105.2. The brewer, Heineken, was among the big gainers as it picked up Fl
1.40 to Fl 174.40. But DSM shed Fl 3.50 to Fl 73.10.
HELSINKI fell on lack of progress in talks on updating the national incomes
settlement; the trade union confederation, SAK, said that it would call
member federations together on Friday to consider future action if the
settlement talks fail. The Hex index fell 14.5 or 1.8 per cent to 779.1.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
November 16                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes               Open      10.30       11.00       12.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1056.10    1059.64     1061.07     1062.10
FT-SE Eurotrack 200        1109.32    1112.92     1112.88     1114.46
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 Nov 13      Nov 12      Nov 11
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100             1059.26     1059.91     1045.16??
FT-SE Eurotrack 200             1114.93     1120.89     1108.98??
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes               13.00     14.00       15.00       Close
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100         1062.38   1061.20     1059.79     1058.27
FT-SE Eurotrack 200         1115.37   1114.19     1112.66     1110.19
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 Nov 10            Nov 9
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100             1054.50           1043.29
FT-SE Eurotrack 200             1117.70           1108.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 -  1062.67 ; 200 -  1116.31
Low/day: 100 -  1055.95  200 -  1109.32  ??Partial
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Politics and poor
results depress Japanese volume
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLUME fell to a 10-year low yesterday as share prices lost more ground,
writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average fell 167.80 to 16,162.99 on small-lot selling by
individuals and arbitrage-unwinding. It opened at the day's high of
16,314.94, and fell to a low of 16,122.97 in the afternoon.
Volume was just 120m shares, its lowest since August 1982. Declines led
advances by 593 to 293 with 204 unchanged, the Topix index of all first
section stocks fell 9.72 to 1,232.52 and, in London, the ISE/Nikkei 50 index
was 1.69 down to 989.06.
Investors remained cautious over the continuing deadlock in parliamentary
debates, and weak interim company results. Wako Research Institute reported
a fall of 39 per cent in the total non-consolidated pre-tax profits at the
407 first-section companies which had announced their results by last
Friday, while sales had declined by 3.4 per cent.
For the full year to March, 322 companies expect a fall in profits while 267
companies project a decline in sales.
On the trading floor, speculative issues dominated activity. The
medium-sized SS Pharmaceutical was the most active issue of the day,
declining Y30 to Y1,010. It rose initially by its daily limit on early
reports of the development of a new Aids drug, but fell later on heavy
profit-taking.
Green Cross, which followed SS in activity, rose Y10 to Y1,310.
Bank shares were lower on worries of short-selling. Rumours that hedge funds
may target bank shares, which have remained relatively stable during the
recent downturn, discouraged investors. Industrial Bank of Japan fell Y100
to Y2,310 and Sakura Bank lost Y20 to Y1,060.
Electronics continued to lose ground on prospects of lower profits. Hitachi
fell Y6 to a new year's low of Y700, while NEC also saw a new low for the
year, declining Y17 to Y610.
Steel companies retreated after last Friday's poor results. Nippon Steel
fell Y4 to Y275.
Sega Enterprises, the video maker, was one of the few gainers of the day,
rising Y50 to Y9,400. The company retained its popularity thanks to its
brisk profit projections.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 121.21 to 17,560.35 in volume of 20.3m
shares. Aoyama Trading, a discount retailer of office workers' blue suits,
rose Y140 to Y7,450. The company posted firm interim results as consumers
opted for cheaper clothing.
Roundup
THE region's markets mostly followed Tokyo down, although for their own
reasons.
HONG KONG finished sharply lower as the worsening Sino-British row over the
colony's future triggered profit-taking by local investors, but a flurry of
late buying allowed it to retrace some early losses.
The Hang Seng index retreated 71.73 or 1.1 per cent to 6,294.83, above an
intraday low of 6,261.99. Turnover fell from HKDollars 3.24bn to HKDollars
2.50bn.
Blue chips which gained most in the recent rally were hit hardest by
profit-taking, with the most active HSBC Holdings losing 50 cents to
HKDollars 65 and its Hang Seng Bank unit dropping Dollars 1.50 to Dollars
56.50.
AUSTRALIA fell for a seventh straight day to end at a 21-month low ahead of
this week's release of bank results. The All Ordinaries index closed 14.5
down at 1357.2, the lowest finish since February, 1991, in turnover of
ADollars 183m.
ANZ profits are due today, and Westpac and NAB on Thursday. ANZ closed 7
cents lower at ADollars 2.53, Westpac fell 4 cents to ADollars 2.59 while
NAB rose 6 cents to ADollars 6.83.
SINGAPORE fell sharply in nervous trading on talk, confirmed after the
close, that both of the country's deputy prime ministers were suffering from
cancer. The Straits Times Industrial index closed at 1,414.27, down 2.3 per
cent or 32.53 in active volume of 130.39m shares.
BANGKOK dropped 1.8 per cent after the central bank requested banks, finance
and securities firms to cut down their loan credits to stock investors. The
SET index lost 15.93 to 893.31 in turnover of Bt5.64bn, the thinnest day's
trading in four weeks.
SEOUL slid in very thin trading in a technical adjustment after the recent
rally. The composite index closed 15.64 lower at 616.64 in turnover of
Won370.68bn compared with Won496.35bn.
TAIWAN's weighted index, which edged just above 3,600 before profit-taking
set in, ended 15.35 higher at 3,588.44 in turnover of TDollars 5.85bn. The
financial sector closed 1.4 per cent higher as investors regained some
buying interest in the Big Three banks, which rose between TDollars 1 and
TDollars 1.50 each.
MANILA dipped in light trading as the composite index fell 7.35 to 1,339.57
in combined turnover of Won152.27m.
KUALA LUMPUR continued to consolidate after the recent bull run. The
composite index fell 4.37 to 646.25 in volume of 170.2m shares against
217.6m.
NEW ZEALAND was lifted by a strong performance from Carter Holt Harvey which
gained 14 cents to Dollars 2.64 after reporting an interim NZDollars 112.4m
profit on Friday. The NZSE-40 capital index rose 8.6 to 1409.50 in turnover
of Dollars 17.6m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG lost early gains to end mixed following lower than expected
results from Barlow Rand. The overall index was unchanged at 3,041 and the
industrial index fell 2 to 4,069. The gold index dropped 3 to 774.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Money Markets: Firmer UK rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CASH RATES in the sterling money market yesterday firmed sharply from Friday
night's levels, as dealers continued to take the view that there will be no
more cuts in UK base rates before the New Year.
The mood in European markets was somewhat more bullish in the morning,
however. Short-dated Euromark futures rose sharply after a group of leading
German economists forecast zero per cent growth in Germany in 1993. This
implies that there may be greater pressure on the Bundesbank to ease
monetary policy, writes James Blitz.
Despite the UK government's continued commitment to easing monetary policy,
the sterling cash market believes that policy is changing cautiously.
At the weekend, Mr Norman Lamont, the UK chancellor, said that the recent
cuts in rates and the September devaluation of sterling amounted to 'a very
considerable relaxation' of policy. Dealers believe that 6 per cent base
rate is inevitable, but the government will tread carefully before
signalling it.
Three-month money therefore rose sharply from an offered rate of 7 1/8 per
cent on Friday night to a close of 7 5/16 per cent.
One month money, a rate at which commercial banks do much trading, rose from
around 7 1/4 per cent on Friday to 7 5/16 per cent last night.
The sharpness of yesterday's rise in market rates partly reflects the
decision of commercial banks to fund their books further down the yield
curve. Rates there are cheaper, and it is safer now to lock into the
longer-dated maturities.
One dealer also suggested that the approach of the new year, when bank
balances must reflect the share of assets and cash required by central
banks, meant that rates were being pushed higher.
He said that Japanese banks had aggressively paid higher rates to meet such
requirements.
Euromark futures rose sharply yesterday morning after a group of economic
forecasters who give independent advice to the German government forecast
zero real growth next year.
The report from the 'five wise men' triggered renewed speculation that the
Bundesbank will further ease monetary policy before the end of the year. The
March contract rose 12 basis points to a high of 92.25, and closed at 92.08.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Foreign Exchanges: D-Mark weakens on forecast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR showed a new bout of strength against the D-Mark yesterday after
a group of independent German economists predicted that there will be zero
per cent growth in Germany in 1993.
The report, by the 'five wise men' who give independent advice to the German
government, led to immediate speculation that the Bundesbank will have to
ease monetary policy more quickly than it wishes, writes James Blitz.
After a sharp fall against the D-Mark on Friday, the dollar received a boost
from Germany's grim economic news, rising nearly 2 1/2 pfennigs on the day
to a close of DM1.59 at the end of European trading. In afternoon trading in
North America, the dollar continued its progress, reaching DM1.5947.
In recent weeks, foreign exchange dealers have started to believe that the
anticipated cut in German official rates may not take place before the New
Year after all.
However, the report by five leading economics professors hired to give the
German government independent advice has encouraged speculation that the
Bundesbank may have to lower the Discount rate, currently at 8.25 per cent,
next month.
The dollar's progress was partly compounded by another set of US economic
data suggesting that economic recovery may be underway. Industrial
production in October was up 0.3 per cent, while recent indicators have
shown a sharp rise in monetary growth, suggesting that bank lending is on
the increase.
However, the increasing gloom on Germany's economic prospect was the
dominant news in all currency trading, and triggered another bout of
strength for the French franc against the German currency. The franc peaked
at FFr3.367 from a previous close of FFr3.373.
The move was also helped by the Bank of France's decision not to reduce its
key lending rates for the third time in two weeks, contrary to the market's
expectations. The lira also appreciated against the D-Mark, closing at L853
from a previous L854.6.
Again, the spotlight was on sterling as the one seriously weak currency in
Europe. The pound fell 1 1/4 pfennigs against the D-Mark to close at
DM2.4150, and 3 cents against the dollar to a close of Dollars 1.5195.
Opinion remains divided on where the pound goes from here, now that the
Autumn Statement has been delivered. Mr Steve Hannah, head of research at
IBJ International in London, was yesterday sticking to the view that the
pound should remain above DM2.40, because of the incipient weakness of the
D-Mark.
However, he believes the political uncertainty created by the arms-for-Iraq
scandal is a new and unsettling factor for sterling. 'If the political side
gets worse, we'll have to jettison our economic views and accept that
politics can drive us away from the economic fundamentals,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Coffee pact chief calls for
more co-operation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COFFEE EXPORTING countries will have to co-operate much more than in the
past if a future international agreement is to be successful, African coffee
producers were told yesterday.
Mr Alexandre Beltrao, chief executive of the International Coffee
Organisation, said profound differences had existed in the domestic policies
of coffee producing countries. He cited the level of prices to growers,
financing, stock policy, quality standards, and marketing.
This had led to permanent tensions, he said in a statement to the
Inter-African Coffee Organisation yesterday. 'If such tensions and
disagreements are to be avoided or minimised, some co-ordination of policies
on price, financing and marketing needs to be established with guidelines
agreed and monitored.'
Mr Beltrao was unable to attend the four-day African meeting yesterday as
next week sees a crucial meeting of the ICO in London. Delegates from both
producer and consumer countries will be meeting to discuss a renewed coffee
agreement at a time when world prices have started to recover from 20-year
lows struck in August.
Yesterday the January robusta contract rose Dollars 21 to a fresh nine-month
high of Dollars 980 a tonne, partly on the back of Friday's sharp rise in
New York after talk that Colombia's crop could be 10 per cent down on the
1991-92 level of 17.5m bags following of disease, drought and power cuts.
World prices more than halved after the ICO export quota system collapsed in
July 1989. This had cost African producers USDollars 3.2bn in the past three
years, Mr Beltrao said. 'To put these figures into perspective net
transfers. . . by the World Bank to all African countries south of the
Sahara (not just coffee producers) in the three fiscal years to 1990 to 1992
totalled Dollars 2.9bn, ie less than the losses suffered by coffee producers
alone.'
The last ICO meeting at the end of September agreed on a definition for a
universal quota system and last month a working group drew up draft rules
for a system of controls. Progress could be maintained next week if
producing countries were driven not merely by low prices, but by 'a
disposition to work jointly in a new framework that will eliminate the
pitfalls of the past and build up a healthy worldwide coffee industry
protected from the vagaries of a speculative market,' Mr Beltrao said.
The Brazilian Coffee Committee, which represents the private sector, has
proposed that the government sell coffee stocks when the internal price
reaches Dollars 90 a bag (60 kg), Dollars 20 above the present level, said
Mr Suelly Evandro Amarante, head of the coffee producers' council, said
yesterday, reports Reuter from Rio de Janeiro.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: MIM to develop zinc/lead/silver
mine
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MIM HOLDINGS, the Australian resources group, yesterday announced plans to
develop its MacArthur River zinc/lead/silver project in the Gulf of
Carpentaria region of the Northern Territory.
MIM said that the ADollars 250m (Pounds 112m) project had been approved
following a two-year feasibility study carried out on behalf of the company
and a group of four Japanese joint-venturers which collectively own 28 per
cent of the project.
Mr Norm Fussell, MIM managing director, said the group expected to extract
about 1.5m tonnes of ore a year from an underground mine at MacArthur River,
producing about 350,000 tonnes of mixed concentrate.
The concentrate is expected to contain about 160,000 tonnes of zinc, 45,000
tonnes of lead and 1.6m ounces of silver. Design work is to begin
immediately and construction is expected to start early in 1993.
Mr Fussell said the feasibility study suggested that world demand for zinc
would increase through the 1990s, and that MacArthur would be profitable
during cyclical downturns.
The McArthur River deposit was discovered by MIM geologists in 1955, but
development was regarded as uncommercial until the costs of extraction were
significantly reduced as a result of recent technological advances.
Mr Fussell said the Japanese joint venturers 'share our confidence not only
in McArthur River and Australia, but also in the strategy of investing in
high quality zinc mining and processing'.
The joint venturers are Nippon Mining (15 per cent), Mitsui (5 per cent),
Mitsubishi Materials Corporation (5 per cent) and Marubeni (3 per cent). The
project will be managed by MIM.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Currency move gives bonus to
British farmers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN COMMUNITY agriculture ministers agreed yesterday to devalue the
'green pound' by 7 1/2 per cent. The move, which has full UK assent, will
increase prices paid to British farmers and is intended to choke off
speculation between varying prices paid for farm produce as a result of the
departure of sterling from the exchange rate mechanism.
Following sterling's flotation after September 16, a 'monetary gap' of 14.4
per cent has opened between the real and 'green' rates for the pound.
The danger of speculation arose from the monetary compensatory amount
system, which is due to be phased out from January 1 as a result of the
inception of the border-free single market or 1992 programme. The MCA for
the UK was 12.9 per cent; from November 19, when the green pound devaluation
comes into effect, it will be 4.9 per cent.
Without the change, food exporters could have shipped produce into the UK,
claimed the nearly 13 per cent subsidy going in, and re-exported the food
after January 1 once the MCA regime had been removed, thereby escaping the
equivalent levy going out.
The green pound devaluation could knock on into lower food prices for the
consumer, according to a European Commission agriculture official.
The abolition of the complex agrimonetary system of MCAs from January will
still leave 'green' currencies in place. The current proposal of the
commission, still to be approved by the council of ministers, is for a
maximum 'monetary gap' of 4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Cuban nickel output well below
target
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CUBA'S OUTPUT of nickel is expected to total just 35,000 tonnes this year,
well short of an original target of 50,000 tonnes, because of production
problems caused by the country's changed relationship with the former Soviet
Union and the countries of eastern Europe.
Spot sales of Cuban nickel will be halted immediately, but all contract
sales will be fulfilled at the agreed time, according to Nickel Refining and
Trading (Niref), the Rotterdam-based agent of Cubaniquel, the state-owned
nickel producer.
Niref said it was too early to predict the outlook for 1993 production.
Cubaniquel has been hurt by the drying up of vitally-important supplies of
capital goods, oil and raw materials such as ammonia and sulphur from the
former Soviet Union and the rest of the former Soviet bloc.
Most of Cuba's refineries were built by former allies in eastern European
and the former Sovuet Union, which once accounted for 80 per cent of Cuban
foreign trade. The radical change in economic and political relations since
the collapse of communism in eastern Europe has made it difficult for Cuba
to gain access to spare parts and other equipment needed to maintain its
nickel output.
'Although support has been received from western countries and technical
improvements have recently been commissioned for one of the three
refineries, production problems could not avoid, however, that the
production target of 50,000 tonnes of nickel content forecast by Cubaniquel
in February will not be reached this year,' Niref said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Where miners need a head for
heights - Kenneth Gooding on the problem of altitude sickness in the Chilean
high Andes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THEY CALL it puna in Chile, scoroche in Peru. The mining industry will have
to learn new tricks to live with it.
Puna is the catch-all term for the very many symptoms caused by what English
speakers call altitude sickness. It will have a profound impact on the way
mining companies operate in Chile, a country that many see as the most
attractive in Latin America for exploration and development.
Much of that country's minerals treasure is locked in the high Andes. Some
of the best mines and projects are located above 2,800 metres (9,000 feet),
the level at which most people begin to feel the onset of puna symptoms.
In no particular order these mines include: Coldelco's Andina and Salvador
copper operations; Exxon's Los Bronces copper project on the same ore body
as Andina; La Coipa gold project (Placer Dome and TVX Gold) and Bema Gold's
Refugio project nearby, both in the so-called Marikunga gold district. There
is Cominco's Quebrada Blanca copper project. Billiton, Falconbridge and
Chevron are partners in the Collahuasi copper project (but Chevron is
selling its stake to Minorco). RTZ owns Cerro Colorado, another copper
project.
Homestake has the El Heuso project, Cominco the Lobo project and Cocar owns
Cancan, all seeking gold.
Chile also boasts - for a short while longer at least (its owners Billiton,
Northgate and Citibank intend to close it at the end of this year) - the
world's highest operating gold mine, Choquelimpie, in the mouth of a dead
volcano at 4,825 metres (15,777 feet).
Billiton is part of the Royal Dutch/Shell group and Shell Chile is helping
to finance a study of the effects of high altitude on miners - research that
will be of immense value as activity builds up in that country.
The air above 2,800 metres is generally described as 'thin'. It contains the
same proportions of oxygen, carbon dioxide and nitrogen as at sea level but
with increasing altitude there is a decrease in atmospheric pressure. The
decrease is gradual and proportional up to about 2,800 metres, but rapidly
and disproportionately accelerates as higher altitudes are achieved.
When high altitude-low pressure air is breathed into lungs adapted to the
higher pressures of lower altitudes, transfer of oxygen from air to blood is
reduced and the body experiences oxygen depletion. The body is then forced
to work harder to take in extra oxygen and in doing so slips back into
oxygen deficit again, creating a vicious circle.
The symptoms of puna can include one or all of the following (and the list
is not exhaustive): headache, gastric problems, nausea, heart arrythmia,
listlessness, vomiting, diarrhoea, lapse of memory, anxiety attacks,
feelings of insecurity, loss of appetite, insomnia, shortage of breath,
muscular cramps, indecisiveness, lack of motivation, obsessive behaviour,
persistent colds, sinusitis, sore throat, painful eyes and loss of vision,
fevers and inability to concentrate. All of these are particularly unwelcome
on mining sites, where so much heavy equipment is used and operators must
feel on top of the job.
The impact of puna is different for each individual. Mr Jim Platt,
Billiton's chief geologist on the Collahuasi project for four years, has
produced a paper on altitude sickness based on his personal experiences. He
says there is no way of knowing if an individual needed for the current
Dollars 40m exploration programme at Collahuasi will be able to work at that
altitude except by taking each one there to see what happens.
'There seems to be no pattern. Extremely fit and active people have been
known to suffer badly while some overweight, heavy-smoking types feel no
effects,' he says.
Mr Platt points out that to guard against the short- and long-term impact of
puna, companies in Chile have begun to make use of a 'buddy' system. This
involves everyone looking out for the health and condition of everyone else,
spotting and signalling any observed deviations from the norm or onset of
puna symptoms.
This system promotes teamwork and safety-consciousnes. Mr Platt suggests the
buddy system is particularly important for detecting potentially dangerous
psychological symptoms, such as anxiety attacks, feelings of paranoia and
insecurity, a sense of entrapment, intense claustrophobia, obsessive
thinking and the edge of a nervous breakdown.
By the end of this year the study sponsored by Shell Chile and carried out
by the Catholic University of Santiago's cardiology department should be
available to throw fresh light on this subject.
Among other things, researchers have been checking the Choquelimpie
employees at the mine, also at Putre which is 1,100 metres lower and where
the mining camp is based, and finally in Arica, a sea-level town, in an
attempt to identify any with heart problems or others potentially at risk.
Mr Patricio Palma, Choquelimpie's safety officer, says: 'We want to know
more about how hearts and lungs function at high altitudes to prevent
problems developing, possibly with the help of drugs'. It might also be
necessary to change working patterns at the mine, he points out.
Fortunately, the cure for puna is simple: the patient is taken to a low
altitude as quickly as possible. In severe cases time may be vital. The cure
is then so rapid and so complete that some of the afflicted immediately want
to return to high altitude, unwilling to believe that they ever had
difficulties.
Mr Platt insists, however: 'They should under no circumstances be permitted
to make a return'.
Mining companies wanting to establish a fully-adapted high-altitude crew can
expect that for every 100 people selected, 30 to 35 will drop out quickly.
Of those, two or three are likely to be very ill indeed.
The 65 to 70 who remain may also be subject to significant attrition in the
medium term either because they cannot put up with the working environment
or as a result of delayed puna symptoms.
Mr Platt points to the bottom line for many mining companies in Chile: 'When
you are planning to staff a high-altitude project, it is likely that twice
the required number of personnel will eventually have to be selected to
ensure that basic (mining) needs are met.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COPPER prices led a general rally from morning lows at the London Metal
Exchange, but aluminium nickel and tin prices still finished down on the
day. Copper's early fall had found support, dealers said, and an upturn in
the afternoon was encouraged by a firmer tone for the metal on the New York
Commodity Exchange (Comex). Sterling's weakness made the crucial difference,
however, turning a Dollars 9 fall for three months metal into a Pounds
23.50-a-tonne rise from Friday's kerb (afterhours) close. ZINC followed
copper, but the market was thin as buyers disappeared at the first signs of
selling interest. At the close three months zinc was up only Dollars 6.50 on
the day at Dollars 1,045 a tonne and by the end of kerb trading it was
showing a Dollars 4 fall from the same point on Friday. NICKEL struggled to
maintain its rally, even after news of the expected setback to Cuba's 1992
production (see story above). Three months nickel closed on the LME at
Dollars 5,415 a tonne, down Dollars 82.50 from Friday.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Low demand for tyres takes the
bounce out of rubber
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SINGAPORE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUBBER INDUSTRY officials see little prospect of an early bounce in the
world market for the commodity, Reuter reports from Singapore
'Unless there is very strong demand, there is nothing in today's economy
that is going to make you believe there is going to be a very strong
immediate recovery,' says Mr Mark Blitstein, director of purchasing
(commodities) at the Goodyear Tire and Rubber Company, who is attending the
34th assembly of the International Rubber Study Group here. Private
companies and government bodies are participating in the six-day meeting.
Mr Blitstein says he expects tyre demand in the US to grow at between 3 and
5 per cent in 1993, marginally up on 1992.
'European demand for tyres will be flat at best while Japanese demand is
likely to be smaller,' another delegate forecasts. Prices are showing signs
of bottoming but the outlook remains clouded by world surplus, officials
say.
Tyre manufacturers consumed about 70 per cent of the world's natural rubber
production of 5.34m tonnes in 1991. Goodyear alone consumed an estimated
400,000 tonnes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Tea
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There were 17,356 packages for the day, reports the Tea Brokers'
Association. The strong demand continued. Landed Assams met keen competition
and the majority ruled firm to 10p dearer. Bangladesh teas again sold well,
advancing 2-4p. Bright east Africans were strong and considerably dearer.
Mediums, which had opened 6-8p higher, closed irregular but about steady on
balance. Offshore: strong competition with prices up by 3-6p. The highest
price realised this week was 203p for a Kenya pd. Quotations: quality 180p,
good medium 160p, medium 137p, low medium 100p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Government Bonds: Concern over estimate for PSBR drives
gilts lower
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SUPPLY fears dominated trading in the gilts market yesterday, in the wake of
last week's Autumn Statement, pushing prices down more than a point.
The market was driven down by concerns that the estimated 1993/94 public
sector borrowing requirement of Pounds 44bn could be exceeded.
Traders said yesterday that a number of factors, such as lower-than-expected
growth, or a collapse in public pay constraint, could push the government's
funding needs even higher.
Already, supply in the gilts market next year is expected to exceed Pounds
50bn, including refinancing of maturing debt.
From the gilt market's point of view, the prospect of a tax increase may now
be viewed as good news.
'A tax increase could be positive for the gilts market. It would show
resolve in attacking the deficit,' said Mr Adrian James, an economist at
NatWest Capital Markets, who added that although such a move would be
unpopular, a general election is still some time away.
THE French market also fared poorly yesterday, despite the issue of positive
inflation data.
French consumer prices showed a monthly rise of 0.3 per cent, representing
an increase of 2.4 per cent in year-on-year inflation, down from 2.6 per
cent in September. French inflation has now fallen substantially below
German inflation.
However, French bond prices ended down  3/8 point, as the market lost some
of its recent buoyant tone, due to fading expectations of further interest
rate cuts.
The French central bank yesterday kept a tighter rein on liquidity, dashing
hopes of further cuts unless the Germans take action.
THE German bund market also appears to have run out of steam, ending
slightly lower, after losing some earlier gains.
The revision of September broad money growth to 9.3 per cent from 9.1 per
cent and a drop in western German wholesale prices for October helped
depress sentiment in the German market.
The December bund future on Liffe closed down 0.12 point at 90.97.
US TREASURY prices were mixed across the maturity range in thin trading
yesterday in the wake of more evidence showing continued improvements in
economic activity.
In late trading the benchmark 30-year government issue had recovered from
early losss to stand  3/16 higher at 100, yielding 7.556 per cent. The
two-year note was notably lower, however, down  5/32 at 99 7/32 to carry a
yield of 4.655 per cent.
Prices eased at the opening on news of a 0.3 per cent rise in industrial
production during October and a small rise in capacity utilisation.
Both figures were slightly above market expectations, and following last
week's bullish news on the economy, backed up the growing perception of
Treasury investors that economic growth over the coming quarters may prove
more robust than anticipated.
The early declines eventually prompted afternoon buying at the long end of
the market, and simultaneous selling of shorter-dated securities in a series
of 'curve-flattening' trades.
CANADIAN bond prices fell more than a point, following a  3/4 point prime
rate hike, as the Canadian dollar came under renewed pressure yesterday.
The Canadian dollar seemed to stabilise somewhat at around CDollars 1.27
against the US dollar, following intervention by the Bank of Canada.
As well as the weakness of the currency, concern about the mounting deficits
facing not only Canada but many provinces pushed bond prices down.
The yield curve has flattened substantially, despite the weak performance of
bonds. The Government of Canada's 8 1/2 per cent 10-year bonds ended down 1
1/8 point.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Bonds: Finland dominates sector with Dollars
2bn, five-year issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Republic of Finland again dominated the international bond markets
yesterday, with the confirmation of the main terms of its much awaited
global US dollar issue.
At Dollars 2bn, this first global sovereign issue was much bigger than
expected and should be the republic's last big foreign currency borrowing
for this year.
Pricing of the five-year paper will take place this afternoon at a spread of
82 to 84 basis points over comparable US Treasuries, compared with the 75 to
80 tipped by bankers outside the deal last week.
The spreads reflect Finland's heavy borrowing programme.
Merrill Lynch, one of the lead managers, took issue with comments from
traders that the issue will appeal to banks in particular which would be
able to swap the bonds for floating rate assets paying 40 to 45 basis points
over the London interbank offered rate.
Mr Tim von Halle, head of syndicate at Merrill Lynch, said: 'We have not
asset swapped a single bond, and we have sold almost Dollars 600m.'
J. P. Morgan Securities and Nomura International are the other lead
managers.
Around 45 per cent of the issue was sold to US domestic investors buying the
spread, said Merrill Lynch.
The bulk of the balance went to continental Europe.
Japan Development Bank's Dollars 300m seven-year 6 7/8 per cent straight
bond through LTCB International received little attention in the
circumstances. It had a mixed reception, supposedly failing to capture the
imagination partly because of the clash with Finland, however traders note
that the maturity and credit are quite different.
Plus points for JDB include the strength of its credit and increasing demand
for longer maturities because of the steepness of the yield curve. The
pricing was thought somewhat tight at 34 basis points over comparable US
Treasuries.
The upward drift in the interest coupons payable on Japanese equity warrants
continued with issues from Daiwa House Industry.
The company has had to accept a coupon of 2 3/8 per cent on its Dollars 300m
four-year issue and 2 3/4 per cent on an issue for SFr300m with the same
maturity. Over the past month, coupons have climbed from around 1.5 per cent
as a result of the oversupply of such issues and the rising cost of the
dollar given the feeling that US interest rates have bottomed out.
Bayerische Vereinsbank again reopened a collared floating rate note due
2002, issuing a further Dollars 50m tranche to fill pockets of demand.
Caisse Autonome de Refinancement's FFr300m reverse FRN is seen as an
investor-driven yield curve play. The DM380m 10-year 7 3/8 per cent issue
for Metropolis of Tokyo was described as very tightly priced but well
received, selling mainly to Japanese financial institutions with operations
in Europe as well as to local retail investors.
Sterling swap spreads are reported to be still recovering from the activity
surrounding Sweden's record Eurosterling bond last week, keeping
swap-related sterling borrowers out.
Some selling pressure was reported on last week's new issues, as profits
were taken.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: Guarantees may be offered on
geared funds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANAGERS of unit trusts which invest in futures and options may be able to
offer guarantees to their customers following a revision of current
regulations planned for early next year, the Securities and Investments
Board has said.
At the moment, restrictions on the offering of guarantees have meant that no
geared futures and options funds - known as 'GFOFs' - have been launched
since restrictions on them were lifted a year ago. Only a handful of futures
and options funds without guarantees have been launched.
Geared funds are riskier, making it important for their managers to offer
some form of guarantee to attract investors. The SIB said it was exploring
methods by which funds could offer guarantees within the existing
regulations, rather than preparing a complete overhaul.
In a separate move, the SIB said it hoped to put out guidance soon on how
all unit trust fund managers use futures to hedge their portfolios.
Unofficial guidance given earlier this year by an executive of Imro, the
investment management regulator, was interpreted by trustees to mean that a
fund could not buy a stock index future unless there was at least a 95 per
cent 'congruance' between its portfolio and the index.
Fund managers have said that this effectively made it impossible for them to
buy stock index futures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: CFTC opens way for
catastrophe contract dealing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Chicago Board of Trade yesterday received regulatory approval from the
Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) for a range of new catastrophe
insurance futures and options, allowing trading to begin on December 11.
The catastrophe insurance futures contracts, originally announced in August
this year, are designed to allow insurers to hedge underwriting risk
associated with unexpected disasters.
Mr William O'Connor, CBOT chairman, said the contracts 'will be the first in
a new complex for a vital industry in need of efficient risk-management
tools'.
The futures contracts are to be based on figures for quarterly insured
catastrophe losses nationwide and in three regions (eastern, midwestern and
western) of the US.
Trading of a contract based on figures for the US as a whole and the eastern
region begins in December.
There is no date set for trading for the contract based on midwestern and
western figures.
The catastrophe losses figures will be based on a large sample of reported
incurred losses for a quarter caused by wind, hail, earthquake, riot or
flood, as appropriate for each applicable property line.
The data will be collat-ed by the Insurance Services Office, which collects
claims-loss data for companies representing about 85 per cent of the US
insurance industry.
The price of a contract will reflect the market's expectation of a quarter's
catastrophe loss in relation to that same quarter's estimated property
premium.
As severe catastrophes occur, or as frequency increases, the futures price
is likely to increase.
Alternatively as the loss quarter progresses with fewer than expected
catastrophe losses the futures price could decline.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Telebras profits reach Dollars
447m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BILL HINCHBERGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAOLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TELEBRAS, Brazil's state-owned telecommunications holding company, turned in
profits of Dollars 447m for the first nine months of this year.
The results partly reflect attempts to recover a drop in real rates suffered
between March 1990 and September 1991. During the first six months of the
year, average real rates were 5.3 per cent higher than in 1991. In 1991, the
company posted a year-end profit of Dollars 106m.
By August, however, real rates were still about half of their level in March
1990.
There are indications from acting president Mr Itamar Franco that rate
increases may not continue to outpace inflation.
This, together with uncertainty over Mr Franco's attitude towards
privatisation of the company, appear to be responsible for the fall in
Telebras shares of American Depository Receipts (ADRs) in the
over-the-counter market.
Last Friday, a lot of 1,000 shares closed at Dollars 12 - 31.4 per cent
lower than the opening price of Dollars 17.50 on October 23.
On paper, nothing has changed with respect to the sale of Telebras and its
28 operating companies. Privatisation can only take place after an amendment
to the 1988 constitution, which would reverse a monopoly in
telecommunications for the state.
However, while Mr Fernando Collor de Mello, the president now suspended to
face impeachment charges, was expected to push for privatisation, Mr Franco
has not displayed a similar commitment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Telebras turns in profits of
Dollars 447m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BILL HINCHBERGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAOLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TELEBRAS, Brazil's state-owned telecommunications holding company, turned in
profits of Dollars 447m for the first nine months of this year.
The results partly reflect attempts to recover a drop in real rates suffered
between March 1990 and September 1991. During the first six months of the
year, average real rates were 5.3 per cent higher than in 1991. In 1991, the
company posted a year-end profit of Dollars 106m.
By August, however, real rates were still about half of their level in March
1990, when Mr Fernando Collor de Mello, the president now suspended to face
impeachment charges, was inaugurated.
There are indications from acting president Mr Itamar Franco that rate
increases may not continue to outpace inflation.
This, along with uncertainty over Mr Franco's attitude towards privatisation
of the company, appear to be responsible for the fall in Telebras shares of
American Depository Receipts (ADRs) in the over-the-counter market. Last
Friday, a lot of 1,000 shares closed at Dollars 12 - 31.4 per cent lower
than the opening price of Dollars 17.50 on October 23.
On paper, nothing has changed with respect to the sale of Telebras and its
28 operating companies. Privatisation can only take place after an amendment
to the 1988 constitution, which reverses a monopoly in telecommunications
for the state. The difference is Mr Collor was expected to push hard for
privatisation, while Mr Franco has not displayed a similar commitment.
Many members of Congress remain sympathetic to the idea of selling Telebras.
'The predominant spirit in Congress is that it will be necessary,' said Mr
Renato Johnsson, a pro-privatisation federal deputy. 'Otherwise there won't
be funds available for investment.'
Another uncertainty is the name of the new company president. Earlier this
month, Mr Luiz Felipe Denucci Martins took over as acting president for Mr
Jose Ignacio Ferreira. Mr Franco is expected to name the new company head by
the end of the month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Power Corp surges 30% on rise
from subsidiaries
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
POWER CORP of Canada, the senior holding company of Mr Paul Desmarais, the
Montreal financier, unveiled a 30 per cent increase in nine-month net
profits.
The group lifted earnings to CDollars 135m (USDollars 107m), or CDollars
1.03 a share, up from CDollars 104m, or 77 cents a share, a year earlier on
revenues which edged ahead to CDollars 4.5bn from CDollars 4.47bn.
The subsidiaries, mainly in financial services and communications,
contributed CDollars 74.4m, against CDollars 70m.
Third-quarter net profits advanced 12 per cent to CDollars 32.3m, or 24
cents a share, on revenues marginally ahead at CDollars 1.47bn.
The results for both periods show that on an operating basis the
subsidiaries improved their performance.
At September 30, Power Corp and 70 per cent-owned Power Financial had
CDollars 750m cash and the group was virtually debt-free.
Its biggest subsidiaries are the publicly held Great West Lifeco, one of
North America's main life insurance companies, and Investors Group, a
financial services retailer.
Mr Desmarais, in a joint venture with the Frere family of Belgium, owns 57
per cent of Paresa, the European holding company controlling Petrofina and a
string of investments in Europe's industrial, financial services and
communications sectors.
Hydro-Quebec, the electric power utility fully owned by the Quebec
government, suffered a 13.5 per cent decline in profits to CDollars 343m in
the first nine months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Struggling Bank Summa faces
deadline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANK Summa, suspended from clearing operations last Friday with bad debts
exceeding Rp1,000bn (Dollars 313m), had no immediate prospect of resuming
normal activity, according to Dr Adrianus Mooy, governor of Bank Indonesia
(BI), the central bank.
In an interview, Dr Mooy accepted that others among Indonesia's 215 banks
faced problems of bad debt and poor management, although not on the scale of
Bank Summa. The sector's bad and doubtful debts, excluding Bank Summa,
amount to about Rp7,400bn or 6.3 per cent of the sector's loans, according
to BI officials.
'It's very important for the banks to look ahead and see whether they can
still survive . . . If they can survive but only for a short period, they
should start thinking about the way out. One of the ways, of course, is
merging,' he said.
'Very soon all these banks will be screened . . . through the application of
prudential regulations,' Dr Mooy added. Banks have been told to increase
their capital to 7 per cent of risk-weighted assets, up from 5 per cent, by
next March.
He said that Bank Summa, the country's 10th largest private bank and owned
by the Soeryadjaya family, had failed to keep to a plan agreed with BI for
the injection of new capital.
The first of three instalments, scheduled in three-month intervals beginning
last September, had not been made. When suspended, Bank Summa also owed
Rp66bn to BI and Rp15bn in inter-bank lending.
'They have to come up with a big bank solution, not only to solve the
deficit they hold with us, but also to meet the action plan. This has to be
done very soon, because if not I see no life in Bank Summa,' Dr Mooy warned.
He said 17 private banks were negotiating to raise more than Rp150bn, in
order to take over Bank Summa's small-scale depositors with performing
loans. This would save depositors but make Bank Summa's restructuring even
more difficult, he noted, adding that over half the bank's bad debt is owed
by private companies in which the Soeryadjayas hold an interest.
Dr Mooy said unless Bank Summa received new money quickly, its problems
would become 'even more impossible'. The alternative, he added, was for BI
'to ask the bank officially to discontinue operations'.
Mr William Soeryadjaya, who heads Bank Summa, was meeting BI officials late
yesterday and has already taken steps to raise new finance.
Last Friday 40m shares in Astra International, which dominates Indonesia's
automotive sector and in which the Soeryadjayas held a 76 per cent stake,
were sold for Rp400bn.
BI officials say the shares were pledged to state-owned Bank Dagang Negara,
against loans to the Soeryadjayas. Astra said yesterday it was unaware who
had bought the shares, equivalent to 16.5 per cent of the company's capital.
Bankers say, however, the Soeryadjayas recently informed banks they planned
to divest 60m shares in three equal blocks to Toyota of Japan, Danareksa, an
Indonesian state-owned mutual trust, and to one of four charitable
foundations chaired by President Suharto.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Canadian mining groups in cash
call
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO SMALL Canadian exploration companies have taken advantage of
international excitement over a hunt for diamonds in the Northwest
Territories by raising new equity from European investors.
Aber Resources of Toronto and Vancouver-based Lytton Minerals said yesterday
they have raised a total of CDollars 9.7m (USDollars 7.6m). Both deals were
channelled through First Marathon Securities of Toronto, which is understood
to have sold the bulk of the shares to British and French institutions.
The diamond rush is one of the most frenzied in North American mining
history, with companies staking claims over several thousand square miles
around the Lac de Gras area, some 400m north-east of Yellowknife.
A small quantity of diamonds has been found. Aber and its partners last week
announced the discovery of 'micro-diamonds' in two of seven samples from one
drillhole.
But analysts have cautioned that evaluation of the area remains in the early
stages.
International investors appear to be attracted by the involvement of some of
the world's biggest mining companies in the search.
Kennecott, the North American subsidiary of the UK's RTZ, has a right to
earn 60 per cent of Aber's interest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: CSFB to organise Russian
sell-off
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT Suisse First Boston has been appointed by RKI, the Russian
privatisation agency, and the European Bank for Reconstruction and
Development to organise Russia's first privatisation of companies through
voucher privatisation auctions.
The auction programme is being announced before next month's key session of
the Congress of Peoples Deputies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Fay, Richwhite to pay bonus on
BNZ stake sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FAY, Richwhite, the New Zealand merchant bank, is to pay shareholders
NZDollars 40m (USDollars 21m) as a tax free special dividend to mark the
successful sale of its 23 per cent holding in the Bank of New Zealand (BNZ).
Sir Michael Fay, joint managing director, told the annual meeting in
Auckland that the company would pay a special dividend of 12 cents a share
with the final dividend of 2 cents a share on December 4.
He said that following the sale of BNZ to National Australia Bank (NAB) last
week, Fay, Richwhite had around NZDollars 40m of liquid shareholders' funds
in excess of maximum requirements. The directors felt that the payment of a
special dividend was appropriate.
Sir Michael said that in a business and banking environment in which there
was a preference for single purpose companies, it was Fay, Richwhite's
intention to remain focused solely on merchant banking and to refrain from
any strategy which confused the business with that of an investment company.
The company's working capital would be used only for trading purposes, with
surplus funds returned to shareholders.
The sale of BNZ, which netted Fay, Richwhite NZDollars 389m, had enabled the
company to retire all its core debt, which would lead to a substantial
reduction in interest costs and improve cash flow.
The sale would also lead to a significant improvement in the quality of
earnings.
Fay, Richwhite shares rose 5 cents to 82 cents on the New Zealand Stock
Exchange yesterday afternoon before the announcement. Earlier this year the
shares hit a low of 52 cents, but reached NZDollars 1.20 during the
America's Cup yachting challenge, when Sir Michael Fay was the main backer
for the New Zealand entry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Bank cleared of favour claims
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FAY, Richwhite, the New Zealand merchant bank, was yesterday cleared by a
public inquiry of allegations that as a leading shareholder in Bank of New
Zealand (BNZ) it was granted favours relating an urgent NZDollars 42.5m
(USDollars 22.31m) loan it received from BNZ in 1990, writes Terry Hall.
At the time Fay, Richwhite held around 26.9 per cent of BNZ and was its
biggest shareholder, apart from the New Zealand government.
Both sold their combined 82.9 per cent holding to National Australia Bank
(NAB) last week.
The claims were made during investigations into BNZ's affairs between 1985
and 1990 when it faced financial disaster due to NZDollars 2.8bn of bad
debts.
The investigations followed accusations made in parliament by Mr Winston
Peters, a dissident government backbencher. Mr Peters and a dismissed BNZ
executive claimed Fay, Richwhite had used undue influence in getting a loan
to refinance its Auckland headquarters building, and it was in excess of the
BNZ's normal loan to value ratio.
Mr Larry Johnson, the BNZ executive, also claimed in an affidavit in
parliament he had been intimidated into approving the loan by Sir Michael
Fay, who was both a director of the BNZ, and joint managing director of Fay,
Richwhite.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Nippon Housing Loan tumbles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NIPPON Housing Loan, Japan's largest housing loan company which is being
restructured due to mounting problem loans, yesterday posted pre-tax losses
and a sharp fall in turnover for the first half to September, writes Emiko
Terazono.
It plunged into taxable losses of Y21bn (Dollars 169m) from profits of
Y1.1bn a year earlier. Turnover fell by 31.8 per cent to Y73.2bn. At the net
level Nippon Housing Loan had losses of Y29.4bn against profits of Y738m.
Non-performing loans were rising due to the property slump. Unrealised
losses on securities were Y27.7bn, while the outstanding balance of loans at
end-September fell to Y2,239.8bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Skoda completes external
refinancing for expansion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SKODA Automobilova, the Czech car maker in which Volkswagen is building a 70
per cent stake, has just completed the first significant external financing
of its revised 10-year, DM7bn (Dollars 4.6bn) expansion and modernisation
programme.
The DM1.4bn financing has been structured by the International Finance
Corporation (IFC), the private investment arm of the World Bank, with a
group of four commercial banks and the European Bank for Reconstruction and
Development (EBRD).
The IFC is responsible for raising DM600m of which it will retain DM200m,
with the rest going to commercial banks under the IFC umbrella. The four
lead banks, Dresdner, Deutsche Bank, J. P. Morgan and Credit Suisse First
Boston, are syndicating a further DM400m parallel loan. The EBRD is expected
to provide DM200m and syndicate DM200m to commercial banks, although the
EBRD board has not yet approved the operation.
Spreads on the current six to 12-year financing operation are said to be the
finest for a central European borrower and below the 2.5 per cent over Libor
at which Hungary has been able to borrow on international capital markets in
recent months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Drop of 3% at Daiwa House
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAIWA House Industry, a leading Japanese housing company, yesterday reported
a drop in interim pre-tax profits due to a fall in financial revenues
countering a rise in sales.
For the first six months to September, Daiwa House posted a 3 per cent fall
in non-consolidated taxable profits to Y43.8bn (Dollars 353m), on a 7.9 per
cent rise in sales to Y464.6bn. Net profits edged ahead by 0.9 per cent to
Y22.2bn.
Slack housing sales were offset by improved housing rentals.
However, the company blamed the fall in profits on a Y5.7bn decline in
interest income. Orders of its housing construction division rose 1.4 per
cent, while building redevelopments fell 20.9 per cent.
For the 12 months to March, Daiwa House expects pre-tax profits to fall 0.6
per cent to Y90bn on a 6.5 per cent rise in sales to Y940bn.
Hazama, a leading Japanese engineering and construction company, reported a
sharp fall in first-half earnings due to sluggish private-sector orders.
Non-consolidated interim pre-tax profits plunged 41.1 per cent to Y8.65bn on
a 7.8 per cent fall in sales to Y277.8bn. Net profits slid 44.2 per cent to
Y3.3bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Nomura Securities to close three
offices in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NOMURA Securities, Japan's largest securities brokerage, yesterday announced
the closure of three of its European offices to reduce costs, amid the slump
in the domestic stock market and the fall in underwriting business in
Europe.
In the latest move to reorganise its operations overseas, Nomura will close
its Munich and Basle branches at the end of this month, and its Stockholm
representative office on December 11. The closures follow last month's cut
of 50 staff in London.
The operations of the Stockholm office will be taken on in London. The four
local employees are to be made redundant. Staff at Nomura's Munich and Basle
offices have been offered jobs at its Frankfurt and Zurich subsidiar-ies.
Last month, Yamaichi Securities closed its branch in Melbourne.
Japanese brokerages have been forced to concentrate on strengthening
domestic operations at a time when the Tokyo stock market has failed to
recover.
While the Nikkei stock average rose from a six-year low of 14,309 in
mid-August, after the Japanese government's announcement of an emergency
economic package, the index has since lost half of these gains on worries
over corporate earnings and the country's political turmoil.
Japanese brokerages crowded into the European markets during the height of
the Tokyo stock market in the 1980s, when Japanese companies rushed to raise
equity-linked funds. However, the slump in the home market has depressed
overseas equity-linked financing.
Nomura said that since current overseas operations were built to satisfy
clients' needs at the peak of the Tokyo stock market, the stream-lining of
operations was inevitable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Barlow Rand hit by falling
economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SHARP deterioration in the South African economy during the second half of
the year restricted earnings growth at Barlow Rand, the country's largest
industrial company, to only 2 per cent in the year to September.
Turnover rose by 10 per cent to R35.2bn (Dollars 11.78bn) from R32bn the
year before, but the difficult trading conditions meant operating profits
before interest advanced by only 5 per cent to R2.7bn from R2.6bn.
Mr Warren Clewlow, chairman, described the year as 'difficult and
challenging,' borne out by recent figures showing that the country's real
gross domestic product fell at an annualised rate of 5.7 per cent during the
September quarter. Barlows' annual turnover is equivalent to about 10 per
cent of South African GDP.
The sharp slowdown during the second half is evident in that earnings per
share were 11 per cent up at the halfway mark, compared with 2 per cent for
the year. The directors predicted in May that growth would slow during the
second half.
Looking at the group's divisional performance, the best performance came
from food and pharmaceuticals despite the impact of the recession on
consumer spending. Static volumes were offset by higher efficiencies and
productivity gains.
Mr Clewlow described business activity as 'severely depressed' in many of
the sectors in the industry division, causing earnings to fall. Reunert
performed strongly, and profits from information technology were up, but
most of the wholly owned subsidiaries recorded lower profits.
On the mineral resources side, earnings from continuing operations fell by 4
per cent - although Rand Mines' performance was not strictly comparable with
1991 - while Pretoria Portland Cement managed a marginal increase in
earnings.
Packaging subsidiary Nampak, the largest packaging company in the country,
lifted pre-tax profits. Textiles group Romatex recovered from a poor 1991 to
lift profits sharply.
J. Bibby, the international arm of the group, produced 'satisfactory'
results, a feature being the acquisition of the Caterpillar dealerships in
Spain and Portugal.
Taking into account the larger number of shares in issue following the issue
of a scrip dividend in 1991, earnings per share rose by 2 per cent to 438
cents from 431 cents.
The dividend for the year is being raised by 2 per cent to 173 cents a share
from 170 cents.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Nippon Housing Loan plunges to
Y21bn loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NIPPON Housing Loan, Japan's largest housing loan company which is being
restructured due to mounting problem loans, yesterday posted pre-tax losses
and a sharp fall in turnover for the first half to September.
The company plunged into taxable losses of Y21bn (Dollars 169m) from profits
of Y1.1bn a year earlier. Turnover fell by 31.8 per cent to Y73.2bn. At the
net level Nippon Housing Loan reported losses of Y29.4bn compared with
profits of Y738m.
The company said non-performing loans were increasing due to the property
slump. Unrealised losses on securities were Y27.7bn, while the outstanding
balance of loans at the end of September fell 3.3 per cent to Y2,239.8bn.
Nippon Housing Loan is passing its interim dividend compared with Y3 a share
last time, and has refrained from making an earnings projection for the full
year to March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Nedcor advances 19% to R408m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEDCOR, South Africa's fourth largest bank, performed in line with its main
competitors, but slightly better than market expectations, to record a 19
per cent increase in net profits to R408m (Dollars 136.88m) for the 12
months to September from R344m the year before.
The country's banking sector has been the one whose profits have withstood
the severe recession. Nedcor is no exception, profiting from wider interest
margins as the cost of money has fallen quicker than lending rates.
Mr Chris Liebenberg, chief executive, said all parts of the bank had
performed soundly. The wider margins and an increase in lending volumes,
helped net interest income rise 19 per cent to R1.6bn.
Other income rose by 17 per cent, to R1.06bn from R904m, leaving total
income 18 per cent up at R2.7bn from R2.3bn.
Where the bank did feel the downswing was in the need to increase the
provisions for bad debts, particularly in the case of clients holding
properties in areas vulnerable to unrest. These rose by 2 per cent to R238m
from R233m.
Costs rose by 17 per cent, a figure which compares favourably with Nedcor's
opposition, but a rise in the tax charge meant the increase in net profits
was restricted to 19 per cent - up to R408m from R344m.
A divisional breakdown of net income shows that R317m came from Nedcor bank,
17 per cent up on 1991. Finansbank and Cape of Good Hope Bank contributed
R22m, Syfrets Group R22m and UAL Merchant Bank R47m - increases respectively
of 57 per cent, 10 per cent and 21 per cent over 1991.
Total assets grew by 14 per cent to R47.3bn from R41.6bn - in line with
inflation - while advances increased by 12 per cent to R34.7bn from R30.
The dividend is being lifted by 16 per cent to 66 cents a share from 57
cents on a similar increase in earnings to 215 cents a share from 185 cents.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Toys 'R' Us up 15% in
third-quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOYS 'R' Us, the large US-based speciality retailer, reported a 15 per cent
improvement in third-quarter profits, to Dollars 57.9m.
The advance came on sales up from Dollars 1.18bn to Dollars 1.34bn, and
translated into earnings per share of 12 cents, compared with 11 cents in
the same period of 1991.
The retailer, which plans to have 540 toy stores operating in the US by
year-end and another 167 overseas, said that comparable store sales only
increased 'marginally' in the quarter, although on a nine-month basis they
were up by 3.6 per cent.
The group said it planned to add another 90-95 new stores next year, both in
the US and overseas - including the first outlets in the Netherlands,
Belgium, Portugal and Switzerland.
Toys 'R' Us has now reported after-tax profits of Dollars 97.8m for the
first nine months of the year, compared with Dollars 77.9m a year earlier.
Sales in this period advanced from Dollars 3.26bn to Dollars 3.77bn.
Tiffany, the upmarket jeweller, reported after-tax profits of just Dollars
56,000 for the three months to end-October, compared with Dollars 8.06m in
the same period of 1991. Sales slipped from Dollars 126.4m to Dollars
106.9m.
The US retailer , however, blamed reduced shipments to the Mitsukoshi
department stores in Japan. These act as Tiffany's principal distributor in
the Japanese market, and the cut in shipments was designed to allow the
Japanese to adjust stock levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Avon outlines restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AVON Products, one of the world's biggest manufacturers of cosmetics and
toiletries, yesterday said it was restructuring its marketing and product
management operations and creating an office of the chairman.
Costs associated with the realignment, which will be completed early next
year, were included in a Dollars 64.4m charge taken in April.
Avon will phase out its three international region headquarters, creating
nine streamlined units covering sales, marketing and distribution operations
around the world.
These new units will report directly to the office of the chairman, which
will set growth initiatives, integrate global strategies and allocate
resources to Avon's businesses around the world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Capital adequacy plan under fire
in Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMAN banks will suffer serious competitive disadvantages at home and
abroad if the government goes ahead with plans to introduce tough new
capital adequacy requirements, according to the chairman of the
Bundesverband deutscher Banken, the influential Federal Association of
German Banks.
Mr Eberhard Martini, chief executive of the Bayerische Hypotheken-und
Wechsel Bank, yesterday criticised the Bundesbank and the Berlin-based
supervisory authorities for pushing the government into promoting measures
which he claimed would damage banks' commercial interests and curb their
ability to lend, especially to finance eastern German reconstruction.
The government is committed to introducing legislation to implement two
European Committee capital adequacy directives by the beginning of next
year. The finance committee of the Bundestag, the lower house of the German
parliament, met last week and is meeting again next week to debate how the
law should be implemented in detail.
At issue is the treatment of the banks' hidden reserves, which consist of
extensive portfolios of property and securities, and participation in
industrial companies. The EC directives envisaged allowing these reserves to
count fully towards Tier 2 capital, but the draft law being debated by the
finance committee imposes stiff restrictions on their use.
Under the draft law, German banks would have to have Tier 1capital (equity
and retained earnings) of 5 per cent before being able to count reserves
towards the total 8 per cent capital requirement. Even then, the reserves
would be limited to the book value of the investment and would only be able
to count for 1 per cent of capital. The banks want the directives to be
adopted without change: this envisages a requirement of 4 per cent Tier 1
capital and 4 per cent Tier 2.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Record take-up for GM card
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A CREDIT card launched by General Motors in September has won more than 2m
accounts and accumulated more than Dollars 500m in balances in less than 60
days, making it the most successful US credit card introduction ever.
The card is a general-purpose MasterCard, with no annual fee, which allows
holders to save up to Dollars 3,500 or more on the purchase of a new GM
vehicle.
The build-up in accounts has been even faster than that of American
Telephone &amp; Telegraph's Universal card, which had one million accounts 78
days after its launch in 1990 and is now the fifth-largest credit card in
the nation, ranked by accounts.
GM said it reached the 1m milestone after just 28 days.
Mr Kurt Peters, publisher of Credit Card News, a Chicago-based newsletter,
said the GM achievement was 'quite remarkable'.
The card would already rank as the 20th largest in the US, by number of
accounts, if placed in the 1991 rankings compiled by the newsletter.
Credit cards, offering fat profit margins because of the high interest they
charge on rolled-over debt, have become an area of increasingly intense
competition between traditional US bank issuers and new entrants such as GM
and AT&amp;T, luring consumers with rebates on goods and services.
Mr Peters said GM had not introduced a new element to the battle but had
intensified the existing competition. 'This turns up the heat on the whole
industry,' he added.
GM's main purpose in launching the card has been to secure customer loyalty
for its vehicles and sell more of them.
The group has seen its car market share plunge from some 46 per cent at the
start of the 1980s to around 35 per cent now.
However, the credit card business is also meant to operate profitably once
launch costs are out of the way.
The card's success stems in part from GM's immense marketing muscle as
America's leading vendor of vehicles. It opened the campaign with a network
television advertising campaign and direct mailings to more than 30m homes.
It has been encouraging consumers to abandon their existing credit cards by
moving debt from those accounts to the GM card to earn more vehicle rebate
money.
The company said some 10 per cent of the 2m accounts had involved this
balance consolidation feature, with an average transfer of some Dollars
2,000.
Mr Peters noted that leading bank credit card issuers had been saying they
were not losing a lot of customers to GM, which suggested that the company's
account holders were simply carrying additional cards in their wallets.
However, Mr Ronald Zebeck, managing director of GM's credit card operations,
said consumers were using the GM card 12 times a month, compared with an
industry average of 3.5 times monthly, and the average purchase was Dollars
112, compared to an industry average of Dollars 58.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Antonini puts his faith in the
'big boxes' - The K mart head sees discount emporia as the key to US
retailing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOE Antonini, head of the K mart retail group, stands in the stockroom of
a former Bloomingdale's in Queens, New York City, and talks about turning
department stores into discount emporia. 'The big box,' declares Mr
Antonini, 'is what K mart is about today.'
A few feet behind the chairman - sometimes tagged 'the Lee Iaccoca of
retailing' because of his willingness to promote the company personally  -
is a large poster. 'Dollars 50bn by 1995; Dollars 100bn by 2000', it reads,
a declaration of group sales targets.
In recent years, K mart, though still the number two US retailer in terms of
sales, has played second fiddle to Wal-Mart Stores. The Arkansas-based
discount chain operator has overtaken K mart in turnover terms. More
significantly, Wal-Mart's low cost base and extraordinary sales momentum
have prompted a major shift in US retailing.
K mart may have been overshadowed by its rival, but the Michigan company is
fighting to regain some initiative. For example, the 'big box', which Mr
Antonini stresses, unashamedly matches the direction which Wal-Mart has been
taking, and both are experimenting with large 'combo' stores, where food
items sit alongside general merchandise.
The clearly-posted sales targets are also aimed at keeping K mart in the
Wal-Mart league. Analysts suggest the Arkansas group could see sales of
Dollars 100bn by 1995, after having recorded Dollars 44bn in 1991, although
executives are more cautious. K mart's turnover last year was Dollars 35bn.
Even the opening of K mart's first New York City store - a 132,000sq ft
refurbishment, carved out of the former Bloomingdale's outlet - smacks of an
attempt to steal a march on its competitor.
Wal-Mart has yet to venture into New York City, traditionally viewed as a
high-cost 'union' town, or even into the heavily-populated tri-state region.
K mart, by contrast, is not only opening the Queens store, but makes clear
others will follow. 'We hope to open several more (stores) within the five
boroughs during the next few years,' Mr Antonini says.
But analysts are divided over whether all this marks a K mart renaissance.
The company's problems have been evident since the mid-1980s. Having grown
rapidly in the 1970s, K mart found itself with a large number of smaller
stores, a dowdy image, and decelerating sales growth.
A trend towards 'niche' retailing was underway in the US, and K mart focused
on acquiring specialist chains, such as Pay Less Drugs in 1985 and
Waldenbooks in 1984. Internal efficiencies of the core discount chain
operation seem to have been overlooked. In 1985, the year before Mr Antonini
took over as chief operating officer, net profits fell 6 per cent to Dollars
471m.
Since then, there has been a stream of initiatives designed to help K mart
regain its edge. As Mr Antonini sees it, the strategy has three elements.
First, K mart is engaged in a major overhaul of the 2,400 discount store
outlets, with improvements ranging from a widening of aisles to the addition
of gardening and pharmacy centres.
This programme - costing around Dollars 3bn - was announced in 1990. By the
end of this year, about half the chain should be operating under the new
format. The programme should be completed by 1995.
More recently, however, the future of the discount store division has been
bound up with the 'combo' store developments. Initially, K mart developed
these emporia - at around 140,000 to 160,000 sq ft, twice the size of a
typical K mart - in conjunction with a joint-venture partner, under the
'American Fare' fascia. But recently, it has stepped out on its own,
converting two of the three American Fare stores to 'Super K marts' and
adding two more 'combo' stores in Ohio. The remaining American Fare outlet
in Atlanta is due to convert by the year-end.
Mr Antonini talks of adding another 15 combo-stores in 1993 and, if all goes
well, a stepped-up rate thereafter. The ultimate potential, he says, is for
400-500 of these outlets within the group.
K mart's second leg - the specialty store division - is a mixed bag, ranging
from the Pace warehouse clubs to OfficeMax, a chain of superstores
specialising in office equipment, furniture and computers. Mr Antonini sees
potential for strong sales growth in this division, and forecast 1992 sales
of Dollars 11bn could rise to Dollars 25bn by 1996.
Finally, K mart is looking overseas - a strategy which differentiates it
from its US competitors apart from, perhaps, Wal-Mart - and made its first
move by purchasing a dozen retail outlets in Czechoslovakia earlier this
year.
So what does the new strategy add up to? Some of the recent moves cannot be
judged at this early stage. A more fundamental question is whether
refurbishing K mart outlets is paying off.
So far this year, K mart's same-store sales growth in the general
merchandise division has been uninspiring, running at 2.1 per cent (for US
stores) in the 39 weeks to end-October. K mart claims an incremental 3-4 per
cent increase in sales from refurbished stores, but stresses this is an
average.
One problem is that the cost base remains substantially higher than at
Wal-Mart. For example, operating, selling, general and administrative (SG&amp;A)
expenses accounted for 15.2 per cent of Wal-Mart sales in the 12 months to
end-January; at K mart, the figure was 21.2 per cent. Again, these ratios
are 'group-wide' and to some extent reflect the two groups' different type
of stores. Growth of the low-cost Pace warehouse club chain may help reduce
K mart's SG&amp;A over time.
Earnings growth, meanwhile, has been patchy as restructuring charges and the
general reshaping of the group has taken a toll.
In the year to end-January 1992, earnings per share stood at Dollars 2.02,
only marginally above 1988's Dollars 2. Supporters argue that the best is to
come - and earnings predictions for the current 12 months range around the
Dollars 2.15 mark. But everything, it seems, has yet to be proved.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Pacific Dunlop chief optimistic
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MELBOURNE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PACIFIC Dunlop, the diversified Australian industrial company, yesterday
reported first-quarter sales and profits well ahead of last year's and
forecast improved earnings for the current 12 months, Reuter reports from
Melbourne. Mr John Gough, chairman, told the company's annual meeting the
group would do better than others in tough conditions. Pacific Dunlop does
not publish quarterly figures, but in the year to June reported net profits
of ADollars 215.80m (USDollars 149.86m) down from ADollars 337.50m a year
earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: K mart reports 11% increase in
third quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
K MART, the large US discount retailer, yesterday reported an 11.1 per cent
increase in after-tax profits in the 13 weeks to October 30, to Dollars
122m. Sales were up from Dollars 7.97bn to Dollars 8.84bn, with the advance
in 'same-store' sales for the quarter running at 2.9 per cent.
Because of an equity-related stock offering in August 1991, however,
earnings per share advanced by a more modest 8 per cent, to 27 cents.
Within the group overall, K mart said core general merchandise outlets
recorded sales of Dollars 6.07bn, up from Dollars 5.8bn in the same period
of 1991, with same-store sales rising by 2.1 per cent.
On the specialty retail side, sales rose from Dollars 2.16bn to Dollars
2.77bn, with same-store results up by 5 per cent. Operating profits from the
general merchandise division totalled Dollars 260m (Dollars 216m), while the
specialty chains produced Dollars 32m (Dollars 41m) - a drop partially
explained by a Dollars 4m loss at the Pace warehouse club chain, compared
with a Dollars 7m profit last time.
Mr Joseph Antonini, chairman, said yesterday that 'the tone of the business
improved materially in the third quarter', and noted there had been less
disruption to business due to the store renewal programme. He said the
company was pleased with the 'progress made by the specialty retail group,
especially considering the large store opening programme'. He suggested that
the Pace results had been affected by a rapid expansion programme.
The group has made after-tax profits of Dollars 406m in the first nine
months, compared with Dollars 380m in the same period of 1991, with sales
reaching Dollars 26.2bn (Dollars 24bn).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Caisse des Depots head resigns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Robert Lion yesterday resigned as chairman of the Caisse des Depots et
Consignations, the state-controlled bank which is France's largest and
probably most powerful investment institution.
The French cabinet will decide upon the successor to Mr Lion, 58, a close
associate of President Francois Mitterrand, at a forthcoming meeting. Mr
Jean-Claude Trichet, head of the French Treasury, and Mr Philippe Lagayette,
deputy governor of the Bank of France, have been mooted as likely
candidates.
Mr Lion, a controversial figure in the French financial sector, announced
his resignation yesterday at an executive committee meeting. However, he
told President Mitterrand last June of his plans to leave.
The chairmanship of the Caisse is one of the most sought-after posts in
French finance. The incumbent controls a formidable institution and is
virtually unassailable given that the position runs for an indeterminate
period.
Until his arrival the Caisse, which manages the state savings system and had
funds of FFr1,560bn (Dollars 289.42bn) last year, had a relatively low
profile.
Mr Lion has pursued a more dynamic policy of private sector investment. He
hit the headlines in 1988 with his bid for Societe Generale, the recently
privatised bank. The bid flopped, thereby unleashing a storm of criticism
from Mr Lion's detractors and renewed calls to reduce the Caisse's power by
separating its savings activities from its private sector role.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Tyre group is down but not out -
Haig Simonian looks at the mood of the new management at Pirelli
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Marco Tronchetti Provera. executive vice-chairman of Pirelli, has had a
turbulent first 12 months in office.
He has had to grapple with the continuing problems of oversupply and severe
price competition in the world tyres business, an international downturn in
cables as well as the legacy of Pirelli's failure to acquire Continental,
its big German tyres rival.
Twelve months after the failed bid, Pirelli is down, but not out. Apart from
its direct 5 per cent stake in Continental, it has negotiated options on a
further 35 per cent and used its weight to stop Continental from pushing
through a capital increase earlier this year.
Although Mr Tronchetti Provera does not see the Continental shares as
strategic, Pirelli is still at loggerheads with the company and especially
its main shareholder, Deutsche Bank, on how to dispose of them.
Those differences led to an angry clash between Mr Tronchetti Provera and Mr
Ulrich Weiss, the Deutsche Bank board member who also chairs Continental's
supervisory board, earlier this year.
The truth behind the aborted takeover may never be known, though some
bankers believe Deutsche Bank's role was much more active than later
admitted. Whatever the circumstances, Pirelli's stake in Continental remains
the biggest barrier to any future co-operation between the two companies.
Some industry analysts believe a closer link between Continental and Pirelli
 -the world's fifth and sixth biggest tyre makers respectively  - is
essential in the long term to compete against the domination of Michelin,
the market leader.
'Remove the shares, and all sorts of situations are possible,' said Mr
Tronchetti Provera, whose family owns more of Pirelli than the Pirellis. But
contrary to occasional rumours, he denies that any talks on possible
co-operation have taken place.
'We haven't been in touch with Continental's management to discuss any
projects in the past few months. No one has made any proposals.'
In spite of the stalemate, there is much greater confidence at Pirelli
compared with last year's dejection. 'At the end of last year we were
clearly the losers, today we are a player,' he says.
The claim is based on the share options, valid until the end of 1993 and
renewable on a further payment for three more years. Yet the Italians have
so far failed definitively to overturn the 5 per cent voting right
restriction on Pirelli's stake in Continental.
Both sides are embroiled in complex legal action to support their positions.
However, Mr Tronchetti Provera does not think the courts will ever have the
last word.
'I don't think the difficulties between us will be solved through the
courts. Both sides use the law to strengthen their positions. But courts are
used as bargaining tools, not as forums, to resolve such disputes.'
Mr Tronchetti Provera has called the Continental stake financial, meaning
they are for sale at the right price. Pirelli and its allies bought the
shares for about DM300, (Dollars 187.5) a far cry from the depressed levels
of today with Continental shares languishing at little more than DM200.
Mr Tronchetti Provera chooses his words carefully when broaching the role of
German institutions in the abortive takeover. Though reportedly opposed to
the bid, he does not criticise the initiative.
'But Pirelli's mistake was not to drop it when German institutions decided
no longer to support us. We should have sold the shares and walked away,' he
says.
Yet he clearly thinks negotiations with the Germans - and Deutsche Bank in
particular - are the only way forward. 'The current situation is damaging to
both sides. That's why I believe it will be settled in the end,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Philip Morris acquires Nabisco
cereal operation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KRAFT General Foods, the core US food division of Philip Morris, has stepped
in as the purchaser of RJR Nabisco's cold cereal business, which takes in
the Shredded Wheat and Shreddies brand names.
The large tobacco and food group has agreed to pay Dollars 450m in cash for
the business, together with certain international trademarks. The previous
potential buyer of the cereal operations, General Mills, had agreed the same
price.
The manufacturing facilities to be acquired will include plants in
Naperville, Illinois, and Niagara Falls, Ontario, although Nabisco will keep
a plant in Niagara Falls, New York, to manufacture snack crackers.
Commenting on the purchase, which is still subject to regulatory review in
the US and Canada, Philip Morris said that it intended to incorporate the
Nabisco cereal lines into its existing line of breakfast cereals, and would
market both through the Kraft sales and distribution networks.
Mr Richard Mayers, head of Kraft General Foods, claimed that the
ready-to-eat cereal category offered 'great potential for expanded growth
and operating income'.
Philip Morris's existing cereal lines include Honey Bunches, Grape-Nuts,
Pebbles and Marshmallow Alpha-Bits. According to the tobacco and food group,
its cereal lines have about 11.5 per cent of the US cold cereals market
while the Nabisco products are estimated to have about 3 per cent - a figure
which has declined from over 5 per cent in four years.
Nabisco had planned to sell the cold cereals business to General Mills, a
much larger player in the cereals market and a competitor to Kellogg, which
remains the industry leader. This deal was announced in early-September.
However, the two parties aborted the transaction in early November, when it
became clear that a 'lengthy and prolonged review' by federal anti-trust
authorities was likely.
Speculation that another buyer would be sought immediately surfaced - with
Philip Morris touted as one of the favourite replacement buyers. Yesterday,
the tobacco company's shares were down Dollars  3/8 at Dollars 79 3/8 .
Although yesterday's deal between Philip Morris and Nabisco is subject to
regulatory review, is seems less likely to provoke problems on this score.
The combined shares of the US market, would be under 15 per cent, on Philip
Morris's figures. There are two significantly larger players in the sector -
namely Kellogg and General Mills.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Paribas sees loss in cement deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PARIBAS, one of France's high prestige banks, will suffer a FFr600m (Dollars
115.3m) loss of profits this year because of its involvement with Ciments
Francais, the French cement company scarred by a scandal over its
off-balance sheet losses.
Ciments Francais, in which Paribas earlier this year agreed to sell a
controlling stake to Italcementi of Italy, has been clouded by controversy
since the discovery last month of off-balance sheet dealings of FFr1.05bn.
The company recently confirmed the dealings had cost it FFr655m in
exceptional losses during the first half of this year. This meant Paribas
faced a reduction in its capital gains on the sale of its shares to
Italcementi, and a fall in its share of Ciments Francais's estimated first
half profits.
Analysts anticipate net profits of less than FFr1.5bn from Paribas this
year, against a loss of FFr184m in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / International Company News: Boardroom shake-up at Spanish
retail bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM BURNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANESTO, the big retail bank which owns large share stakes in a number of
Spanish companies, replaced its chief executive yesterday following poor
results in the group's parent bank.
Mr Enrique Lasarte, chairman of Banco de Vitoria, a Banesto subsidiary and
an associate of Mr Mario Conde, Banesto chairman, was appointed Banesto's
chief executive in place of Mr Juan Belloso.
The boardroom shake-up is being interpreted among the Madrid business
community as confirmation that Banesto is encountering trading problems as
the Spanish economy moves into recession.
Mr Lasarte's appointment comes in the wake of losses of Pta25m (Dollars
248,828) for Banesto during the third quarter of 1992 with the bank
increasing provisions from Pta8.6bn to Pta16.4bn. Most of Banesto's rivals
maintained their earnings over the first nine months of 1992.
Banesto appears to be suffering from its aggressive consumer credit policy
of recent years. An additional drain on liquidity stems from Banesto's links
with Corporacion Banesto, the industrial holding, which groups the bank's
corporate interests.
In the past, Banesto has been able to sell industrial interests, such as
Petromed, the oil company which was acquired by British Petroleum last year,
and thus increase revenue with extraordinary income.
At least two of the Banesto-controlled companies on the Corporacion are
currently up for sale - Acerinox, the steel producer and Agroman, the
construction company - but a depressed market and the high price that
Banesto has placed on them is impeding their disposal.
Mr Juan Belloso is a member of the ruling socialist party who was formerly
one of the senior industrial troubleshooters in state-owned enterprises.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Allied-Lyons sells Muswell's chain
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Allied-Lyons is to sell its chain of Muswell's continental style cafe-bars
to Priorywood Holdings. Terms of the deal were not disclosed.
A total of 28 Muswell sites will be sold. Allied will retain eight outlets
and convert them to other brands.
Mr Tony Trigg, chief executive of Allied-Lyons Retailing, said that the
company had decided after a strategic review to focus resources on two core
areas: pubs and mainstream branded restaurants.
Mr Bob Sneesby, chairman of Priorywood, which operates a chain of
restaurants, said that Muswell's was 'a very good fit with our outlets and
trading activity'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Write-off ups loss at CH Bailey
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Losses at CH Bailey, the engineering, ship repairing and leisure group,
increased from Pounds 664,081 to Pounds 1.09m pre-tax over the 12 months to
March 27.
The figure was struck after a write-off of Pounds 639,191 in respect of the
group's investment in Clarke Foods, the ice-cream maker which called in
administrative receivers in October.
Turnover amounted to Pounds 3.54m, down from Pounds 5m. Losses per share
were 1.8p (1.1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Towles cuts interim loss to Pounds 537,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Towles, the Loughborough-based textile company, reported lower pre-tax
losses of Pounds 537,000 for the six months to August 31, compared with
Pounds 644,000. Turnover increased from Pounds 5.75m to Pounds 6.49m.
After a tax credit of Pounds 177,000 (Pounds 212,000) losses per share were
15p (18p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Oglesby &amp; Butler falls to IPounds 74,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Oglesby &amp; Butler Group, the Irish-based electrical and electronic power tool
company, reported profits of IPounds 74,000 (Pounds 81,100) before tax for
the six months to September 30.
The decline from last time's IPounds 164,000 came on turnover of IPounds
1.51m (IPounds 1.82m). Earnings per share worked through at 0.61p, down from
1.33p last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Nesco advances 60% to Pounds 222,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nesco Investments, the computer software group which also generates and
supplies electricity in Nigeria, reported a 60 per cent increase, from
Pounds 138,889 to Pounds 222,313, in pre-tax profits for the year to June
30.
Directors said DCS, the computer services operation, produced its best ever
result with operating profits before exceptional items and interest
improving by 23 per cent.
Total sales were down from Pounds 5.65m to Pounds 5.31m, reflecting the
weakness of the naira.
Earnings per share amounted to 2.97p against 0.83p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Platignum up 71% at Pounds 329,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Platignum, the manufacturer of writing instruments, stationery, furniture
and housewares, took an upward turn in the half year to September 30 with
pre-tax profits advancing 71 per cent from Pounds 192,000 to Pounds 329,000.
Turnover fell from Pounds 8.89m to Pounds 8.14m.
Mr Simon Knott, chairman, said that both stationery and housewares were
performing well in difficult markets.
An extraordinary charge of Pounds 260,000 related to the disposal in June of
Cousins and Matthews, the Elm Furniture subsidiary. Problems at Younger
Furniture, which has incurred losses, continued to be 'addressed'.
Earnings improved from 0.9p, adjusted for the 1-for-10 share consolidation
which took place as part of the capital reorganisation in May, to 1.3p. As
forecast with the open offer and placing in March, there is a return to the
dividend list with an interim of 0.25p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Black Arrow trebles
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BLACK ARROW Group, the office furniture and leasing finance group, saw
pre-tax profits treble in the half year to September 30.
However, the company warned that the outlook for the rest of the year was
bleak.
On turnover up 41 per cent at Pounds 11.7m (Pounds 8.35m) profits rose from
Pounds 538,000 to Pounds 1.55m. including a Pounds 668,000 contribution from
a property disposal.
But Mr Arnold Edward, chairman, said trading conditions had deteriorated in
recent months and were not expected to improve for some time.
The interim dividend, doubled at 1p, 'but does not necessarily imply an
increase in the final dividend', he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Construction slump leaves Vibroplant 24%
behind
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VIBROPLANT, the plant hire group with operations in both the UK and US,
yesterday blamed the slump and price cutting in the UK construction industry
for a sharp decline in interim pre-tax profits.
Mr Jeremy Pilkington, chairman, said that output in most UK construction
sectors is still in decline, and warned that commercial and industrial
construction is unlikely to recover before 1994 'at the earliest.'
As a result second-half profits are expected to be lower than those in the
first half.
Although US profits were maintained in the latest period, the reduced UK
contribution resulted in a 24 per cent decline in group pre-tax profits
which fell to Pounds 2.03m in the six months ending September 30, down from
Pounds 2.68m.
A further deterioration in construction activity levels in both the UK and
the US during the first half, resulted in an 11.4 per cent drop in turnover
to Pounds 36.2m (Pounds 40.9m).
Earnings per share fell to 2.93p (4.05p) but the interim is maintained at
1.22p although the dividend policy will be kept under review.
In the UK, pre-tax profits fell by 34 per cent to Pounds 1.22m on revenues
which were broadly maintained at Pounds 18.7m (Pounds 19.3m) including a
first-time revenue contribution of Pounds 1.1m from Alphabet Event Hire
which was acquired in February.
The underlying decline in plant hire revenues reflected a further
deterioration in hire rates and the group's 'reluctance to engage in highly
marginal business at some of the prices prevailing in the marketplace.'
Revenues from the group's US businesses dropped by 19 per cent to Pounds
17.5m (Pounds 21.5m) because of a reduction in machine sales and the sale in
March of the loss-making Baltimore business.
Rental revenues from continuing businesses increased by 3 per cent and,
helped by cost reduction measures and lower financing costs, pre-tax profits
from the US operations were flat at Pounds 810,000 (Pounds 821,000).
Strong positive cash flow enabled the group to invest about Pounds 3m during
the first half, and to continue its objective of reducing borrowings.
At the end of September group debt stood at Pounds 32m, representing about
60 per cent of shareholders' funds, down from Pounds 37m, representing
gearing of 70 per cent, at the end of March.
A further reduction in borrowings is expected in the second half with
year-end gearing falling to about 50 per cent.
Looking ahead Mr Pilkington noted that the prospects for US economic
recovery have suffered 'several false dawns' but added 'we would expect the
recovery to start earlier in the US, and proceed more rapidly than in the
UK.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Graphs as the new corporate sleight of hand
 -Andrew Jack examines how companies are using a variety of means to enhance
their performances
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A PICTURE may be worth a thousand words, but a graph can severely distort a
company's true financial performance, according to an academic study
released yesterday.
Nearly four fifths of leading quoted British companies use graphs to
illustrate their annual reports, but almost one third portray the
performance more favourably than the underlying numbers should permit.
Companies with good performance are more likely to use graphs than those
with poor or worsening performance, said Vivien Beattie from the University
of Southampton and Michael John Jones from the University of Wales.
Their analysis - sponsored and published by the Chartered Association of
Certified Accountants - is based on an analysis of the 1989 annual reports
of 240 companies.
'Many graphs were not presented in a neutral, unbiased way,' say the two
authors. 'In particular, there was evidence of selectivity, measurement
distortion and presentational enhancement.' They warn that an unfaithful,
biased presentation of graphs may undermine the reliability of financial
statements.
Among the 21 detailed examples, the authors cite YJ Lovell Holdings. The
company's graphs have columns of inconsistent width and variable spaces
between them, which distort the figures.
The graphs slope to the right, drawing the eye upwards to suggest continual
growth.
Lovell uses a different colour and puts in bold the figure above the graph
line for the most recent year. There is no clear indication of where the
baseline sits.
Scottish Metropolitan Property creates an eye-catching graphic, but has no
axes, and displays inconsistencies in the width of the lines and the spaces
between them.
The position of the baseline is also unclear. The use of darker colours
draws the eye upwards and to the right.
Graphs were used by 79 per cent of the companies sampled - an even higher
proportion for those employing graphic designers to help produce their
reports.
Two thirds of these companies used graphs to highlight at least one of four
key financial variables: turnover, pre-tax profits, earnings and dividend
per share.
Some 30 per cent of the graphs showed 'material measurement distortion'  -
where the physical measurements on the graph are not proportional to the
numeric values being represented - which was greater than 5 per cent.
The main devices the authors say the companies used to manipulate figures to
create the impression of strong performance include:
distortion: variations in the width, volume and space between graph lines;
use of symbols (such as a company product) in place of a line which distorts
as it grows in size.
scale: non-zero or broken axes; truncation of a negative axis; use of a
non-arithmetic scale; the absence of any scale at all.
typeface: non-horizontal.
cross-hatching: giving the impression of movement and the illusion of tilt.
colour: different colours including more powerful ones for different years.
shadows/shade behind graph lines: to draw the eye upwards, sometimes
darkening higher up the graph.
sloping: upwards and to the right of words, graphs and arrows to draw the
eye upwards.
emphasising top of the graph: drawing the eye.
combinations of graphs: not aligning graphs, making comparisons difficult;
encouraging comparisons where they are false because scales are different.
Thorn EMI uses the performance over four years of three financial variables,
combined with a graph for a single year showing the contribution to turnover
from four divisions.
Vivien Beattie said: 'A lot is left in the hands of graphic designers who
while trying to do a good job for their client perhaps end up doing the
wrong thing.
'Graphs are a good thing, but if designers are left unchecked, their
tendency is to over-design. This can either obscure or even distort
information.'
The communication of information using graphs in corporate annual reports.
ACCA, 29 Lincoln's Inn Fields, London WC2A 3EE. Pounds 15
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Amstrad holders 'unlikely to do better than
30p'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMSTRAD shareholders should accept the 30p-a-share buy-out offer made by Mr
Alan Sugar, Kleinwort Benson, financial adviser to the board of the computer
and electronics company he founded, has recommended in the offer document.
A report commissioned by Kleinwort from Touche Ross, Amstrad's auditor,
warned that in the event of the company considering a voluntary liquidation
shareholders would be unlikely to get materially more than 30p a share.
Amstrad's net asset value was 46.3p per share at its June 30 financial
year-end.
Shareholders should also vote for the offer because Amstrad depended on the
'expertise and motivation' of Mr Sugar, Kleinwort said in the document
posted yesterday.
Mr Sugar planned to use a loan from Amstrad to finance part of the Pounds
112.7m purchase of the 66 per cent of the shares he does not own. This
arrangement would be 'fair and reasonable' to shareholders, Kleinwort said.
The document made it clear that dividends from Amstrad, once it was wholly
owned by Mr Sugar, would help repay some of the loans used to finance the
buy-out.
If shareholders rejected the offer, there would be little prospect in the
near future of Amstrad paying 'a significant regular dividend', Mr Sugar
warned in the document.
If shareholders accept the offer, the price would represent an annual rate
of return of approximately 27.9 per cent for those who bought shares at
Amstrad's 1980 flotation and subsequently took up his rights at the time of
two scrip issues and a rights issue.
However, if a shareholder bought nil paid rights at the time of Amstrad's
rights issue and took up those rights, the annual rate of return reduces to
about 8.6 per cent.
Mr Sugar intends to turn Amshold, the Jersey holding company which he set up
for the buy-out, into one of his main vehicles. In addition to holding the
shares in Amstrad, it would hold Amprop, a property dealing company wholly
owned by Mr Sugar and members of his family, as well as Tottenham Hotspur,
in which he has a 47.8 per cent holding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Harmony rebels accuse directors of
concealing group's true performance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HARMONY LEISURE, the public house group at the centre of a shareholder
battle for boardroom control, yesterday announced interim losses of Pounds
344,000 pre-tax on turnover of Pounds 3.09m.
The company blamed the losses for the six months to September 27, which
compared with profits of Pounds 445,000 on turnover of Pounds 3.81m, on
higher net interest charges - up from Pounds 239,000 to Pounds 248,000  -
and depreciation of assets.
Rebel shareholders hoping to oust the executive directors accused the
company of putting up a smokescreen on its true performance.
They claimed losses had been reduced only because the company had sold
several public houses to offset interest charges.
'On this theory, they would be pleased to have no turn over because it would
mean no losses,' said Mr Andrew Martyr, leader of the rebel group.
Harmony, however, denied that the sale of two of its sites was reflected in
the half year figures.
Mr Stanley Lever, managing director, said the company was making progress in
cutting administration expenses and operating losses - down to Pounds 96,000
from Pounds 210,000 last year.
The annual accounts to March 29 were qualified after Barclays, concerned at
the level of borrowings, insisted on a substantial loan repayment in January
next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Warburg joins Hoare as joint broker to
British Gas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
British Gas yesterday announced that SG Warburg Securities has been
appointed joint broker with Hoare Govett, which was taken over by the Dutch
bank ABN Amro earlier this year, writes Roland Rudd.
Hoare Govett was recently forced to give up being sole broker to RTZ, the
mining group, which appointed Cazenove as joint broker. Mr Peter
Meinertzhagen, Hoare Govett's chairman, said he was not concerned by the
decisions since most of the UK's big companies had joint brokers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Volex beats forecast with rise to Pounds
3.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PEARSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX PROFITS for the six months to September 30 at Volex, the electrical
interconnection products company, comfortably exceeded the 86 per cent
increase to Pounds 2.8m forecast in October, writes Peter Pearse.
Mr Howard Poulson, chairman, said that September's results - not in at the
time of the forecast - had been 'very good' and enabled pre-tax profits to
more than double to Pounds 3.21m (Pounds 1.48m).
Mr Poulson ascribed the advance in large part to the progressive reduction
of exposure to UK markets, mainly via acquisitions, and to 'the strategic
re-direction into higher margin products'.
Sales from overseas operations accounted for some 47 per cent of group
turnover of Pounds 42.7m (Pounds 41m) against 20 per cent last time. After
October's Pounds 6.5m acquisition of Mayor, the Singapore-based maker of
data and power cord assemblies, the figure will rise to about 60 per cent,
Mr Poulson said.
In wiring harnesses, which account for about a third of group sales, the
move away from the high volume car production market saw the closure of the
St Helens factory, which supplied Rover, and a greater emphasis on
agricultural and commercial vehicles as well as other transport areas.
Cable assemblies, boosted by the acquisitions of Cable Products in January
1992, Icontec in July 1993 and now Mayor, account for more than 50 per cent
of group sales.
Specialist cables suffered in the general economic climate but remained
profitable.
The interim dividend is maintained at 6.5p, payable from earnings per share
of 11.7p (6.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Former Mowlem men arrested in California
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO FRENCHMEN wanted in France for allegedly embezzling Dollars 8m (Pounds
5.2m) from a subsidiary of John Mowlem, the construction group, have been
arrested in California by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Mowlem said last night that it had made a provision of more than Pounds 4m
in its 1991 accounts to cover any loss. 'We cannot say any more about the
matter because the case is sub-judice,' the company added.
Mr Jean-Michel Garoscio, 31, and Mr Erwan Anger, 28, were arrested in
Monterey, where they were running a restaurant, according to the FBI.
The two men are being held without bail to await extradition proceedings to
France. They are sought by a court in Lyon on charges of misappropriating
corporate assets and forgery.
They were previously employed by HSS Location, a subsidiary of HSS Hire
Service Corporation, which is owned by Mowlem and rents tools to the
building trade.
It is alleged that Mr Garoscio and Mr Anger used a variety of schemes to
embezzle money from the company between 1988 and March 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Volex surpasses forecast with sharp advance
to Pounds 3.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PEARSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX PROFITS for the six months to September 30 at Volex, the electrical
interconnection products company, comfortably exceeded the 86 per cent
increase to Pounds 2.8m forecast in October.
Mr Howard Poulson, chairman, said that September's results - not in at the
time of the forecast - had been 'very good' and enabled pre-tax profits to
more than double to Pounds 3.21m (Pounds 1.48m).
Mr Poulson ascribed the advance in large part to the progressive reduction
of exposure to UK markets, mainly via acquisitions, and to 'the strategic
re-direction into higher margin products'.
Sales from overseas operations accounted for some 47 per cent of group
turnover of Pounds 42.7m (Pounds 41m), against 20 per cent last time. After
October's Pounds 6.5m acquisition of Mayor, the Singapore-based maker of
data and power cord assemblies, the figure will rise to about 60 per cent,
Mr Poulson said.
In wiring harnesses, which account for about a third of group sales, the
move away from the high volume car production market saw the closure of the
St Helens factory, which supplied Rover, and a greater emphasis on
agricultural and commercial vehicles as well as other transport areas.
Ionix, acquired in March, supplies harnesses to the aerospace industry and
Rolls-Royce.
Cable assemblies, boosted by the acquisitions of Cable Products in January
1992, Icontec in July 1993 and now Mayor, account for more than 50 per cent
of group sales. Mr Poulson said that demand was outstripping supply in both
Mayor and Pencon, which is benefiting from the expected safety legislation
requiring the pre-fitting of plugs to electrical appliances.
Specialist cables, said Mr Poulson, suffered in the general economic climate
but remained profitable.
He added that his medium-term plan was to introduce a fourth leg to Volex.
This would represent a move away from OEM (original equipment manufacturer)
products towards higher added value products, possibly branded.
The interim dividend is maintained at 6.5p, payable from earnings per share
of 11.7p (6.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: GrandMet's drinks side takes 30% of
Gonzalez Byass
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONAL Distillers &amp; Vintners, the drinks arm of Grand Metropolitan,
is to take a 30 per cent stake in Gonzalez Byass, the Spanish sherry and
brandy company.
It is understood the stake will cost about Pounds 40m, valuing Gonzalez at
more than Pounds 120m.
The deal gives IDV access to some of Spain's best known brands, including
Tio Pepe sherry. Gonzalez's fino sherry business also ties with IDV's Croft
Original pale cream sherry. 'There is almost a perfect fit,' according to Mr
Edwin Beckett, director of IDV corporate affairs.
Under the agreement, which is due to be completed later this month, IDV will
use its international distribution network to gradually start distributing
Gonzalez's main brands in markets outside Spain. Gonzalez will take over the
Spanish distribution of Cinzano, the Italian vermouth and wines company
where IDV took full control in January.
The distribution agreement does not include Japan and Switzerland, where
Gonzalez will retain its existing distributors. IDV is also unlikely to
assume UK distribution in the 'immediate' future.
Links between the two companies go back to earlier this century when two
members of the Gilbey family, former owner of IDV's Gilbey's gin, married
members of the Gonzalez family.
Gonzalez reported sales of Pta20bn (Pounds 116m) last year. Annual sales of
Soberano and Tio Pepe total 1.6m and 650,000 cases respectively.
Mr Beckett said Gonzalez wanted IDV to help build its brands into
international names. IDV would consider lifting its stake in Gonzalez if the
partnership worked.
IDV will appoint two directors to Gonzalez's board while Mr Carlos Gonzalez,
chairman, will join the board of IDV Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Chill wind of change at Mirror - Raymond
Snoddy on the Maxwell culture's decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWSPAPER editors live by the sword and usually die the same way. A dip in
circulation, a new proprietor or chief executive with different ideas is
usually enough to swell the ranks of former national newspaper editors.
The abrupt removal of Mr Richard Stott, the editor of the Daily Mirror as
his replacement Mr David Banks was flying in from Sydney, where he had
edited the Telegraph Mirror - has much wider significance.
It is the latest and most dramatic example of a revolution at Mirror Group
Newspapers.
The revolution is designed to purge those allegedly tainted by 'the Maxwell
culture' - though many people remain from the Maxwell era - and cut costs
and push up profits.
The impetus for change has come from the group of banks that effectively own
54 per cent of MGN, held as collateral for loans made to the private Maxwell
interests now in administration.
The banks have been persuaded that greater savings are possible and that
editorial costs at the left-of-centre popular newspaper group have survived
in their pre-Wapping purity.
The late Robert Maxwell, the argument goes, sorted out the printers with
consummate toughness but was soft on editorial because he believed he was a
journalist too.
Mr Banks stressed the importance of 'commercial dynamism ' as he took over
his new paper and there was an immediate ban on casual shifts.
MGN executives say several hundred casual shifts a week are worked.
In future the paper will be brought out largely by its staff journalists.
Ironically, the process of change almost certainly stemmed from a consortium
being put together by Hambros Bank to bid for MGN, a consortium that never
actually got anywhere.
The consortium included Mr David Montgomery, now chief executive of MGN, and
Lord Hollick, the Labour peer, and chief executive of MAI the media and
financial services group and a non-executive at the Mirror.
Mr Montgomery has been talking to Sir Robert Clark, MGN chairman, for months
and shadowing everything the group did.
The banks want to give themselves the widest range of options to either sell
out at a later stage to a single buyer, or sell their stake in tranches to
institutions.
Last month MGN announced pre-tax profits of Pounds 15.3m for the six months
to end-June.
Popular newspaper sales have been soft and in the depths of a recession, MGN
is believed to be Pounds 1m behind budget.
Some bankers are already anticipating a period - sometime in 1994 - when the
shares could 'suddenly start to motor.'
After new printing plants are successfully installed at the Scottish Daily
Record and Evening Mail, group debt will fall dramatically and cash flow
increase.
At present the Scottish titles have to turn away advertising during busy
times of the year because they are limited to 48 pages.
'He (David Montgomery) is doing exactly what needs to be done,' said Mr
Derek Terrington, publishing analyst at stockbrokers Kleinwort Benson. Mr
Terrington believes the share price could reach 130p by the end of next
year, ahead of the original Maxwell offer price of 125p.
The analyst believes the banks will wait until the share price is between
125p and 150p before they get out. Some banks may not want to wait so long.
Daily Mirror journalists take a more apocalyptic view of the changes, saying
yesterday they amounted to 'the beginning of the end of the Daily Mirror as
we knew it.'
Although assurances have been given that the Daily Mirror will continue to
try to help the election of a Labour Government, some of the old guard fear
an element of idealism will inevitably be lost.
Lord Hollick said yesterday any fears that the Daily Mirror's support for
the Labour Party would be diminished were totally misplaced.
'The task now is to have a strong and highly successful newspaper which
supports the Labour Party and which can be independently owned,' Lord
Hollick said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Waste Management ahead 62% to Pounds 40m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Waste Management International, the UK-quoted arm of Waste Management of
Chicago, yesterday reported a 62 per cent increase in third quarter profits
on sales ahead 41 per cent.
Pre-tax profits for the three months to end-September rose from Pounds 24.7m
to Pounds 40.1m
Third quarter earnings per share rose from 4.7p to 6.1p (12.5p for nine
months).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Brit Steel Pounds 51m loss as recession
deepens - Andrew Baxter considers the figures for the first half
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DEEPENING recession in the world steel market pushed British Steel into
a Pounds 51m pre-tax loss for the six months to October 3, and forced the
privatised group to pass its interim dividend.
The deficit was at the lower end of analysts' expectations, and compared
with a Pounds 19m profit last time.
The decision not to pay an interim (3p) was taken reluctantly, the company
explained, and reflected further recent deterioration in trading conditions
and the weak outlook both for demand and prices.
As for the final, the company will reconsider the position in June and
recommend the 'appropriate' level. In the absence of unforeseen
circumstances, this will be no less than 1p (1.5p.)
The company warned, that justifying a final significantly higher than 1p
will require an improvement in trading prospects, which in turn will depend
on prices. The total dividend in 1991-92 was 4.5p.
First-half turnover fell from Pounds 2.28bn to Pounds 2.21bn, while the
trading loss was Pounds 49m (profit of Pounds 30m). The pre-tax loss was
struck after a Pounds 2m exceptional debit comprising redundancy and other
rationalisation costs.
A Pounds 108m net cash flow outflow, however, on the exceptional items
contributed significantly to a Pounds 185m increase in net borrowings to
Pounds 196m, compared with Pounds 11m at the end of last year.
The net loss was Pounds 48m (Pounds 13m profit), and losses per share were
2.4p. This compared with earnings of 0.65p last time and losses of 1.7p for
the full year.
Cost reduction and plant rationalisation measures continued during the first
half. Employment in the UK fell by a further 3,000 to 41,800 people, due
mainly to the closure in June of the Ravenscraig works in Scotland. Overseas
employment stayed constant at 4,700.
A geographical breakdown of the results showed that the decline in the UK
market was the principle reason for the fall in turnover. Domestic sales
dropped from Pounds 1.29bn to Pounds 1.14bn.
In contrast, turnover in the European Community, excluding the UK, rose from
Pounds 595m to Pounds 656m, while US turnover jumped from Pounds 90m to
Pounds 105m. Turnover in Asia slipped from Pounds 132m to Pounds 121m.
In volume terms, the company sold 5.8m tonnes of products in the first half,
up from 5.7m tonnes a year earlier. For all of 1991-92, sales volume was
12.2m tonnes.
The company said late last month that it would cut its 'liquid steel make'
by up to 20 per cent or 600,000 tonnes in the current quarter, compared with
the same quarter last year, to bring production in line with demand.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Nestle buys Clarke ice-cream business
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES, Consumer Industries Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NESTLE, the world's largest food manufacturer, has bought most of the assets
of Clarke Foods, the UK's second largest ice-cream producer, which went into
receivership last month.
The Swiss group's purchase, from receivers Robson Rhodes, marks its first
move into the ice-cream market in the UK.
The value of the deal was not disclosed, though Nestle said it was not
assuming any of Clarke's debts, totalling about Pounds 25m.
The assets acquired include four factories and the ice-cream brands of the
Lyons Maid business, such as Fiesta, Zoom, Fab and Mivvi.
Clarke bought Lyons Maid for Pounds 12m last year but paid only Pounds 7.5m
of the price before going into receivership.
Mr Peter Blackburn, chairman of Nestle's UK subsidiary, said the brands had
a strong heritage and a great potential for development.
Nestle's immediate priority was to pick up the running of the business and
ensure continuity of supply.
The company is due to meet Clarke's management today and will spend several
weeks carrying out a detailed study of the business.
Clarke accounted for an estimated 13 per cent of total UK ice-cream sales of
about Pounds 800m last year. Its market share today is far lower, following
production problems which prevented it from achieving more than a quarter of
its planned sales last summer.
Since a severe shortage of working capital caused the company to be placed
in receivership, its workforce has been cut from about 600 to 300 people.
The company has factories in Greenford, Stourbridge, Telford and Liverpool
and recently invested modern production equipment. It also has eight sales
offices.
Nestle has ice-cream operations in France, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, the
US, Latin America and North Africa. It formed a joint venture earlier this
year with Dairy Farm of Hong Kong to make ice-cream in China.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Acquisitions provide lift at Jarvis Porter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A JUMP in interim profits at Jarvis Porter, which prints labels for the
spirits, toiletries and pharmaceutical industries, from Pounds 1.01m to
Pounds 1.85m pre-tax, pushed the shares 15p higher to 175p.
Profits in the six months to August 31 benefited from acquisitions, improved
margins and a swing from interest payable to receivable.
Mr Paul Jarvis, chairman, said he was pleased with the results. He said Mr
Richard Brewster, the chief executive who joined the group from David S
Smith, the paper and packaging group, in May last year, had brought Jarvis
Porter greater opportunities to expand by acquisition.
The shares are well above the 138p price at which the group placed shares in
July to finance a Pounds 11.4m acquisition of businesses from James Wilkes.
That deal went through in August, and the businesses were owned for three
weeks of the period. The results also included a full contribution from
Holmes McDougall, bought in June last year for Pounds 7m.
Sales rose 23 per cent to Pounds 16.4m and operating profits 60 per cent to
Pounds 1.84m. Operating margins were 11.3 per cent, compared to 8.6 per
cent, and 10.2 per cent for the 1991-92 year.
Net interest receivable was Pounds 12,000 compared to Pounds 142,000
payable. Earnings per share rose 65 per cent to 5.1p and the interim
dividend is increased from 1.4p to 1.5p.
COMMENT
Fans of Mr Brewster who bought shares in Jarvis Porter after his move there
last year will feel justified by these results. Already his first
acquisition is contributing well and the second appears promising too. More
are to be expected, although Mr Brewster is in no great rush and may be less
ambitious in the size of deal than he was at David S Smith. Specialisation
and solid finances are still to be the key words at Jarvis Porter. Current
year forecasts of about Pounds 4.5m pre-tax (up from Pounds 2.19m) suggest a
p/e of 16.4. This might look a bit steep but will still attract dedicated
followers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / UK Company News: BOC resilient to slowdown
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALTHOUGH BOC's pre-tax profits of Pounds 341.9m were at the lower end of
analysts' expectations, they nevertheless demonstrated the resilience of the
group's operations to the slowdown in the world economy. Mr Patrick Rich,
chairman, expressed pleasure at the figures. 'Our results show our ability
to ride out difficult economic conditions,' he said.
The gases business demonstrated modest growth thanks to relentless efforts
to improve operating efficiencies and reduce costs, said Mr Rich. Turnover
increased from Pounds 1.96bn to Pounds 2bn, while operating profits rose
from Pounds 261.5m to Pounds 287.4m. Adverse exchange rates reduced profits
by Pounds 6m. At constant exchange rates, turnover would have increased 4
per cent and operating profit 12 per cent.
Sales volumes of gases in the US and Australia were flat. A slowdown of the
rapid growth in the north Pacific region, particularly Japan, affected
results.
Demand for healthcare products had been less directly affected by economic
conditions, although some hospitals had delayed purchasing conditions, said
Mr Rich.
Healthcare turnover increased from Pounds 493m to Pounds 513m, but operating
profits fell 9 per cent to Pounds 98.9m. This was partly caused by
additional research and development costs for Delta Biotechnology
The pharmaceuticals operations enjoyed a particularly successful year
because of improved volumes and prices in the anaesthetics business
Vacuum and distribution operations, mostly related to clean-room technology
in the semi-conductor business, were badly hit by depressed capital
investment. It had been a difficult year said Mr Rich. Turnover was constant
at Pounds 282m, but operating profits declined 40 per cent to Pounds 19.7m.
Mr Rich said next year promised to be better, even without an improvement in
general economic activity.
BOC's European turnover increased from Pounds 826.2m to Pounds 866m, while
operating profits fell from Pounds 141.6m to Pounds 135.4m. Mr Rich said the
Edwards vacuum subsidiary and additional R&amp;D spend at Delta biotechnology
had reduced profitability. Industrial gas results had improved.
Mr Rich warned any recovery would be slow. However, the group had planned
accordingly. 'We are far from the end of cost-cutting,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-7347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKQCNADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921117
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 NOV 92 / Companies in this issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------
UK
 -----------------------------------
Allied-Lyons                24
Amstrad                     23
BOC                     22, 21
Bailey (CH)                 24
Black Arrow                 24
British Gas             23, 11
British Steel            22, 1
Claremont                   10
Clarke Foods                22
Ford Iveco Truck             8
GEC                         24
Grand Metropolitan          22
Harmony Leisure             23
Jarvis Porter               22
Kingfisher                  21
Mirror Group News           22
Mowlem (John)               23
Nesco Investments           24
Oglesby &amp; Butler            24
Platignum                   24
Priorywood                  24
Storehouse                  22
Towles                      24
Vibroplant                  24
Virgin Group                21
Volex 23
Waste Management            22
 -----------------------------------
Overseas
 -----------------------------------
ACIL                        29
AT&amp;T                    28, 21
Aber Resources              28
Avon Products               26
BNZ                         27
Banesto                     25
Bank Summa                  28
Barlow Rand                 27
Berkel's Patent             24
Blockbuster                 21
CSFB                        28
Caisse de Depots            25
Continental                 26
Daimler-Benz                21
Daiwa House Industry        27
Fay, Richwhite              27
Fiat                         8
Ford                         8
GM                          26
Gonzalez Byass              22
KLM                         28
K mart                      26
NAB                         27
Nedcor                      27
Nestle                      22
Nippon Housing Loan         27
Nomura Securities           27
Northwest Airlines          28
Paribas                     25
Petrobras                   28
Philip Morris               25
Pirelli                     25
Power Corp                  28
RJR Nabisco                 25
Repsol                      25
Skoda Automobilova          27
Staples Inc                 21
Telebras                    28
Telefonica                  25
Toys 'R' Us                 26
Westinghouse                28
Volkswagen                  27
 -----------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
